<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20110620170550.txt.gz
TIME:20110620170550
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
     Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 8.01. Other Events
In connection with the distribution of all of the common stock of AMC Networks Inc. (the "Company") by Cablevision Systems Corporation ("Cablevision") to Cablevision's stockholders (the "Distribution"), on June 20, 2011, Cablevision mailed to its stockholders of record on June 16, 2011, which was the record date of the Distribution, an Information Statement (the "Information Statement"). The Information Statement is substantially in the form attached as Exhibit 99.1 to the Amendment 6 to the Company's Form 10 filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on June 10, 2011, except for certain revisions to reflect expected changes in the Company's financing arrangements being entered into as part of the Distribution.
The Information Statement is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and the foregoing description of the changes is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Information Statement as so filed.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
     (d) Exhibits.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrants have duly caused this report to be signed on their behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Dated: June 20, 2011

Table of Contents
 
June 16, 2011
 
Dear Stockholder:
 
I am pleased to report that the previously announced spin-off by Cablevision Systems Corporation of its AMC Networks Inc. subsidiary is expected to become effective on June 30, 2011. AMC Networks Inc., a Delaware corporation, will become a public company on that date and will own the cable programming networks and related businesses currently owned and operated by Cablevision's Rainbow Media Holdings subsidiary. AMC Networks Inc.'s Class A Common Stock will be listed on The NASDAQ Stock Market LLC under the symbol "AMCX."
 
Holders of record of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock as of the close of business, New York City time, on June 16, 2011, which will be the record date, will receive one share of AMC Networks Inc. Class A Common Stock for every four shares of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock held. Holders of record of Cablevision NY Group Class B Common Stock as of the close of business on the record date will receive one share of AMC Networks Inc. Class B Common Stock for every four shares of Cablevision NY Group Class B Common Stock held. No action is required on your part to receive your AMC Networks Inc. stock. You will not be required either to pay anything for the new shares or to surrender any shares of Cablevision stock.
 
No fractional shares of AMC Networks Inc. stock will be issued. If you otherwise would be entitled to a fractional share you will receive a check for the cash value thereof, which generally will be taxable to you. In due course you will be provided with information to enable you to compute your tax bases in both the Cablevision and the AMC Networks Inc. stock. Cablevision has received a private letter ruling from the Internal Revenue Service and expects to obtain an opinion from Sullivan & Cromwell LLP to the effect that, for U.S. Federal income tax purposes, the distribution of the AMC Networks Inc. stock will be tax-free to Cablevision and to you to the extent that you receive AMC Networks Inc. stock.
 
The enclosed Information Statement describes the distribution of shares of AMC Networks Inc. stock and contains important information about AMC Networks Inc., including financial statements. I suggest that you read it carefully. If you have any questions regarding the distribution, please contact Cablevision's transfer agent, Wells Fargo Shareowner Services at
1-800-468-9716.
 
Sincerely,
 
/s/ Charles F. Dolan
Charles F. Dolan
Chairman
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
This Information Statement is being furnished in connection with the distribution by Cablevision Systems Corporation to holders of its common stock of all the outstanding shares of AMC Networks Inc. common stock. We have completed a series of transactions with Cablevision pursuant to which we own the cable programming networks and related businesses that were owned and operated by the Rainbow Media Holdings subsidiary of Cablevision, as described in this Information Statement.
 
Shares of our Class A Common Stock will be distributed to holders of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock of record as of the close of business, New York City time, on June 16, 2011, which will be the record date. Each such holder will receive one share of our Class A Common Stock for every four shares of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock held on the record date. Shares of our Class B Common Stock will be distributed to holders of Cablevision NY Group Class B Common Stock as of the close of business on the record date. Each holder of Cablevision NY Group Class B Common Stock will receive one share of our Class B Common Stock for every four shares of Cablevision NY Group Class B Common Stock held on the record date. The distribution will be effective at 11:59 p.m. on June 30, 2011. For Cablevision stockholders who own common stock in registered form, in most cases the transfer agent will credit their shares of AMC Networks Inc. common stock to book entry accounts established to hold their Cablevision common stock. Our distribution agent will mail these stockholders a statement reflecting their AMC Networks Inc. common stock ownership shortly after June 30, 2011. For stockholders who own Cablevision common stock through a broker or other nominee, their shares of AMC Networks Inc. common stock will be credited to their accounts by the broker or other nominee. Stockholders will receive cash in lieu of fractional shares, which generally will be taxable. See "The Distribution  Material U.S. Federal Income Tax Consequences of the Distribution."
 
No stockholder approval of the distribution is required or sought. We are not asking you for a proxy and you are requested not to send us a proxy. Cablevision stockholders will not be required to pay for the shares of our common stock to be received by them in the distribution, or to surrender or to exchange shares of Cablevision common stock in order to receive our common stock, or to take any other action in connection with the distribution. There is currently no trading market for our common stock. Our Class A Common Stock will be listed on The NASDAQ Stock Market LLC under the symbol "AMCX." We will not list our Class B Common Stock on any stock exchange.
 
IN REVIEWING THIS INFORMATION STATEMENT, YOU SHOULD CAREFULLY CONSIDER THE MATTERS DESCRIBED UNDER THE CAPTION "RISK FACTORS" BEGINNING ON PAGE 23.
 
NEITHER THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION NOR ANY STATE SECURITIES COMMISSION HAS APPROVED OR DISAPPROVED THESE SECURITIES OR DETERMINED IF THIS INFORMATION STATEMENT IS TRUTHFUL OR COMPLETE. ANY REPRESENTATION TO THE CONTRARY IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE.
 
 
THIS INFORMATION STATEMENT DOES NOT CONSTITUTE AN OFFER TO SELL OR THE SOLICITATION OF AN OFFER TO BUY ANY SECURITIES.
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
 
 
The following is a summary of some of the information contained in this Information Statement. This summary is included for convenience only and should not be considered complete. This summary is qualified in its entirety by the more detailed information contained elsewhere in this Information Statement, which should be read in its entirety.
 
Unless the context otherwise requires, all references to "we," "our," "us," "AMC Networks" or the "Company" refer to AMC Networks Inc., together with its direct and indirect subsidiaries. "AMC Networks Inc." refers to AMC Networks Inc. individually as a separate entity. Where we describe in this Information Statement our business activities, we do so as if the transfer of the Rainbow Media Holdings subsidiary of Cablevision Systems Corporation to AMC Networks Inc. had already occurred.
 
 
AMC Networks owns and operates several of cable television's most recognized brands delivering high quality content to audiences and a valuable platform to distributors and advertisers. Since our founding in 1980, we have been a pioneer in the cable television programming industry, having created or developed some of the leading programming networks. We have, since our inception, focused on programming of film and original productions, including through our creation of Bravo and AMC in 1980 and 1984, respectively. Bravo, which we sold to NBC Universal in 2002, was the first network dedicated to film and the performing arts. We have continued this dedication to quality programming and storytelling through our creation of The Independent Film Channel (today known as IFC) in 1994 and WE tv (which we launched as Romance Classics in 1997), and our acquisition of Sundance Channel in 2008.
 
We manage our business through two reportable operating segments: (i) National Networks, which includes AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel; and (ii) International and Other, which includes Channel Global, our international programming business; IFC Entertainment, our independent film distribution business; and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology (formerly Rainbow Network Communications), our network technical services business. Our National Networks are distributed throughout the United States via cable and other multichannel distribution platforms, including direct broadcast satellite ("DBS") and platforms operated by telecommunications providers (we refer collectively to these cable and other multichannel distributors as "multichannel video distributors" or "distributors"). In addition to our extensive U.S. distribution, AMC, IFC and Sundance Channel are available in Canada and Sundance Channel and WE tv are available in other countries throughout Europe and Asia. We earn revenue principally from the affiliation fees paid by distributors to carry our programming networks and from advertising sales. In 2010, affiliation fees and advertising sales accounted for 57% and 37%, respectively, of our total net revenues.
AMC/Sundance
 
National Networks
 
We own four nationally distributed entertainment programming networks: AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel, each of which are available to our distributors in high-definition and standard-definition formats. Our programming networks principally generate their revenues from affiliation fees paid by multichannel video distributors and from the sale of advertising, although we also earn ancillary revenues from sources such as digital and international program sales. As of December 31, 2010, AMC, WE tv and IFC had 96.4 million, 76.8 million and 62.7 million Nielsen subscribers, respectively, and Sundance Channel had 39.9 million viewing subscribers (for a discussion of the difference between Nielsen subscribers and viewing subscribers, see "Business  Subscriber and Viewer Measurement").
 
  AMC is a television network focused on the highest quality storytelling  both originally produced and curated, and delivered in series and feature-film form. AMC's programming includes Emmy and Golden Globe Award-winning or nominated original scripted dramatic television series such as , and , occasional mini-series such as and , and unscripted series and packaged movie events such as , and . In addition, with a comprehensive library of popular films, AMC also offers movie-based entertainment.
AMC.
Mad Men
Breaking Bad
The Walking Dead
Broken Trail
The Prisoner
Storymakers
DVDtv
AMC News
Table of Contents
  WE tv offers compelling, entertaining stories and focuses on programming of particular interest to women, with an emphasis on life events such as weddings, having children and raising a family. The programming features original series and specials, as well as feature films. WE tv's schedule includes original series such as , , and . Additionally, WE tv's programming includes series such as , and .
WE tv.
Bridezillas
My Fair Wedding with David Tutera
Joan and Melissa: Joan Knows Best?
Downsized
Ghost Whisperer
Charmed
Golden Girls
 
  IFC is a network dedicated to presenting an independent, alternative mindset through programming focused on independent film and original alternative comedy series. Since its launch in 1994, IFC has developed television programming that challenges the conventions of storytelling and provides a unique perspective to its audiences through its original series, notable independent film collection and cult television shows. The network's original content includes the David Cross comedy , and .
IFC.
The Increasingly Poor Decisions of Todd Margaret
The Onion News Network
Portlandia
 
  Sundance Channel is the television destination for independent-minded viewers. Benefitting from its relationship with the Sundance Institute and the renowned Sundance Film Festival, the network features independent films and original series showcasing innovative people and ideas in areas like invention, design, travel, enterprise and fashion. Launched in 1996 and acquired by us in 2008, Sundance Channel's programming celebrates fresh talent and seeks to champion new ideas.
Sundance Channel.
 
International and Other
 
In addition to our National Networks, we also operate AMC/Sundance Channel Global, which is our international programming business; IFC Entertainment, our independent film distribution business; and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, our network technical services business. Our International and Other segment also includes VOOM HD, an international programming service that we are in the process of winding-down.
 
  AMC/Sundance Channel Global's business principally consists of four distinct channels in six languages spread across eight countries, focusing primarily on AMC in Canada and global versions of the Sundance and WE tv brands. Principally generating revenues from affiliation fees, AMC/Sundance Channel Global reached approximately 8 million viewing subscribers in Canada, Europe and Asia as of December 31, 2010, and has broad availability to distributors in Europe and Asia.
AMC/Sundance Channel Global.
 
  IFC Entertainment encompasses our independent film distribution business, making independent films available to a national audience by initially releasing them in theaters as well as on platforms. IFC Entertainment operates multiple including Sundance Selects, IFC Films and IFC Midnight, which distribute critically acclaimed independent films across virtually all available media platforms, including theatrically and via DVDs, cable television and streaming to computers and other electronic devices. IFC Entertainment also operates the IFC Center and SundanceNow.
IFC Entertainment.
video-on-demand
sub-brands,
video-on-demand,
 
  AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology is a full-service network programming feed origination and distribution company, supplying an array of services to the network programming industry. AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology has nearly 30 years experience across its network services groups, including affiliate engineering, network operations, traffic and scheduling, that provide delivery of any programming network, in high definition or standard definition.
AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology.
day-to-day
 
Our Strengths
 
Our strengths include:
 
  We have operated in the cable programming industry for more than 30 years and over this time we have continually enhanced the value of our network portfolio. Our programming network brands are well known and well regarded by our key constituents  our viewers, distributors and advertisers  and have developed strong followings within their respective targeted demographics, increasing our value to distributors and advertisers. AMC (which targets adults aged 25 to 54), WE tv (which targets women aged 18 to 49), IFC (which targets men aged 18 to 49) and Sundance Channel (which targets adults aged 25 to 54) have established themselves as
Strong Industry Presence and Portfolio of Brands.
Table of Contents
important within their respective markets. Our deep and established presence in the industry lends us a high degree of credibility with distributors and content producers, and helps provide us with stable affiliate and studio relationships, advantageous channel placements and heightened viewer engagement.
 
  Our national networks are broadly distributed in the United States. AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel are each carried by all major multichannel video distributors. Our national networks are available to a significant percentage of subscribers in these distributors' systems. This broad distribution and penetration provides us with a strong national platform on which to maintain, promote and grow our business.
Broad Distribution and Penetration of our National Networks.
 
  We continually refine our mix of programming and, in addition to our popular film programming, have increasingly focused on highly visible, critically acclaimed original programming, including the award-winning , and other popular series and shows, such as , , and Our focus on quality original programming, targeted towards the audiences we seek to reach, has allowed us to increase in recent years our programming networks' ratings and their viewership within their respective targeted demographics.
Compelling Programming.
Mad Men
Breaking Bad
The Walking Dead, Bridezillas
Portlandia
The Onion News Network
Brick City.
 
  Our affiliation agreements with multichannel video distributors generate a recurring source of revenue. We generally seek to structure these agreements so that they are long-term in nature and to stagger their expiration dates, thereby increasing the predictability and stability of our affiliation fee revenues.
Recurring Revenue from Affiliation Agreements.
 
  Our national networks have a strong connection with each of their respective targeted demographics, which makes our programming networks an attractive platform to advertisers. Although all of our programming networks were originally operated without advertising, we have been incrementally migrating our portfolio to an advertiser-supported model. We have experienced significant growth in our advertising revenues in recent years, which has allowed us to develop high-quality programming.
Desirable Advertising Platform.
 
  We have a portfolio that includes higher-margin programming networks and faster-growing programming networks, through which we seek to grow both revenue and operating income. Our revenues, net, operating income and adjusted operating cash flow ("AOCF") increased at annual growth rates in 2010 versus the prior year of 10.7%, 17.7% and 10.2%, respectively. We achieved operating income margins and AOCF margins of 13.5%, 24.4% and 26.0%, and 32.0%, 37.4%, and 37.2%, respectively, in 2008, 2009 and 2010. For a reconciliation of AOCF, a non-GAAP financial measure, to operating income see "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations  Results of Operations  Statement of Operations Data."
Attractive Financial Profile.
 
Our Strategy
 
Our strategy is to maintain and improve our position as a leading programming and entertainment company by owning and operating several of the most popular and award-winning brands in cable television that create engagement with audiences globally across multiple media platforms. The key focuses of our strategy are:
 
  We intend to continue developing strong original programming across all of our programming networks to enhance our brands, strengthen our relationship with our viewers, distributors and advertisers, and increase distribution and audience ratings. We believe that our continued investment in original programming supports future growth in our two principal revenue streams  affiliation fee revenue from our distributors and advertising revenue. We also intend to expand the deployment of our original programming across multiple distribution platforms.
Continued Development of High-Quality Original Programming.
 
  Of our four national networks, only AMC is fully distributed in the United States. We intend to seek increased distribution of our other national networks to grow affiliate and advertising revenues. In addition, we have begun to expand the distribution of our programming networks around the globe.
Increased Distribution of our Programming Networks.
Table of Contents
  We have a proven track record of significantly increasing revenue by introducing advertising on networks that were previously not advertiser supported. We first accomplished this in 2002, when we moved AMC and WE tv to an advertiser-supported model. Most recently, in December 2010, we moved IFC to such a model. We seek to continue to evolve the programming on each of our networks to achieve even stronger viewer engagement within their respective core targeted demographics, thereby increasing the value of our programming to advertisers and allowing us to obtain higher advertising rates. For example, we have begun to refine the programming mix on IFC to include alternative comedy programming, such as and , in order to increase IFC's appeal to its targeted demographic of men aged 18 to 49. We are also continuing to seek additional advertising revenue at AMC and WE tv through higher Nielsen ratings in desirable demographics.
Continued Growth of Advertising Revenue.
The Onion News Network
Portlandia
 
  We believe that control (including long-term contract arrangements) and ownership of content is becoming increasingly important, and we intend to increase our control position over our programming content. We already control, own or have long-term license agreements covering significant portions of our content across our programming networks as well as in our independent film distribution business operated by IFC Entertainment. We intend to continue to focus on obtaining the broadest possible control rights (both as to territory and platforms) for our content.
Increased Control of Content.
 
  The technological landscape surrounding the distribution of entertainment content is continuously evolving as new digital platforms emerge. We intend to distribute our content across as many of these new platforms as possible, when it makes business sense to do so, so that our viewers can access our content where, when and how they want it. To that end, our programming networks are allowing many of our distributors to offer our content to subscribers on computers and other digital devices, and on platforms, all of which permit subscribers to access programs at their convenience. We also have launched our own digital platform, SundanceNow, which makes our IFC Entertainment library of independent films available to consumers in the United States and around the globe, and have made some of our content available on third-party digital platforms like iTunes and Netflix. Our national networks each host dedicated websites that promote their brands, provide programming information and provide access to content. In addition, AMC has acquired the film-focused websites filmsite.org and filmcritic.com, which together with amctv.com deliver over 4 million unique visitors each month.
Exploitation of Emerging Media Platforms.
video-on-demand
direct-to-consumer
 
Key Challenges
 
Following the Distribution, we may face a number of challenges, both pre-existing and as a result of the Distribution, including:
 
 
See "Risk Factors" for a discussion of these and other matters our stockholders should carefully consider in connection with the Distribution.
 
Company Information
 
We are a Delaware corporation with our principal executive offices at 11 Penn Plaza, New York, NY 10001. Our telephone number is AMC Networks Inc. is a holding company and conducts substantially all of its operations through its subsidiaries.
(212) 324-8500.
Table of Contents
AMC Networks Inc. was incorporated on March 9, 2011 as an indirect, wholly-owned subsidiary of Cablevision Systems Corporation ("Cablevision"). Cablevision's board of directors approved the Distribution (as defined below) on June 6, 2011 and the Company thereafter acquired 100% of the limited liability company interests in Rainbow Media Holdings LLC ("RMH"), the subsidiary of Cablevision through which Cablevision has historically owned the businesses described in this Information Statement. Certain businesses historically conducted by Cablevision through RMH, including News 12 Networks ("News 12") and Rainbow Advertising Sales Corporation ("RASCO"), have not been transferred to us and will remain as part of Cablevision following the Distribution.
Table of Contents
 
 
Please see "The Distribution" for a more detailed description of the matters described below.
 
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
 
 
The operating and balance sheet data included in the following selected financial data as of December 31, 2010 and 2009 and for each year in the three-year period ended December 31, 2010 have been derived from the audited annual consolidated financial statements of AMC Networks Inc. included elsewhere in this Information Statement, and the balance sheet data as of December 31, 2008, 2007 and 2006 and the income statement data for the years ended December 31, 2007 and 2006 have been derived from the unaudited annual consolidated financial statements of the Company, which are not included in this Information Statement. The operating and balance sheet data included in the following selected financial data for the three months ended and as of March 31, 2011 and 2010 have been derived from the unaudited interim consolidated financial statements of the Company and, in the opinion of the management of the Company, reflect all adjustments necessary for the fair presentation of such data for the respective interim periods. The financial information does not necessarily reflect what our results of operations and financial position would have been if we had operated as a separate publicly-traded entity during the periods presented. The results of operations for the three month period ended March 31, 2011 are not necessarily indicative of the results that might be expected for future interim periods or for the full year ending December 31, 2011. The selected financial data presented below should be read in conjunction with the annual and interim financial statements included elsewhere in this Information Statement and with "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" and "Unaudited Pro Forma Consolidated Financial Information."
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
The following is a brief summary of the terms of the Distribution. Please see "The Distribution" for a more detailed description of the matters described below.
 
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
 
 
General
 
All of our outstanding shares of Class A Common Stock will be distributed to the holders of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock and all of the outstanding shares of our Class B Common Stock will be distributed to the holders of Cablevision NY Group Class B Common Stock. We refer to this distribution of securities as the "Distribution." In the Distribution, each holder of Cablevision common stock will receive a distribution of one share of our common stock for every four shares of Cablevision common stock held as of the close of business, New York City time, on June 16, 2011, which will be the record date.
 
Manner of Effecting the Distribution
 
The general terms and conditions relating to the Distribution are set forth in the Distribution Agreement between us and Cablevision. Under the Distribution Agreement, the Distribution will be effective at 11:59 p.m. on June 30, 2011. For most Cablevision stockholders who own Cablevision common stock in registered form on the record date, our transfer agent will credit their shares of our common stock to book entry accounts established to hold these shares. Our distribution agent will send these stockholders a statement reflecting their ownership of our common stock. Book entry refers to a method of recording stock ownership in our records in which no physical certificates are used. For stockholders who own Cablevision common stock through a broker or other nominee, their shares of our common stock will be credited to these stockholders' accounts by the broker or other nominee. As further discussed below, fractional shares will not be distributed. Following the Distribution, stockholders whose shares are held in book entry form may request that their shares of our common stock be transferred to a brokerage or other account at any time, as well as delivery of physical stock certificates for their shares, in each case without charge.
 
CABLEVISION STOCKHOLDERS WILL NOT BE REQUIRED TO PAY FOR SHARES OF OUR COMMON STOCK RECEIVED IN THE DISTRIBUTION, OR TO SURRENDER OR EXCHANGE SHARES OF CABLEVISION COMMON STOCK IN ORDER TO RECEIVE OUR COMMON STOCK, OR TO TAKE ANY OTHER ACTION IN CONNECTION WITH THE DISTRIBUTION. NO VOTE OF CABLEVISION STOCKHOLDERS IS REQUIRED OR SOUGHT IN CONNECTION WITH THE DISTRIBUTION, AND CABLEVISION STOCKHOLDERS HAVE NO APPRAISAL RIGHTS IN CONNECTION WITH THE DISTRIBUTION.
 
Fractional shares of our common stock will not be issued to Cablevision stockholders as part of the Distribution or credited to book entry accounts. In lieu of receiving fractional shares, each holder of Cablevision common stock who would otherwise be entitled to receive a fractional share of our common stock will receive cash for the fractional interest, which generally will be taxable to such holder. An explanation of the tax consequences of the Distribution can be found below in the subsection captioned " Material U.S. Federal Income Tax Consequences of the Distribution." The distribution agent will, as soon as practicable after the Distribution date, aggregate fractional shares of our Class A Common Stock into whole shares and sell them in the open market at the prevailing market prices and distribute the aggregate proceeds, net of brokerage fees, ratably to Cablevision NY Group Class A stockholders otherwise entitled to fractional interests in our Class A Common Stock. Similarly, fractional shares of our Class B Common Stock will be aggregated, converted to Class A Common Stock, and sold in the public market by the distribution agent. The amount of such payments will depend on the prices at which the aggregated fractional shares are sold by the distribution agent in the open market shortly after the Distribution date.
 
See "Executive Compensation  Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards," for a discussion of how outstanding Cablevision options, restricted shares, restricted stock units and performance awards will be affected by the Distribution.
 
In order to be entitled to receive shares of our common stock in the Distribution, Cablevision stockholders must be stockholders of record of Cablevision common stock at the close of business, New York City time, on the record date, June 16, 2011.
Table of Contents
 
Concurrent Financing Transactions
 
As part of the Distribution, we will incur approximately $2,425,000,000 of New AMC Networks Debt, consisting of $1,725,000,000 aggregate principal amount of senior secured term loans and $700,000,000 aggregate principal amount of senior unsecured notes. A portion of the proceeds of the New AMC Networks Debt will be used to repay all outstanding Company debt (excluding capital leases) and approximately $1,275,000,000 of the New AMC Networks Debt will be issued to CSC Holdings, which will use such New AMC Networks Debt to satisfy and discharge outstanding Cablevision or CSC Holdings debt.
 
CSC Holdings will accomplish the satisfaction and discharge of the outstanding debt by entering into a transaction with the Exchange Entities, whereby CSC Holdings will exchange a portion of the New AMC Networks Debt for outstanding Cablevision or CSC Holdings debt, a substantial portion of which will have been acquired from Cablevision's lenders by the Exchange Entities for this purpose. Following the exchange, we expect that affiliates of the Exchange Entities, in an unrelated transaction, will syndicate our senior secured term loans to several lenders and distribute our senior unsecured notes in an exempt offering. See "Description of Financing Transactions and Certain Indebtedness."
 
Reasons for the Distribution
 
Cablevision's board of directors has determined that separation of our businesses from Cablevision's other businesses is in the best interests of Cablevision and its stockholders. The potential benefits considered by Cablevision's board of directors in making the determination to consummate the Distribution included the following:
 
 
Cablevision's board of directors believes that the aggregate stock price of Cablevision and the Company could potentially increase relative to the pre-Distribution value of outstanding Cablevision stock because the Distribution will permit investors to invest separately in AMC Networks and in the remaining businesses of Cablevision. This may make AMC Networks and Cablevision common stock more attractive to investors, as compared to Cablevision common stock before the Distribution, because the common stock of each of AMC Networks and Cablevision will become available to classes of investors who seek an investment that offers the growth, risk and sector exposure of either AMC Networks or Cablevision, but not that of the combined company. There can be no assurance, however, as to the future market price of AMC Networks or Cablevision common stock. See "Risk Factors  The combined post-Distribution value of Cablevision and AMC Networks shares may not equal or exceed the pre-Distribution value of Cablevision shares."
 
Cablevision's board of directors also considered several factors that might have a negative effect on Cablevision as a result of the Distribution. Cablevision's board of directors considered that the Distribution would result in substantial reductions to the restricted payments baskets under various debt instruments of Cablevision and its subsidiary, CSC Holdings. Moreover, the Distribution would separate from Cablevision the businesses of the Company, which represent significant value, in a transaction that produces no direct economic consideration for Cablevision, other than the debt reduction noted above. Because the Company will no longer be a wholly-owned subsidiary of Cablevision, the Distribution also will affect the terms of, or limit the incentive for, or the ability of Cablevision to pursue, cross-company business transactions and initiatives with AMC Networks since, as separate public companies, such transactions and initiatives will need to be assessed by each company from its own business perspective. Finally, following the Distribution, Cablevision and its remaining businesses will need to absorb corporate and administrative costs previously allocated to its Rainbow segment.
Table of Contents
Cablevision's board of directors considered certain aspects of the Distribution that may be adverse to the Company. The Company's common stock may come under initial selling pressure as certain Cablevision stockholders sell their shares in the Company because they are not interested in holding an investment in the Company's businesses. Moreover, certain factors such as a lack of historical financial and performance data as an independent company may limit investors' ability to appropriately value the Company's common stock. Furthermore, because the Company will no longer be a wholly-owned subsidiary of Cablevision, the Distribution also will limit the ability of the Company to pursue cross-company business transactions and initiatives with other businesses of Cablevision.
 
Results of the Distribution
 
After the Distribution, we will be a public company owning and operating the network programming and related businesses (other than the regional programming and advertising sales businesses discussed under "Summary  Our Company") historically owned by Cablevision through RMH, a wholly-owned indirect subsidiary of Cablevision. Immediately after the Distribution, we expect to have approximately 1,000 holders of record of our Class A Common Stock and 26 holders of record of our Class B Common Stock and approximately 57.9 million shares of Class A Common Stock and approximately 13.5 million shares of Class B Common Stock outstanding, based on the number of record stockholders and outstanding shares of Cablevision common stock on May 31, 2011 and after giving effect to the delivery to stockholders of cash in lieu of fractional shares of our common stock. The actual number of shares to be distributed will be determined on the record date. You can find information regarding options to purchase our common stock that will be outstanding after the Distribution in the section captioned, "Executive Compensation  Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards." We and Cablevision will both be controlled by Charles F. Dolan, our Executive Chairman, members of his family and certain related family entities.
 
Prior to the Distribution, we have entered or will enter into several agreements with Cablevision (and certain of its subsidiaries and affiliates) in connection with, among other things, employee matters, tax, transition services and a number of ongoing commercial relationships, including affiliation agreements with respect to our programming networks.
 
The Distribution will not affect the number of outstanding shares of Cablevision common stock or any rights of Cablevision stockholders.
 
Material U.S. Federal Income Tax Consequences of the Distribution
 
The following is a summary of the material U.S. federal income tax consequences of the Distribution to us, Cablevision and Cablevision stockholders. This summary is based on the Code, the Treasury regulations promulgated under the Code, and interpretations of such authorities by the courts and the IRS, all as in effect as of the date of this Information Statement and all of which are subject to change at any time, possibly with retroactive effect. This summary is limited to holders of Cablevision common stock that are U.S. holders, as defined below, that hold their shares of Cablevision common stock as capital assets within the meaning of section 1221 of the Code. Further, this summary does not discuss all tax considerations that may be relevant to holders of Cablevision common stock in light of their particular circumstances, nor does it address the consequences to holders of Cablevision common stock subject to special treatment under the U.S. federal income tax laws, such as tax-exempt entities, partnerships (including entities treated as partnerships for U.S. federal income tax purposes), persons who acquired such shares of Cablevision common stock pursuant to the exercise of employee stock options or otherwise as compensation, financial institutions, insurance companies, dealers or traders in securities, and persons who hold their shares of Cablevision common stock as part of a straddle, hedge, conversion, constructive sale, synthetic security, integrated investment or other risk-reduction transaction for U.S. federal income tax purposes. This summary does not address any U.S. federal estate, gift or other non-income tax consequences or any applicable state, local, foreign, or other tax consequences. Each stockholder's individual circumstances may affect the tax consequences of the Distribution.
Table of Contents
For purposes of this summary, a "U.S. holder" is a beneficial owner of Cablevision common stock that is, for U.S. federal income tax purposes:
 
 
If a partnership (including any entity treated as a partnership for U.S. federal income tax purposes) holds shares of Cablevision common stock, the tax treatment of a partner in the partnership generally will depend upon the status of the partner and the activities of the partnership. A partner of a partnership holding shares of Cablevision common stock should consult its tax advisor regarding the tax consequences of the Distribution.
 
Cablevision has received a private letter ruling from the IRS to the effect that, among other things, the Distribution, and certain related transactions, including (i) the contribution by CSC Holdings of certain assets to the Company, (ii) the receipt by CSC Holdings of Company common stock, a portion of the New AMC Networks Debt, and the potential assumption of certain liabilities by the Company and (iii) the expected exchange transaction with the Exchange Entities whereby CSC Holdings will transfer such portion of the New AMC Networks Debt to the Exchange Entities in return for the transfer to CSC Holdings of approximately $1,250,000,000 of outstanding Cablevision or CSC Holdings debt, will qualify for tax-free treatment under the Code to Cablevision, the Company, and holders of Cablevision common stock. In addition, Cablevision expects to obtain an opinion from Sullivan & Cromwell LLP substantially to the effect that, among other things, the Distribution and certain related transactions will qualify for tax-free treatment under the Code to Cablevision, the Company, and holders of Cablevision common stock, and that accordingly, for U.S. federal income tax purposes, no gain or loss will be recognized by, and no amount will be included in the income of, a holder of Cablevision common stock upon the receipt of shares of our common stock pursuant to the Distribution, except to the extent such holder receives cash in lieu of fractional shares of our common stock.
 
Although a private letter ruling from the IRS generally is binding on the IRS, if the factual representations or assumptions made in the letter ruling request are untrue or incomplete in any material respect, we will not be able to rely on the ruling. Furthermore, the IRS will not rule on whether a distribution satisfies certain requirements necessary to obtain tax-free treatment under the Code. Rather, the ruling is based upon representations by Cablevision that these conditions have been satisfied, and any inaccuracy in such representations could invalidate the ruling. The opinion discussed above addresses all of the requirements necessary for the Distribution and certain related transactions to obtain tax-free treatment under the Code and is based on, among other things, certain assumptions and representations made by Cablevision and us, which if incorrect or inaccurate in any material respect would jeopardize the conclusions reached by counsel in such opinion. The opinion will not be binding on the IRS or the courts.
 
On the basis of the ruling and the opinion we expect to receive, and assuming that Cablevision common stock is a capital asset in the hands of a Cablevision stockholder on the Distribution date:
 
Table of Contents
 
 
If the Distribution does not qualify for tax-free treatment for U.S. federal income tax purposes then, in general, Cablevision would recognize taxable gain in an amount equal to the excess of the fair market value of the common stock of our Company over Cablevision's tax basis therein, i.e., as if it had sold the common stock of our Company in a taxable sale for its fair market value. In addition, the receipt by Cablevision's stockholders of common stock of our Company would be a taxable distribution, and each U.S. holder that participated in the Distribution would recognize a taxable distribution as if the U.S. holder had received a distribution equal to the fair market value of our common stock that was distributed to him or her, which generally would be treated first as a taxable dividend to the extent of Cablevision's earnings and profits, then as a non-taxable return of capital to the extent of each U.S. holder's tax basis in his or her Cablevision common stock, and thereafter as capital gain with respect to any remaining value.
 
Even if the Distribution otherwise qualifies for tax-free treatment under the Code, the Distribution may be disqualified as tax-free to Cablevision and would result in a significant U.S. federal income tax liability to Cablevision (but not to holders of Cablevision common stock) under Section 355(e) of the Code if the Distribution were deemed to be part of a plan (or series of related transactions) pursuant to which one or more persons acquire, directly or indirectly, stock representing a 50% or greater interest by vote or value, in Cablevision or us. For this purpose, any acquisitions of Cablevision's stock or our stock within the period beginning two years before the Distribution and ending two years after the Distribution are presumed to be part of such a plan, although Cablevision or we may be able to rebut that presumption. The process for determining whether a prohibited acquisition has occurred under the rules described in this paragraph is complex, inherently factual and subject to interpretation of the facts and circumstances of a particular case. Cablevision or we might inadvertently cause or permit a prohibited change in the ownership of Cablevision or us to occur, thereby triggering tax to Cablevision, which could have a material adverse effect. If such an acquisition of our stock or Cablevision's stock triggers the application of Section 355(e), Cablevision would recognize taxable gain equal to the excess of the fair market value of the common stock of our Company held by it immediately before the Distribution over Cablevision's tax basis therein, but the Distribution would remain tax-free to each Cablevision stockholder. In certain circumstances, under the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement between Cablevision and us, it is expected that we would be required to indemnify Cablevision against that taxable gain if it were triggered by an acquisition of our stock. See "Certain Relationships and Related Party Transactions  Relationship Between Cablevision and Us After the Distribution  Tax Disaffiliation Agreement" for a more detailed discussion of the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement between Cablevision and us.
 
Payments of cash in lieu of a fractional share of any common stock of our Company made in connection with the Distribution may, under certain circumstances, be subject to backup withholding, unless a holder provides proof of an applicable exception or a correct taxpayer identification number, and otherwise complies with the applicable requirements of the backup withholding rules. Any amounts withheld under the backup withholding rules are not additional tax and may be refunded or credited against the holder's U.S. federal income tax liability, provided that the holder furnishes the required information to the IRS.
Table of Contents
U.S. Treasury regulations require certain Cablevision stockholders with significant ownership in Cablevision that receive shares of our stock in the Distribution to attach to their U.S. federal income tax return for the year in which such stock is received a detailed statement setting forth such data as may be appropriate to show that the Distribution is tax-free under the Code. Within a reasonable period of time after the Distribution, Cablevision will provide its stockholders who receive our common stock pursuant to the Distribution with the information necessary to comply with such requirement.
 
Cablevision and the Company have determined that the Company will not be deemed to be a United States real property holding corporation as of the Distribution date, as defined in section 897(c)(2) of the Code.
 
EACH CABLEVISION STOCKHOLDER SHOULD CONSULT HIS OR HER TAX ADVISOR ABOUT THE PARTICULAR CONSEQUENCES OF THE DISTRIBUTION TO SUCH STOCKHOLDER, INCLUDING THE APPLICATION OF STATE, LOCAL AND FOREIGN TAX LAWS, AND POSSIBLE CHANGES IN TAX LAW THAT MAY AFFECT THE TAX CONSEQUENCES DESCRIBED ABOVE.
 
Listing and Trading of Our Common Stock
 
There is not currently a public market for our common stock. Our Class A Common Stock will be listed on NASDAQ under the symbol "AMCX." It is anticipated that trading will commence on a when-issued basis prior to the Distribution. On the first trading day following the Distribution date, when-issued trading in our Class A Common Stock will end and regular-way trading will begin. "When-issued trading" refers to trading which occurs before a security is actually issued. These transactions are conditional, with settlement to occur if and when the security is actually issued and NASDAQ determines transactions are to be settled. "Regular-way trading" refers to normal trading transactions, which are settled by delivery of the securities against payment on the third business day after the transaction.
 
We cannot assure you as to the price at which our Class A Common Stock will trade before, on or after the Distribution date. Until our Class A Common Stock is fully distributed and an orderly market develops in our Class A Common Stock, the price at which such stock trades may fluctuate significantly. In addition, the combined trading prices of our Class A Common Stock and Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock held by stockholders after the Distribution may be less than, equal to or greater than the trading price of the Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock prior to the Distribution. Our Class B Common Stock will not be listed on a securities exchange or publicly traded.
 
The shares of our common stock distributed to Cablevision stockholders will be freely transferable, except for shares received by people who may have a special relationship or affiliation with us or shares subject to contractual restrictions. People who may be considered our affiliates after the Distribution generally include individuals or entities that control, are controlled by, or are under common control with us. This may include certain of our officers, directors and significant stockholders. Persons who are our affiliates will be permitted to sell their shares only pursuant to an effective registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"), or an exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act, or in compliance with Rule 144 under the Securities Act. As described under "Shares Eligible for Future Sale  Registration Rights Agreements," certain persons will have registration rights with respect to our stock.
 
Reason for Furnishing this Information Statement
 
This Information Statement is being furnished by Cablevision solely to provide information to stockholders of Cablevision who will receive shares of our common stock in the Distribution. It is not, and is not to be construed as, an inducement or encouragement to buy or sell any of our securities. We will not update the information in this Information Statement except in the normal course of our respective public disclosure obligations and practices.
Table of Contents
 
 
You should carefully consider the following risk factors and all the other information contained in this Information Statement in evaluating us and our common stock.
 
Risks Relating to Our Business
 
Our business depends on the appeal of our programming to our distributors and our viewers, which may be unpredictable and volatile.
 
Our business depends in part upon viewer preferences and audience acceptance of the programming on our networks. These factors are often unpredictable and volatile, and subject to influences that are beyond our control, such as the quality and appeal of competing programming, general economic conditions and the availability of other entertainment activities. We may not be able to anticipate and react effectively to shifts in tastes and interests in our markets. A change in viewer preferences could cause our programming to decline in popularity, which could cause a reduction in advertising revenues and jeopardize renewal of our contracts with distributors. In addition, our competitors may have more flexible programming arrangements, as well as greater amounts of available content, distribution and capital resources, and may be able to react more quickly than we can to shifts in tastes and interests.
 
To an increasing extent, the success of our business depends on original programming, and our ability to predict accurately how audiences will respond to our original programming is particularly important. Because original programming often involves a greater degree of commitment on our part, as compared to acquired programming that we license from third parties, and because our network branding strategies depend significantly on a relatively small number of original programs, a failure to anticipate viewer preferences for such programs could be especially detrimental to our business.
 
In addition, feature films constitute a significant portion of the programming on our AMC, IFC and Sundance Channel programming networks. In general, the popularity of feature-film content on linear television is declining, due in part to the broad availability of such content through an increasing number of distribution platforms. Should the popularity of feature-film programming suffer significant further declines, we may lose viewership or be forced to rely more heavily on original programming, which could increase our costs.
 
If our programming does not gain the level of audience acceptance we expect, or if we are unable to maintain the popularity of our programming, our ratings may suffer, which will negatively affect advertising revenues, and we may have a diminished bargaining position when dealing with distributors, which could reduce our affiliation fee revenues. We cannot assure you that we will be able to maintain the success of any of our current programming, or generate sufficient demand and market acceptance for our new programming.
 
If economic instability persists in the United States or in other parts of the world, our results of operations could be adversely affected.
 
Our business is significantly affected by prevailing economic conditions. We derive substantial revenues from advertising spending by U.S. businesses, and these expenditures are sensitive to general economic conditions and consumer buying patterns. Financial instability or a general decline in economic conditions in the United States could adversely affect advertising rates and volume, resulting in a decrease in our advertising revenues.
 
Decreases in U.S. consumer discretionary spending may affect cable television and other video service subscriptions, in particular with respect to digital service tiers on which certain of our programming networks are carried. This could lead to a decrease in the number of subscribers receiving our programming from multichannel video distributors, which could have a negative impact on our viewing subscribers and affiliation fee revenues. Similarly, a decrease in viewing subscribers would also have a negative impact on the number of viewers actually watching the programs on our programming networks, which could also impact the rates we are able to charge advertisers.
Table of Contents
Furthermore, world-wide financial instability may affect our ability to penetrate new markets. Because our networks are highly distributed in the United States, our ability to expand the scope of our operations internationally is important to the continued growth of our business. Our inability to negotiate favorable affiliation agreements with foreign distributors or to secure advertisers for those markets could negatively affect our results of operations.
 
Because a limited number of distributors account for a large portion of our business, the loss of any significant distributor would adversely affect our revenues.
 
Our programming networks depend upon agreements with a limited number of cable television system operators and other multichannel video distributors. In 2010, Comcast and DirecTV each accounted for at least 10% of our net revenues. The loss of any significant distributor could have a material adverse effect on our revenues.
 
In addition, we have in some instances made upfront payments to distributors in exchange for additional subscribers or have agreed to waive or accept lower affiliation fees if certain numbers of additional subscribers are provided. We also may help fund our distributors' efforts to market our programming networks or we may permit distributors to offer promotional periods without payment of subscriber fees. As we continue our efforts to add viewing subscribers, our net revenues may be negatively affected by these deferred carriage fee arrangements, discounted subscriber fees or other payments.
 
If we are unable to renew our programming networks' affiliation agreements, some of which expire in 2011 and 2012, our revenues will be negatively affected.
 
Our programming networks have affiliation agreements that will expire in 2011 and 2012. As of December 31, 2010, these affiliation agreements covered approximately 11%, 26%, 19% and 33%, respectively, of the subscribers of AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel. Failure to renew these affiliation agreements, or other agreements expiring after this time, could have a material adverse effect on our business. A reduced distribution of our programming networks would adversely affect our affiliation fee revenue, and impact our ability to sell advertising or the rates we charge for such advertising. Even if affiliation agreements are renewed, we cannot assure you that the renewal rates will equal or exceed the rates that we currently charge these distributors.
 
Furthermore, the largest multichannel video distributors have significant leverage in their relationship with programming networks. The two largest cable distributors provide service to approximately 35 percent of U.S. households receiving cable or DBS service, while the two largest DBS distributors provide service to an additional 33 percent of such households. Further consolidation among multichannel video distributors could increase this leverage.
 
In some cases, if a distributor is acquired, the affiliation agreement of the acquiring distributor will govern following the acquisition. In those circumstances, the acquisition of a distributor that is party to one or more affiliation agreements with our programming networks on terms that are more favorable to us could adversely impact our financial condition and results of operations.
 
We are subject to intense competition, which may have a negative effect on our profitability or on our ability to expand our business.
 
The cable programming industry is highly competitive. Our programming networks compete with other programming networks and other types of video programming services for marketing and distribution by cable and other multichannel video distribution systems. In distributing a programming network, we face competition with other providers of programming networks for the right to be carried by a particular cable or other multichannel video distribution system and for the right to be carried by such system on a particular "tier" of service.
 
Certain programming networks affiliated with broadcast networks like NBC, ABC, CBS or Fox may have a competitive advantage over our programming networks in obtaining distribution through the "bundling" of
Table of Contents
carriage agreements for such programming networks with a distributor's right to carry the affiliated broadcasting network. In addition, our ability to compete with certain programming networks for distribution may be hampered because the cable television or other multichannel video distributors through which we seek distribution may be affiliated with these programming networks Because such distributors may have a substantial number of subscribers, the ability of such programming networks to obtain distribution on the systems of affiliated distributors may lead to increased affiliation and advertising revenue for such programming networks because of their increased penetration compared to our programming networks. Even if the affiliated distributors carry our programming networks, they may place their affiliated programming network on a more desirable tier, thereby giving their affiliated programming network a competitive advantage over our own. In addition, following the Distribution, we will no longer be owned by Cablevision, which could impact the competitive landscape in which we operate because some of our distributors have other commercial relationships with Cablevision. Because of these other relationships, the Company has from time to time in the past achieved greater distribution or more favorable terms than it might have achieved as a standalone company. Following the Distribution, our ability to pursue cross-company initiatives that might provide such benefits will be limited, since as separate public companies, we and Cablevision will each need to assess any such initiatives from our own business perspective.
.
 
In addition to competition for distribution, we also face intense competition for viewing audiences with other cable and broadcast programming networks, home video products and Internet-based video content providers, some of which are part of large diversified entertainment or media companies that have substantially greater resources than us. To the extent that our viewing audiences are eroded by competition with these other sources of programming content, our ratings would decline, negatively affecting advertising revenues, and we may face difficulty renewing affiliation agreements with distributors on acceptable terms, which could cause affiliation fee revenues to decline. In addition, competition for advertisers with these content providers, as well as with other forms of media (including print media, Internet websites and radio), could affect the amount we are able to charge for advertising time on our programming networks, and therefore our advertising revenues.
 
An important part of our strategy involves exploiting identified markets of the cable television viewing audience that are generally well defined and limited in size. Our programming networks have faced and will continue to face increasing competition obtaining distribution and attracting advertisers as other programming networks seek to serve the same or similar markets.
 
Our programming networks' success depends upon the availability of programming that is adequate in quantity and quality, and we may be unable to secure or maintain such programming.
 
Our programming networks' success depends upon the availability of quality programming, particularly original programming and films, that is suitable for our target markets. While we produce some of our original programming, we obtain most of the programming on our networks (including original programming, films and other acquired programming) through agreements with third parties that have produced or control the rights to such programming. These agreements expire at varying times and may be terminated by the other party if we are not in compliance with their terms.
 
We compete with other programming networks to secure desired programming. Competition for programming has increased as the number of programming networks has increased. Other programming networks that are affiliated with programming sources such as movie or television studios or film libraries may have a competitive advantage over us in this area. In addition to other cable programming networks, we also compete for programming with national broadcast television networks, local broadcast television stations, services and Internet-based content delivery services, such as Netflix, iTunes and Hulu. Some of these competitors have exclusive contracts with motion picture studios or independent motion picture distributors or own film libraries.
video-on-demand
 
We cannot assure you that we will ultimately be successful in negotiating renewals of our programming rights agreements or in negotiating adequate substitute agreements in the event that these agreements expire or are terminated.
Table of Contents
Our programming networks have entered into long-term programming acquisition contracts that require substantial payments over long periods of time, even if we do not use such programming to generate revenues.
 
Our programming networks have entered into numerous contracts relating to the acquisition of programming, including rights agreements with film companies. These contracts typically require substantial payments over extended periods of time. We must make the required payments under these contracts even if we do not use the programming.
 
Increased programming costs may adversely affect our profits.
 
We incur costs for the creative talent, including actors, writers and producers, who create our original programming. Some of our original programming has achieved significant popularity and critical acclaim, which could increase the costs of such programming in the future. An increase in the costs of programming may lead to decreased profitability or otherwise adversely affect our business.
 
We may not be able to adapt to new content distribution platforms and to changes in consumer behavior resulting from these new technologies, which may adversely affect our business.
 
We must successfully adapt to technological advances in our industry, including the emergence of alternative distribution platforms. Our ability to exploit new distribution platforms and viewing technologies will affect our ability to maintain or grow our business. Additionally, we must adapt to changing consumer behavior driven by advances such as digital video recorders (or "DVRs"), Internet-based content delivery and mobile devices. Such changes may impact the revenues we are able to generate from our traditional distribution methods, either by decreasing the viewership of our programming networks on cable and other multichannel video distribution systems or by making advertising on our programming networks less valuable to advertisers. If we fail to adapt our distribution methods and content to emerging technologies, our appeal to our targeted audiences might decline and there could be a negative effect on our business.
video-on-demand,
 
Our business is limited by regulatory constraints, both domestic and foreign, which may adversely impact our operations.
 
Although our business generally is not directly regulated by the Federal Communications Commission (the "FCC"), under the Communications Act of 1934, there are certain FCC regulations that govern our business either directly or indirectly. See "Business  Regulation." Furthermore, to the extent that regulations and laws, either presently in force or proposed, hinder or stimulate the growth of the cable television and satellite industries, our business will be affected.
 
The U.S. Congress and the FCC currently have under consideration, and may in the future adopt, new laws, regulations and policies regarding a wide variety of matters that could, directly or indirectly, affect our operations.
 
The regulation of cable television services and satellite carriers is subject to the political process and has been in constant flux over the past two decades. Further material changes in the law and regulatory requirements must be anticipated. We cannot assure you that our business will not be adversely affected by future legislation, new regulation or deregulation.
 
An important aspect of our growth strategy involves the expansion of our programming networks and brands into markets outside the United States. The distribution of our programming networks in foreign markets is subject to laws and regulations specific to those countries. Changes in laws and regulations of foreign jurisdictions could adversely affect our business and ability to access new foreign markets.
 
If our technology facility fails or its operations are disrupted, our performance could be hindered.
 
Our programming is transmitted by our subsidiary, AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology. AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology uses its technology facility for a variety of purposes, including signal processing, program editing, promotions, creation of programming segments to fill short gaps between
Table of Contents
featured programs, quality control, and live and recorded playback. Like other facilities, this facility is subject to interruption from fire, lightning, adverse weather conditions and other natural causes. Equipment failure, employee misconduct or outside interference could also disrupt the facility's services. Although we have an arrangement with a third party to re-broadcast the previous 48 hours of our networks' programming in the event of a disruption, we currently do not have a backup operations facility for our programming.
 
In addition, we rely on third-party satellites in order to transmit our programming signals to our distributors. As with all satellites, there is a risk that the satellites we use will be damaged as a result of natural or man-made causes, or will otherwise fail to operate properly. Although we maintain in-orbit protection providing us with satellite transmission facilities should our primary satellites fail, there can be no assurance that such transmission facilities will be effective or will not themselves fail.
back-up
back-up
 
Any significant interruption at AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology's facility affecting the distribution of our programming, or any failure in satellite transmission of our programming signals, could have an adverse effect on our operating results and financial condition.
 
The loss of any of our key personnel and artistic talent could adversely affect our business.
 
We believe that our future success will depend to a significant extent upon the performance of our senior executives. We do not maintain "key man" insurance. In addition, we depend on the availability of a number of writers, directors, producers and others, who are employees of third-party production companies that create our original programming. The loss of any significant personnel or talent could have an adverse effect on our business.
 
Risks Related to the Distribution and the Financing Transactions
 
Our substantial debt and high leverage could adversely affect our business.
 
Following the Distribution, we will have a significant amount of debt. On the pro forma basis described under "Unaudited Pro Forma Consolidated Financial Information," assuming we had completed the Distribution and the financing transactions described in this Information Statement (including incurrence of the New AMC Networks Debt) as of March 31, 2011, we would have had $2,425 million of total debt, $1,725 million of which would have been senior secured debt under our new senior secured credit facilities and $700 million of which would have been senior unsecured debt.
 
Our substantial amount of debt could have important consequences. For example, it could:
 
 
In addition, as described under "Description of Financing Transactions and Certain Indebtedness," we will incur, in connection with the Distribution, a significant amount of debt for which we will not receive any cash proceeds, but which will instead be issued to Cablevision in partial consideration for the transfer to us of the cable programming networks and related businesses described in this Information Statement and currently owned by Cablevision's RMH subsidiary. As a result, we will significantly increase the amount of leverage in our business. This will increase the riskiness of our business and of an investment in our common stock. Furthermore, in the long-term, we do not expect to generate sufficient cash from operations to repay at maturity the debt that will be incurred as part of the Distribution. As a result, we will be dependent upon our
Table of Contents
ability to access the capital and credit markets. Failure to raise significant amounts of funding to repay these obligations at maturity could adversely affect our business. If we are unable to raise such amounts, we would need to take other actions including selling assets, seeking strategic investments from third parties or reducing other discretionary uses of cash.
 
A substantial portion of our debt will bear interest at variable rates. If market interest rates increase, variable rate debt will create higher debt service requirements, which could adversely affect our cash flow. While we may enter into hedging agreements limiting our exposure to higher interest rates, any such agreements may not offer complete protection from this risk.
 
Because there has not been any public market for our common stock, the market price and trading volume of our common stock may be volatile and you may not be able to resell your shares at or above the initial market price of our stock following the Distribution.
 
Prior to the Distribution, there will have been no trading market for our common stock. We cannot predict the extent to which investors' interest will lead to a liquid trading market or whether the market price of our common stock will be volatile. The market price of our common stock could fluctuate significantly for many reasons, including in response to the risk factors listed in this Information Statement or for reasons unrelated to our specific performance, such as reports by industry analysts, investor perceptions, or negative developments for our customers, competitors or suppliers, as well as general economic and industry conditions.
 
The combined post-Distribution value of Cablevision and AMC Networks shares may not equal or exceed the pre-Distribution value of Cablevision shares.
 
After the Distribution, Cablevision NY Group Class A Shares will continue to be listed and traded on the New York Stock Exchange. AMC Networks Inc. Class A Common Stock will be listed on NASDAQ under the symbol "AMCX." We cannot assure you that the combined trading prices of Cablevision NY Group Class A Shares and AMC Networks Inc. Class A Common Stock after the Distribution, as adjusted for any changes in the combined capitalization of these companies, will be equal to or greater than the trading price of Cablevision NY Group Class A Shares prior to the Distribution. Until the market has fully evaluated the business of Cablevision without the business of AMC Networks, the price at which Cablevision NY Group Class A Shares trade may fluctuate significantly. Similarly, until the market has fully evaluated the business of AMC Networks, the price at which shares of AMC Networks Inc. Class A Common Stock trade may fluctuate significantly.
 
The agreements governing our debt, including our new senior secured credit facilities and the indenture governing our senior unsecured notes, contain various covenants that impose restrictions on us that may affect our ability to operate our business.
 
The agreement governing our new senior secured credit facilities and the indenture governing our senior unsecured notes will contain covenants that, among other things, limit our ability to:
 
 
Our new senior secured credit facility will also require us to comply with specified financial ratios and tests, including, but not limited to, leverage ratios limiting the amount of our total debt and our senior debt to multiples of our annualized cash flow, an interest coverage ratio requiring that our trailing six-month cash
Table of Contents
flow exceed a multiple of our interest expense, and a debt service coverage ratio requiring that our annualized cash flow exceed a multiple of our debt service requirements.
 
See "Description of Financing Transactions and Certain Indebtedness  Senior Secured Credit Facilities" and " Senior Notes" for details of these financial ratios and tests.
 
Various risks, uncertainties and events beyond our control could affect our ability to comply with these covenants and maintain these financial tests and ratios. Failure to comply with any of the covenants in our existing or future financing agreements could result in a default under those agreements and under other agreements containing cross-default provisions. A default would permit lenders to accelerate the maturity for the debt under these agreements and to foreclose upon any collateral securing the debt. Under these circumstances, we might not have sufficient funds or other resources to satisfy all of our obligations, including our obligations under the notes. In addition, the limitations imposed by financing agreements on our ability to incur additional debt and to take other actions might significantly impair our ability to obtain other financing.
 
The Distribution could result in significant tax liability.
 
Cablevision has received a private letter ruling from the IRS to the effect that, among other things, the Distribution, and certain related transactions, including (i) the contribution by CSC Holdings of certain assets to the Company, (ii) the receipt by CSC Holdings of Company common stock, a portion of the New AMC Networks Debt, and the potential assumption of certain liabilities by the Company and (iii) the expected exchange transaction with the Exchange Entities whereby CSC Holdings will transfer such portion of the New AMC Networks Debt to the Exchange Entities in return for the transfer to CSC Holdings of approximately $1,250,000,000 of outstanding Cablevision or CSC Holdings debt, will qualify for tax-free treatment under the Code to Cablevision, the Company, and holders of Cablevision common stock. In addition, Cablevision expects to obtain an opinion from Sullivan & Cromwell LLP substantially to the effect that, among other things, the Distribution and certain related transactions will qualify for tax-free treatment under the Code to Cablevision, the Company, and holders of Cablevision common stock, and that accordingly, for U.S. federal income tax purposes, no gain or loss will be recognized by, and no amount will be included in the income of, a holder of Cablevision common stock upon the receipt of shares of our common stock pursuant to the Distribution, except to the extent such holder receives cash in lieu of fractional shares of our common stock.
 
Although a private letter ruling from the IRS generally is binding on the IRS, if the factual representations or assumptions made in the letter ruling request are untrue or incomplete in any material respect, we will not be able to rely on the ruling. Furthermore, the IRS will not rule on whether a distribution satisfies certain requirements necessary to obtain tax-free treatment under the Code. Rather, the ruling is based upon representations by Cablevision that these conditions have been satisfied, and any inaccuracy in such representations could invalidate the ruling. The opinion discussed above addresses all of the requirements necessary for the Distribution and certain related transactions to obtain tax-free treatment under the Code and is based on, among other things, certain assumptions and representations made by Cablevision and us, which if incorrect or inaccurate in any material respect would jeopardize the conclusions reached by counsel in such opinion. The opinion will not be binding on the IRS or the courts. See "The Distribution  Material U.S. Federal Income Tax Consequences of the Distribution."
 
If the Distribution does not qualify for tax-free treatment for U.S. federal income tax purposes, then, in general, Cablevision would be subject to tax as if it had sold the common stock of our Company in a taxable sale for its fair market value. Cablevision's stockholders would be subject to tax as if they had received a distribution equal to the fair market value of our common stock that was distributed to them, which generally would be treated first as a taxable dividend to the extent of Cablevision's earnings and profits, then as a non-taxable return of capital to the extent of each stockholder's tax basis in his or her Cablevision stock, and thereafter as capital gain with respect to the remaining value. It is expected that the amount of any such taxes to Cablevision's stockholders and Cablevision would be substantial. See "The Distribution  Material U.S. Federal Income Tax Consequences of the Distribution."
Table of Contents
We may have a significant indemnity obligation to Cablevision if the Distribution is treated as a taxable transaction.
 
We have entered into a Tax Disaffiliation Agreement with Cablevision, which sets out each party's rights and obligations with respect to deficiencies and refunds, if any, of federal, state, local or foreign taxes for periods before and after the Distribution and related matters such as the filing of tax returns and the conduct of IRS and other audits. Pursuant to the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement, we will be required to indemnify Cablevision for losses and taxes of Cablevision resulting from the breach of certain covenants and for certain taxable gain recognized by Cablevision, including as a result of certain acquisitions of our stock or assets. If we are required to indemnify Cablevision under the circumstances set forth in the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement, we may be subject to substantial liabilities, which could materially adversely affect our financial position.
 
The tax rules applicable to the Distribution may restrict us from engaging in certain corporate transactions or from raising equity capital beyond certain thresholds for a period of time after the Distribution.
 
To preserve the tax-free treatment of the Distribution to Cablevision and its stockholders, under the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement with Cablevision, for the two-year period following the Distribution, we will be subject to restrictions with respect to:
 
 
Furthermore, the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement limits our ability to pre-pay, pay down, redeem, retire, or otherwise acquire a portion of the New AMC Networks Debt. These restrictions may limit our ability during such period to pursue strategic transactions of a certain magnitude that involve the issuance or acquisition of our stock or engage in new businesses or other transactions that might increase the value of our business. These restrictions may also limit our ability to raise significant amounts of cash through the issuance of stock, especially if our stock price were to suffer substantial declines, or through the sale of certain of our assets. For more information, see the sections entitled "The Distribution  Material U.S. Federal Income Tax Consequences of the Distribution" and "Certain Relationships and Related Party Transactions  Relationship Between Cablevision and Us After the Distribution  Tax Disaffiliation Agreement."
 
Our historical financial results as a business segment of Cablevision and our unaudited pro forma consolidated financial statements may not be representative of our results as a separate, stand-alone company.
 
The historical financial information we have included in this Information Statement has been derived from the consolidated financial statements and accounting records of Cablevision and does not necessarily reflect what our financial position, results of operations or cash flows would have been had we operated as a separate, stand-alone company during the periods presented. Although Cablevision accounted for our Company as a business segment, we were not operated as a separate, stand-alone company for the historical periods presented. The historical costs and expenses reflected in our consolidated financial statements include an
Table of Contents
allocation for certain corporate functions historically provided by Cablevision, including general corporate expenses and employee benefits and incentives. These allocations were based on what we and Cablevision considered to be reasonable reflections of the historical utilization levels of these services required in support of our business. Our historical costs have also included a management fee paid to Cablevision based upon certain of our revenues. The historical information does not necessarily indicate what our results of operations, financial position, cash flows or costs and expenses will be in the future. Our pro forma financial information set forth under "Unaudited Pro Forma Consolidated Financial Information" reflects changes that may occur in our funding and operations as a result of the separation. However, there can be no assurances that this unaudited pro forma consolidated financial information will reflect our costs as a separate, stand-alone company.
 
Our ability to operate our business effectively may suffer if we do not, quickly and effectively, establish our own financial, administrative and other support functions in order to operate as a separate, company, and we cannot assure you that the transition services Cablevision has agreed to provide us will be sufficient for our needs.
stand-alone
 
Historically, we have relied on financial, administrative and other resources of Cablevision to support the operation of our business. In conjunction with our separation from Cablevision, we will need to expand our financial, administrative and other support systems or contract with third parties to replace certain of Cablevision's systems. We will also need to maintain our own credit and banking relationships and perform our own financial and operational functions. We cannot assure you that we will be able to successfully put in place the financial, operational and managerial resources necessary to operate as a public company or that we will be able to be profitable doing so. Any failure or significant downtime in our own financial or administrative systems or in Cablevision's financial or administrative systems during the transition period could impact our results or prevent us from performing other administrative services and financial reporting on a timely basis and could materially harm our business, financial condition and results of operations.
 
We may incur material costs and expenses as a result of our separation from Cablevision, which could adversely affect our profitability.
 
We may incur costs and expenses (excluding the management fees paid to Cablevision) greater than those we currently incur as a result of our separation from Cablevision. These increased costs and expenses may arise from various factors, including financial reporting, costs associated with complying with federal securities laws (including compliance with the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002), tax administration, and legal and human resources related functions. Although Cablevision will continue to provide certain of these services to us under a transition services agreement, such services are for a limited period of time. We cannot assure you that these costs will not be material to our business.
 
If, following the Distribution, we are unable to satisfy the requirements of Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, or our internal control over financial reporting is not effective, the reliability of our financial statements may be questioned and our stock price may suffer.
 
Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 requires any company subject to the reporting requirements of the U.S. securities laws to do a comprehensive evaluation of its and its consolidated subsidiaries' internal control over financial reporting. To comply with this statute, we will eventually be required to document and test our internal control procedures, our management will be required to assess and issue a report concerning our internal control over financial reporting, and our independent auditors will be required to issue an opinion on their audit of our internal control over financial reporting. The rules governing the standards that must be met for management to assess our internal control over financial reporting are complex and require significant documentation, testing and possible remediation to meet the detailed standards under the rules. During the course of its testing, our management may identify material weaknesses or deficiencies which may not be remedied in time to meet the deadline imposed by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. If our management cannot favorably assess the effectiveness of our internal control over financial
Table of Contents
reporting or our auditors identify material weaknesses in our internal controls, investor confidence in our financial results may weaken, and our stock price may suffer.
 
We are controlled by the Dolan family, which may create certain conflicts of interest and which means certain stockholder decisions can be taken without the consent of the majority of the holders of our Class A Common Stock.
 
We have two classes of common stock:
 
 
As of the Distribution date, the Dolan family, including trusts for the benefit of members of the Dolan family, will collectively own all of our Class B Common Stock, less than 4% of our outstanding Class A Common Stock and approximately 71% of the total voting power of all our outstanding common stock. Of this amount, Cablevision's Chairman, Charles F. Dolan, our Executive Chairman, and his spouse will control approximately 38% of our outstanding Class B Common Stock, less than 1% of our outstanding Class A Common Stock and approximately 27% of the total voting power of all our outstanding common stock. The members of the Dolan family holding Class B Common Stock will execute prior to the Distribution a stockholders agreement pursuant to which, among other things, the voting power of the holders of our Class B Common Stock will be cast as a block with respect to all matters to be voted on by holders of Class B Common Stock. The Dolan family is able to prevent a change in control of our Company and no person interested in acquiring us will be able to do so without obtaining the consent of the Dolan family.
 
Charles F. Dolan, members of his family and certain related family entities, by virtue of their stock ownership, have the power to elect all of our directors subject to election by holders of Class B Common Stock and are able collectively to control stockholder decisions on matters on which holders of all classes of our common stock vote together as a single class. These matters could include the amendment of some provisions of our certificate of incorporation and the approval of fundamental corporate transactions.
 
In addition, the affirmative vote or consent of the holders of at least 66/% of the outstanding shares of the Class B Common Stock, voting separately as a class, is required to approve:
2
3
 
 
As a result, Charles F. Dolan, members of his family and certain related family entities also collectively have the power to prevent such issuance or amendment.
 
We have adopted a written policy whereby an independent committee of our Board of Directors will review and approve or take such other action as it may deem appropriate with respect to certain transactions involving the Company and its subsidiaries, on the one hand, and certain related parties, including Charles F. Dolan and certain of his family members and related entities on the other hand. See "Certain Relationships and Related Party Transactions  Related Party Transaction Approval Policy." This policy will not address all possible conflicts which may arise, and there can be no assurance that this policy will be effective in dealing with conflict scenarios.
 
The members of the Dolan family group have entered into an agreement with the Company in which they agree that during the period beginning on the Distribution date, the Dolan family group must obtain the prior approval of a majority of the Company's independent directors prior to acquiring common stock of the Company through a tender offer that results in members of the Dolan family group owning more than 50% of the total number of outstanding shares of common stock of the Company. For purposes of this agreement, the term "independent directors" means the directors of the Company who have been determined by our Board of Directors to be independent directors for purposes of NASDAQ corporate governance standards.
12-month
Table of Contents
We will be a "controlled company" for NASDAQ purposes, which allows us not to comply with certain of the corporate governance rules of NASDAQ.
 
We have been informed that Charles F. Dolan, members of his family and certain related family entities have entered into a stockholders agreement relating, among other things, to the voting of their shares of our Class B Common Stock. As a result, following the Distribution, we will be a "controlled company" under the corporate governance rules of NASDAQ. As a controlled company, we will have the right to elect not to comply with the corporate governance rules of NASDAQ requiring: (i) a majority of independent directors on our Board of Directors, (ii) an independent compensation committee and (iii) an independent corporate governance and nominating committee. Our Board of Directors has elected for the Company to be treated as a "controlled company" under NASDAQ corporate governance rules and not to comply with the NASDAQ requirement for a majority independent board of directors and an independent corporate governance and nominating committee because of our status as a controlled company.
 
Future stock sales could adversely affect the trading price of our Class A Common Stock following the Distribution.
 
All of the shares of Class A Common Stock will be freely tradable without restriction or further registration under the Securities Act unless the shares are owned by our "affiliates" as that term is defined in the rules under the Securities Act. Shares held by "affiliates" may be sold in the public market only if registered or if they qualify for an exemption from registration under Rule 144 which is summarized under "Shares Eligible for Future Sale." Further, we plan to file a registration statement to cover the shares issued under our equity-based benefit plans.
 
As described under "Shares Eligible for Future Sale  Registration Rights Agreements," certain parties have registration rights covering a portion of our shares. We have entered into registration rights agreements with Charles F. Dolan, members of his family, certain Dolan family interests and the Dolan Family Foundations that provide them with "demand" and "piggyback" registration rights with respect to approximately 15.9 million shares of Class A Common Stock, including shares issuable upon conversion of shares of Class B Common Stock. Sales of a substantial number of shares of Class A Common Stock could adversely affect the market price of the Class A Common Stock and could impair our future ability to raise capital through an offering of our equity securities.
 
We share a senior executive and certain directors with Cablevision and The Madison Square Garden Company, which may give rise to conflicts.
 
Following the Distribution, our Executive Chairman, Charles F. Dolan, will also continue to serve as the Chairman of Cablevision. As a result, following the Distribution, a senior executive officer of the Company will not be devoting his full time and attention to the Company's affairs. In addition, eight members of our Board of Directors are also directors of Cablevision and seven members of our Board are also directors of The Madison Square Garden Company ("MSG"), an affiliate of Cablevision. These directors may have actual or apparent conflicts of interest with respect to matters involving or affecting each company. For example, there will be the potential for a conflict of interest when we on one hand, and Cablevision or MSG on the other hand, consider acquisitions and other corporate opportunities that may be suitable for us and either or both of them. Also, conflicts may arise if there are issues or disputes under the commercial arrangements that will exist between Cablevision or MSG and us. In addition, after the Distribution, certain of our directors and officers, including Charles F. Dolan, will continue to own Cablevision or MSG stock and options to purchase, and stock appreciation rights in respect of, Cablevision or MSG stock, as well as cash performance awards with any payout based on Cablevision's or MSG's performance, which they acquired or were granted prior to the Distribution. These ownership interests could create actual, apparent or potential conflicts of interest when these individuals are faced with decisions that could have different implications for our Company, Cablevision or MSG. See "Certain Relationships and Related Party Transactions  Certain Relationships and Potential Conflicts of Interest" for a discussion of certain procedures we will institute to help ameliorate such potential conflicts that may arise.
Table of Contents
Our overlapping directors and executive officer with Cablevision and Madison Square Garden may result in the diversion of corporate opportunities to and other conflicts with Cablevision or Madison Square Garden and provisions in our amended and restated certificate of incorporation may provide us no remedy in that circumstance.
 
The Company's amended and restated certificate of incorporation will acknowledge that directors and officers of the Company may also be serving as directors, officers, employees, consultants or agents of Cablevision and its subsidiaries or MSG and its subsidiaries and that the Company may engage in material business transactions with such entities. The Company will renounce its rights to certain business opportunities and the Company's amended and restated certificate of incorporation will provide that no director or officer of the Company who is also serving as a director, officer, employee, consultant or agent of Cablevision and its subsidiaries or MSG and its subsidiaries will be liable to the Company or its stockholders for breach of any fiduciary duty that would otherwise exist by reason of the fact that any such individual directs a corporate opportunity (other than certain limited types of opportunities set forth in our certificate of incorporation) to Cablevision or any of its subsidiaries or MSG or any of its subsidiaries instead of the Company, or does not refer or communicate information regarding such corporate opportunities to the Company. These provisions in our amended and restated certificate of incorporation will also expressly validate certain contracts, agreements, assignments and transactions (and amendments, modifications or terminations thereof) between the Company and Cablevision or any of its subsidiaries or MSG or any of its subsidiaries and, to the fullest extent permitted by law, provide that the actions of the overlapping directors or officers in connection therewith are not breaches of fiduciary duties owed to the Company, any of its subsidiaries or their respective stockholders. See "Description of Capital Stock  Certain Corporate Opportunities and Conflicts."
Table of Contents
 
 
AMC Networks Inc. was incorporated on March 9, 2011 as an indirect, wholly-owned subsidiary of Cablevision Systems Corporation ("Cablevision"). Our principal executive offices are located at 11 Penn Plaza, New York, NY 10001, and our telephone number is
(212) 324-8500.
 
Cablevision's board of directors approved the Distribution on June 6, 2011 and the Company thereafter acquired 100% of the limited liability company interests in RMH, the subsidiary of Cablevision through which Cablevision has historically owned the businesses described in this Information Statement. Where we describe in this Information Statement our business activities, we do so as if the transfer of RMH to AMC Networks Inc. had already occurred. Unless the context otherwise requires, all references to "we," "our," "us," "AMC Networks" or the "Company" refer to AMC Networks Inc., together with its direct and indirect subsidiaries. "AMC Networks Inc." refers to AMC Networks Inc. individually as a separate entity.
 
Our Company
 
AMC Networks owns and operates several of cable television's most recognized brands delivering high quality content to audiences and a valuable platform to distributors and advertisers. Since our founding in 1980, we have been a pioneer in the cable television programming industry, having created or developed some of the leading programming networks. We have, since our inception, focused on programming of film and original productions, including through our creation of Bravo and AMC in 1980 and 1984, respectively. Bravo, which we sold to NBC Universal in 2002, was the first network dedicated to film and the performing arts. We have continued this dedication to quality programming and storytelling through our creation of The Independent Film Channel (today known as IFC) in 1994 and WE tv (which we launched as Romance Classics in 1997), and our acquisition of Sundance Channel in 2008.
 
We manage our business through two reportable operating segments: (i) National Networks, which includes AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel; and (ii) International and Other, which includes Channel Global, our international programming business; IFC Entertainment, our independent film distribution business; and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, our network technical services business. Our National Networks are distributed throughout the United States via cable and other multichannel distribution platforms, including DBS and platforms operated by telecommunications providers. In addition to our extensive U.S. distribution, AMC, IFC and Sundance Channel are available in Canada and Sundance Channel and WE tv are available in other countries throughout Europe and Asia. We earn revenue principally from the affiliation fees paid by distributors to carry our programming networks and from advertising sales. In 2010, affiliation fees and advertising sales accounted for 57% and 37%, respectively, of our total net revenues.
AMC/Sundance
 
Our Strengths
 
Our strengths include:
 
  We have operated in the cable programming industry for more than 30 years and over this time we have continually enhanced the value of our network portfolio. Our programming network brands are well known and well regarded by our key constituents  our viewers, distributors and advertisers  and have developed strong followings within their respective targeted demographics, increasing our value to distributors and advertisers. AMC (which targets adults aged 25 to 54), WE tv (which targets women aged 18 to 49), IFC (which targets men aged 18 to 49) and Sundance Channel (which targets adults aged 25 to 54) have established themselves as important within their respective markets. Our deep and established presence in the industry lends us a high degree of credibility with distributors and content producers, and helps provide us with stable affiliate and studio relationships, advantageous channel placements and heightened viewer engagement.
Strong Industry Presence and Portfolio of Brands.
 
  Our national networks are broadly distributed in the United States. AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel are each carried by all major multichannel video distributors. Our national networks are available to a significant percentage of
Broad Distribution and Penetration of our National Networks.
Table of Contents
subscribers in these distributors' systems. This broad distribution and penetration provides us with a strong national platform on which to maintain, promote and grow our business.
 
  We continually refine our mix of programming and, in addition to our popular film programming, have increasingly focused on highly visible, critically acclaimed original programming, including the award-winning , and other popular series and shows, such as , , and Our focus on quality original programming, targeted towards the audiences we seek to reach, has allowed us to increase in recent years our programming networks' ratings and their viewership within their respective targeted demographics.
Compelling Programming.
Mad Men
Breaking Bad
The Walking Dead, Bridezillas
Portlandia
The Onion News Network
Brick City.
 
  Our affiliation agreements with multichannel video distributors generate a recurring source of revenue. We generally seek to structure these agreements so that they are long-term in nature and to stagger their expiration dates, thereby increasing the predictability and stability of our affiliation fee revenues.
Recurring Revenue from Affiliation Agreements.
 
  Our national networks have a strong connection with each of their respective targeted demographics, which makes our programming networks an attractive platform to advertisers. Although all of our programming networks were originally operated without advertising, we have been incrementally migrating our portfolio to an advertiser-supported model. We have experienced significant growth in our advertising revenues in recent years, which has allowed us to develop high-quality programming.
Desirable Advertising Platform.
 
  We have a portfolio that includes higher-margin programming networks and faster-growing programming networks, through which we seek to grow both revenue and operating income. Our revenues, net, operating income and AOCF increased at annual growth rates in 2010 versus the prior year of 10.7%, 17.7% and 10.2%, respectively. We achieved operating income margins and AOCF margins of 13.5%, 24.4% and 26.0%, and 32.0%, 37.4%, and 37.2%, respectively, in 2008, 2009 and 2010. For a reconciliation of AOCF, a non-GAAP financial measure, to operating income see "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations  Results of Operations  Statement of Operations Data."
Attractive Financial Profile.
 
Our Strategy
 
Our strategy is to maintain and improve our position as a leading programming and entertainment company by owning and operating several of the most popular and award-winning brands in cable television that create engagement with audiences globally across multiple media platforms. The key focuses of our strategy are:
 
  We intend to continue developing strong original programming across all of our programming networks to enhance our brands, strengthen our relationship with our viewers, distributors and advertisers, and increase distribution and audience ratings. We believe that our continued investment in original programming supports future growth in our two principal revenue streams  affiliation fee revenue from our distributors and advertising revenue. We also intend to expand the deployment of our original programming across multiple distribution platforms.
Continued Development of High-Quality Original Programming.
 
  Of our four national networks, only AMC is fully distributed in the United States. We intend to seek increased distribution of our other national networks to grow affiliate and advertising revenues. In addition, we have begun to expand the distribution of our programming networks around the globe. We first expanded beyond the U.S. market with the launch in Canada of IFC (in 2001) and AMC (in 2006), and we have recently also launched Sundance Channel in the Canadian market. We are building on this base by distributing an international version of Sundance Channel, which is currently distributed in four countries in Europe and two countries in Asia, with additional expansion planned in 2011 and future years. We have also launched an international version of WE tv in three countries in Asia, with further expansion planned in other Asian markets.
Increased Distribution of our Programming Networks.
 
  We have a proven track record of significantly increasing revenue by introducing advertising on networks that were previously not advertiser supported. We first
Continued Growth of Advertising Revenue.
Table of Contents
accomplished this in 2002, when we moved AMC and WE tv to an advertiser-supported model. Most recently, in December 2010, we moved IFC to such a model. We seek to continue to evolve the programming on each of our networks to achieve even stronger viewer engagement within their respective core targeted demographics, thereby increasing the value of our programming to advertisers and allowing us to obtain higher advertising rates. For example, we have begun to refine the programming mix on IFC to include alternative comedy programming, such as and , in order to increase IFC's appeal to its targeted demographic of men aged 18 to 49. We are also continuing to seek additional advertising revenue at AMC and WE tv through higher Nielsen ratings in desirable demographics.
The Onion News Network
Portlandia
 
  We believe that control (including long-term contract arrangements) and ownership of content is becoming increasingly important, and we intend to increase our control position over our programming content. We already control, own or have long-term license agreements covering significant portions of our content across our programming networks as well as in our independent film distribution business operated by IFC Entertainment. We intend to continue to focus on obtaining the broadest possible control rights (both as to territory and platforms) for our content.
Increased Control of Content.
 
  The technological landscape surrounding the distribution of entertainment content is continuously evolving as new digital platforms emerge. We intend to distribute our content across as many of these new platforms as possible, when it makes business sense to do so, so that our viewers can access our content where, when and how they want it. To that end, our programming networks are allowing many of our distributors to offer our content to subscribers on computers and other digital devices, and on platforms, all of which permit subscribers to access programs at their convenience. We also have launched our own digital platform, SundanceNow, which makes our IFC Entertainment library of independent films available to consumers in the United States and around the globe, and have made some of our content available on third-party digital platforms like iTunes and Netflix. Our national networks each host dedicated websites that promote their brands, provide programming information and provide access to content. In addition, AMC has acquired the film-focused websites filmsite.org and filmcritic.com, which together with amctv.com deliver over 4 million unique visitors each month.
Exploitation of Emerging Media Platforms.
video-on-demand
direct-to-consumer
 
National Networks
 
We own four nationally distributed entertainment programming networks: AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel (which we acquired in June 2008), each of which are available to our distributors in high-definition and standard-definition formats. Our programming networks principally generate their revenues from affiliation fees paid by multichannel video distributors and from the sale of advertising, although we also earn ancillary revenues from sources such as digital and international program sales. As of December 31, 2010, AMC, WE tv and IFC had 96.4 million, 76.8 million and 62.7 million Nielsen subscribers, respectively, and Sundance Channel had 39.9 million viewing subscribers (for a discussion of the difference between Nielsen subscribers and viewing subscribers, see " Subscriber and Viewer Measurement").
 
AMC
 
AMC is a television network focused on the highest quality storytelling  both originally produced and curated, and delivered in series and feature-film form. AMC's programming includes Emmy and Golden Globe Award-winning or nominated original scripted dramatic television series such as , and , occasional mini-series such as and , and unscripted series and packaged movie events such as , and . In addition, with a comprehensive library of popular films, AMC also offers movie-based entertainment.
Mad Men
Breaking Bad
The Walking Dead
Broken Trail
The Prisoner
Storymakers
DVDtv
AMC News
 
We launched AMC in 1984, and over the past several years it has garnered many of the industry's highest honors, including 23 Emmy Awards, 4 Golden Globe Awards, 2 Screen Actors Guild Awards, 2 Peabody Awards, and 4 consecutive American Film Institute (AFI) Awards for Top 10 Most Outstanding Television Programs of the Year. AMC is the only cable network in history to win the Emmy Award for Outstanding
Table of Contents
Drama Series three years in a row, as well as the Golden Globe Award for Best Television Series  Drama for three consecutive years.
 
AMC's film library consists of films that are licensed from major studios such as Twentieth Century Fox, Warner Bros., Sony, MGM, NBC Universal, Paramount and Buena Vista under long-term contracts. AMC generally structures its contracts for the exclusive cable television right to air the films during identified windows.
 
  As of December 31, 2010, AMC had affiliation agreements with all major multichannel video distributors and reached approximately 96 million Nielsen subscribers.
AMC Subscribers and Affiliation Agreements.
 
 
 
Approximately 89% of AMC's subscribers are under affiliation agreements that expire after December 31, 2012.
 
WE tv
 
tv offers compelling, entertaining stories and focuses on programming of particular interest to women, with an emphasis on life events such as weddings, having children and raising a family. The programming features original series and specials, as well as feature films. WE tv's schedule includes original series such as , , and . Additionally, WE tv's programming includes series such as , and . WE tv has the exclusive license rights to certain films from studios such as Paramount, Sony and Warner Bros.
WE
Bridezillas
My Fair Wedding with David Tutera
Joan and Melissa: Joan Knows Best?
Downsized
Ghost Whisperer
Charmed
Golden Girls
 
  As of December 31, 2010, WE tv had affiliation agreements with all major multichannel video distributors and reached approximately 77 million Nielsen subscribers.
WE tv Subscribers and Affiliation Agreements.
 
 
 
Approximately 74% of WE tv's subscribers are under affiliation agreements that expire after December 31, 2012.
 
IFC
 
is a network dedicated to presenting an independent, alternative mindset through programming focused on independent film and original alternative comedy series. Since its launch in 1994, IFC has developed television programming that challenges the conventions of storytelling and provides a unique perspective to its audiences through its original series, notable independent film collection and cult television shows. Its library includes films from the most significant independent film distributors including Fox Searchlight, Miramax, Sony Classics, IFC Entertainment and Lionsgate. The network's original content includes the David Cross comedy , and . In addition, IFC provides viewers with access to must-see festivals and events around the country, including the annual film and music festival and, for the past decade, IFC has been the exclusive home of The Independent Spirit Awards, the largest award show for independent movies.
IFC
The Increasingly Poor Decisions of Todd Margaret
The Onion News Network
Portlandia
South-by-Southwest
Table of Contents
  As of December 31, 2010, IFC had affiliation agreements with all major multichannel video distributors and reached approximately 63 million Nielsen subscribers.
IFC Subscribers and Affiliation Agreements.
 
 
 
Approximately 81% of IFC's subscribers are under affiliation agreements that expire after December 31, 2012.
 
Sundance Channel
 
Sundance Channel is the television destination for independent-minded viewers. Benefitting from its relationship with the Sundance Institute and the renowned Sundance Film Festival, the network features independent films and original series showcasing innovative people and ideas in areas like invention, design, travel, enterprise and fashion. Launched in 1996 and acquired by us in 2008, Sundance Channel's programming celebrates fresh talent and seeks to champion new ideas.
 
Sundance Channel's original series engage viewers across a number of platforms, and include unscripted shows such as the Peabody Award-winning franchise , innovative multi-platform fashion programming under the label, the celebrity vehicle and other new series that highlight what's just about to hit in the world of product-design, pop-culture, style and food. Sundance Channel's first scripted mini-series aired in fall 2010 to great critical acclaim, including winning the 2011 Golden Globe Award for Best Mini-Series or Motion Picture Made for Television.
Brick City
Full Frontal Fashion
Shoebox Sessions
Carlos
 
  As of December 31, 2010, Sundance Channel had affiliation agreements with all major multichannel video distributors and reached approximately 40 million viewing subscribers. Sundance Channel currently generates advertising revenue from sponsorship arrangements and promotional breaks, rather than traditional advertising spots.
Sundance Channel Subscribers and Affiliation Agreements.
 
 
 
 
 
Approximately 67% of Sundance Channel's subscribers are under affiliation agreements that expire after December 31, 2012.
 
International and Other
 
In addition to our National Networks, we also operate AMC/Sundance Channel Global, which is our international programming business; IFC Entertainment, our independent film distribution business; and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, our network technical services business. Our International and Other segment also includes VOOM HD, an international programming service that we are in the process of winding-down.
Table of Contents
AMC/Sundance Channel Global
 
AMC/Sundance Channel Global's business principally consists of four distinct channels in six languages spread across eight countries, focusing primarily on AMC in Canada and global versions of the Sundance and WE tv brands. Principally generating revenues from affiliation fees, AMC/Sundance Channel Global reached approximately 8 million viewing subscribers in Canada, Europe and Asia as of December 31, 2010, and has broad availability to distributors in Europe and in Asia through satellite delivery that can facilitate future expansion.
 
Sundance Channel  International
 
An internationally-recognized brand, Sundance Channel's global services provide not only the best of the independent film world but also feature certain content from AMC, IFC, Sundance, and IFC Films, as well as a unique pipeline of international content, in an effort to provide distinctive programming to an upscale audience.
 
The ability of Sundance Channel to offer content in standard definition and high definition across multiple platforms provides value to distributors and opportunity for expansion into additional international markets. The international version of Sundance Channel is available in France, Belgium, the Netherlands, Poland, South Korea and Singapore; and provides programming in French, Dutch, Polish, Korean, and Mandarin. The network is distributed via satellite in Asia, and has a substantial satellite footprint (which extends from the Philippines to the Middle East, and from Russia to Australia).
 
Canada
 
We provide programming to the Canadian market through our AMC and Sundance Channel brands, which are distributed through affiliation arrangements with the three major Canadian multichannel video distributors and through trademark license and content distribution arrangements with Canadian programming outlets. In 2006, we launched AMC Canada as a service that provides essentially the same programming as the U.S. version of the network. AMC Canada has today achieved near-full distribution in the Canadian market. In 2010, we launched a Sundance Channel-branded network in Canada.
 
WE tv Asia
 
Providing programming in the Korean and Mandarin languages, WE tv Asia provides a selection of the best domestic programming from the WE tv U.S. network with programs like and , and some of the best of other female-oriented networks in the United States, such as and . With the same broad satellite footprint as Sundance Channel  International, WE tv Asia is available in South Korea, Singapore and Hong Kong and also presents significant opportunities for expansion into new Asian markets.
Bridezillas
My Fair Wedding with David Tutera
Tabatha's Salon Takeover
Tori & Dean
 
IFC Entertainment
 
IFC Entertainment encompasses our independent film distribution business, making independent films available to a national audience by initially releasing them in theaters and on platforms. IFC Entertainment consists of multiple brands, including Sundance Selects, IFC Films and IFC Midnight, which distribute critically acclaimed independent films across virtually all available media platforms, including theatrically and via DVDs, cable television, and streaming to computers and other electronic devices. IFC Entertainment also operates the IFC Center, the DOC NYC festival and SundanceNow. Most IFC Films, IFC Midnight and Sundance Selects titles are available on-demand on the same day that they are first distributed theatrically. The on-demand services are currently offered to IFC's distributors as well as being carried by other multichannel video distributors throughout the United States. Recently released films include , , and . IFC Entertainment has a film library consisting of more than 400 titles.
video-on-demand
video-on-demand,
The Killer Inside Me
The Human Centipede
Joan Rivers: A Piece of Work, The Art of the Steal
Tiny Furniture
 
As part of its strategy to encourage the growth of the marketplace for independent film, IFC Entertainment also operates the IFC Center, DOC NYC and SundanceNow. The IFC Center, a five-screen
Table of Contents
cinema with HD digital and 35mm projection capabilities, shows art-house films in the heart of New York's Greenwich Village, while DOC NYC is a festival celebrating documentary storytelling in film, photography, prose and other media. IFC Entertainment is also focusing on new distribution platforms for our content, and recently launched SundanceNow, our digital platform, which makes our IFC Entertainment library of independent films available to consumers in the United States and around the globe.
direct-to-consumer
 
AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology
 
AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology is a full-service network programming feed origination and distribution company, supplying an array of services to the network programming industry. AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology's operations are housed in Bethpage, New York, where AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology consolidates origination and satellite communications functions in a 55,000 square-foot facility designed to keep AMC Networks at the forefront of network origination and distribution technology. AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology has nearly 30 years experience across its network services groups, including affiliate engineering, network operations, traffic and scheduling that provide delivery of any programming network, in high definition or standard definition.
day-to-day
 
Currently, AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology is responsible for the origination of 38 programming feeds for national and international distribution. AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology's current clients include AMC Networks' own national networks, as well as third-party and affiliated clients including fuse, MSG Network, MSG Plus, MSG Varsity, two Comcast Sports networks, an FSN regional sports network, SNY and Mid Atlantic Sports Network.
 
Content Rights and Development
 
The programming on our networks includes original programming that we control, either through outright ownership or through long-term licensing arrangements, and acquired programming that we license from studios and other rights holders.
 
Original Programming
 
We contract with independent production companies, including Lionsgate Entertainment, Sony Productions, September Films and Pilgrim Films and Television, to produce most of the original programming that appears on our programming networks. These contractual arrangements either provide us with outright ownership of the programming, in which case we hold all programming and other rights to the content, or they consist of a long-term license, which provides us with exclusive rights to exhibit the content on our programming networks, but may be limited in terms of specific geographic markets or distribution platforms. We currently self produce one of our original series  AMC's .
The Walking Dead
 
In addition to , the original programming that we own outright includes , , , and . We may freely exhibit this programming on our networks or through other distribution platforms, both in the United States and in international markets. We may also license this content to other programming networks or distribution platforms.
The Walking Dead
My Fair Wedding with David Tutera
Downsized
Joan and Melissa: Joan Knows Best?
Iconoclasts
Brick City
 
We hold long-term licenses for original programming that includes , and . These licensing arrangements give us the exclusive right for certain periods of time to exhibit the shows on our programming networks within the United States and, in some cases, in international markets. These licenses may also give us the right to exploit the programming on additional distribution platforms (such as and mobile devices) within our licensed territory. The license agreements are typically of multi-season duration and provide us with a right of first negotiation or a right of first refusal on the renewal of the license for additional programming seasons.
Mad Men
Breaking Bad
Bridezillas
video-on-demand
Table of Contents
Acquired Programming
 
The majority of the content on our programming networks consists of existing films, episodic series and specials that we acquire pursuant to rights agreements with film studios, production companies or other rights holders. This acquired programming includes episodic series such as and , as well as an extensive film library. The rights agreements for this content are of varying duration and generally permit our programming networks to carry these series, films and other programming during certain window periods.
Golden Girls
Arrested Development
 
Affiliation Agreements
 
  Our programming networks are distributed to our viewing audience pursuant to affiliation agreements with multichannel video distributors. These agreements, which typically have durations of several years, require us to deliver programming that meets certain standards set forth in the agreement. We earn affiliation fees under these agreements, generally based upon the number of each distributor's subscribers who receive our programming or, in some cases, based on a fixed contractual monthly fee. Our affiliation agreements also give us the right to sell a specific amount of national advertising time on our programming networks.
Affiliation Agreements and Significant Customers.
 
Our programming networks' existing affiliation agreements expire at various dates, and some are due to expire in 2011 and 2012. Failure to renew important affiliation agreements, or the termination of those agreements, could have a material adverse effect on our business, and, even if affiliation agreements are renewed, there can be no assurance that renewal rates will equal or exceed the rates that are currently being charged. We have never failed to renew an agreement with any of our top ten distributors, although agreements have sometimes expired before the renewal was fully negotiated and finalized (in such cases, carriage of our programming networks continued unaffected during the periods in which the agreements were being negotiated).
 
In 2010, Comcast and DirecTV each accounted for at least 10% of our total net revenues.
 
We frequently negotiate with distributors in an effort to increase their subscriber base for our networks. We have in some instances made upfront payments to distributors in exchange for these additional subscribers or agreed to waive or accept lower subscriber fees if certain numbers of additional subscribers are provided. We also may help fund the distributors' efforts to market our programming networks or we may permit distributors to offer limited promotional periods without payment of subscriber fees. As we continue our efforts to add subscribers, our subscriber revenue may be negatively affected by such deferred carriage fee arrangements, discounted subscriber fees and other payments; however, we believe that these transactions generate a positive return on investment over the contract period.
 
Advertising Arrangements
 
Under our affiliation agreements with our distributors, we have the right to sell a specified amount of national advertising time on certain of our programming networks. Our advertising revenues are more variable than affiliation fee revenues because virtually all of our advertising is sold on a short-term basis, not under long-term contracts. Our advertising arrangements with advertisers provide for a set number of advertising units to air over a specific period of time at a negotiated price per unit. In certain advertising sales arrangements, our programming networks guarantee specified viewer ratings for their programming. If these guaranteed viewer ratings are not met, we are generally required to provide additional advertising units to the advertiser at no charge. For these types of arrangements, a portion of the related revenue is deferred if the guaranteed viewer ratings are not met and is subsequently recognized either when we provide the required additional advertising time, the guarantee obligation contractually expires or performance requirements become remote. Most of our advertising revenues vary based upon the popularity of our programming as measured by Nielsen Media Research ("Nielsen").
 
In 2010, our national programming networks had approximately 800 advertisers representing companies in a broad range of sectors, including the food, health, retail and automotive industries. Our AMC and
Table of Contents
WE tv programming networks use a traditional advertising sales model, while Sundance Channel principally sells sponsorships. Prior to December 2010, IFC principally sold sponsorships, but since then it migrated to a traditional advertising sales model.
 
Subscriber and Viewer Measurement
 
The number of subscribers receiving our programming from multichannel video distributors generally determines the affiliation fees we receive. We refer to these subscribers as "viewing subscribers." These numbers are reported monthly by the distributor and are reported net of certain excluded categories of subscribers set forth in the relevant affiliation agreement. These excluded categories include delinquent and complimentary accounts and subscribers receiving our programming networks during promotional periods. For most management purposes, we use a different measurement, Nielsen subscribers, when that measurement is available. Nielsen subscribers represent the number of subscribers receiving our programming from multichannel video distributors as reported by Nielsen, based on their sampling procedures. Because Nielsen subscribers are reported without deduction for certain classes of subscribers, Nielsen subscriber figures tend to be higher than viewing subscribers for a given programming network. Nielsen subscriber figures are available for our AMC, WE tv and IFC programming networks.
day-to-day
 
For purposes of the advertising rates we are able to charge advertisers, the relevant measurement is the Nielsen rating, which measures the number of viewers actually watching the commercials within programs we show on our programming networks. This measurement is calculated by The Nielsen Company using their sampling procedures and reported daily, although advertising rates are adjusted less frequently. In addition to the Nielsen rating, our advertising rates are also influenced by the demographic mix of our viewing audiences, since advertisers tend to pay premium rates for more desirable demographics.
 
Regulation
 
The FCC regulates our programming networks in certain respects because they are affiliated with a cable television operator like Cablevision. Other FCC regulations, although imposed on cable television operators and satellite operators, affect programming networks indirectly.
 
Closed Captioning
 
Certain of our networks must provide closed-captioning of programming for the hearing impaired. In the future, the 21 Century Communications and Video Accessibility Act of 2010 may require us to provide closed captioning on certain video programming that we offer on the Internet.
st
 
Obscenity Restrictions
 
Cable operators and other distributors are prohibited from transmitting obscene programming, and our affiliation agreements generally require us to refrain from including such programming on our networks.
 
Program Access
 
The "program access" provisions of the Federal Cable Act generally require satellite delivered video programming in which a cable operator holds an attributable interest, as that term is defined by the FCC, to be made available to all multichannel video distributors, including DBS providers and telephone companies, on nondiscriminatory prices, terms and conditions, subject to certain exceptions specified in the statute and the FCC's rules. For purposes of these rules, the common directors and five percent or greater voting stockholders of Cablevision and AMC Networks are deemed to be cable operators with attributable interests in us. As long as we continue to have common directors and major stockholders with Cablevision, our satellite-delivered video programming services will remain subject to the program access provisions. Until October 2012, unless extended, these rules also prohibit us from entering into exclusive contracts with cable operators for these services. The FCC recently extended the program access rules to terrestrially-delivered programming created by cable operator-affiliated programmers such as us. The new rules would compel the licensing of such programming in response to a complaint by a multichannel video distributor, if the complainant can
Table of Contents
demonstrate that the lack of such programming, undue influence by the cable operator affiliate, or discrimination in the price, terms, or conditions for such programming significantly hinders or prevents the distributor from providing satellite cable programming. These new rules could require us to make any terrestrial programming services we create available to multichannel video distributors on nondiscriminatory prices, terms and conditions. The new rules have been challenged in federal court. We cannot predict how the court will act on the challenge.
 
In 2007, the FCC sought comment on a proposal to allow a cable operator to petition for repeal of the exclusivity ban prior to 2012 with respect to programming it owns, in markets where the cable operator faces competition from other video programming distributors; and is considering revisions to the program access complaint procedures. The FCC has taken no action on this proposal.
 
Wholesale " La Carte"
 
In 2007, the FCC sought comment on whether cable programming networks require distributors to purchase and carry undesired programming in return for the right to carry desired programming and, if so, whether such arrangements should be prohibited. The FCC has taken no action on this proposal. We do not currently require distributors to carry more than one of our national programming networks in order to obtain the right to carry a particular national programming network. However, we generally negotiate with a distributor for the carriage of all of our national networks concurrently.
 
Effect of "Must-Carry" Requirements
 
The FCC's implementation of the statutory "must-carry" obligations requires cable and DBS operators to give broadcasters preferential access to channel space. In contrast, programming networks, such as ours, have no guaranteed right of carriage on cable television or DBS systems. This may reduce the amount of channel space that is available for carriage of our networks by cable television systems and DBS operators.
 
Satellite Carriage
 
All satellite carriers must under federal law offer their service to deliver our and our competitor's programming networks on a nondiscriminatory basis (including by means of a lottery). A satellite carrier cannot unreasonably discriminate against any customer in its charges or conditions of carriage.
 
Media Ownership Restrictions
 
FCC rules set media ownership limits that restrict, among other things, the number of daily newspapers and radio and TV stations in which a single entity may hold an attributable interest as that term is defined by the FCC. These rules have been challenged in federal court. We cannot predict how the court will rule on these challenges. The fact that the common directors and five percent or greater voting stockholders of Cablevision and AMC Networks will hold attributable interests in each of the companies after the Distribution for purposes of these rules means that these cross-ownership rules may have the effect of limiting the activities or strategic business alternatives available to us, at least for as long as we continue to have common directors and major stockholders with Cablevision. Although we have no plans or intentions to become involved in the businesses affected by these restrictions, we would need to be mindful of these rules if we were to consider engaging in any such business in the future.
 
Website Requirements
 
We maintain various websites that provide information regarding our businesses and offer content for sale. The operation of these websites may be subject to a range of federal, state and local laws such as privacy and consumer protection regulations.
Table of Contents
Other Regulation
 
In 2007, the FCC recommended that Congress prohibit the availability of violent programming, including on cable programming networks, during the hours when children are likely to be watching. Congress has considered this proposal, but to date has not yet enacted such restrictions. The FCC also imposes rules regarding political broadcasts.
 
Competition
 
Our programming networks operate in two highly competitive markets. First, our programming networks compete with other programming networks to obtain distribution on cable television systems and other multichannel video distribution systems, such as DBS, and ultimately for viewing by each system's subscribers. Second, our programming networks compete with other programming networks and other sources of video content, including broadcast networks, to secure desired entertainment programming. The success of our businesses depends on our ability to license and produce content for our programming networks that is adequate in quantity and quality and will generate satisfactory viewer ratings. In each of these cases, some of our competitors are large publicly held companies that have greater financial resources than we do. In addition, we compete with these entities for advertising revenue.
 
It is difficult to predict the future effect of technology on many of the factors affecting AMC Networks' competitive position. For example, data compression technology has made it possible for most video programming distributors to increase their channel capacity, which may reduce the competition among programming networks and broadcasters for channel space. On the other hand, the addition of channel space could also increase competition for desired entertainment programming and ultimately, for viewing by subscribers. As more channel space becomes available, the position of our programming networks in the most favorable tiers of these distributors would be an important goal. Additionally, video content delivered directly to viewers over the Internet competes with our programming networks for viewership.
 
Distribution of Programming Networks
 
The business of distributing programming networks to cable television systems and other multichannel video distributors is highly competitive. Our programming networks face competition from other programming networks' carriage by a particular multichannel video distributor, and for the carriage on the service tier that will attract the most subscribers. Once our programming network is selected by a distributor for carriage, that network competes for viewers not only with the other programming networks available on the distributor's system, but also with broadcast television, Internet-based video and other online services, mobile services, radio, print media, motion picture theaters, DVDs, and other sources of information and entertainment.
over-the-air
 
Important to our success in each area of competition we face are the prices we charge for our programming networks, the quantity, quality and variety of the programming offered on our networks, and the effectiveness of our networks' marketing efforts. The competition for viewers among advertiser supported networks is directly correlated with the competition for advertising revenues with each of our competitors.
 
Our ability to successfully compete with other networks may be hampered because the cable television systems or other multichannel video distributors through which we seek distribution may be affiliated with other programming networks. In addition, because such distributors may have a substantial number of subscribers, the ability of such programming networks to obtain distribution on the systems of affiliated distributors may lead to increased affiliation and advertising revenue for such programming networks because of their increased penetration compared to our programming networks. Even if such affiliated distributors carry our programming networks, such distributors may place their affiliated programming network on a more desirable tier, thereby giving the affiliated programming network a competitive advantage over our own.
 
New or existing programming networks that are affiliated with broadcasting networks like NBC, ABC, CBS or Fox may also have a competitive advantage over our programming networks in obtaining distribution through the "bundling" of agreements to carry those programming networks with agreements giving the distributor the right to carry a broadcast station affiliated with the broadcasting network.
Table of Contents
An important part of our strategy involves exploiting identified markets of the cable television viewing audience that are generally well defined and limited in size. Our networks have faced and will continue to face increasing competition as other programming networks and online or other services seek to serve the same or similar niches.
 
Sources of Programming
 
We also compete with other programming networks to secure desired programming. Most of our original programming and all of our acquired programming is obtained through agreements with other parties that have produced or own the rights to such programming. Competition for this programming will increase as the number of programming networks increases. Other programming networks that are affiliated with programming sources such as movie or television studios or film libraries may have a competitive advantage over us in this area.
 
With respect to the acquisition of entertainment programming, such as syndicated programs and movies that are not produced by or specifically for networks, our competitors include national broadcast television networks, local broadcast television stations, programs and other cable programming networks. Internet-based video content distributors have also emerged as competitors for the acquisition of content or the rights to distribute content. Some of these competitors have exclusive contracts with motion picture studios or independent motion picture distributors or own film libraries.
video-on-demand
 
Competition for Advertising Revenue
 
Our programming networks must compete with other sellers of advertising time and space, including other cable programming networks, radio, newspapers, outdoor media and, increasingly, Internet sites. We compete for advertisers on the basis of rates we charge and also on the number and demographic nature of viewers who watch our programming. Advertisers will often seek to target their advertising content to those demographic categories they consider most likely to purchase the product or service they advertise. Accordingly, the demographic of our viewership can be equally or more important than the number of viewers watching our programming.
make-up
 
Legal Proceedings
 
DISH Network Contract Dispute
 
In 2005, subsidiaries of the Company entered into agreements with EchoStar Communications Corporation and its affiliates by which EchoStar Media Holdings Corporation acquired a 20% interest in VOOM HD Holdings LLC ("VOOM HD") and EchoStar Satellite LLC (the predecessor to DISH Network, LLC ("DISH Network")) agreed to distribute VOOM on DISH Network for a term. The affiliation agreement with DISH Network for such distribution provides that if VOOM HD fails to spend $100 million per year (subject to reduction to the extent that the number of offered channels is reduced to fewer than 21), up to a maximum of $500 million in the aggregate, on VOOM, DISH Network may seek to terminate the agreement under certain circumstances. On January 30, 2008, DISH Network purported to terminate the affiliation agreement, effective February 1, 2008, based on its assertion that VOOM HD had failed to comply with this spending provision in 2006. On January 31, 2008, VOOM HD sought and obtained a temporary restraining order from the New York Supreme Court for New York County prohibiting DISH Network from terminating the affiliation agreement. In conjunction with its request for a temporary restraining order, VOOM HD also requested a preliminary injunction and filed a lawsuit against DISH Network asserting that DISH Network did not have the right to terminate the affiliation agreement. In a decision filed on May 5, 2008, the court denied VOOM HD's motion for a preliminary injunction. On or about May 13, 2008, DISH Network ceased distribution of VOOM on its DISH Network. On May 27, 2008, VOOM HD amended its complaint to seek damages for DISH Network's improper termination of the affiliation agreement. On June 24, 2008, DISH Network answered VOOM HD's amended complaint and EchoStar Satellite LLC asserted counterclaims alleging breach of contract and breach of the duty of good faith and fair dealing with respect to the affiliation agreement. On July 14, 2008, VOOM HD replied to DISH Network's counterclaims. The Company believes that the counterclaims asserted by DISH Network are without merit. VOOM HD and DISH Network each filed
15-year
Table of Contents
cross-motions for summary judgment. In November 2010, the court denied both parties' cross-motions for summary judgment. The court also granted VOOM HD's motion for sanctions based on DISH Network's spoliation of evidence and its motion to exclude DISH Network's principal damages expert. The trial will be scheduled after DISH Network's appeal of the latter two rulings.
 
In connection with the Distribution, CSC Holdings and AMC Networks and its subsidiary, Rainbow Programming Holdings, LLC (collectively, the "AMC Parties") have entered into an agreement (the "VOOM Litigation Agreement") which will provide that from and after the Distribution date, CSC Holdings shall retain full control over the pending litigation with DISH Network. Any decision with respect to settlement will be made jointly by CSC Holdings and the AMC Parties. CSC Holdings and the AMC Parties will share equally in the proceeds (including in the value of any non-cash consideration) of any settlement or final judgment in the pending litigation with DISH Network that are received by subsidiaries of the Company from VOOM HD. CSC Holdings and the AMC Parties will also bear equally the legal fees and expenses (above amounts currently budgeted for the remainder of 2011). A form of the VOOM Litigation Agreement has been filed as an exhibit to the registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part, and the foregoing summary of the agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the agreement as so filed.
 
Broadcast Music, Inc. Matter
 
Broadcast Music, Inc. ("BMI"), an organization that licenses the performance of musical compositions of its members, had alleged that certain of the Company's subsidiaries require a license to exhibit musical compositions in its catalog. BMI agreed to interim fees based on revenues covering certain periods (generally the period commencing from the launch or acquisition of each of our programming networks). In May 2011, the parties reached an agreement with respect to the license fees for an amount that approximates amounts previously accrued, which were $7.0 million and $6.1 million at December 31, 2010 and 2009, respectively.
 
Other Legal Matters
 
On April 15, 2011, Thomas C. Dolan, who is expected to become a director of the Company and who is a director and Executive Vice President, Strategy and Development, in the Office of the Chairman at Cablevision, filed a lawsuit against Cablevision and RMH, in New York Supreme Court. The lawsuit raises compensation-related claims (seeking approximately $11 million) related to events in 2005. The matter is being handled under the direction of an independent committee of the board of directors of Cablevision. Under the Distribution Agreement, Cablevision will indemnify the Company and RMH against any liabilities and expenses related to this lawsuit. Based on the Company's assessment of this possible loss contingency, no provision has been made for this matter in the accompanying consolidated financial statements.
 
In addition to the matters discussed above, the Company is party to various lawsuits and claims in the ordinary course of business. Although the outcome of these other matters cannot be predicted with certainty and the impact of the final resolution of these other matters on the Company's results of operations in a particular subsequent reporting period is not known, management does not believe that the resolution of these matters will have a material adverse effect on the financial position of the Company or the ability of the Company to meet its financial obligations as they become due.
 
Employees
 
As of May 31, 2011 we had 849 full-time employees and 27 part-time employees. None of our employees are represented by unions.
 
Properties
 
We currently use approximately 200,000 square feet of office space that we lease at 11 Penn Plaza, New York, NY 10001, under lease arrangements with remaining terms of six and nine years. We use this space as our corporate headquarters and as the principal business location of our business. We also lease the 55,000 square-foot Broadcasting and Technology Center in Bethpage, New York, from which AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology conducts its operations. In addition, we maintain leased sales offices in Santa Monica, Atlanta and Chicago.
Table of Contents
 
 
We do not expect to pay cash dividends on our common stock for the foreseeable future.
Table of Contents
 
 
The following unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated balance sheet as of March 31, 2011 and the unaudited pro forma consolidated statements of operations for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and the year ended December 31, 2010 are based on the historical consolidated financial statements of the Company. The unaudited pro forma consolidated financial statements presented below should be read in conjunction with "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" and our consolidated annual and interim financial statements and corresponding notes thereto included elsewhere in this Information Statement. The unaudited pro forma consolidated financial statements reflect certain known impacts as a result of the Distribution and the separation of the Company from Cablevision. The unaudited pro forma consolidated financial statements have been prepared giving effect to the Distribution as if this transaction had occurred as of January 1, 2010 for the unaudited pro forma consolidated statements of operations for the year ended December 31, 2010 and for the three months ended March 31, 2011, and as of March 31, 2011 for the unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated balance sheet.
 
The unaudited pro forma consolidated financial information set forth below has been derived from the consolidated annual and interim financial statements of the Company including the unaudited consolidated balance sheet as of March 31, 2011, the unaudited consolidated statement of income for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and the audited consolidated statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2010 included elsewhere within this Information Statement and reflect certain assumptions that we believe are reasonable given the information currently available. While such adjustments are subject to change based upon the finalization of the underlying separation agreements, in management's opinion, the pro forma adjustments have been developed on a reasonable and rational basis.
 
Following the Distribution, we will incur corporate costs to operate our business as a separate, public entity, which are expected to be lower than our historical expenses, including corporate allocations from and management fees paid to Cablevision, which will not continue to be charged to us subsequent to the Distribution. For the three months ended March 31, 2011 and for the year ended December 31, 2010, our results of operations included corporate and administrative charges from Cablevision of $7.7 million and $32.4 million, respectively, and management fees charged by Cablevision to certain subsidiaries of the Company of $6.7 million and $26.5 million, respectively. Corporate costs to operate our business as a separate, stand-alone public entity principally relate to areas that include, but are not limited to:
stand-alone
 
 
Subsequent to the Distribution, the preliminary estimates for the net decrease in corporate expenses to operate our business range between approximately $14 million and $18 million on an annual basis prospectively. Actual expense reductions, if any, could vary from this range estimate and such variations could be material.
 
These unaudited pro forma consolidated financial statements reflect all other adjustments that, in the opinion of management, are necessary to present fairly the pro forma consolidated results of operations and consolidated financial position of the Company as of and for the periods indicated. The unaudited pro forma consolidated financial information is for illustrative and informational purposes only and is not intended to represent or be indicative of what our financial condition or results of operations would have been had the Company operated historically as a company independent of Cablevision or if the Distribution had occurred on the dates indicated. The unaudited pro forma consolidated financial information also should not be considered representative of our future consolidated financial condition or consolidated results of operations.
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Table of Contents
The unaudited pro forma adjustments to the accompanying historical financial information as of March 31, 2011, for the three months ended March 31, 2011, and for the year ended December 31, 2010 are described below (dollars in thousands):
 
Balance Sheet
 
(1) Adjustments to cash and cash equivalents relating to (i) estimated net cash proceeds of $1,111,000 that represents a portion of the $2,425,000 of New AMC Networks Debt to be issued as part of the Distribution, net of estimated financing costs of approximately $39,000 and excludes approximately $1,275,000 of New AMC Networks Debt that will be issued directly to CSC Holdings, which will use such New AMC Networks Debt to satisfy and discharge outstanding Cablevision or CSC Holdings debt, partially offset by (ii) the repayment of all of the Company's outstanding debt and accrued interest (excluding capital leases) of $1,042,533.
 
The Company intends to repay all of its outstanding credit facility debt and pay the related accrued interest at the Distribution date. As noted in (3) below, in May 2011, the Company redeemed 100% of the outstanding senior notes for $300,000 and borrowed $300,000 under its revolving credit facility in order to fund the redemption. The Company also intends to repay all of its outstanding senior subordinated notes and related accrued interest on or after the Distribution date. In accordance with the senior subordinated notes indenture agreement, if the notes are redeemed prior to September 1, 2011, they would be redeemable, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to 103.458% of the face value, which decreases to 101.729% on September 1, 2011. The pro forma adjustment for the senior subordinated notes assumes all the outstanding notes will be redeemed at 103.458% of face value resulting in an $11,239 premium paid by the Company. Although we do not expect the actual premium paid to be materially different, the actual premium paid by the Company in connection with the redemption of the senior subordinated notes could be higher or lower, depending on the timing and manner in which the notes are repaid. An increase or decrease of 0.1% in the premium would decrease or increase, respectively, cash and cash equivalents by $325.
 
Additional adjustments to cash and cash equivalents also include (i) a payment to Cablevision for the unfunded account balances of the Company's employees in the Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan of approximately $4,000, (ii) a payment to Cablevision of approximately $6,900 to settle accrued liabilities for costs associated with historical allocations of Cablevision's corporate employee's outstanding stock appreciation rights and long-term incentive plan obligations partially offset by (iii) the receipt of approximately $6,300 from Cablevision for the historic contributions (net of benefits paid) made by the Company on behalf of its employees in the Cablevision Excess Cash Balance Plan and the Cablevision Excess Savings Plan. For a discussion of the Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan, the Cablevision Excess Cash Balance Plan and the Cablevision Excess Savings Plan, see "Executive Compensation  Historical Compensation Information  Pension Benefits."
 
(2) Adjustments to deferred financing costs include (i) the capitalization of the estimated financing costs of approximately $39,000 expected to be incurred in connection with the New AMC Networks Debt, consisting of $1,725,000 aggregate principal amount of senior secured term loans and $700,000 aggregate principal amount of senior unsecured notes, partially offset by (ii) the write-off of the unamortized deferred financing costs of $6,387 relating to the Company's outstanding debt that will be repaid in connection with the Distribution. The Company does not expect a material change to the estimated financing costs of approximately $39,000.
 
(3) Represents the repayment (net of unamortized discount aggregating $1,247) of the Company's outstanding credit facility debt, senior notes, senior subordinated notes and accrued interest at March 31, 2011 of $412,500, $299,619, $324,134 and $5,033, respectively, prior to or at the Distribution date offset by the incurrence of the New AMC Networks Debt, consisting of $1,714,000 (net of original issue discount) of senior secured term loans and $686,000 (net of original issue discount) of senior unsecured notes, in connection with the Distribution. On May 13, 2011, the Company redeemed 100% of the outstanding senior notes due 2012 for $300,000. In order to fund the redemption, in May 2011 the Company borrowed $300,000 under its $300,000 revolving credit facility. The $300,000 revolving credit facility will be repaid on the Distribution date. The
Table of Contents
repayment of the senior notes of $299,619 is reflected as a pro forma adjustment, however, since the May 2011 $300,000 draw down on the revolving credit facility and subsequent repayment on the Distribution date has no net impact on the Company's total debt, it is not reflected as a pro forma adjustment.
 
(4) Adjustments to accrued employee-related costs represent (i) an increase in the liability of approximately $3,300 resulting from the transfer to the Company from Cablevision of the Company's employees' participant accounts in the Cablevision Excess Savings Plan and (ii) an increase of $3,400 resulting from the transfer to the Company from Cablevision of the Company's employees' participant accounts in the Cablevision Excess Cash Balance Plan, offset by (iii) a decrease of approximately $6,900 of liabilities, reflecting the payment to Cablevision of their corporate employees' outstanding stock appreciation rights and long-term incentive plan liabilities. The net effect of these three adjustments is to increase current liabilities by approximately $2,500 and reduce non-current liabilities by approximately $2,700.
 
(5) Adjustments to other liabilities represent the elimination of certain liabilities for uncertain tax positions and the related accrued interest aggregating $57,451 that will be retained by Cablevision pursuant to a Tax Disaffiliation Agreement between the Company and Cablevision.
 
(6) Adjustments to stockholder's equity (deficiency) include (i) a decrease of approximately $1,250,000 from a portion of the New AMC Networks Debt that will be issued to CSC Holdings, which will use such New AMC Networks Debt to satisfy and discharge outstanding Cablevision or CSC Holdings debt, (ii) a decrease relating to a loss on extinguishment of debt of $11,239 relating to the estimated redemption premium paid by the Company on its senior subordinated notes, partially offset by the related tax effect of $4,173, (iii) a decrease relating to the write-off of the unamortized deferred financing costs of $6,387 relating to the Company's existing credit facility debt, senior notes and senior subordinated notes that will be repaid with a portion of the remaining proceeds from the issuance of the New AMC Networks Debt in connection with the Distribution, (iv) a decrease of $1,247 related to the unamortized discount on the Company's existing senior notes and senior subordinated notes that will be repaid with a portion of the proceeds from the issuance of the remaining New AMC Networks Debt in connection with the Distribution, (v) a decrease of approximately $400 related to the transfer to the Company from Cablevision of the Company's employees' participant accounts in the Cablevision Excess Cash Balance Plan, (vi) a decrease of $4,000 relating to the contribution to Cablevision for the unfunded account balances of the Company's employees in the Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan, (vii) a decrease of $9,325 as a result of the decrease in the Company's aggregate net deferred tax asset relating to the impact of the tax adjustments discussed in (7) below, partially offset by (viii) an increase to stockholder's equity of $57,451 relating to the elimination of certain liabilities for uncertain tax positions and the related accrued interest that will be retained by Cablevision pursuant to a Tax Disaffiliation Agreement between the Company and Cablevision.
 
(7) The pro forma adjustment recorded to current deferred tax asset, noncurrent deferred tax asset and noncurrent deferred tax liability reflects adjustments that are currently expected to result from the Distribution to Cablevision's stockholders. Deferred tax assets and liabilities presented in the consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this Information Statement have been measured using the applicable corporate tax rates historically used by Cablevision. However, primarily due to different state and local apportionment factors that will be applicable to the Company as of the Distribution date, the estimated applicable corporate tax rates used to measure deferred taxes will be lower on a stand-alone basis. In addition, the noncurrent deferred tax asset was reduced by an amount relating to the historical recognition of share-based compensation expense for employees of Cablevision that was allocated to the Company for which the post-Distribution tax benefit upon exercise or vesting of the related share-based payment awards will be realized by Cablevision. Furthermore, at the Distribution date, a portion of the deferred tax asset for net operating loss and tax credit carry forwards is expected to be reclassified from noncurrent deferred tax asset and presented as a current deferred tax asset.
 
Statement of Operations
 
(8) Resulting from the issuance of the New AMC Networks Debt and the repayment of outstanding debt discussed in note (1) above, the adjustment represents the net impact of (i) elimination of historical interest
Table of Contents
expense related to borrowings under the Company's outstanding debt and the associated amortization of deferred financing costs, offset by an increase in (ii) interest expense on the New AMC Networks Debt, consisting of $1,725,000 aggregate principal amount of senior secured term loans and $700,000 aggregate principal amount of senior unsecured notes to be issued by the Company in connection with the Distribution, fees on any undrawn revolver commitments and the related amortization of deferred financing costs associated with the New AMC Networks Debt. The deferred financing costs will be amortized over the applicable life of the senior secured term loans and senior unsecured notes. The interest rate on the $1,725,000 aggregate principal amount of senior secured term loans and $700,000 aggregate principal amount of senior unsecured notes will be a variable rate and a fixed rate, respectively, in each case to be determined. For purposes of the pro forma presentation, the current estimated weighted average rate on the New AMC Networks Debt is assumed to be 6.0% per annum. The current estimated weighted average rate of 6.0% per annum on the New AMC Networks Debt was calculated based on weighting the (i) current estimated variable rate for the senior secured term loans, (ii) current estimated fixed rate for the senior unsecured notes and (iii) estimated fixed rate fee on any undrawn revolver commitments. An increase of /% in the estimated weighted average interest rate on this debt would increase the pro forma adjustment by approximately $750 and approximately $3,000 for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and for the year ended December 31, 2010, respectively.
1
8
 
(9) Includes the pro forma adjustments to reduce income tax expense by $1,644 and $6,491 for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and for the year ended December 31, 2010, respectively, to reflect the change in the applicable corporate income tax rates that will be lower on a stand-alone basis as compared with the applicable corporate tax rates historically used by Cablevision, as well as the income tax impact related to the pro forma adjustments discussed above.
 
(10) The number of shares used to compute basic and diluted net income per share is 72,350,000, which is the number of shares of AMC Networks Inc. common stock assumed to be outstanding on the Distribution date, based on the outstanding Cablevision New York Group Class A and Class B Common Stock at March 31, 2011, and on a distribution ratio of one share of AMC Networks Inc. common stock for every four shares of Cablevision common stock outstanding. The actual number of our basic and diluted shares outstanding will not be known until the Distribution date. There is no dilutive impact from common stock equivalents for periods prior to the Distribution, as the Company had no dilutive securities outstanding. The dilutive effect of the Company's share-based awards that will be issued in connection with the conversion of Cablevision's share-based payment awards upon the Distribution and for future Company grants will be included in the computation of diluted income from continuing operations per share in periods subsequent to the Distribution.
Table of Contents
 
 
The operating and balance sheet data included in the following selected financial data as of December 31, 2010 and 2009 and for each year in the three-year period ended December 31, 2010 have been derived from the audited annual consolidated financial statements of AMC Networks Inc. included elsewhere in this Information Statement, and the balance sheet data as of December 31, 2008, 2007 and 2006 and the income statement data for the years ended December 31, 2007 and 2006 have been derived from the unaudited annual consolidated financial statements of the Company, which are not included in this Information Statement. The operating and balance sheet data included in the following selected financial data for the three months ended and as of March 31, 2011 and 2010 have been derived from the unaudited interim consolidated financial statements of the Company and, in the opinion of the management of the Company, reflect all adjustments necessary for the fair presentation of such data for the respective interim periods. The financial information does not necessarily reflect what our results of operations and financial position would have been if we had operated as a separate publicly-traded entity during the periods presented. The results of operations for the three month period ended March 31, 2011 are not necessarily indicative of the results that might be expected for future interim periods or for the full year ending December 31, 2011. The selected financial data presented below should be read in conjunction with the annual and interim financial statements included elsewhere in this Information Statement and with "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" and "Unaudited Pro Forma Consolidated Financial Information."
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
This Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations contains statements that constitute forward-looking information involving risks and uncertainties. In this Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations there are statements concerning our future operating and future financial performance. Words such as "expects," "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "may," "will," "should," "could," "potential," "continue," "intends," "plans" and similar words and terms used in the discussion of future operating results and future financial performance identify forward-looking statements. Investors are cautioned that such forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance or results and involve risks and uncertainties and that actual results or developments may differ materially from the forward-looking statements as a result of various factors. Factors that may cause such differences to occur include, but are not limited to:
 
 
We disclaim any obligation to update or revise the forward-looking statements contained herein, except as otherwise required by applicable federal securities laws.
 
All dollar amounts and subscriber data included in the following Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations are presented in thousands.
 
Introduction
 
Management's discussion and analysis, or MD&A, of our results of operations and financial condition is provided as a supplement to the audited annual consolidated financial statements and unaudited interim consolidated financial statements and notes thereto included elsewhere herein to help provide an understanding of our financial condition, changes in financial condition and results of our operations. The information included in MD&A should be read in conjunction with the annual and interim consolidated financial
Table of Contents
statements included in this Information Statement as well as the financial data set forth under "Selected Financial Data" and the pro forma consolidated financial information set forth under "Unaudited Pro Forma Consolidated Financial Information." Our MD&A is organized as follows:
 
This section provides a general description of our business, as well as other matters that we believe are important in understanding our results of operations and financial condition and in anticipating future trends.
Business Overview.
 
This section discusses accounting policies considered to be important to an understanding of our financial condition and results of operations, and which require significant judgment and estimates on the part of management in their application. In addition, all of our significant accounting policies, including our critical accounting policies, are discussed in the notes to our annual consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this Information Statement.
Critical Accounting Policies.
 
This section provides an analysis of our results of operations for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010, and for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008. Our discussion is presented on both a consolidated and segment basis. Our two segments are: (i) National Networks and (ii) International and Other.
Consolidated Results of Operations.
 
This section provides a discussion of our financial condition as of March 31, 2011 as well as an analysis of our cash flows for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010, and for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008. The discussion of our financial condition and liquidity includes summaries of (i) our primary sources of liquidity and (ii) our contractual obligations and off balance sheet arrangements that existed at December 31, 2010, along with any significant changes at March 31, 2011.
Liquidity and Capital Resources.
 
Business Overview
 
We manage our business through two reportable segments: (i) National Networks, which includes our four national programming networks (AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel); and (ii) International and Other, which includes AMC/Sundance Channel Global, our international programming business; IFC Entertainment, our independent film distribution business; AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, our network technical services business; and VOOM HD. Our national networks are distributed throughout the United States by multichannel video distributors. In addition to our extensive U.S. distribution, AMC and Sundance Channel are available in Canada and Sundance Channel and WE tv are available in certain other countries throughout Europe and Asia.
 
VOOM HD historically offered a suite of channels, produced exclusively in HD and marketed for distribution to DBS and cable television distributors ("VOOM"). VOOM was available in the United States only on Cablevision's cable television systems and on DISH Network. On December 18, 2008, the Company decided to discontinue funding the domestic offerings of VOOM. Subsequently, VOOM HD terminated the domestic offerings of VOOM. VOOM HD discontinued the VOOM international channel as of December 31, 2009. As of March 31, 2011, VOOM HD internationally distributes the Rush HD channel, a network dedicated to action and adventure sports. VOOM HD ceased distributing the Rush HD channel in Europe in April 2011. See also "Business  Legal Proceedings  DISH Network Contract Dispute."
 
We evaluate segment performance based on several factors, of which the primary financial measure is business segment adjusted operating cash flow (defined as operating income (loss) before depreciation and amortization, share-based compensation expense or benefit and restructuring expense or credit). We have presented the components that reconcile adjusted operating cash flow to operating income. The table below sets forth, for the periods presented, certain historical financial information for our reportable segments. For more discussion of the historical financial information for our reportable segments, see " Results of Operations  Business Segment Results" and Note 7 and Note 16 in the accompanying interim consolidated financial statements and annual consolidated financial statements, respectively.
 
Table of Contents
 
 
National Networks
 
In our National Networks segment, which accounted for 92% of our consolidated revenues, net of inter-segment eliminations, for the year ended December 31, 2010, we earn revenues in two principal ways. First, we receive affiliation payments from distributors. These revenues are generally based on a per subscriber fee under multi-year contracts, commonly referred to as "affiliation agreements," which generally provide for annual affiliation rate increases. The specific affiliation fee revenues we earn vary from period to period, distributor to
Table of Contents
distributor and also vary among our networks, but are generally based upon the number of each distributor's subscribers who receive our programming, referred to as "viewing subscribers." The terms of certain affiliation agreements provide that the affiliation fee revenues we earn are a fixed contractual monthly fee.
 
The second principal source of revenues is from advertising. Under our affiliation agreements with our distributors, we have the right to sell a specified amount of national advertising time on certain of our programming networks. Our advertising revenues are more variable than affiliation fee revenues because virtually all of our advertising is sold on a short-term basis, not under long-term contracts. Our advertising arrangements with advertisers provide for a set number of advertising units to air over a specific period of time at a negotiated price per unit. In certain advertising sales arrangements, our programming networks guarantee specified viewer ratings for their programming. If these guaranteed viewer ratings are not met, we are generally required to provide additional advertising units to the advertiser at no charge. For these types of arrangements, a portion of the related revenue is deferred if the guaranteed viewer ratings are not met and is subsequently recognized either when we provide the required additional advertising time, the guarantee obligation contractually expires or performance requirements become remote. Most of our advertising revenues vary based upon the popularity of our programming as measured by Nielsen. In 2010, our national programming networks had approximately 800 advertisers representing companies in a broad range of sectors, including the food, health, retail and automotive industries. Our AMC and WE tv programming networks use a traditional advertising sales model, while Sundance Channel principally sells sponsorships. Prior to December 2010, IFC principally sold sponsorships, but since then it migrated to a traditional advertising sales model.
 
We seek to grow our revenues by increasing the number of viewing subscribers of the distributors that carry our services. We refer to this as our "penetration." AMC, which is widely distributed, has a more limited ability to increase its penetration than do WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel. WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel, although carried by all of the larger distributors, have higher growth opportunities due to their current penetration levels with those distributors. IFC and Sundance Channel are currently carried primarily on digital tiers, while WE tv is carried on either analog expanded basic or digital tiers. Therefore, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel penetration rates may increase if distributors are successful in converting their analog subscribers to digital tiers of service that include those networks. Our revenues may also increase over time through contractual rate increases stipulated in most of our affiliation agreements. In negotiating for increased or extended carriage, we have in some instances made upfront payments in exchange for additional subscribers or extended carriage, which we record as deferred carriage fees and which are amortized as a reduction to revenue over the period of the related affiliation agreements, or agreed to waive for a specified period or accept lower per subscriber fees if certain additional subscribers are provided. We also may help fund the distributors' efforts to market our channels. We believe that these transactions generate a positive return on investment over the contract period. We seek to increase our advertising revenues by increasing the number of minutes of national advertising sold and by increasing the rates we charge for such advertising, but, ultimately, the level of our advertising revenues, in most cases, is directly related to the overall distribution of our programming, penetration of our services and the popularity (including within desirable demographic groups) of our services as measured by Nielsen.
 
Our principal goals are to increase our affiliation fee revenues and our advertising revenues by increasing distribution and penetration of our services, and increasing our ratings. To do this, we must continue to contract for and produce high-quality, attractive programming. There is an increasing concentration of subscribers in the hands of a few distributors, which could create disparate bargaining power between the largest distributors and us by giving those distributors greater leverage in negotiating the price and other terms of affiliation agreements.
 
International and Other
 
Our International and Other segment includes the operations of AMC/Sundance Channel Global, our international programming business; IFC Entertainment, our independent film distribution business; AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, our network technical services business; and VOOM HD.
Table of Contents
Although we view our international expansion as an important long-term strategy, international expansion is currently expected to represent only a small amount of our projected overall financial results over the next five years. However, international expansion could provide a benefit to our financial results if we were able to grow this portion of our business faster than expected. Similar to our domestic businesses, the most significant business challenges we expect to encounter in our international business include programming competition (from both foreign and domestic programmers), limited channel capacity on distributors' platforms, the growth of subscribers on those platforms and economic pressures on affiliation fees. Other significant business challenges unique to international expansion include increased programming costs for international rights and translation ( dubbing and subtitling), a lack of availability of international rights for a portion of our domestic programming content, increased distribution costs for cable, satellite or fiber feeds and a limited physical presence in each territory.
i.e.
 
Corporate Expenses
 
Our historical results of operations reflected in our consolidated financial statements include management fee charges and the allocation of expenses related to certain corporate functions historically provided by Cablevision. These management fee charges were made pursuant to a consulting agreement with Cablevision and the expense allocations for providing certain management services to subsidiaries of the Company were based on what the Company and Cablevision considered to be reasonable reflections of the historical utilization levels of these services required in support of our business. As a separate, stand-alone public company, we will need to expand our financial, administrative and other staff to support these new requirements. In addition, we will need to add staff and systems to replace many of the functions previously provided by Cablevision. However, our corporate operating costs as a separate company subsequent to the Distribution, including those associated with being a publicly-traded company, are expected to be lower than the historical allocation of expenses related to certain corporate functions (including management fee charges). We will terminate the consulting agreement on the Distribution date and will not replace such agreement.
 
Cautionary Note Concerning Historical Financial Statements
 
Our financial information does not necessarily reflect what our results of operations and financial position would have been if we had operated as an entity separate from Cablevision, our indirect parent, during the periods presented herein.
 
Impact of Economic Conditions
 
Our future performance is dependent, to a large extent, on general economic conditions including the impact of direct competition, our ability to manage our businesses effectively, and our relative strength and leverage in the marketplace, both with suppliers and customers.
 
Additional capital and credit market disruptions could cause economic downturns, which may lead to lower demand for our products, such as lower demand for television advertising and a decrease in the number of subscribers receiving our programming networks from our distributors. We have experienced some of the effects of the recent economic downturn. Continuation of events such as these may adversely impact our results of operations, cash flows and financial position.
 
Critical Accounting Policies
 
In preparing its financial statements, the Company is required to make certain estimates, judgments and assumptions that it believes are reasonable based upon the information available. These estimates and assumptions affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the periods presented. The significant accounting policies
Table of Contents
which we believe are the most critical to aid in fully understanding and evaluating our reported financial results include the following:
 
Impairment of Long-Lived and Indefinite-Lived Assets
 
The Company's long-lived and indefinite-lived assets at March 31, 2011 include property and equipment, net of $65,453, amortizable intangible assets, net of $345,104, identifiable indefinite-lived intangible assets of $19,900 and goodwill of $83,173. These assets accounted for approximately 27% of the Company's consolidated total assets as of March 31, 2011.
 
The Company reviews its long-lived assets (property and equipment, and intangible assets subject to amortization that arose from acquisitions) for impairment whenever events or circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of an asset may not be recoverable. If the sum of the expected cash flows, undiscounted and without interest, is less than the carrying amount of the asset, an impairment loss is recognized as the amount by which the carrying amount of the asset exceeds its fair value.
 
Goodwill and indefinite-lived intangible assets, which represent Sundance Channel trademarks of $19,900, are tested annually for impairment during the first quarter ("annual impairment test date") and upon the occurrence of certain events or substantive changes in circumstances.
 
The Company is required to determine goodwill impairment using a two-step process. The first step of the goodwill impairment test is used to identify potential impairment by comparing the fair value of a reporting unit with its carrying amount, including goodwill utilizing an enterprise-value based premise approach. If the carrying amount of a reporting unit exceeds its fair value, the second step of the goodwill impairment test is performed to measure the amount of goodwill impairment loss, if any. The second step of the goodwill impairment test compares the implied fair value of the reporting unit's goodwill with the carrying amount of that goodwill. If the carrying amount of the reporting unit's goodwill exceeds the implied fair value of that goodwill, an impairment loss is recognized in an amount equal to that excess. The implied fair value of goodwill is determined in the same manner as the amount of goodwill that would be recognized in a business combination. For the purpose of evaluating goodwill impairment at the annual impairment test date, the Company had five reporting units, which recognized goodwill. These reporting units are AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel, which are included in the National Networks reportable segment, and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, which is included in the International and Other reportable segment.
 
The goodwill balance as of March 31, 2011 by reporting unit is as follows:
 
 
In assessing the recoverability of the Company's goodwill and other long-lived assets, the Company must make assumptions regarding estimated future cash flows and other factors to determine the fair value of the respective assets. These estimates and assumptions could have a significant impact on whether an impairment charge is recognized and also the magnitude of any such charge. Fair value estimates are made at a specific point in time, based on relevant information. These estimates are subjective in nature and involve uncertainties and matters of significant judgments and therefore cannot be determined with precision. Changes in assumptions could significantly affect the estimates. Estimates of fair value are primarily determined using discounted cash flows and comparable market transactions. These valuations are based on estimates and assumptions including projected future cash flows, discount rate, and determination of appropriate market comparables and determination of whether a premium or discount should be applied to comparables. These valuations also include assumptions for the projected number of subscribers and the projected average rates
Table of Contents
per basic and viewing subscribers and growth in fixed price contractual arrangements used to determine affiliation fee revenue, access to program rights and the cost of such program rights, amount of programming time that is advertiser supported, number of advertising spots available and the sell through rates for those spots, average fee per advertising spot, and operating margins, among other assumptions. If these estimates or material related assumptions change in the future, we may be required to record impairment charges related to our long-lived assets.
 
Based on the Company's annual impairment test during the first quarter of 2011, the Company's reporting units had significant safety margins, representing the excess of the estimated fair value of each reporting unit less its respective carrying value (including goodwill allocated to each respective reporting unit). In order to evaluate the sensitivity of the estimated fair value calculations of the Company's reporting units on the annual impairment calculation for goodwill, the Company applied a hypothetical 30% decrease to the estimated fair values of each reporting unit. This hypothetical decrease would have no impact on the goodwill impairment analysis for any of the Company's reporting units.
 
The impairment test for identifiable indefinite-lived intangible assets consists of a comparison of the estimated fair value of the intangible asset with its carrying value. If the carrying value of the indefinite-lived intangible asset exceeds its fair value, an impairment loss is recognized in an amount equal to that excess.
 
The Company's indefinite-lived trademark intangible assets relate to the Company's Sundance Channel trademarks, which were valued using a relief-from-royalty method in which the expected benefits are valued by discounting estimated royalty revenue over projected revenues covered by the trademarks. The Sundance Channel related trademarks were recorded in June 2008 when the Company completed transactions which resulted in the 100% acquisition of Sundance Channel L.L.C. Significant judgments inherent in a valuation include the selection of appropriate discount and royalty rates, estimating the amount and timing of estimated future cash flows and identification of appropriate continuing growth rate assumptions. The discount rates used in the analysis are intended to reflect the risk inherent in the projected future cash flows generated by the respective intangible assets.
 
Based on the Company's annual impairment test during the first quarter of 2011, the Company's Sundance Channel related trademarks identifiable indefinite-lived intangible assets had significant safety margins, representing the excess of the identifiable indefinite-lived intangible assets estimated fair value less their respective carrying values. In order to evaluate the sensitivity of the fair value calculations of the Company's identifiable indefinite-lived intangible assets, the Company applied a hypothetical 30% decrease to the estimated fair value of the Company's identifiable indefinite-lived intangible assets. This hypothetical decrease in estimated fair value would have resulted in an impairment charge of approximately $400.
 
During 2008, the Company recorded an impairment charge of $15,034, included in depreciation and amortization for the write-off of deferred carriage fees at VOOM HD after DISH Network ceased the distribution of VOOM in May 2008. See "Business  Legal Proceedings  DISH Network Contract Dispute."
 
Useful Lives of Finite-Lived Intangible Assets
 
The Company has recognized intangible assets for affiliation agreements and affiliate relationships, advertiser relationships and other intangible assets as a result of purchase accounting. The Company has determined that such intangible assets have finite lives. The estimated useful lives and net carrying values of these intangible assets at March 31, 2011 are as follows:
 
 
The useful lives for the affiliation agreements and affiliate relationships were determined based upon an analysis of the weighted average remaining terms of existing agreements the Company had in place with its
Table of Contents
major customers at the time that purchase accounting was applied, plus an estimate for renewals of such agreements. The Company has been successful in renewing its major affiliation agreements and maintaining customer relationships in the past and believes it will be able to renew its major affiliation agreements and maintain those customer relationships in the future. However, it is possible that the Company will not successfully renew such agreements as they expire or that if it does, the net revenue earned may not equal or exceed the net revenue currently being earned, which could have a significant adverse impact on our business.
 
There have been periods when an existing affiliation agreement has expired and the parties have not finalized negotiations of either a renewal of that agreement or a new agreement for certain periods of time. In substantially all these instances, the affiliates continued to carry and pay for the service under oral or written interim agreements until execution of definitive replacement agreements or renewals. If an affiliate were to cease carrying a service on an other than temporary basis, the Company would record an impairment charge for the then remaining carrying value of that affiliation agreement and affiliate relationship intangible asset. If the Company were to renew an affiliation agreement at rates that produced materially less net revenue compared to the net revenue produced under the previous agreement, the Company would evaluate the impact on its cash flows and, if necessary, would further evaluate such indication of potential impairment by following the policy described above under "Impairment of Long-Lived and Indefinite-Lived Assets" for the asset group containing that intangible asset. The Company also would evaluate whether the remaining useful life of the affiliation agreement and affiliate relationship intangible asset remained appropriate. Based on December 31, 2010 carrying values, if the estimated remaining life of all affiliation agreements and affiliate relationships were shortened by 10%, the effect on amortization for the year ending December 31, 2011 would be to increase our annual amortization expense by approximately $7,944.
 
Program Rights
 
Rights to programming, including feature films and episodic series, acquired under license agreements are stated at the lower of amortized cost or net realizable value. Such licensed rights along with the related obligations are recorded at the contract value when a license agreement is executed, unless there is uncertainty with respect to either cost, acceptability or availability. If such uncertainty exists, those rights and obligations are recorded at the earlier of when the uncertainty is resolved or when the license period begins. Costs are amortized to technical and operating expense on a straight-line basis over a period not to exceed the respective license periods.
 
Our owned original programming is primarily produced by independent production companies, with the remainder produced by us. Owned original programming costs, including estimated participation and residual costs, qualifying for capitalization as program rights are amortized to technical and operating expense over their estimated useful lives, commencing upon the first airing, based on attributable revenue for airings to date as a percentage of total projected attributable revenue. Projected program usage is based on the historical performance of similar content. Estimated attributable revenue can change based upon programming market acceptance, levels of affiliation fee revenue and advertising revenue, and program usage. Accordingly, we periodically review revenue estimates and planned usage and revise our assumptions if necessary, which could impact the timing of amortization expense or result in an impairment charge.
 
We periodically review the programming usefulness of our licensed and owned original program rights based on a series of factors, including ratings, type and quality of program material, standards and practices, and fitness for exhibition. If it is determined that film or other program rights have no future programming usefulness, a write-off of the unamortized cost is recorded in technical and operating expense. Other than those recorded in connection with VOOM HD's restructuring activities (see Note 4 in the accompanying annual consolidated financial statements), impairment charges of $1,122 and $7,778 were recorded for the years ended December 31, 2010 and 2009, respectively, and $274 for the three months ended March 31, 2011. There were no impairment charges recorded for the year ended December 31, 2008 and for the three months ended March 31, 2010.
Table of Contents
Valuation of Deferred Tax Assets
 
Deferred tax assets have resulted primarily from the Company's future deductible temporary differences and net operating loss carry forwards ("NOLs"). In assessing the realizability of deferred tax assets, management considers whether it is more likely than not that some portion or all of the deferred tax asset will not be realized. The Company's ability to realize its deferred tax assets depends upon the generation of sufficient future taxable income and tax planning strategies to allow for the utilization of its NOLs and deductible temporary differences. If such estimates and related assumptions change in the future, the Company may be required to record additional valuation allowances against its deferred tax assets, resulting in additional income tax expense in the Company's consolidated statement of operations. Management evaluates the realizability of the deferred tax assets and the need for additional valuation allowances quarterly. At this time, based on current facts and circumstances, management believes that it is more likely than not that the Company will realize benefit for its gross deferred tax assets, except those deferred tax assets against which a valuation allowance has been recorded which relate to certain local tax credit carry forwards. The Company increased the valuation allowance by $1,398, $1,309 and $1,189 in 2010, 2009 and 2008, respectively and by $385 and $358 for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010, respectively.
 
Certain Transactions
 
The following transactions occurred during the periods covered by this Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations:
 
2010 Transactions
 
On December 31, 2010, RMH transferred its membership interests in News 12 (regional news programming services), RASCO (a cable television advertising company), and certain other businesses to wholly-owned subsidiaries of Cablevision in contemplation of the Distribution. The operating results of these transferred entities through the date of transfer have been presented in discontinued operations for all periods presented in the accompanying consolidated financial statements.
 
2008 Transaction
 
In June 2008, the Company acquired a 100% interest in Sundance Channel L.L.C. for a purchase price, including transaction costs, of $482,416 and its results have been included in the accompanying consolidated financial statements from the date of acquisition.
Table of Contents
 
Consolidated Results of Operations
 
The following table sets forth on a historical basis certain items related to operations as a percentage of revenues, net for the periods indicated.
 
 
 
The following is a reconciliation of operating income to AOCF:
 
Table of Contents
 
 
The following is a reconciliation of operating income to AOCF:
 
Table of Contents
 
 
The following is a reconciliation of operating income to AOCF:
 
Table of Contents
Comparison of Consolidated Results  Overview
 
Consolidated Results  AMC Networks Inc.
 
We classify our operations into two reportable segments:
 
 
On December 31, 2010, RMH transferred its membership interests in News 12, RASCO and certain other businesses to wholly-owned subsidiaries of Cablevision in contemplation of the Distribution. The operating results of these transferred entities through the date of the transfer have been presented in the consolidated statements of operations as discontinued operations for all periods presented. Additionally, the net operating results following the sale of our ownership interests in the Lifeskool and Sportskool services in September and October 2008, respectively, which were recorded under the installment sales method, have been classified as discontinued operations for all periods presented.
video-on-demand
 
We allocate certain amounts of our corporate overhead to each segment based upon their proportionate estimated usage of services. The segment financial information set forth below, including the discussion related to individual line items, does not reflect inter-segment eliminations unless specifically indicated.
 
Pursuant to a consulting agreement with Cablevision, the Company pays a management fee calculated based on gross revenues (as defined under the terms of the consulting agreement) on a monthly basis. We will terminate the consulting agreement on the Distribution date and will not replace such agreement.
 
As a separate, stand-alone public company, we will need to expand our financial, administrative and other staff to support these new requirements. In addition, we will need to add staff and systems to replace many of the functions previously provided by Cablevision. However, our corporate operating costs as a separate company subsequent to the Distribution, including those associated with being a company, are expected to be lower than the historical allocation of expenses related to certain corporate functions (including management fee charges). See Note 12 of the accompanying annual consolidated financial statements for a detailed discussion of corporate expenses allocated by Cablevision.
publicly-traded
 
Our consolidated results discussion focuses primarily on the relative performance of our two segments  National Networks and International and Other. Immediately following this discussion are sections that separately address the performance of each of our segments. In those sections, we provide more detailed analysis of the reasons for increases or decreases in the various line items at the segment level.
Table of Contents
Comparison of Consolidated Three Months Ended March 31, 2011 Versus Three Months Ended March 31, 2010
 
for the three months ended March 31, 2011 increased $24,531 (10%) as compared to revenues, net for the same period in the prior year. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Revenues, net
 
 
include primarily:
Technical and operating expenses (excluding depreciation, amortization and impairments)
 
 
for the three months ended March 31, 2011 increased $7,986 (10%) as compared to the same period in 2010. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Technical and operating expenses (excluding depreciation and amortization)
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, technical and operating expenses were 33% for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010.
 
include primarily sales, marketing and advertising expenses, administrative costs, and costs of facilities. Selling, general and administrative expenses increased $8,477 (11%) for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to the same period in 2010. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Selling, general and administrative expenses
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, selling, general and administrative expenses were 32% for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010.
 
decreased $1,764 (7%) for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to the same period in 2010. The net decrease is attributable to the following:
Depreciation and amortization
 
Table of Contents
increased $8,201 (9%) for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to the same period in 2010. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Adjusted operating cash flow
 
 
decreased $1,223 (6%) for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to the same period in 2010. The net decrease is attributable to the following:
Interest expense, net
 
 
The Company recorded income tax expense attributable to continuing operations of $23,136 for the three months ended March 31, 2011, representing an effective tax rate of 44%. The effective tax rate was higher than the federal statutory rate of 35% due primarily to state income tax expense of $2,803, tax expense of $385 resulting from an increase in the valuation allowance with regard to certain local income tax credit carry forwards, and tax expense of $1,523, including accrued interest, related to uncertain tax positions.
Income tax expense:
 
The Company recorded income tax expense attributable to continuing operations of $17,906 for the three months ended March 31, 2010, representing an effective tax rate of 43%. The effective tax rate was higher than the federal statutory rate of 35% due primarily to state income tax expense of $2,276, tax expense of $358 resulting from an increase in the valuation allowance with regard to certain local income tax credit carry forwards and tax expense of $395, including accrued interest, related to uncertain tax positions.
 
Income (loss) from discontinued operations
 
Income (loss) from discontinued operations, net of income taxes, for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010 reflects the following items, net of related income taxes:
 
Table of Contents
Business Segment Results
 
National Networks
 
The table below sets forth, for the periods presented, certain historical financial information and the percentage that those items bear to revenues, net for our National Networks segment.
 
 
The following is a reconciliation of operating income to AOCF:
 
 
for the three months ended March 31, 2011 increased $19,809 (9%) as compared to revenues, net for the same period in the prior year. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Revenues, net
 
 
Revenue increases discussed above are primarily derived from an increase in contractual affiliation rates charged for our services, an increase in the number of subscribers and an increase in the prices and level of advertising on our networks. Affiliation fee revenues are generally based on a per subscriber fee under multi-year affiliation agreements, which generally provide for annual affiliation rate increases. The specific affiliation fee revenues we earn vary from period to period, distributor to distributor and also vary among our networks, but are generally based upon the number of each distributor's subscribers who receive our programming. The terms of certain affiliation agreements provide that the affiliation fee revenues we earn are
Table of Contents
a fixed contractual monthly fee. Our advertising revenues are more variable than affiliation fee revenues because virtually all of our advertising is sold on a short-term basis. Our advertising arrangements with advertisers provide for a set number of advertising units to air over a specific period of time at a negotiated price per unit and in certain advertising arrangements, guarantee specified viewer ratings. If these guaranteed viewer ratings are not met, we are generally required to provide additional advertising units to the advertiser, resulting in revenue being deferred until such time as the guarantee has been met. Most of our advertising revenues vary based on the popularity of our programming as measured by Nielsen.
 
The following table presents certain subscriber information at March 31, 2011, December 31, 2010 and March 31, 2010:
 
 
 
 
The Company believes the WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel programming services may benefit from increased distribution, especially on the digital tiers of cable television distributors as digital penetration increases, and increased advertising revenues as cable networks, including advertiser-supported niche programming networks (such as WE tv and IFC), attract a greater advertising market share. These increases could potentially be offset by lower net effective rates per viewing subscriber for our programming services due to the consolidation of distributors and limited opportunities for increases in distribution in the United States for our substantially fully penetrated AMC programming service. Changes in the viewership ratings of our AMC, WE tv and IFC programming services may also significantly affect future advertising revenues. We believe that the decline in IFC subscribers shown as of March 31, 2011 as compared to December 31, 2011 may reflect the impact on the Nielsen sampling of channel or tiering changes by distributors, as IFC did not lose any affiliate relationships during the relevant periods.
 
for the three months ended March 31, 2011 increased $3,996 (6%) as compared to the same period in 2010. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Technical and operating expenses (excluding depreciation and amortization)
 
 
The increase in amortization of program rights and series development/original programming costs for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to the same period in the prior year is due primarily to increased amortization of program rights at AMC and WE tv, partially offset by a decrease at IFC and Sundance Channel. The increase in programming related costs resulted principally from increased formatting related costs.
 
As a percentage of revenues, technical and operating expenses decreased to 30% for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to 31% for the same period in the prior year.
Table of Contents
There may be significant changes in the level of our technical and operating expenses from quarter to quarter changes from year to year due to content acquisition original programming costs. As additional competition for programming increases from programming services and alternate distribution technologies continue to develop in the industry, costs for content acquisition original programming may increase.
and/or
and/or
and/or
 
increased $9,794 (16%) for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to the same period in 2010. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Selling, general and administrative expenses
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, selling, general and administrative expenses increased to 29% for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to 27% for the same period in the prior year.
 
The increase in sales and marketing costs is also due to an increase in advertising sales related expenses at AMC and WE tv due to increased advertising sales revenues for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to the same period in 2010. Management fees increased to $6,740 for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to $6,218 for the same period in 2010 due to the increased revenues at AMC and WE tv in 2011 as compared to 2010. Pursuant to a consulting agreement with Cablevision, we pay a management fee calculated based on gross revenues (as defined under the terms of the consulting agreement) on a monthly basis. We will terminate the consulting agreement on the Distribution date and will not replace such agreement.
 
There may be significant changes in the level of our selling, general and administrative expenses from quarter to quarter and year to year due to the timing of promotion and marketing of original programming. The increase in selling, marketing and advertising costs at IFC and WE tv for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to the same period in 2010 may not be indicative of the full year results for the year ending December 31, 2011.
 
decreased $1,872 (8%) for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to the same period in 2010. Amortization expense decreased $1,886 for 2011 as compared to 2010 primarily resulting from certain identifiable intangible assets of Sundance Channel becoming fully amortized in the fourth quarter of 2010. Depreciation expense increased $14 for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to the same period in 2010.
Depreciation and amortization
 
increased $6,084 (6%) for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to the same period in 2010 due to an increase in revenues, net of $19,809, partially offset by an increase in operating expenses resulting primarily from an increase in amortization of program rights expense and marketing expense due to the increase in the number of original programming premieres, excluding share-based compensation, and depreciation and amortization expense, as discussed above.
Adjusted operating cash flow
Table of Contents
International and Other
 
The table below sets forth, for the periods presented, certain historical financial information and the percentage that those items bear to revenues, net for our International and Other segment.
 
 
The following is a reconciliation of operating loss to AOCF deficit:
 
 
The International and Other segment includes the operating results of VOOM HD. As of March 31, 2011, VOOM HD distributed internationally the Rush HD channel, a network dedicated to action and adventure sports. The 2011 operating loss of VOOM HD of $4,491 included primarily legal fees, costs and related expenses of approximately $3,100 incurred in connection with the DISH Network contract dispute and technical expense of approximately $1,200 resulting primarily from a reduction in the estimated useful life of program rights related to ceasing distribution of the Rush HD channel in Europe in April 2011. The 2010 operating loss of VOOM HD of $5,450 included primarily legal fees, costs and related expenses incurred in connection with the DISH Network contract dispute.
 
for the three months ended March 31, 2011 increased $5,499 (28%) as compared to revenues, net for the same period in the prior year. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Revenues, net
 
Table of Contents
for the three months ended March 31, 2011 increased $4,376 (30%) as compared to the same period in the prior year. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Technical and operating expenses (excluding depreciation and amortization)
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, technical and operating expenses increased to 75% for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to 73% for the three months ended March 31, 2010.
 
decreased $1,244 (8%) for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to the same period in the prior year. The net decrease is attributable to the following:
Selling, general, and administrative expenses
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, selling, general and administrative expenses decreased to 57% for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to 78% for the three months ended March 31, 2010.
 
increased $108 (3%) in 2011 as compared to 2010 due to an increase in depreciation expense primarily related to AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology.
Depreciation and amortization
 
deficit decreased $2,435 (26%) for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to the same period in 2010 due to an increase in revenues, net of $5,499 and a decrease in selling, general and administrative expenses of $1,312, partially offset by an increase in technical and operating expenses of $4,376, excluding share-based compensation, and depreciation and amortization expense, as discussed above.
Adjusted operating cash flow
Table of Contents
Comparison of Consolidated Year Ended December 31, 2010 Versus Year Ended December 31, 2009
 
Consolidated Results  AMC Networks Inc.
 
for the year ended December 31, 2010 increased $104,656 (11%) as compared to revenues, net for the prior year. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Revenues, net
 
 
include primarily:
Technical and operating expenses (excluding depreciation, amortization and impairments)
 
 
in 2010 increased $55,728 (18%) as compared to 2009. The increase is attributable to the following:
Technical and operating expenses (excluding depreciation, amortization and impairments)
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, technical and operating expenses increased to 34% for the year ended December 31, 2010 as compared to 32% for the year ended December 31, 2009.
 
include primarily sales, marketing and advertising expenses, administrative costs, and costs of facilities. Selling, general and administrative expenses increased $14,230 (5%) for 2010 as compared to 2009. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Selling, general and administrative expenses
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, selling, general and administrative expenses decreased to 30% for the year ended December 31, 2010 as compared to 32% for the year ended December 31, 2009.
 
decreased $49 (less than 1%) for 2010 as compared to 2009. The net decrease is attributable to the following:
Depreciation and amortization (including impairments)
 
Table of Contents
increased $37,181 (10%) for the year ended December 31, 2010 as compared to the same period in 2009. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Adjusted operating cash flow
 
 
decreased $2,293 (3%) for 2010 as compared to 2009. The net decrease is attributable to the following:
Interest expense, net
 
 
was $3,237 for the year ended December 31, 2009. The interest rate swap contracts effectively fixed the borrowing rates on a substantial portion of the Company's floating rate debt to limit the exposure against the risk of rising rates. The loss on interest rate swap contracts resulted from a shift in the yield curve over the life of the swap contracts. The interest rate swap contracts matured in November 2009.
Loss on interest rate swap contracts, net
 
: The Company recorded income tax expense attributable to continuing operations of $88,073 for the year ended December 31, 2010, representing an effective tax rate of 43%. The effective tax rate was higher than the federal statutory rate of 35% due primarily to state income tax expense of $10,937, tax expense of $1,398 resulting from an increase in the valuation allowance with regard to certain local income tax credit carry forwards, tax expense of $1,236 for the impact of a change in the state rate used to measure deferred taxes and tax expense of $1,890, including accrued interest, related to uncertain tax positions.
Income tax expense
 
The Company recorded income tax expense attributable to continuing operations of $70,407 for the year ended December 31, 2009, representing an effective tax rate of 44%. The effective tax rate was higher than the federal statutory rate of 35% due primarily to state income tax expense of $9,238, tax expense of $1,309 resulting from an increase in the valuation allowance with regard to certain local income tax credit carry forwards, tax expense of $638 for the impact of a change in the state rate used to measure deferred taxes and tax expense of $3,250, including accrued interest, related to uncertain tax positions.
 
Loss from discontinued operations
 
Loss from discontinued operations, net of income taxes, for the years ended December 31, 2010 and 2009 reflects the following items, net of related income taxes and noncontrolling interests:
 
Table of Contents
Business Segment Results
 
National Networks
 
The table below sets forth, for the periods presented, certain historical financial information and the percentage that those items bear to revenues, net for our National Networks segment.
 
 
The following is a reconciliation of operating income to AOCF:
 
 
for the year ended December 31, 2010 increased $98,080 (11%) as compared to revenues, net for the prior year. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Revenues, net
 
 
Revenue increases discussed above are primarily derived from an increase in contractual affiliation rates charged for our services, an increase in the number of subscribers and an increase in the prices and level of advertising on our networks. Affiliation fee revenues are generally based on a per subscriber fee under multi-year affiliation agreements, which generally provide for annual affiliation rate increases. The specific affiliation fee revenues we earn vary from period to period, distributor to distributor and also vary among our networks, but are generally based upon the number of each distributor's subscribers who receive our programming. The terms of certain affiliation agreements provide that the affiliation fee revenues we earn are a fixed contractual monthly fee. Our advertising revenues are more variable than affiliation fee revenues because virtually all of our advertising is sold on a short-term basis. Our advertising arrangements with
Table of Contents
advertisers provide for a set number of advertising units to air over a specific period of time at a negotiated price per unit and, in certain advertising arrangements, guarantee specified viewer ratings. If these guaranteed viewer ratings are not met, we are generally required to provide additional advertising units to the advertiser, resulting in revenue being deferred until such time as the guarantee has been met. Most of our advertising revenues vary based on the popularity of our programming as measured by Nielsen.
 
The following table presents certain subscriber information at December 31, 2010 and 2009:
 
 
 
 
The Company believes the WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel programming services may benefit from increased distribution, especially on the digital tiers of cable television distributors as digital penetration increases, and increased advertising revenues as cable networks, including advertiser-supported niche programming networks (such as WE tv and IFC), attract a greater advertising market share. These increases could potentially be offset by lower net effective rates per viewing subscriber for our programming services due to the consolidation of distributors and limited opportunities for increases in distribution in the United States for our substantially fully penetrated AMC programming service. Changes in the viewership ratings of our AMC, WE tv and IFC programming services may also significantly affect future advertising revenues.
 
for the year ended December 31, 2010 increased $45,490 (17%) as compared to 2009. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Technical and operating expenses (excluding depreciation and amortization and impairments)
 
 
The increase in amortization of program rights and series development/original programming costs for the year ended December 31, 2010 as compared to the prior year is due primarily to increased amortization of program rights at AMC and, to a lesser extent increased amortization of program rights at WE tv and IFC. The increase in programming related costs resulted principally from increased presentation, interstitial and formatting related costs.
 
As a percentage of revenues, technical and operating expenses increased to 32% for the year ended December 31, 2010 as compared to 30% for the year ended December 31, 2009.
 
There may be significant changes in the level of our technical and operating expenses from quarter to quarter changes from year to year due to content acquisition original programming costs. As additional competition for programming increases from programming services and alternate distribution technologies continue to develop in the industry, costs for content acquisition original programming may increase.
and/or
and/or
and/or
Table of Contents
increased $15,749 (6%) for 2010 compared to 2009. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Selling, general and administrative expenses
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, selling, general and administrative expenses decreased to 27% for the year ended December 31, 2010 as compared to 29% for the year ended December 31, 2009.
 
The increase in sales and marketing costs is also due to an increase in advertising sales related expenses at AMC and WE tv due to increased advertising sales revenues in 2010 compared to 2009. Management fees of $26,511 in 2010 compared to $23,773 in 2009 increased due to the increased revenues at AMC and WE tv in 2010. Pursuant to a consulting agreement with Cablevision, the Company pays a management fee calculated based on gross revenues (as defined under the terms of the consulting agreement) on a monthly basis. We will terminate the consulting agreement on the Distribution date and will not replace such agreement.
 
There may be significant changes in the level of our selling, general and administrative expenses from quarter to quarter and year to year due to the timing of promotion and marketing of original programming.
 
increased $3,132 (3%) in 2010 as compared to 2009. Depreciation expense increased $158 for the year ended December 31, 2010 as compared to 2009. Amortization expense increased $2,974 for 2010 as compared to 2009 primarily due to the increase in amortization resulting from a reduction in the estimated useful life of certain identifiable intangible assets acquired in connection with the acquisition of Sundance Channel in June 2008, partially offset by a decrease in amortization due to certain intangible assets of AMC, WE tv and IFC becoming fully amortized in the second quarter of 2009.
Depreciation and amortization
 
increased $38,227 (10%) in 2010 compared to 2009 due to an increase in revenues, net of $98,080, partially offset by an increase in operating expenses resulting primarily from an increase in amortization of program rights expense and marketing expense due to the increase in the number of original programming premieres, excluding share-based compensation, and depreciation and amortization expense, as discussed above.
Adjusted operating cash flow
Table of Contents
International and Other
 
The table below sets forth, for the periods presented, certain historical financial information and the percentage that those items bear to revenues, net for our International and Other segment.
 
 
The following is a reconciliation of operating loss to AOCF deficit:
 
 
In January 2009, the domestic programming of VOOM was shut down. This decision had a favorable impact on the operating loss of our International and Other reportable segment of $20,089 for the year ended December 31, 2010 as the loss of revenues from our VOOM domestic business was more than offset by the elimination of most operating expenses of VOOM HD. The 2010 operating loss of VOOM HD of $9,303 included primarily legal fees, costs and related expenses of approximately $11,100 in connection with the DISH Network contract dispute, partially offset by a restructuring credit of $2,218. The 2009 operating loss of VOOM HD of $29,392 represents primarily legal fees, costs and related expenses of approximately $16,800 in connection with the DISH Network contract dispute and restructuring expense of $5,162.
Table of Contents
for the year ended December 31, 2010 increased $8,578 (9%) as compared to revenues, net for the prior year. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Revenues, net
 
 
The decrease in revenues of VOOM was due primarily to the loss of carriage by Cablevision effective January 20, 2009.
 
for the year ended December 31, 2010 increased $11,910 (22%) as compared to the prior year. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Technical and operating expenses (excluding depreciation and amortization)
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, technical and operating expenses increased to 63% for the year ended December 31, 2010 as compared to 56% for the year ended December 31, 2009.
Table of Contents
decreased $1,102 (2%) for the year ended December 31, 2010 as compared to the prior year. The net decrease is attributable to the following:
Selling, general, and administrative expenses
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, selling, general and administrative expenses decreased to 55% for the year ended December 31, 2010 as compared to 61% for the year ended December 31, 2009.
 
decreased $3,181 (19%) in 2010 as compared to 2009 due to a decrease in depreciation expense primarily related to VOOM HD, AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology and corporate fixed assets.
Depreciation and amortization (including impairments)
 
of $2,218 for the year ended December 31, 2010 represents primarily the negotiated reductions of contract termination costs originally recorded in 2008 following the Company's decision to discontinue funding the domestic programming of VOOM HD.
Restructuring credit
 
of $5,162 for the year ended December 31, 2009 represents primarily the impairment of program rights and contract termination costs due to the Company's decision in 2009 to discontinue funding certain international VOOM HD programming.
Restructuring expense
 
increased $1,133 (8%) for the year ended December 31, 2010 as compared to 2009. The increase was due primarily to an increase in operating expenses (excluding depreciation and amortization and share-based compensation) due primarily to the launch of certain AMC/Sundance Channel Global services and an increased number of titles being distributed by IFC Entertainment, partially offset by an increase in revenues, net.
Adjusted operating cash flow deficit
 
Comparison of Consolidated Year Ended December 31, 2009 Versus Year Ended December 31, 2008
 
Consolidated Results  AMC Networks Inc.
 
for the year ended December 31, 2009 increased $80,087 (9%) as compared to revenues, net for the prior year. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Revenues, net
 
Table of Contents
in 2009 decreased $4,595 (1%) as compared to 2008. The net decrease is attributable to the following:
Technical and operating expenses (excluding depreciation, amortization and impairments)
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, technical and operating expenses decreased to 32% for the year ended December 31, 2009 as compared to 35% for the year ended December 31, 2008.
 
increased $11,430 (4%) for 2009 as compared to 2008. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Selling, general and administrative expenses
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, selling, general and administrative expenses decreased to 32% for the year ended December 31, 2009 as compared to 34% for the year ended December 31, 2008.
 
of $5,162 for the year ended December 31, 2009 represents primarily the impairment of program rights and contract termination costs due to the Company's decision in 2009 to discontinue funding certain international VOOM HD programming.
Restructuring expense
 
Restructuring expense of $46,877 for the year ended December 31, 2008 represents primarily the impairment of program rights of $40,974 and employee severance and other costs of $5,821 due to the Company's decision to discontinue the domestic programming of VOOM.
 
decreased $1,845 (2%) for 2009 as compared to 2008. The net decrease is attributable to the following:
Depreciation and amortization (including impairments)
 
 
increased $77,716 (27%) for the year ended December 31, 2009 as compared to the same period in 2008. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Adjusted operating cash flow
 
Table of Contents
decreased $21,357 (22%) for 2009 as compared to 2008. The net decrease is attributable to the following:
Interest expense, net
 
 
for the year ended December 31, 2008 of $103,238 represents primarily the decrease in the fair value of General Electric common stock owned by the Company through its disposition in June 2008. The effects of these losses are partially offset by gains on the related equity derivative contracts, net described below.
Loss on investments, net
 
for the year ended December 31, 2008 consists of a gain on equity derivative contracts of $66,447. The gain on equity derivative contracts consists of realized gains due to the change in fair value of the Company's equity derivative contracts relating to the General Electric common stock which was disposed of in connection with the acquisition of Sundance Channel L.L.C. in June 2008. The effect of this gain is partially offset by losses on investment securities pledged as collateral, which are included in loss on investments, net discussed above.
Gain on equity derivative contracts
 
for the years ended December 31, 2009 and 2008 consist of the loss on interest rate swap contracts of $3,237 and $2,843, respectively. The interest rate swap contracts effectively fixed the borrowing rates on a substantial portion of the Company's floating rate debt to limit the exposure against the risk of rising rates. The loss on interest rate swap contracts resulted from a shift in the yield curve over the life of the swap contracts. The interest rate swap contracts matured in November 2009.
Loss on interest rate swap contracts, net
 
of $2,424 for the year ended December 31, 2008 resulted from the repayment of the Company's collateralized indebtedness relating to its holdings of General Electric common stock during the second quarter of 2008.
Loss on extinguishment of debt
 
The Company recorded income tax expense attributable to continuing operations of $70,407 for the year ended December 31, 2009, representing an effective tax rate of 44%. The effective tax rate was higher than the federal statutory rate of 35% due primarily to state income tax expense of $9,238, tax expense of $1,309 resulting from an increase in the valuation allowance with regard to certain local income tax credit carry forwards, tax expense of $638 for the impact of a change in the state rate used to measure deferred taxes and tax expense of $3,250, including accrued interest, related to uncertain tax positions.
Income tax expense
 
The Company recorded income tax expense attributable to continuing operations of $2,732 for the year ended December 31, 2008, representing an effective tax rate of 15%. The effective tax rate was lower than the federal statutory rate of 35% due primarily to state income tax benefit of $985, tax expense of $1,189 resulting from an increase in the valuation allowance with regard to certain local income tax credit carry forwards, tax expense of $2,604 for the impact of a change in the state rate used to measure deferred taxes, tax expense of $1,689, including accrued interest, related to uncertain tax positions and a reduction in tax benefit of $4,054 resulting from using a lower state tax rate to measure the deferred tax benefit on an unrealized loss on a stock investment.
Table of Contents
Loss from discontinued operations
 
Loss from discontinued operations, net of income taxes, for the years ended December 31, 2009 and 2008 reflects the following items, net of related income taxes and noncontrolling interests:
 
 
Business Segment Results
 
National Networks
 
The table below sets forth, for the periods presented, certain historical financial information and the percentage that those items bear to revenues, net for our National Networks.
 
 
The following is a reconciliation of operating income to AOCF:
 
Table of Contents
for the year ended December 31, 2009 increased $120,031 (15%) as compared to the prior year. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Revenues, net
 
 
Revenue increases discussed above are primarily derived from increases in contractual affiliation rates charged for our services, an increase in the number of subscribers and an increase in the prices and level of advertising on our networks. Affiliation fee revenues are generally based on a per subscriber fee under multi-year affiliation agreements, which generally provide for annual affiliation rate increases. The specific affiliation fee revenues we earn vary from period to period, distributor to distributor and also vary among our networks, but are generally based upon the number of each distributor's subscribers who receive our programming. The terms of certain affiliation agreements provide that the affiliation fee revenues we earn are a fixed contractual monthly fee. Our advertising revenues are more variable than affiliation fee revenues because virtually all of our advertising is sold on a short-term basis. Our advertising arrangements with advertisers provide for a set number of advertising units to air over a specific period of time at a negotiated price per unit and, in certain advertising arrangements, guarantee specified viewer ratings. If these guaranteed viewer ratings are not met, we are generally required to provide additional advertising units to the advertiser, resulting in revenue being deferred until such time as the guarantee has been met. Most of our advertising revenues vary based on the popularity of our programming as measured by Nielsen.
 
The following table presents certain subscriber information at December 31, 2009 and 2008:
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
for the year ended December 31, 2009 increased $42,683 (19%) as compared to 2008. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Technical and operating expenses (excluding depreciation and amortization)
 
 
The increase in amortization of program rights and series development/original programming costs for the year ended December 31, 2009 as compared to the prior year is due primarily to increased amortization of program rights at AMC and, to a lesser extent, increased amortization of program rights at WE tv and IFC.
 
As a percentage of revenues, technical and operating expenses were 30% for the years ended December 31, 2009 and 2008.
 
increased $29,561 (13%) in 2009 as compared to 2008. The net increase is attributable to the following:
Selling, general and administrative expenses
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, selling, general and administrative expenses were 29% for the years ended December 31, 2009 and 2008.
 
Management fees of $23,773 in 2009 compared to $21,513 in 2008 increased due to the increased revenues at AMC and WE tv in 2009. Pursuant to a consulting agreement with Cablevision, the Company pays a management fee calculated based on gross revenues (as defined under the terms of the consulting agreement) on a monthly basis. We will terminate the consulting agreement on the Distribution date and will not replace such agreement.
 
increased $14,092 (19%) in 2009 as compared to 2008. Amortization expense increased $13,554 for 2009 as compared to 2008 primarily due to an increase of $15,053 due to the amortization of identifiable intangible assets resulting from the acquisition of Sundance Channel in June 2008, partially offset by a decrease in amortization expense of $1,499 due to certain identifiable intangible assets at AMC, WE tv and IFC becoming fully amortized in the second quarter of 2009. Depreciation expense increased $538 in 2009 as compared to 2008.
Depreciation and amortization
 
increased $51,832 (16%) in 2009 compared to 2008 due to an increase in revenues, net of $120,031, partially offset by an increase in operating expenses, excluding share-based compensation, restructuring and depreciation and amortization expenses, as discussed above.
Adjusted operating cash flow
Table of Contents
International and Other
 
The table below sets forth, for the periods presented, certain historical financial information and the percentage that those items bear to revenues, net for our International and Other segment.
 
 
In January 2009, the domestic programming of VOOM was shut down. This decision had a favorable impact on the operating loss of our International and Other reportable segment of $76,760 for the year ended December 31, 2009 compared to the year ended December 31, 2008 as the loss of revenues from our VOOM domestic business was more than offset by the elimination of a significant portion of the operating expenses of VOOM HD. The 2009 operating loss of VOOM HD of $29,392 included primarily legal fees, costs and related expenses of approximately $16,800 in connection with the DISH Network contract dispute and restructuring expense of $5,162. The 2008 operating loss of VOOM HD of $106,152 included revenues, net of $59,855, offset by operating expenses of $104,178, restructuring expense of $46,795 and an impairment charge of $15,034 for the of deferred carriage fees at VOOM HD after DISH Network ceased the distribution of VOOM in May 2008.
write-off
 
The following is a reconciliation of operating loss to AOCF deficit:
 
Table of Contents
for the year ended December 31, 2009 decreased $35,107 (27%) as compared to revenues, net for the prior year. The net decrease is attributable to the following:
Revenues, net
 
 
The decrease in revenues of VOOM was due primarily to the loss of DISH Network's carriage in May 2008 and the loss of carriage by Cablevision effective January 20, 2009.
 
for the year ended December 31, 2009 decreased $45,190 (46%) as compared to the prior year. The net decrease is attributable to the following:
Technical and operating expenses (excluding depreciation, amortization and impairments)
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, technical and operating expenses decreased to 56% in 2009 as compared to 75% in 2008 due primarily to the decrease in programming costs at VOOM HD.
Table of Contents
decreased $18,228 (24%) for the year ended December 31, 2009 as compared to the prior year. The net decrease is attributable to the following:
Selling, general, and administrative expenses
 
 
As a percentage of revenues, selling, general and administrative expenses increased to 61% in 2009 from 58% in 2008.
 
of $5,162 for the year ended December 31, 2009 represents primarily the impairment of program rights and contract termination costs due to the Company's decision in 2009 to discontinue funding certain international VOOM HD programming.
Restructuring expense
 
Restructuring expense of $46,795 for the year ended December 31, 2008 represents the impairment of program rights of $40,974 and employee severance and other costs of $5,821 due to the Company's decision to discontinue the domestic programming of VOOM HD.
 
decreased $15,937 (49%) in 2009 as compared to 2008. Amortization expense (including impairments) decreased $15,034 for 2009 as compared to 2008 primarily due to the write-off of deferred carriage fees recorded in 2008 at VOOM HD after DISH Network ceased the distribution of VOOM in May 2008. Depreciation expense decreased $903 in 2009 as compared to 2008.
Depreciation and amortization (including impairments)
 
decreased $28,730 (68%) for the year ended December 31, 2009 as compared to 2008 due to a decrease in operating expenses and revenues, net, as discussed above, excluding depreciation and amortization and share-based compensation.
Adjusted operating cash flow deficit
 
Cash Flow Discussion
 
Continuing Operations
 
Operating Activities
 
Net cash provided by operating activities amounted to $48,436 for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to $40,643 for the three months ended March 31, 2010. The March 31, 2011 cash provided by operating activities resulted from $139,218 of net income before depreciation and amortization and other non-cash items and an increase in cash resulting from a decrease in accounts receivable, trade of $17,856, partially offset by a decrease in cash resulting from the acquisition of and payment of obligations relating to program rights totaling $63,791, deferred carriage fee payments of $2,008, a decrease in accounts payable, accrued expenses and other liabilities of $29,334, a decrease in amounts due from/to affiliates, net of $12,613, and an increase in other assets of $892.
 
The March 31, 2010 cash provided by operating activities resulted from $125,735 of net income before depreciation and amortization and other non-cash items and an increase in cash resulting from a decrease in
Table of Contents
accounts receivable, trade of $6,496 and a decrease in other assets of $12,125, partially offset by a decrease in cash resulting from the acquisition of and payment of obligations relating to program rights totaling $63,270, deferred carriage fee payments of $1,663, a decrease in accounts payable, accrued expenses and other liabilities of $29,166 and a decrease in amounts due from/to affiliates, net of $9,614.
 
Net cash provided by operating activities amounted to $265,995 for the year ended December 31, 2010 compared to $204,002 for the year ended December 31, 2009. The 2010 cash provided by operating activities resulted from $571,984 of net income before depreciation and amortization and other non-cash items, partially offset by the acquisition of and payment of obligations relating to program rights totaling $301,745, deferred carriage fee payments of $3,031 and an increase in net other assets totaling $1,213.
 
Net cash provided by operating activities amounted to $204,002 for the year ended December 31, 2009 compared to $80,130 for the year ended December 31, 2008. The 2009 cash provided by operating activities resulted from $486,705 of net income before depreciation and amortization and other non-cash items, partially offset by the acquisition of and payment of obligations relating to program rights totaling $249,951, deferred carriage fee payments of $3,888, an increase in accounts receivable, trade totaling $27,641, and an increase in net other assets totaling $1,223.
 
Net cash provided by operating activities amounted to $80,130 for the year ended December 31, 2008. The 2008 cash provided by operating activities resulted from $383,285 of net income before depreciation and amortization and other non-cash items, partially offset by the acquisition of and payment of obligations relating to program rights totaling $244,947, deferred carriage fee payments of $17,882, an increase in accounts receivable, trade and prepaid expenses and other assets of $22,185, an increase in amounts due from/to affiliates of $6,449 and a decrease in net other liabilities totaling $11,692.
 
Investing Activities
 
Net cash used in investing activities for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010 was $1,721 and $377, respectively, which consisted primarily of capital expenditures of $1,599 and $577 for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010, respectively, primarily for the purchase of technical and transmission related equipment.
 
Net cash used in investing activities for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008 was $17,157, $13,169 and $133,779, respectively, which consisted primarily of capital expenditures of $17,243, $13,419, and $23,577 for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008, respectively, primarily for the purchase of technical and transmission related equipment. Additionally, 2008 investing activities included payments for acquisitions of businesses of $110,415 primarily related to the acquisition of Sundance Channel in June 2008.
 
Financing Activities
 
Net cash used in financing activities amounted to $42,780 for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to $24,863 for the three months ended March 31, 2010. In 2011, financing activities consisted of capital contributions from Cablevision of $20,813, repayment of credit facility debt of $62,500 and principal payments on capital leases of $1,093. In 2010, financing activities consisted of repayment of a note payable to an affiliate of Cablevision (see below) of $190,000, capital distributions to Cablevision of $8,491, repayment of credit facility debt of $16,250 and principal payments on capital leases of $1,040, partially offset by capital contributions from Cablevision of $190,918. On June 3, 2011, the Company made a cash capital distribution of approximately $21,000 to Cablevision.
 
Net cash used in financing activities amounted to $148,816 for the year ended December 31, 2010 compared to $132,474 for the year ended December 31, 2009. In 2010, financing activities consisted of capital contributions from Cablevision of $204,018, repayment of a note payable to an affiliate of Cablevision (see below) of $190,000, capital distributions to Cablevision of $53,754, repayment of credit facility debt of $105,000 and principal payments on capital leases of $4,080.
 
Net cash used in financing activities amounted to $132,474 for the year ended December 31, 2009 compared to net cash provided by financing activities of $55,836 for the year ended December 31, 2008. In
Table of Contents
2009, financing activities consisted of net capital distributions to Cablevision of $9,440, repayment of credit facility debt of $120,000 and principal payments on capital leases of $3,034.
 
Net cash provided by financing activities amounted to $55,836 for the year ended December 31, 2008. In 2008, financing activities consisted of proceeds from credit facility debt of $276,000, capital contributions from Cablevision of $235,353 and proceeds from a note payable to affiliate of $60,000, partially offset by the repayment of collateralized indebtedness of $368,097, repayment of credit facility debt of $76,000, capital distributions to Cablevision of $65,938, payment of financing costs of $2,941 associated with a new incremental revolver supplement entered into in June 2008 and principal payments on capital leases of $2,541.
 
Discontinued Operations
 
The net effect of discontinued operations on cash and cash equivalents amounted to a cash inflow (outflow) of $178 and $(8,384) for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010, respectively.
 
The net effect of discontinued operations on cash and cash equivalents amounted to a cash outflow of $49,890, $54,011 and $48,602 for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008, respectively.
 
Operating Activities
 
Net cash provided by (used in) operating activities of discontinued operations amounted to $178 for the three months ended March 31, 2011 as compared to $(7,437) for the three months ended March 31, 2010. The March 31, 2011 cash provided by operating activities resulted from a decrease in net assets of $178. The March 31, 2010 cash used in operating activities resulted from $14,978 of net loss excluding depreciation and amortization and other non-cash items and a decrease in other liabilities, net of $339, partially offset by an increase in cash resulting from a decrease in amounts due from affiliates, net of $7,880.
 
Net cash used in operating activities of discontinued operations amounted to $30,870 for the year ended December 31, 2010 compared to $48,967 for the year ended December 31, 2009. The 2010 cash used in operating activities resulted from $52,287 of loss excluding depreciation and amortization and other non-cash items and a decrease in accounts payable and other liabilities of $9,423, partially offset by an increase in cash resulting from a decrease in current and other assets of $30,840.
 
Net cash used in operating activities of discontinued operations amounted to $48,967 for the year ended December 31, 2009 compared to $99,423 for the year ended December 31, 2008. The 2009 cash used in operating activities resulted primarily from $50,528 of loss excluding depreciation and amortization and other non-cash items, partially offset by a net increase in cash resulting from the net change in assets and liabilities of $1,561.
 
Net cash used in operating activities of discontinued operations amounted to $99,423 for the year ended December 31, 2008. The 2008 cash used in operating activities resulted from $36,763 of loss excluding depreciation and amortization and other non-cash items, and a net decrease in cash resulting from a payment relating to the settlement of a contract dispute of $58,293 and the net change in other assets and liabilities of $4,367.
 
Investing Activities
 
Net cash used in investing activities of discontinued operations for the three months ended March 31, 2010 was $505, which consisted of capital expenditures of $630, partially offset by proceeds from the sale of affiliate interests of $125.
 
Net cash used in investing activities of discontinued operations for the year ended December 31, 2010 was $10,183 compared to $4,753 for the year ended December 31, 2009. The 2010 investing activities consisted of capital expenditures of $10,744, partially offset by proceeds from the sale of affiliate interests of $561.
 
Net cash used in investing activities of discontinued operations for the year ended December 31, 2009 was $4,753 compared to net cash provided by investing activities of $46,173 for the year ended December 31,
Table of Contents
2008. The 2009 investing activities consisted of capital expenditures of $7,259, partially offset by proceeds from the sale of affiliate interests and other net cash receipts of $2,506.
 
Net cash provided by investing activities of discontinued operations for the year ended December 31, 2008 was $46,173 and consisted of a decrease in restricted cash of $52,838 primarily relating to the settlement of a contract dispute, proceeds from the sale of affiliate interests and other net cash receipts of $1,485, partially offset by capital expenditures of $8,150.
 
Liquidity and Capital Resources
 
Overview
 
The operations of the businesses that are included in our consolidated financial statements collectively have historically generated positive cash flow from operating activities. However, each of our programming businesses has substantial programming, acquisition and development expenditure requirements.
 
We generated positive net cash from operating activities for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and for each of the three years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008. Sources of cash have included primarily cash flow from the operations of our businesses and borrowings under the revolving credit facilities of Rainbow National Services LLC ("RNS"), our indirect wholly-owned subsidiary. As discussed below, we intend to terminate the RNS revolving credit facilities in connection with the Distribution, and to replace these facilities with a new revolving credit facility that we will enter into in connection with the Distribution.
 
Cablevision is not a guarantor of, and has not otherwise had any obligations relating to, the RNS revolving credit facilities or any of our other indebtedness. During the three years ended December 31, 2010, and for the three months ended March 31, 2011, we have serviced our debt exclusively through cash flows from our own operations or from financing sources independent of Cablevision, except in connection with the repayment of the RMH Promissory Note in March 2010, as discussed below.
 
Our principal uses of cash include our debt service, the acquisition and development of program rights and the net funding and investment requirements of our developing services. Our businesses do not require significant capital expenditures. As a percentage of revenues, net, capital expenditures were less than 2% for the years ended December 31, 2010 and 2009. In anticipation of the Distribution, commencing on January 1, 2011 we are no longer funding the operations of those businesses that will not be transferred to us in the Distribution. From January 1, 2011 through March 22, 2011, we repaid the entire outstanding balance under the RNS revolving credit facility of $50,000 at December 31, 2010. On May 13, 2011, we redeemed 100% of our outstanding 8/% senior notes due September 2012 at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the notes of $300,000, plus accrued and unpaid interest of $5,250, to the redemption date. In order to fund the May 13, 2011 redemption, in May 2011 we borrowed $300,000 under our $300,000 revolving credit facility. We used cash on hand to fund the payment of accrued and unpaid interest of $5,250. In connection with the redemption, we will recognize a loss on extinguishment of debt of $1,183, representing the write-off of the related unamortized deferred financing costs.
3
4
 
As part of the Distribution, we intend to enter into a $500,000 Senior Secured Revolving Credit Facility which will be undrawn at closing and which will provide us with additional liquidity. In addition, an incremental facility of up to $400,000 will be available subject to meeting certain conditions. Although we currently believe that amounts available under our revolving credit facility will be available when, and if needed, we can provide no assurance that access to such funds will not be impacted by adverse conditions in the financial markets. The obligations of the financial institutions under our revolving credit facility are several and not joint and, as a result, a funding default by one or more institutions does not need to be made up by the others.
 
As a result of our incurrence of the New AMC Networks Debt in connection with the Distribution, our contractual debt obligations will increase to $2,444,198, from $1,055,451 as of March 31, 2011. We believe that a combination of cash-on-hand, cash generated from operating activities, and availability under our revolving credit facility will provide sufficient liquidity to service the increased principal and interest payments on our indebtedness, along with our other funding and investment requirements over the next twelve months and over the longer term. However, we do not expect to generate sufficient cash from operations to
Table of Contents
repay at maturity the entirety of the New AMC Networks Debt. As a result, we will be dependent upon our ability to access the capital and credit markets in order to repay or refinance this indebtedness. Failure to raise significant amounts of funding to repay these obligations at maturity would adversely affect our business. In such a circumstance, we would need to take other actions including selling assets, seeking strategic investments from third parties or reducing other discretionary uses of cash.
 
Our increased amount of debt could have important consequences on our business including, but not limited to, increasing our vulnerability to general adverse economic and industry conditions, limiting the availability of our cash flow to fund future programming investments, capital expenditures, working capital, business activities and other general corporate requirements, and limiting our flexibility in planning for, or reacting to, changes in our business and the industry in which we operate.
 
In addition, economic or market disruptions could lead to lower demand for our services, such as lower levels of advertising. These events would adversely impact our results of operations, cash flows and financial position.
 
The following table summarizes our outstanding debt, including capital lease obligations, interest expense and capital expenditures as of and for the three months ended March 31, 2011:
 
 
Total amounts payable by the Company in connection with its outstanding obligations during the five years subsequent to December 31, 2010 and thereafter, including capital leases and related interest, as of December 31, 2010 are as follows:
 
 
As of March 31, 2011, total amounts payable by the Company in connection with its outstanding obligations during the five years subsequent to December 31, 2010 and thereafter, including capital leases and related interest, decreased by $64,542 to $1,064,767 at March 31, 2011 primarily due to the repayment of credit facility debt of $62,500 in the three months ended March 31, 2011.
 
Giving effect to our incurrence of the New AMC Networks Debt (including the use of a portion of the proceeds thereof to repay our existing indebtedness) in connection with the Distribution, the total amounts
Table of Contents
payable during the five years subsequent to December 31, 2010 and thereafter, including capital leases and related interest, as of March 31, 2011 would have been as follows:
 
 
Debt Financing Agreements
 
The RNS credit facilities consist of an $800,000 senior secured credit facility (the "RNS Credit Facility"), comprising a $500,000 term A loan facility and a $300,000 revolving credit facility. The term A loan facility matures June 30, 2013 and the revolving credit facility matures June 30, 2012. The RNS Credit Facility allows RNS to utilize up to $50,000 of the revolving credit facility for letters of credit and up to $5,000 for a swing loan. Further, the RNS Credit Facility provides for an incremental facility of up to $925,000, provided that it be for a minimum amount of $100,000. On June 3, 2008, RNS entered into an Incremental Revolver Supplement (the "RNS Incremental Revolver") whereby RNS received commitments from lenders in the amount of $280,000. The interest rate under the RNS Incremental Revolver is 2.0% over the Eurodollar rate for Eurodollar-based borrowings and 1.0% over the Base Rate for Base Rate borrowings (as defined in the RNS Incremental Revolver). The terms and conditions of the RNS Incremental Revolver are no more restrictive than those of the RNS Credit Facility. Borrowings under the RNS Incremental Revolver may be repaid without penalty at any time. There were no borrowings outstanding under the RNS Incremental Revolver facility at March 31, 2011.
 
Outstanding borrowings under the term A loan facility were $412,500 at March 31, 2011. At March 31, 2011, the interest rate on the term A loan facility was 1.25%. As of March 31, 2011, RNS had $580,000 in total undrawn revolver commitments consisting of $300,000 under the RNS original revolver and $280,000 under the RNS Incremental Revolver, which undrawn amounts were available to be drawn to meet our net funding and investment requirements. The borrowings under the RNS Credit Facility may be repaid without penalty at any time. RNS is obligated to pay fees of 0.375% per annum on any undrawn revolver commitment.
 
RNS was in compliance with all of its financial covenants under the RNS Credit Facility as of March 31, 2011.
 
As of March 31, 2011, RNS also has outstanding $300,000 principal amount of 8/% senior notes due September 1, 2012 and $325,000 principal amount of 10/% senior subordinated notes due September 1, 2014. The indentures under which the senior notes and senior subordinated notes were issued contain various other covenants, which are generally less restrictive than those contained in the RNS Credit Facility. RNS was in compliance with all of its financial covenants under its senior notes and senior subordinated notes as of March 31, 2011.
3
4
3
8
 
On May 13, 2011, we redeemed 100% of our outstanding 8/% senior notes due September 2012 at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the notes of $300,000, plus accrued and unpaid interest of $5,250, to the redemption date (see discussion above).
3
4
 
As part of the Distribution, we will incur approximately $2,425,000 of New AMC Networks Debt, consisting of $1,725,000 aggregate principal amount of senior secured term loans and $700,000 aggregate principal amount of senior unsecured notes. A portion of the proceeds of the New AMC Networks Debt will be used to repay all outstanding Company debt (excluding capital leases), including all amounts outstanding under the RNS Credit Facility and all of the RNS senior notes and senior subordinated notes, and
Table of Contents
approximately $1,275,000 of the New AMC Networks Debt will be issued to CSC Holdings, which will use such New AMC Networks Debt to satisfy and discharge outstanding Cablevision or CSC Holdings debt. For a description of the material terms and covenants of our new senior secured term loans and senior unsecured notes, see "Description of Financing Transactions and Certain Indebtedness."
 
RMH Promissory Note
 
At December 31, 2009, RMH had a $190,000 intercompany payable to Madison Square Garden, L.P., a subsidiary of MSG, an affiliate of Cablevision, in the form of a non-interest bearing advance. On January 28, 2010, in connection with the spin-off of MSG from Cablevision, the intercompany advance was replaced with a promissory note having a principal amount of $190,000, an interest rate of 3.25% and a maturity date of June 30, 2010. In March 2010, the $190,000 of indebtedness was repaid, including $914 of interest accrued from January 28, 2010 through the date of repayment, which was funded by a capital contribution from Cablevision.
 
Contractual Obligations and Off Balance Sheet Commitments
 
The Company's contractual obligations to affiliates and non-affiliates as of December 31, 2010, which consist primarily of our debt obligations, and the effect such obligations are expected to have on our liquidity and cash flow in future periods, are summarized in the following table:
 
 
See Note 8 to our annual consolidated financial statements for a discussion of our long-term debt. See Note 11 to our annual consolidated financial statements for a discussion of our leases. See Note 2 to our annual consolidated financial statements for a discussion of our program rights obligations.
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
As of March 31, 2011, the Company's off balance sheet arrangements not reflected on the Company's consolidated balance sheet increased approximately $19,500 to approximately $236,500 as compared to approximately $217,000 at December 31, 2010. The increase relates primarily to an increase of commitments for future program rights obligations. Additionally, the Company's debt obligations of $1,279,515 at December 31, 2010 decreased approximately $94,800 to approximately $1,184,700 at March 31, 2011. The decrease primarily relates to the payment of credit facility debt of $62,500 of which $12,500 and $50,000 are presented in Year 1 and respectively, in the table above, and the payment of interest on the senior notes and the senior subordinated notes of approximately $30,000 presented in Year 1 in the table above.
Years 2-3,
 
The incurrence of the New AMC Networks Debt will significantly increase our contractual debt obligations for periods subsequent to the Distribution, to approximately $2,444,198 from $1,055,451 as of March 31, 2011. Based on the assumptions described in Note 3 to our unaudited pro forma consolidated statement of operations, included under "Unaudited Pro Forma Consolidated Financial Information," we estimate that payments due with respect to the New AMC Networks Debt (including principal and interest payments) will be $72,758, $399,375, $604,641 and $2,369,830, respectively, during year 1, years 2-3, years 4-5 and after year 5, in each case following the Distribution date.
 
DISH Network was issued a 20% interest in VOOM HD, the Company's subsidiary operating VOOM, and that 20% interest will not be diluted until $500,000 in cash has been invested in VOOM HD by the Company. On the fifth or eighth anniversary of the effective date of the investment agreement, the termination of the affiliation agreement by DISH Network, or other specified events, DISH Network has a put right to require a wholly-owned subsidiary of RMH to purchase all of its equity interests in VOOM HD at fair value. On the seventh or tenth anniversary of the effective date of the investment agreement, or the second anniversary date of the termination of the affiliation agreement by DISH Network, a wholly-owned subsidiary of RMH has a call right to purchase all of DISH Network's ownership in VOOM HD at fair value. The table above does not include any future payments that would be required upon the exercise of this put right, if any. See "Business  Legal Proceedings  DISH Network Contract Dispute."
 
Managing our Interest Rate Risk
 
To manage interest rate risk, we enter into interest rate swap contracts from time to time to adjust the proportion of total debt that is subject to variable interest rates. Such contracts effectively fix the borrowing rates on floating rate debt to limit the exposure against the risk of rising rates. We do not enter into interest rate swap contracts for speculative or trading purposes and we only enter into interest rate swap contracts with financial institutions that are rated investment grade. We monitor the financial institutions that are counterparties to our interest rate swap contracts and diversify our swap contracts among various counterparties to mitigate exposure to any single financial institution. There were no outstanding interest rate swap contracts as of March 31, 2011.
 
Interest rate risk is primarily a result of exposures to changes in the level, slope and curvature of the yield curve, the volatility of interest rates and credit spreads.
 
All interest rate swap contracts are carried at their fair values on our consolidated balance sheets, with changes in value reflected in the consolidated statements of operations.
 
As of March 31, 2011, we have $1,036,253 of debt outstanding (excluding capital leases), of which $412,500 outstanding under our Credit Facility is subject to variable interest rates. A hypothetical 100 basis point increase in interest rates prevailing at March 31, 2011 could have an adverse effect on our annual interest expense of approximately $4,100.
Table of Contents
 
Fair Value of Debt
 
Based on the level of interest rates prevailing at March 31, 2011, the fair value of our fixed rate debt of $637,610 was more than its carrying value of $623,753 by $13,857. The fair value of these financial instruments is estimated based on reference to quoted market prices for these or comparable securities. A hypothetical 100 basis point decrease in interest rates prevailing at March 31, 2011 would increase the estimated fair value of our fixed rate debt by approximately $11,300 to $648,910. This estimate is based on the assumption of an immediate and parallel shift in interest rates across all maturities.
 
Our floating rate borrowings bear interest in reference to current LIBOR-based market rates and thus their carrying values approximate fair value.
Table of Contents
 
 
Corporate Governance
 
General
 
Our Class A Common Stock will be listed on NASDAQ under the symbol "AMCX." As a result, we are generally subject to NASDAQ corporate governance listing standards.
 
A listed company that meets the NASDAQ definition of "controlled company" may elect not to comply with certain of these requirements. Holders of Cablevision NY Group Class B Common Stock who are members of the Dolan family and certain related family entities entered into a Stockholders Agreement relating, among other things, to the voting of their shares of Cablevision NY Group Class B Common Stock and filed a Schedule 13D with the SEC as a "group" under the rules of the SEC. We have been informed that these parties have entered into a similar stockholders agreement with respect to the voting of their shares of the Class B Common Stock that will be issued in the Distribution. As a result, following the Distribution, we will be a "controlled company." As a controlled company, we will have the right to elect not to comply with the corporate governance rules of NASDAQ requiring: (i) a majority of independent directors on our Board of Directors, (ii) an independent compensation committee and (iii) an independent corporate governance and nominating committee. Our Board of Directors has elected for the Company to be treated as a "controlled company" under the NASDAQ corporate governance rules and not to comply with the NASDAQ requirement for a majority independent board of directors and an independent corporate governance and nominating committee because of our status as a controlled company.
 
In connection with the consideration of the Distribution by the board of directors of Cablevision, a committee of the Cablevision board, composed of two independent Class A directors, recommended to the full Cablevision board of directors the principal elements of our governance structure, including the replication in our amended and restated certificate of incorporation of the Cablevision common stock voting structure, which the Cablevision board adopted as part of its approval of the filing with the SEC of the registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part.
 
Corporate Governance Guidelines
 
Our Board of Directors will adopt our Corporate Governance Guidelines. These guidelines will set forth our practices and policies with respect to Board composition and selection, Board meetings, executive sessions of the Board, Board committees, the expectations we have of our directors, selection of the Executive Chairman and the President and Chief Executive Officer, management succession, Board and executive compensation, and Board self-evaluation. The full text of our Corporate Governance Guidelines will be available on our website at http://investors.amcnetworks.com. A copy may be obtained by writing to AMC Networks Inc., 11 Penn Plaza, New York, NY 10001.
 
Executive Sessions of Independent Board Members
 
Under our Corporate Governance Guidelines, our non-management directors may meet in executive sessions with no members of management present. The non-management directors may specify the procedure to designate the director who may preside at any such executive session. Non-management directors who are not independent under the rules of NASDAQ may participate in these executive sessions, but directors who are independent under the rules of NASDAQ must meet separately in regularly scheduled executive sessions at least twice each year.
 
Communicating with Our Directors
 
Our Board will adopt policies designed to allow stockholders and other interested parties to communicate with our directors. Any interested party that wishes to communicate directly with the Board or any director or the Non-management directors as a group should send communications in writing to Chairman of the Audit Committee, AMC Networks Inc., 11 Penn Plaza, New York, NY 10001. Any person, whether or not an employee, who has a concern with respect to our accounting, internal accounting controls or auditing issues,
Table of Contents
may, in a confidential or anonymous manner, communicate those concerns to our Audit Committee by contacting The Network, Inc., which has been designated to act as a confidential contact organization for this purpose, at 1-888-217-8076.
 
Code of Conduct and Ethics
 
Our Board of Directors will adopt a Code of Conduct and Ethics for our directors, officers and employees. We expect that a portion of this Code of Conduct and Ethics will also serve as a code of conduct and ethics for our senior financial officers and principal accounting officers or controller. Among other things, our Code of Conduct and Ethics will cover conflicts of interest, disclosure responsibilities, legal compliance, reporting and compliance under the Code, confidentiality, corporate opportunities, fair dealing, protection and proper use of assets, and equal employment opportunity and harassment. The full text of the code will be available on our website at http://investors.amcnetworks.com. In addition, a copy may be obtained by writing AMC Networks Inc., 11 Penn Plaza, New York, NY 10001.
 
Our Directors
 
The following individuals are expected to be elected by CSC Holdings, our sole stockholder prior to the Distribution, to serve as directors of the Company commencing on the Distribution date.
 
Class A Directors
 
NEIL ASHE, , President of CBS Interactive from July 2008 to March 2011 and currently Special Advisor to the Chief Executive Officer of CBS Corporation. Chief Executive Officer of CNET Networks, Inc. from October 2006 to July 2008; Executive Vice President of CNET Networks, Inc. from October 2005 to October 2006; Senior Vice President of CNET Networks, Inc. from May 2002 to October 2005. Mr. Ashe is also a director of Hungry Machine Inc. d.b.a. Living Social and was a director of CNET Networks.
43
 
In light of Mr. Ashe's business leadership and management experience gained as the president and the chief executive officer of major internet content and information providers, including content relating to a major television network, we expect that our sole stockholder will conclude that he should be elected to the Board commencing on or prior to the time of the Distribution.
 
ALAN D. SCHWARTZ, , Executive Chairman of Guggenheim Partners, LLC since 2009. Consultant for Rothschild Inc. from 2008 to 2009. President of The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc. from 2007 to 2008; Chief Executive Officer of The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc. from January 2008 to March 2008; Co-President of The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc. from 2001 to 2007; and President and Co-Chief Operating Officer of The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc. from 2001 to 2008. Mr. Schwartz is also a director of MSG and Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc. He is a trustee of Duke University and a member of the boards of the Robin Hood Foundation, MENTOR: The National Mentoring Partnership, St. Vincent's Services for Children and NYU Medical Center.
61
 
In light of Mr. Schwartz's experience as an investment banker, his experience as a senior executive of other businesses and his service as a director of other public companies and charitable institutions, we expect that our sole stockholder will conclude that he should be elected to the Board commencing on or prior to the time of the Distribution.
 
DR. LEONARD TOW, , Chief Executive Officer of New Century Holdings LLC, an outdoor advertising company, since January 2005. Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Citizens Communications Company from 1990 to September 2004. Dr. Tow is also a director of Cablevision and was a director of Citizens Communications Company from 1989 to 2004.
83
 
In light of Mr. Tow's experience as a founder and chief executive officer of a major cable television company, his experience as the chief executive officer of a private company, as well as the knowledge and experience he has gained and contributions he has made during his tenure as a director of Cablevision, we expect that our sole stockholder will conclude that he should be elected to the Board commencing on or prior to the time of the Distribution.
Table of Contents
ROBERT WRIGHT, , Senior Adviser of THL Investment Capital since 2008. He served as Vice Chairman of General Electric Company and President, Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of NBC and NBC Universal from 1986 to 2007. Mr. Wright is also a director of Polo Ralph Lauren Corporation, Mission Product LLC and EMI Group Global Ltd. Mr. Wright has served on the boards of General Electric Company and NBC Universal. He is a trustee of the New York Presbyterian Hospital and co-founder of Autism Speaks.
68
 
In light of Mr. Wright's extensive business leadership and management experience at a major television network and leading media and entertainment company and his service as a director of other public companies, we expect that our sole stockholder will conclude that he should be elected to the Board commencing on or prior to the time of the Distribution.
 
Class B Directors
 
WILLIAM J. BELL, , Consultant to Cablevision since 2005 and various positions at Cablevision and its predecessor since 1979, including its Vice Chairman and Chief Financial Officer until 2004.
71
 
In light of Mr. Bell's experience in various positions with Cablevision since 1979, including as its former Chief Financial Officer, we expect that our sole stockholder will conclude that he should be elected to the Board commencing on or prior to the time of the Distribution.
 
CHARLES F. DOLAN, , Director of the Company since March 9, 2011. Executive Chairman of the Company since June 6, 2011. Chairman of Cablevision since 1985. Chief Executive Officer of Cablevision from 1985 to October 1995. Founded and acted as the General Partner of Cablevision's predecessor from 1973 to 1985. Established Manhattan Cable Television in 1961 and Home Box Office in 1971. Mr. Dolan will continue in his role as Chairman of Cablevision following the Distribution. He serves as a director of Cablevision and MSG. Charles F. Dolan is the father of James L. Dolan, Patrick F. Dolan, Thomas C. Dolan, Marianne Dolan Weber, and the of Kristin A. Dolan and Brian G. Sweeney.
84
father-in-law
 
In light of Mr. Dolan's experience as founder, his service as Chairman and, previously, as the Chief Executive Officer of Cablevision and its predecessors, as well as the knowledge and experience he has gained and contributions he has made during his tenure as a director of Cablevision, we expect that our sole stockholder will conclude that he should be reelected to the Board commencing on or prior to the time of the Distribution.
 
JAMES L. DOLAN, , Director of the Company since March 9, 2011. President of Cablevision since June 1998. Chief Executive Officer of Cablevision since October 1995. Executive Chairman of MSG since July 2009. Chairman of MSG since October 1999. Chief Executive Officer of RMH from September 1992 to October 1995. Vice President of Cablevision from 1987 to September 1992. He serves as a director of Cablevision and MSG. James L. Dolan is the son of Charles F. Dolan, the spouse of Kristin A. Dolan, the brother of Patrick F. Dolan, Thomas C. Dolan and Marianne Dolan Weber and the of Brian G. Sweeney.
56
brother-in-law
 
In light of Mr. Dolan's experience in various positions with Cablevision since 1979, including as its Chief Executive Officer since 1995, as well as the knowledge and experience he has gained and contributions he has made during his tenure as a director of Cablevision, we expect that our sole stockholder will conclude that he should be reelected to the Board commencing on or prior to the time of the Distribution.
 
KRISTIN A. DOLAN, , Senior Vice President of Cablevision since 2003. She serves as a director of Cablevision and MSG. Kristin A. Dolan is the of Charles F. Dolan, the spouse of James L. Dolan and the of Patrick F. Dolan, Thomas C. Dolan, Brian G. Sweeney and Marianne Dolan Weber.
45
daughter-in-law
sister-in-law
 
In light of Ms. Dolan's experience in various positions with Cablevision since 1990, as well as the knowledge and experience she has gained and contributions she has made during her tenure as a director of Cablevision, we expect that our sole stockholder will conclude that she should be elected to the Board commencing on or prior to the time of the Distribution.
 
PATRICK F. DOLAN, , President of News 12 Networks, a subsidiary of Cablevision, since February 2002. Vice President of News 12 Networks from September 1995 to February 2002. News Director of News 12 Long Island, a subsidiary of Cablevision, from December 1991 to September 1995. He serves as a director
59
Table of Contents
of Cablevision. Patrick F. Dolan is the son of Charles F. Dolan, the brother of James L. Dolan, Thomas C. Dolan and Marianne Dolan Weber and the of Kristin A. Dolan and Brian G. Sweeney.
brother-in-law
 
In light of Mr. Dolan's experience as a member of Cablevision's founding family and in various positions with Cablevision since 1989, as well as the knowledge and experience he has gained and contributions he has made during his tenure as a director of Cablevision, we expect that our sole stockholder will conclude that he should be elected to the Board commencing on or prior to the time of the Distribution.
 
THOMAS C. DOLAN, , Executive Vice President-Strategy and Development, Office of the Chairman of Cablevision since September 2008. Executive Vice President and Chief Information Officer of Cablevision from October 2001 until April 2005. Mr. Dolan was on unpaid leave of absence from Cablevision from April 2005 until September 2008. Senior Vice President and Chief Information Officer of Cablevision from February 1996 to October 2001. Vice President and Chief Information Officer of Cablevision from July 1994 to February 1996. General Manager of the Cablevision's East End Long Island cable system from November 1991 to July 1994. System Manager of the Cablevision's East End Long Island cable system from August 1987 to October 1991. He serves as a director of Cablevision and MSG. He also served as a director of Cablevision from March 1998 to May 2005. Thomas C. Dolan is the son of Charles F. Dolan, the brother of James L. Dolan, Patrick F. Dolan and Marianne Dolan Weber and the of Kristin A. Dolan and Brian G. Sweeney.
58
brother-in-law
 
In light of Mr. Dolan's experience as a member of Cablevision's founding family and in various positions with Cablevision since 1987, as well as the knowledge and experience he has gained and contributions he has made during his tenure as a director of Cablevision, we expect that our sole stockholder will conclude that he should be elected to the Board commencing on or prior to the time of the Distribution. See "Business  Legal Proceedings  Other Legal Matters" for a discussion of a lawsuit filed by Mr. Dolan against the Company and Cablevision.
 
BRIAN G. SWEENEY, , Senior Vice President  eMedia of Cablevision since January 2000. He serves as a director of Cablevision and MSG. Brian G. Sweeney is the of Charles F. Dolan and the of James L. Dolan, Kristin A. Dolan, Patrick F. Dolan, Thomas C. Dolan and Marianne Dolan Weber.
46
son-in-law
brother-in-law
 
In light of Mr. Sweeney's experience in various positions with Cablevision since 1993, as well as the knowledge and experience he has gained and contributions he has made during his tenure as a director of Cablevision, we expect that our sole stockholder will conclude that he should be elected to the Board commencing on or prior to the time of the Distribution.
 
MARIANNE DOLAN WEBER, , President of Dolan Family Foundation from 1986 to September 1999. Chairman of Dolan Family Foundation since September 1999. President of Dolan Children's Foundation from 1997 to September 1999. Chairman of Dolan Children's Foundation since September 1999. Manager of Dolan Family Office, LLC since 1997. She serves as a director of Cablevision and MSG. Marianne Dolan Weber is the daughter of Charles F. Dolan, the sister of James L. Dolan, Patrick F. Dolan and Thomas C. Dolan and the of Kristin A. Dolan and Brian G. Sweeney.
53
sister-in-law
 
In light of Ms. Dolan Weber's experience as a member of Cablevision's founding family and as chairman of the Dolan Family Foundation and the Dolan Children's Foundation, as well as the knowledge and experience she has gained and contributions she has made during her tenure as a director of Cablevision, we expect that our sole stockholder will conclude that she should be elected to the Board commencing on or prior to the time of the Distribution.
 
For a discussion of the manner in which our directors are nominated for election, see " Board Committees  Absence of Nominating Committee."
 
The term of office of our directors will expire at the 2012 annual meeting of stockholders and at each succeeding annual meeting after that. The business address for each director is Networks Inc., 11 Penn Plaza, New York, NY 10001 and each director is a citizen of the United States. We will encourage our directors to attend annual meetings of stockholders and believe that attendance at annual meetings is just as important as attendance at meetings of the Board.
c/o AMC
Table of Contents
Because we did not have any operations in 2010 and were not organized in 2010, our Board did not hold any meetings during that year.
 
Director Compensation
 
A director who is a Company employee will receive no extra compensation for serving as a director. Each non-employee director will receive a base fee of $50,000 per year; $2,000 per Board, committee and Non-management director meeting attended in person; and $500 per Board, committee and Non-management director meeting attended by telephone. Non-employee directors will also receive $5,000 annually per committee membership and $10,000 annually per committee chairmanship.
 
We will also pay our non-employee directors compensation in restricted stock units. Each year, each non-employee director will receive a number of restricted stock units for the number of shares of common stock equal to $110,000 divided by the fair market value of a share of our Class A Common Stock. The restricted stock units the non-employee directors will receive will be fully vested on the date of grant. Such compensation will be made pursuant to our Stock Plan for Non-Employee Directors. See "Executive Compensation  Our Stock Plan for Non-Employee Directors" for information concerning our Stock Plan for Non-Employee Directors.
 
Board Committees
 
The board will have two permanent committees: the Audit Committee and the Compensation Committee.
 
Audit Committee
 
At the time of the Distribution, our Audit Committee will consist of at least three members. The primary purposes and responsibilities of our Audit Committee are: (a) to assist the Board of Directors (i) in its oversight of the integrity of our financial statements, (ii) in its oversight of our compliance with legal and regulatory requirements, (iii) in assessing our independent registered public accounting firm's qualifications and independence, and (iv) in assessing the performance of our internal audit function and independent registered public accounting firm; (b) to decide whether to appoint, retain or terminate the Company's independent auditors and to pre-approve, or to adopt appropriate procedures to pre-approve, all audit, audit-related and other services, if any, to be provided by the independent registered public accounting firm; (c) to review the appointment and replacement of the head of our internal audit department; (d) to establish procedures for the receipt, retention and treatment of complaints received by the Company regarding accounting, internal accounting controls or auditing matters and for the confidential, anonymous submission by Company employees or any provider of accounting related services of concerns regarding questionable accounting and auditing matters and review of submissions and treatment of any such complaints; (e) to conduct and review with the Board an annual performance review of the Audit Committee; and (f) to prepare any report of the Audit Committee required by the rules and regulations of the SEC for inclusion in our annual proxy statement. The text of our Audit Committee charter will be available on our website at A copy may be obtained by writing to AMC Networks Inc., 11 Penn Plaza, New York, NY 10001.
http://investors.amcnetworks.com.
 
Under the Audit Committee's charter, our Board of Directors must determine that each member of our Audit Committee is "independent" within the meaning of the rules of both NASDAQ and the SEC, has not participated in the preparation of the financial statements of the Company or any current subsidiary of the Company at any time during the past three years and is able to read and understand fundamental financial statements, including balance sheets, income statements and cash flow statements. Our Board must also determine that at least one member of our Audit Committee is an "audit committee financial expert" within the meaning of the rules of the SEC.
 
Our Board will establish a procedure whereby complaints or concerns with respect to accounting, internal controls and auditing matters may be submitted to the Audit Committee. This procedure is described under "Communicating with Our Directors" above.
 
Our Audit Committee did not exist in 2010.
Table of Contents
Compensation Committee
 
At the time of the Distribution, our Compensation Committee will consist of not less than two members, each of whom our Board has determined is "independent" under the rules of NASDAQ. The primary purposes of our Compensation Committee are to: (a) establish our general compensation philosophy and, in consultation with management, oversee the development and implementation of compensation programs; (b) review and approve corporate goals and objectives relevant to the compensation of our Executive Chairman and President and Chief Executive Officer, evaluate their performance in light of these goals and objectives and determine and approve their compensation based upon that evaluation; (c) make recommendations to the Board with respect to the compensation of our executive officers (other than the Executive Chairman and President and Chief Executive Officer) who are required to file reports with the SEC under Section 16 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (together with the Executive Chairman and President and Chief Executive Officer, the "Senior Employees"), (d) approve any new equity compensation plan or material changes to an existing plan; (e) oversee the activities of the committee or committees administering our retirement plans; (f) in consultation with management, oversee regulatory compliance with respect to compensation matters; (g) determine and approve any severance or similar termination payments to be made to Senior Employees (current or former); (h) determine the components and amount of Board compensation and review such determinations from time to time in relation to other similarly situated companies; (i) prepare any reports of the Compensation Committee to be included in the Company's annual proxy statement; and (j) conduct and review with the Board an annual performance review of the Compensation Committee. The text of our Compensation Committee charter will be available on our website at http://investors.amcnetworks.com. A copy may be obtained by writing to AMC Networks Inc., 11 Penn Plaza, New York, NY 10001.
 
Our Compensation Committee did not exist in 2010.
 
We expect our Board to determine that each member of our Compensation Committee is "independent" under the rules of NASDAQ.
 
Absence of Nominating Committee
 
We will not have a nominating committee. We believe that it is appropriate not to have a nominating committee because of our stockholder voting structure. Under the terms of our amended and restated certificate of incorporation, the holders of our Class B Common Stock will have the right to elect 75% of the members of our Board. We believe that creating a committee consisting solely of independent directors charged with responsibility for recommending nominees for election as directors would be inconsistent with the vested rights of the holders of Class B Common Stock under our certificate of incorporation. Instead, our Corporate Governance Guidelines provide a mechanism for the selection of nominees for election as directors by the holders of our Class A Common Stock ("Class A Directors") and by the holders of our Class B Common Stock ("Class B Directors"). Under the terms of our amended and restated certificate of incorporation, the holders of our Class A Common Stock will have the right to elect 25% of the members of our Board. Under our Corporate Governance Guidelines, nominees for election as Class A Directors shall be recommended to the Board by the Class A Directors then in office who were elected by the holders of our Class A Common Stock. Nominees for election as Class B Directors shall be recommended to our Board by the Class B Directors then in office who were elected by the holders of the Class B Common Stock.
 
We do not expect our directors to set specific, minimum qualifications that nominees must meet in order for them to be nominated for election to the Board, but rather believe that each nominee should be evaluated based on his or her individual merits, taking into account, among other matters, the factors set forth in our Corporate Governance Guidelines under "Board Composition" and "Selection of Directors." Those factors include:
 
Table of Contents
 
 
The Class A Directors will evaluate possible candidates to recommend to the Board for nomination as Class A Directors and suggest individuals for the Board to explore in more depth. The Board will consider nominees for Class A Directors recommended by holders of our Class A Common Stock. Nominees recommended by stockholders will be given appropriate consideration in the same manner as other nominees. Stockholders who wish to submit nominees for consideration by the Board for election at our annual meeting of stockholders may do so by submitting in writing such nominees' names, in compliance with the procedures and along with the other information required by our By-Laws. Any such nominee must be submitted to the Corporate Secretary of the Company, at AMC Networks Inc., 11 Penn Plaza, New York, NY 10001, not less than 60 or more than 90 days prior to the date of our annual meeting of stockholders, provided that if the date of the meeting is publicly announced or disclosed less than 70 days prior to the date of the meeting, such notice must be given not more than ten days after such date is first announced or disclosed.
 
The Class B Directors will consult from time to time with one or more of the holders of Class B Common Stock to assure that all Class B Director nominees recommended to the Board are individuals who will make a meaningful contribution as Board members and will be individuals likely to receive the approving vote of the holders of a majority of the outstanding Class B Common Stock. The Class B Directors do not intend to consider unsolicited suggestions of nominees by holders of our Class A Common Stock. We believe that this is appropriate in light of the voting provisions of our amended and restated certificate of incorporation, which vest exclusively in the holders of our Class B Common Stock the right to elect our Class B Directors.
 
Other Committees
 
In addition to standing committees, the Company has adopted a policy whereby a committee of our Board of Directors consisting entirely of independent directors (the "Independent Committee") will review and approve or take such other action as it may deem appropriate with respect to transactions involving the Company and its subsidiaries, on the one hand, and in which any director, officer, greater than 5% stockholder of the Company or any other "related person" as defined in Item 404 of of the SEC ("Item 404") has or will have a direct or indirect material interest. This approval requirement will cover any transaction that meets the related party disclosure requirements of the SEC as set forth in Item 404, which currently apply to any transaction (or any series of similar transactions) in which the amount involved exceeds $120,000. The policy will not cover decisions on compensation or benefits or the hiring or retention of any person. The hiring or retention of executive officers will be determined by our full Board of Directors. Compensation of executive officers is subject to the approval of our Compensation Committee. This policy also does not cover any pro rata distributions to all Company stockholders, including a pro rata distribution of our Class A Common Stock to holders of our Class A Common Stock and our Class B Common Stock to holders of our Class B Common Stock. No director on the Independent Committee will participate in the consideration of a related party transaction with that director or any related person of that director.
Regulation S-K
 
Similarly, an Independent Committee will oversee approval of all transactions and arrangements between the Company and its subsidiaries, on the one hand, and Cablevision System Corporation and its subsidiaries, or MSG and its subsidiaries, on the other hand, to the extent involving amounts in excess of the dollar threshold set forth in Item 404. See "Certain Relationships and Related Party Transactions  Related Party Transaction Approval Policy."
 
Our By-Laws provide for the formation of an Executive Committee of the Board of Directors which would have the power to exercise all of the powers and authority of the Board in the management of the business and affairs of the Company, except as limited by the Delaware General Corporation Law. Our Board has not formed an Executive Committee, although it could do so in the future.
 
Risk Oversight
 
The oversight of risk management is an important Board responsibility. The Audit Committee will take the lead on behalf of the Board in monitoring risk management. The Audit Committee will discuss guidelines and policies governing the process by which senior management of the Company and the relevant departments
Table of Contents
of the Company access and manage the Company's exposure to risk and discuss the Company's major financial risk exposures and the steps management has taken to monitor and control such exposures. AMC Networks believes that its executive compensation program, with its emphasis on long-term performance, its close connection to Company-wide and divisional performance and its significant equity components is designed to align the executives' compensation with the Company's long-term strategy and growth and, as a result, does not encourage excessive risk taking. Our Compensation Committee will consider the issue of the Company's exposure to risk in establishing and implementing our executive compensation programs.
 
Our Executive Officers
 
The following individuals are expected to continue to serve as our executive officers at the time of the Distribution.
 
 
 
 
JOSHUA W. SAPAN, , President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company since March 9, 2011. Chief Executive Officer of RMH since 1995. Chief Operating Officer of Rainbow Media Holdings from 1991 to 1995. President of AMC and Bravo from 1987 to 1991. Serves on the boards of The Cable Center, the Cable & Telecommunications Association for Marketing (CTAM) Educational Foundation, the International Radio and Television Society (IRTS) Foundation, the Museum of the Moving Image, the National Association for Multi-Ethnicity in Communications (NAMIC) Foundation, WNYC Radio and The New School University.
60
 
EDWARD A. CARROLL, , Chief Operating Officer of the Company since June 6, 2011. Various positions at RMH since 1987, including as Chief Operating Officer of Rainbow Entertainment Services since January 2009; President of Rainbow Entertainment Services from 2004 to 2009; and General Manager of IFC and/or Bravo from 1997 to 2004.
47
 
SEAN S. SULLIVAN, , Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of the Company since June 6, 2011. Chief Corporate Officer of RMH since September 2010. Chief Financial Officer of HiT Entertainment from 2009 to 2010. Chief Financial Officer and President of Commercial Print and Packaging division of Cenveo, Inc. from 2005 to 2008. Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Spencer Press, Inc. from 2004 to 2005. Executive Vice President of Burton Capital Management from 2003 to 2004. Senior Vice President, Finance and Corporate Development for Moore Corporation Limited from 2001 to 2002.
44
 
JAMES G. GALLAGHER, , Executive Vice President and General Counsel of the Company since June 6, 2011. Executive Vice President and General Counsel of RMH since February 2008. Executive Vice President and General Counsel of Tommy Hilfiger Corporation from 2005 to 2006. Executive Vice President and General Counsel of HSN (Home Shopping Network) from 1996 to 2002.
52
 
JOHN P. GIRALDO, , Chief Accounting Officer of the Company since June 6, 2011. Senior Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer of Scholastic Corporation from 2009 to 2011. Vice President, Controller of MTV Games from 2008 to 2009. Senior Vice President, Corporate Accounting at New Line Cinema from 2002 through 2008. Vice President of Finance at Major League Soccer from 1998 to 2001.
43
Table of Contents
 
 
Introduction
 
This section presents information concerning compensation arrangements for our executive officers. We present historical information concerning the compensation of Mr. Charles F. Dolan, who is also an executive officer of Cablevision, and Messrs. Joshua W. Sapan, Edward A. Carroll, Sean S. Sullivan and James G. Gallagher, each of whom is an officer of RMH. The historical compensation information, including in particular the information set forth below under "Historical Compensation Information," may not be directly relevant to the compensation that any of such individuals will receive from the Company. With respect to current compensation, we have presented information below under "Key Elements of 2011 Compensation from the Company" concerning the compensation that Messrs. Dolan, Sapan, Carroll, Sullivan and Gallagher will receive from the Company under their employment agreements or similar arrangements with the Company that will be in place at the time of the Distribution.
 
Each of Messrs. Dolan, Sapan, Carroll, Sullivan and Gallagher holds various cash and equity-based long-term incentive awards that were granted by Cablevision. Treatment of these in the Distribution is described under "Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards."
 
Compensation Discussion and Analysis
 
This Compensation Discussion and Analysis describes the specific arrangements that the Company has in place for its named executive officers as well as a discussion of Cablevision's compensation philosophy for its named executive officers for 2010. Cablevision's compensation philosophy may be relevant to the Company because it is anticipated that the elements of our compensation will be similar to the elements of Cablevision's compensation. However, our Compensation Committee will review the impact of the Distribution and will review all aspects of compensation and make appropriate adjustments.
 
For purposes of this Compensation Discussion and Analysis, the Company's named executive officers are Messrs. Dolan, Sapan, Carroll, Sullivan and Gallagher. These individuals are referred to collectively as our Named Executive Officers ("NEOs"). Mr. Dolan is also a named executive officer of Cablevision and will continue to be an executive officer of Cablevision following the Distribution.
 
Compensation Consultant
 
In accordance with their charters, Cablevision's compensation committee has, and our Compensation Committee will have, the authority to engage outside consultants to assist in the performance of its duties and responsibilities. Cablevision's compensation committee uses a compensation consultant to assist the Cablevision compensation committee in determining whether the elements of Cablevision's executive compensation program are reasonable and consistent with Cablevision's objectives. The compensation consultant advises Cablevision's compensation committee on designing Cablevision's executive compensation program and the reasonableness of individual compensation awards. The compensation consultant reports directly to Cablevision's compensation committee, although the compensation consultant meets with members of Cablevision's management from time to time for purposes of gathering information on management proposals and recommendations to be presented to Cablevision's compensation committee.
 
As part of its ongoing engagement, Cablevision's compensation consultant, ClearBridge Compensation Group ("ClearBridge") conducted a review of Cablevision's 2010 executive compensation to assist Cablevision's compensation committee in determining compensation programs and decisions for 2011. The Cablevision compensation committee has retained ClearBridge to assist in designing and establishing the Company's executive compensation program for 2011. Our Compensation Committee is also expected to engage a compensation consultant to assist our Compensation Committee in making compensation decisions in the future.
Table of Contents
Cablevision Compensation Overview and Philosophy
 
Cablevision's executive compensation program is designed to meet the following key objectives:
 
 
Cablevision Elements of In-Service Compensation
 
Cablevision's compensation committee seeks to fulfill the objectives described above by maintaining appropriate balances between (1) short-term and long-term compensation, (2) cash and equity compensation, and (3) performance-based and non-performance-based compensation. We expect our compensation committee to use a similar mix of these compensation elements.
 
The Cablevision executive compensation program consists of three principal elements, each of which is important to Cablevision's desire to attract, retain, motivate and reward highly-qualified executives. The three principal compensation elements are: base salary, annual cash incentives and long-term incentives. In addition, each executive officer is also eligible to receive certain benefits, which are generally provided to all other eligible employees, and certain perquisites described below.
 
A significant percentage of total direct compensation is allocated to incentive compensation in accordance with the philosophy of Cablevision's compensation committee as described above. Cablevision's compensation committee reviews historical Cablevision compensation and other information provided by its compensation consultant and other factors such as experience, performance and length of service to determine the level and mix of compensation for its executive officers, by position and grade level, that the Cablevision compensation committee has deemed appropriate.
 
Base Salaries
 
The Cablevision compensation committee was responsible for setting the base salary of Mr. Dolan in 2010. Base salaries for Cablevision's named executive officers have been set at levels that are intended to reflect the competitive marketplace in attracting and retaining quality executives. The Cablevision employment agreement with Mr. Dolan contains a minimum base salary level of $400,000. Cablevision's compensation committee reviews the salaries of each of its named executive officers no less frequently than on an annual basis. Cablevision's compensation committee evaluates each of its executive's performance, experience and grade level and may increase its executives' salaries. Based on their performance and in accordance with the terms of the Cablevision employment agreements, the Cablevision compensation committee, in its discretion, has increased base salaries for certain of its executive officers over time. Mr. Dolan's base salary in 2010 remained at the same level as in 2009 (which was $1,664,000).
 
Mr. Sapan was not an executive officer of Cablevision in 2010. As the President and Chief Executive Officer of RMH, the 2010 base salary of Mr. Sapan was reviewed by Cablevision's executive management, working within guidelines and procedures established by Cablevision's compensation committee. Mr. Sapan's base salary was increased from $1,200,000 in 2009 to $1,240,000 in 2010.
Table of Contents
Messrs. Carroll, Sullivan and Gallagher were not executive officers of Cablevision in 2010. As employees of RMH, their base salaries were reviewed by the Company's executive management, working within guidelines and established by Cablevision's compensation committee. The base salaries of Messrs. Carroll and Gallagher were increased from $900,000 to $950,000 and from $420,000 to $436,800, respectively, in 2010 from 2009. Mr. Sullivan joined RMH in mid-2010, and his base salary was established at $575,000 at that time.
 
Pursuant to their employment agreements or arrangements with the Company and the determinations of the executive management of the Company, as of the Distribution date, the Company's NEOs will receive the following base salaries from the Company for 2011 at the following annualized rates: Mr. Dolan  $400,000; Mr. Sapan  $1,280,000; Mr. Carroll  $1,035,000; Mr. Sullivan  $585,000; and Mr. Gallagher  $450,000. Because Mr. Dolan will remain as an officer of Cablevision following the Distribution, he will also continue to receive an annual base salary from Cablevision.
 
Annual Incentives
 
Under Cablevision's executive compensation program, annual incentive awards, or bonuses, are made to its executive officers and other members of Cablevision management. For the Cablevision individuals that the compensation committee determines may be covered by Section 162(m) of the Code, as amended, 2010 bonuses were granted under Cablevision's 2006 Cash Incentive Plan ("Cablevision CIP"), a stockholder approved plan. For all other members of management, bonuses were granted under a management performance incentive program administered by the compensation committee.
 
Cablevision's annual incentive awards are designed to link directly executive compensation to performance and provide incentives and rewards for excellent business performance during the year. Each bonus-eligible employee is assigned a target bonus equal to a percentage of that employee's annual base salary. The target bonus is determined based upon the applicable employee's position, grade level, responsibilities, and historical and expected future contributions to Cablevision. Cablevision's compensation committee currently reviews the target bonus levels of its named executive officers no less frequently than on an annual basis. Cablevision's compensation committee evaluates each of its executive's performance, experience and grade level and may adjust executive target bonus levels accordingly. Based on their performance, Cablevision's compensation committee, in its discretion, has increased the target bonus levels for Messrs. Dolan and Sapan over time. Similarly, the target bonus level for Mr. Carroll has also been increased by the Company's executive management over time. Target bonuses for 2010 were as follows (expressed as a percentage of base salary): Mr. Dolan  175%; Mr. Sapan  105%; Mr. Carroll  100%; Mr. Sullivan  60%; and Mr. Gallagher  45%.
 
The payment of Cablevision annual incentive awards depends on the extent to which Cablevision business units achieve performance objectives established by Cablevision's compensation committee. These performance objectives include a number of financial and operating metrics measured at the business unit level, such as revenue, AOCF, capital spending, subscriber growth and viewership, with each business unit generally having between five and ten measured objectives. As a result, actual payouts under the annual incentive program represent the aggregate effect of achievement levels for a large number of unit-specific performance objectives. The aggregated targets are generally designed to be achievable but reaching the target amounts is not assured. The payout scale is also generally designed to provide some payout even if aggregated targets are missed.
 
For each performance objective at a given business unit, actual results are measured against targeted amounts, and the resulting scores are then weighted according to the terms of the plan. Annual incentive payouts for senior executives are based on the scores achieved at each business unit for which a participant has management responsibility, and then adjusted based on relative individual performance ratings. In the case of Messrs. Sapan, Sullivan and Gallagher, payouts under the annual incentive program in 2010 depended on achievement of performance objectives at all business units within the RMH subsidiary of Cablevision, including each of our national programming networks. Payouts to such individuals in 2010 were based on a weighted-average achievement of all relevant business units of 116.5%, and then modified slightly to reflect individual performance ratings. In the case of Mr. Carroll, payouts under the annual incentive program
rolled-up
Table of Contents
in 2010 depended on achievement of performance objectives at each of our national programming networks. The payout to Mr. Carroll in 2010 was based on a weighted-average achievement of all relevant business units of 113.63%, and then modified slightly to reflect individual performance ratings. In the case of Mr. Dolan, payouts under the annual incentive program in 2010 depended on achievement of performance objectives at all business units at Cablevision. The payout to Mr. Dolan in 2010 was based on a weighted-average achievement of all Cablevision business units of 147.3%. Mr. Dolan's annual incentive is not adjusted for individual performance.
rolled-up
rolled-up
 
Pursuant to their employment agreements with the Company and the determinations of the executive management of the Company, the Company's NEOs have the following target bonus levels for 2011 bonuses, if any, that may be paid by the Company (expressed as a percentage of base salary): Mr. Dolan  175%; Mr. Sapan  200%; Mr. Carroll  100%; Mr. Sullivan  60%; and Mr. Gallagher  45%. Because Mr. Dolan will remain an officer of Cablevision following the Distribution, he is also eligible to receive an annual bonus from Cablevision.
 
Long-Term Incentives
 
Cablevision's executive compensation program is designed to achieve the objectives described above. Its core long-term incentive program in 2010 consisted of two elements: restricted stock and cash performance awards. These long-term incentives were awarded to members of management based upon each individual's grade level and provided approximately 50% of the value of their long-term incentive awards in restricted stock and approximately 50% of the value of their long-term incentive awards as cash performance awards. Cablevision's most senior executives, including Mr. Dolan and Mr. Sapan, received approximately 40% of the value of their total long-term incentive awards in restricted stock and approximately 60% of the value of their long-term incentive awards as cash performance awards. Cablevision believed restricted stock would provide its executive officers with an incentive to improve Cablevision's stock price performance and a direct alignment with stockholders' interests, as well as a continuing stake in the long-term success of Cablevision. The cash performance awards also would provide strong incentives for the executives to help Cablevision achieve specific long-term financial objectives. In addition, because these equity and cash awards would vest over time, Cablevision believed these awards would provide strong incentives for the executives to remain with Cablevision. In 2010, Messrs. Dolan and Sapan received approximately 40% of the value of their total long-term incentive award from Cablevision in restricted stock and approximately 60% of the value of their total long-term incentive award as a cash performance award. In 2010, Messrs. Carroll, Sullivan and Gallagher received approximately 50% of the value of their total long-term incentive award from RMH in restricted stock and approximately 50% of the value of their total long-term incentive award as cash performance awards.
 
Grants of long-term incentives are made under Cablevision's stockholder-approved plans. Prior to 2006, restricted stock, stock options and stock appreciation rights awards were granted under Cablevision's 1996 Amended and Restated Employee Stock Plan, which expired by its terms in February 2006. This plan was replaced by Cablevision's 2006 Employee Stock Plan, which was approved by stockholders at Cablevision's annual meeting in May 2006. Cash awards have been made under Cablevision's Long-Term Incentive Plan, which was replaced by the Cablevision CIP in May 2006.
 
In March 2011, Cablevision's compensation committee approved long-term incentive awards with the following targeted values for 2011: Mr. Dolan  $7,300,000; Mr. Sapan  $3,100,000; Mr. Carroll  $1,300,000; Mr. Sullivan  $500,000; and Mr. Gallagher  $480,000. See " Key Elements of 2011 Compensation from the Company  Transition of Awards Granted by Cablevision to Certain of our NEOs" for a discussion of the treatment of these awards following the Distribution. In addition, as discussed in the description of Mr. Sapan's employment agreement under " Employment Agreements," on or about the six-month anniversary of the Distribution date, Mr. Sapan will receive a one-time special award of restricted stock restricted stock units, in such form or forms as determined by the Company's Compensation Committee, having a value of $4,750,000. The special award will be subject to forfeiture restrictions expiring on the third anniversary of the grant and will be subject to the satisfaction of AMC performance objectives, which are expected to be substantially similar in type to the AMC performance objectives contained in Mr. Sapan's March 2011 Cablevision restricted stock grant agreement.
and/or
Table of Contents
Restricted Stock
 
Under Cablevision's executive compensation program, annual grants of restricted stock are made to its executive officers and other members of Cablevision's management. An award of restricted stock provides the recipient with a specified number of shares of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock as long as the recipient remains employed by Cablevision through the date that the restrictions lapse. Under the current executive compensation program, restricted stock awards will vest in their entirety on the third anniversary of the date of grant (i.e., cliff-vesting) as long as the recipient is continuously employed until such date. Grants by Cablevision of restricted stock made prior to 2006 generally vested at the end of a four-year period, subject to certain limited exceptions. Information regarding restricted stock awards for Messrs. Dolan, Sapan, Carroll, Sullivan and Gallagher in 2010 is set forth in the Summary Compensation Table below. More information regarding other restricted stock grants appears in the Outstanding Cablevision Equity Awards at 2010 Fiscal Year-End Table below. See " Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards" for a discussion of the impact of the Distribution on Cablevision restricted stock.
3-year
 
Performance Awards
 
The current Cablevision executive compensation program contemplates annual grants of three-year performance awards to its executive officers and other members of Cablevision's management to be earned on the basis of long-term performance relative to pre-established financial goals. Cablevision's compensation committee sets the performance objectives for each award in the first quarter of the year of grant. Each recipient will be eligible to receive a specified dollar amount, depending on the employee's grade level, to the extent that the performance objectives are achieved.
 
The performance awards granted in 2010 will be payable in 2013 if Cablevision achieves specified targets of net revenues and AOCF in the 12-month period ending December 31, 2012. The target levels of net revenues and AOCF were derived from Cablevision's five-year plan for its operating business units presented to the Cablevision board of directors in connection with Cablevision's 2010 annual budget and risk adjusted by the compensation committee. These targets were intended to measure ongoing operating performance of Cablevision and are subject to various adjustments such as for acquisitions and dispositions and investments in new business initiatives and exclude all charges for long-term performance-based compensation. In determining achievement of the 2010 performance awards, each performance measure is weighted equally. The awards provide for a potential payout on a sliding scale such that the actual payment may range from zero (if both incremental operating business unit net revenues and incremental operating business unit AOCF fail to reach at least 60% of the targets) to 200% (if, for example, both incremental operating business unit net revenues and incremental operating business unit AOCF equal or exceed 158% of the targets). If Cablevision does not achieve threshold levels of performance, the award does not provide for any payment. If Cablevision exceeds threshold levels but does not achieve the targeted amounts, or if Cablevision achieves one target but not both, the award provides for partial payments. In addition, if results exceed the desired targets, recipients will receive payments in excess of the target award for the exceptional performance. The Cablevision performance awards of Messrs. Dolan, Sapan, Carroll, Sullivan and Gallagher granted in 2010 are set forth in the Grants of Cablevision Plan-Based Awards Table below.
 
Cablevision performance awards earned in 2010 were granted in 2008 and are reflected below under " Historical Compensation Information  Summary Compensation Table." The amount earned under these awards was based on incremental net revenues and AOCF from 2007 to 2010, calculated exclusive of certain corporate expenses and subject to certain adjustments to reflect changes in Cablevision's business and other factors over the course of the award measurement period, including to account for acquisitions of or investments in new businesses, dispositions or discontinuation of businesses and changes in the application of GAAP. The expenses to be excluded and all adjustments are established at the time the award is granted. We refer to incremental net revenues and incremental AOCF, as so adjusted for purposes of performance awards, as "Award-Adjusted Incremental Net Revenue" and "Award-Adjusted Incremental AOCF," respectively.
 
Amounts earned under performance awards in 2010 were based on achievements against target Award-Adjusted Incremental Net Revenue of $1.655 billion and target Award-Adjusted Incremental AOCF of $781 million.
Table of Contents
For the period between 2007 and 2010, Award-Adjusted Incremental Net Revenue was $1.234 billion and Award-Adjusted Incremental AOCF was $652 million. Each of these measures is weighted equally for purposes of determining amounts earned under the performance awards. Under the sliding-scale payout described above, this resulted in an earned amount equal to 91.2% of the targeted payout amount for performance awards granted in 2008.
 
Because the targets for all performance awards have been derived from Cablevision's confidential five-year strategic plans, which are not disclosed publicly for competitive reasons, Cablevision does not believe it is appropriate to disclose specific future numerical targets. Disclosure of these targets could provide information that could lead to competitive harm to Cablevision. Cablevision believes that its five-year plans, and consequently the targets set for the performance awards, are ambitious and reflect desired above-market performance. In determining the threshold levels of performance, Cablevision's compensation committee considered, among other factors, Cablevision's five-year plan and the degree of difficulty in achieving the targets, including a comparison of the five-year plan with analysts' published projections of our growth as well as of some of our competitors. The 2010 performance award includes a sliding scale of payouts based upon the levels of incremental net revenues and AOCF. Cablevision believes that the lowest levels on the sliding scale should be achieved, although there can be no assurance this will occur. As the payout scale increases, the likelihood of achievement decreases and the payouts increase. Cablevision's compensation committee has the authority to amend or waive the performance targets under these awards and to make interpretations and adjustments thereto.
 
See " Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards" for a discussion of the impact of the Distribution on Cablevision performance awards.
 
Stock Options
 
Cablevision does not include options as part of its executive compensation program every year. Options were issued to Cablevision's most senior executives, including Mr. Dolan and Mr. Sapan as part of its 2009 program and to Messrs. Dolan, Sapan and Carroll prior to 2007. Each stock option granted in 2009 was granted with an exercise price no less than the closing price of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock on the date of grant. No stock options were granted in 2010. Stock options will have value only if, and to the extent that, the price of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock on the date the stock option is exercised exceeds this exercise price.
 
The stock options vest over three years in 33 /% annual increments and expire 5/ years from the grant date, although options granted prior to 2009 generally expire after ten years. More information regarding stock option grants to our NEOs appears in the Outstanding Cablevision Equity Awards at 2010 Fiscal Year-End Table below. See " Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards" for a discussion of the impact of the Distribution on Cablevision stock options.
1
3
1
2
 
Other Types of Awards in Prior Years
 
In the past, Cablevision has issued other types of long-term incentives to its executive officers and other members of Cablevision management, such as performance-based stock options, stock appreciation rights, performance retention awards and deferred compensation awards.
 
Under Cablevision's former executive compensation program, grants of stock appreciation rights were made to its executive officers and other members of Cablevision management. Stock appreciation rights are the right to receive the appreciation in the value of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock over a specified period of time. Upon exercise of a stock appreciation right, the award recipient will receive an amount of cash, common stock or a combination of cash and common stock equal to the amount of the appreciation. Historically, Cablevision granted stock appreciation rights in tandem with options. Each stock appreciation right was required to be granted with an exercise price no less than the closing price of a share of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock on the date of grant; for a tandem stock appreciation right, the exercise price is equal to the exercise price per share of the related option. Generally, the stock appreciation rights vest over three years in 33/% annual increments and expire ten years from the grant date. More
1
3
Table of Contents
information regarding Cablevision stock appreciation right grants to our NEOs appears in the Outstanding Cablevision Equity Awards at 2010 Fiscal Year-End Table below. See " Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards" for a discussion of the impact of the Distribution on Cablevision stock appreciation rights.
 
Cablevision's former executive compensation program also included special retention incentives called deferred compensation awards. Although Cablevision referred to these awards as "deferred compensation awards," it does not believe that they constitute "deferred compensation" under Section 409A of the Code. These awards were generally made to its executive officers and other members of Cablevision management. The purpose of these deferred compensation awards was to attract and retain senior executives.
 
The Cablevision deferred compensation awards contemplated an initial award amount for each recipient of $500,000. Each year, on the anniversary date of the award, the award amount grows by an additional amount equal to the lesser of 20% of the individual's annual base salary in effect at that time and $150,000. In addition, the award amount is increased by quarterly interest, at an annual interest rate equal to the average of the one-year LIBOR fixed-rate equivalent for the ten business days immediately preceding October 1st of each year. The deferred compensation award is paid in installments: 50% of the then current award amount was paid on the fifth anniversary of the effective date of the award (October 2009 for Messrs. Dolan, Sapan and Carroll), and the balance of the then current award amount is payable on the seventh anniversary of the effective date (October 2011 for Messrs. Dolan, Sapan and Carroll), so long as the recipient continues to be employed. Information regarding the Cablevision deferred compensation awards of Messrs. Dolan, Sapan and Carroll is set forth in the Summary Compensation Table below. See " Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards" for a discussion of the impact of the Distribution on Cablevision deferred compensation awards.
 
Benefits
 
Cablevision offers benefits to its executive officers generally to provide for retirement income and serve as a safety net against hardships that can arise from illness, disability or death.
 
Cablevision's executive officers are eligible to participate in the same health and welfare benefit plans made available to the other benefits-eligible employees of Cablevision, including, for example, medical, dental, vision, life insurance and disability coverage.
 
For a description of Cablevision's defined benefit plans and defined contribution plans, see " Historical Compensation Information  Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan," " Historical Compensation Information  Cablevision Excess Cash Balance Plan," " Historical Compensation Information  Nonqualified Supplemental Benefit Plan," " Historical Compensation Information  Cablevision 401(k) Plan" and " Historical Compensation Information  Cablevision Excess Savings Plan" below.
 
In addition to the standard life insurance available to all Cablevision employees (based on a multiple of base salary, up to a $4,000,000 cap on the total amount of life insurance), Cablevision purchased whole life insurance policies for certain current and former senior executives of Cablevision, including Messrs. Dolan and Sapan. The policies originally provided coverage (before the application of any dividends to purchase increased insurance) in the amount of the greater of three times the individual's annual base salary as in effect in 1996 or the estimated death benefit provided under previous policies. As of each respective policy's most recent anniversary date, the policies for Messrs. Dolan and Sapan provided estimated death benefits of $3,489,919 and $1,298,751, respectively. Based on current projections, Cablevision believes the policy for Mr. Dolan is fully funded and Cablevision does not anticipate the need to make any additional premium payments. The expected death benefits are expected to grow over time to the extent that the dividends payable on the policy values exceed the premiums required to fund the death benefit. Information regarding premiums paid by Cablevision in 2010 with respect to Mr. Sapan is set forth in the Summary Compensation Table below. As of the Distribution date, the Company will assume responsibility for the payment of premiums with respect to Mr. Sapan, to the extent necessary. With respect to Mr. Dolan, this program will not become a responsibility of the Company.
Table of Contents
Perquisites
 
Cablevision provides certain perquisites to its executive officers as described below. The aggregate value of Cablevision perquisites received by our NEOs in 2010 is set forth in the Summary Compensation Table below. Following the Distribution, we expect to provide certain perquisites to our eligible employees and executive officers as described below.
 
Telecommunications Services
 
Cablevision perquisites include access to telecommunications services (cable television, high-speed data and voice) at no monthly cost to its employees, including its executive officers, living in Cablevision's service area. Certain Cablevision employees living outside the service area are eligible for reimbursement of certain costs in purchasing similar services. The services provided vary depending on the grade level of the Cablevision employee.
 
It is currently expected that for a period of two months following the Distribution, as Company employees, our executive officers will continue to have access to the telecommunications benefit they received from Cablevision immediately prior to the Distribution. Following the Distribution, and for such time as he is employed by Cablevision, Mr. Dolan is expected to continue to receive the same telecommunications benefits as other Cablevision employees.
 
Executive Security
 
In order to address its security concerns, Cablevision has established an executive security program for the protection of certain of its executive officers, including Mr. Dolan. Recommendations of a third-party security expert have been implemented for office, home and travel, at Cablevision's cost, to the extent approved by the compensation committee. Because certain of these costs can be viewed as conveying personal benefits to Cablevision's executive officers, they are reported as perquisites.
 
Car and Driver
 
In connection with Cablevision's executive security program, Mr. Dolan has a Cablevision car and driver assigned to him on a full-time basis, which he is permitted to use for his personal use in addition to business purposes. Certain Cablevision executive officers and members of management have used Cablevision cars and drivers on a limited basis for personal use.
 
To the extent Cablevision employees use a Cablevision car and driver for personal use, those employees are imputed compensation for tax purposes. For compensation reporting purposes, the benefit attributable to the personal use of Company cars is valued at a portion of the cost of the driver and car plus car maintenance, fuel and other related costs, based on an estimated percentage of use.
 
Following the Distribution, the Company may provide car and driver services to certain of its executive officers.
 
Aircraft
 
Cablevision owns and operates passenger helicopters and leases and operates a jet to facilitate business travel of senior executives. Cablevision also has agreements with entities controlled by Charles F. Dolan or other members of the Dolan family pursuant to which the Company has a right to use fixed-wing aircraft owned by such entities.
 
Generally, Mr. Dolan is permitted to use the helicopters and the jet for personal travel. Certain other Cablevision executive officers and other members of its management are permitted to use the helicopters and jet for personal travel upon the approval of Cablevision's Chief Executive Officer or his designee. Personal use of the helicopters by Cablevision's executives has primarily been for purposes of commuting.
 
To the extent any Cablevision employee uses any of the aircraft for personal travel without reimbursement, they are imputed compensation for tax purposes based on the Standard Industry Fare Level
Table of Contents
rates that are published biannually by the IRS. For compensation reporting purposes, Cablevision valued the incremental cost of the personal use of the aircraft based on the variable costs incurred by Cablevision net of reimbursements received from executives. The incremental cost of the use of the aircraft does not include any costs that would have been incurred by Cablevision whether or not the personal trip was taken, such as lease and insurance payments, pilot salaries and other overhead costs.
 
In connection with any personal travel on the jet, Mr. Dolan reimburses Cablevision for the actual expenses of each specific flight at the maximum amount Cablevision may legally charge under part 91 of the Federal Aviation Regulations.
 
Other
 
Certain of the Cablevision executive officers have, from time to time, used Cablevision's travel department to make their personal travel arrangements. For compensation reporting purposes, Cablevision valued the incremental cost of personal use of the travel department as a portion of the cost of the travel department employees and related overhead, based on the time spent making the arrangements.
 
Following the Distribution, we may provide similar and additional perquisites to certain of our executive officers or senior executives as determined by our Compensation Committee.
 
Post-Termination Compensation
 
Cablevision believes that its post-termination benefits described below are integral to Cablevision's ability to attract and retain qualified executives. Following the Distribution, we expect to provide post-termination benefits for our NEOs. See " Employment Agreements" for a description of the severance arrangements we have agreed to provide to our NEOs.
 
Under certain circumstances, payments or other benefits may be provided by Cablevision to employees upon the termination of their employment with Cablevision. The amount and type of any payment or benefit will depend upon the circumstances of the termination of employment. These may include termination by Cablevision without cause, termination by the employee for good reason, other voluntary termination by the employee, retirement, death, disability, or termination following a change in control of Cablevision or following a going-private transaction. The definitions of "cause" and "good reason" vary among the different Cablevision employment agreements with executive officers and the Cablevision award agreements. The Distribution is not a change in control under any of Cablevision's employment agreements or award agreements.
 
The Cablevision award agreements regarding the various long-term incentives also address employment termination events, including the circumstances upon which vesting, payment forfeiture of all or a portion of the long-term incentives may be accelerated. If an executive's employment agreement with Cablevision refers to the treatment of any award upon a triggering event, the particular award agreement does not supersede the terms of the employment agreement unless otherwise provided in the award agreement.
and/or
 
Tax Deductibility of Compensation
 
Section 162(m) of the Code, as amended, establishes a $1 million limit on the amount that a publicly held corporation may deduct for compensation paid to the chief executive officer and the next three most highly paid named executive officers (other than the chief financial officer) in a taxable year. This limitation does not apply to any compensation that is "qualified performance-based compensation" under Section 162(m), which is defined as compensation paid in connection with certain stock options or that is paid only if the individual's performance meets pre-established objective goals based on performance criteria established under a plan approved by stockholders. Our short-term and long-term incentive compensation plans are expected to be generally designed to qualify for this exemption from the deduction limitations of Section 162(m) and to be consistent with providing appropriate compensation to executives.
 
From time to time, to the extent it deems appropriate, Cablevision's compensation committee may make awards (or modifications to awards) that would not qualify for an exemption from Section 162(m). For
Table of Contents
example, Cablevision expects that, for 2010, the amount of base salary in excess of $1 million for Cablevision's chief executive officer and the next three most highly paid named executive officers, plus any other annual compensation paid or imputed to Cablevision's chief executive officer and the next three most highly paid named executive officers of Cablevision covered by Section 162(m) that causes their compensation to exceed the $1 million limit, will not be deductible by Cablevision for federal income tax purposes. Our Compensation Committee may also make awards (or modifications to awards) that would not qualify for an exemption from Section 162(m).
non-performance-based
 
Although it is the Company's intent generally to qualify compensation for the exemption from the deduction limitations, we believe that it is in the best interests of the Company's stockholders to allow our Compensation Committee the flexibility and discretion to design an appropriate executive compensation program so that the Company can attract, retain and motivate our executives, notwithstanding Section 162(m).
 
Employment Agreements
 
Messrs. Dolan and Sapan will each enter into employment agreements with the Company that become effective on the date of the Distribution. Mr. Dolan will also amend his employment agreement with Cablevision, which amendment will become effective at the date of the Distribution, to allow for his simultaneous service to us and Cablevision. Set forth below is a description of the employment agreements between the Company and Messrs. Dolan and Sapan. These employment agreements were negotiated by the Cablevision compensation committee prior to the Distribution with the assistance of its compensation consultant. In addition, the Company's existing employment arrangements with Messrs. Carroll and Sullivan are each described below.
 
The employment agreements of Messrs. Carroll and Sullivan will not be revised or replaced prior to the Distribution. It is possible that new agreements will be put in place for Messrs. Carroll, Sullivan and/or Gallagher following the Distribution but no decision has been made on whether that will happen or on the terms of any such revised or new agreement.
 
Charles F. Dolan
 
Mr. Dolan's new employment agreement with the Company provides for his employment as our Executive Chairman. The employment agreement with the Company has an initial term of one year and automatically renews for successive one-year terms unless terminated by either party at least three months prior to the end of the then existing term. The agreement provides for an annual base salary of not less than $400,000 per year, subject to increase by the Company's Compensation Committee. Mr. Dolan is also eligible for an annual bonus with a target of 175% of his annual base salary, as the Company's Compensation Committee shall determine in its discretion, which will be prorated for 2011. Under the agreement, Mr. Dolan continues to be eligible to participate in the Company's long-term cash or equity programs or arrangements, at the level determined by the Company's Compensation Committee, in its discretion consistent with his role and responsibilities as Executive Chairman. For example, in 2012 he will be entitled to receive one or more long-term cash equity awards with an aggregate target value of $900,000, and as determined by the Company's Compensation Committee in its discretion. Although there is no guarantee, it is currently expected that long-term cash or equity awards or similar target values will be made to Mr. Dolan annually.
and/or
 
Mr. Dolan will be eligible to participate in the Company's Excess Savings Plan, when established, and the Company will provide Mr. Dolan with life and accidental death and dismemberment insurance. Any such life and accidental death and dismemberment insurance provided by the Company will be based on Mr. Dolan's base salary from the Company (provided that, to the extent the Company and Cablevision continue to use the same insurance carriers, any payout under the Company's plans will be aggregated with similar payouts under the Cablevision plan with respect to any applicable maximum coverage). Mr. Dolan will not participate in any other employee welfare benefit or pension plan of the Company. The employment agreement authorizes Mr. Dolan, in carrying out his responsibilities and duties under the agreement, to make expenditures from time to time on behalf of the Company for the performance, furtherance and maintenance of the Company's business, including travel relating to the business of the Company, entertainment and similar items, and the Company agrees to promptly reimburse Mr. Dolan for such expenditures or in some cases to advance the amount thereof to Mr. Dolan.
Table of Contents
Mr. Dolan's employment agreement does not provide for any post-employment benefits in the event of the termination of his employment by him or the Company other than in the case of his death or disability. In the event of Mr. Dolan's death, his agreement provides for payment to his estate of an amount equal to the greater of one year's base salary or one-half of the compensation that would have been payable to Mr. Dolan during the remaining term of his agreement. The Company has the right under the employment agreement to terminate the agreement if Mr. Dolan is incapacitated for more than six consecutive months. In that event, Mr. Dolan will be entitled to receive all his compensation and benefits until the end of the remaining term of his agreement. Mr. Dolan's employment agreement does not address (or provide for any benefits in the event of) termination by the Company without cause, by Mr. Dolan for good reason or termination in connection with retirement, a change in control or a going private transaction.
 
Mr. Dolan acknowledges in the employment agreement that any continuing service requirements with respect to any options to purchase Company stock or restricted shares of Company stock issued in connection with the Distribution will be based solely on his service to Cablevision and its affiliates (other than the Company and our subsidiaries). The Company will have no liability to Mr. Dolan with respect to any cash payable pursuant to the outstanding long-term cash and equity awards that were granted to him under the plans of Cablevision prior to the Distribution date, and Mr. Dolan has agreed that he will not assert any such liability against the Company.
 
In the employment agreement, the Company acknowledges that, in addition to Mr. Dolan's services pursuant to the agreement, he will simultaneously serve, and is expected to devote most of his business time and attention to serving, as Chairman of Cablevision. The Company recognizes and agrees that his responsibilities to Cablevision will preclude him from devoting a substantial portion of his time and attention to the Company's affairs. The agreement states the Company's recognition that there may be certain potential conflicts of interest and fiduciary duty issues associated with Mr. Dolan's dual roles at the Company and Cablevision and that none of (i) his dual responsibilities at the Company and Cablevision, (ii) his inability to devote a substantial portion of his time and attention to the Company's affairs, (iii) the actual or potential conflicts of interest and fiduciary duty issues that are waived in the Company's certificate of incorporation, or (iv) any actions taken, or omitted to be taken, by him in good faith to comply with his duties and responsibilities to the Company or Cablevision in light of his dual responsibilities to the Company and Cablevision, will be deemed to be a breach by him of his obligations under the employment agreement.
 
Joshua W. Sapan
 
Mr. Sapan's new employment agreement with the Company provides for Mr. Sapan's employment as President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company until the fifth anniversary of the Distribution (the "Scheduled Expiration Date") at a minimum annual base salary of $1,280,000 (subject to annual review and potential increase in the discretion of the Company's Compensation Committee) and an annual target bonus equal to 200% of his annual base salary (and a possible range of 0% to 400%) in the discretion of our Compensation Committee. Under the agreement, Mr. Sapan continues to be eligible to participate in all the Company's employee benefits and retirement plans at the level available to other members of senior management of the Company subject to meeting the relevant eligibility requirements and the terms of the plans.
 
Mr. Sapan will also be eligible to participate in the Company's long-term cash or equity programs and arrangements at the level determined by our Compensation Committee in its discretion consistent with the role and responsibilities of President and Chief Executive Officer. For example, in calendar year 2012, Mr. Sapan will be entitled to receive one or more long-term cash equity awards with an aggregate target value of $5,210,000, as determined by our Compensation Committee in its discretion. Although not guaranteed, it is currently expected that long-term cash or equity awards of similar target values will be made to him annually.
and/or
 
Mr. Sapan will also be eligible to receive, subject to the approval of our Compensation Committee, a one-time special award of restricted stock restricted stock units, in such form or forms as determined by our Compensation Committee, with an aggregate target value of $4,750,000 (the "Special Equity Award"). The Special Equity Award will be made to Mr. Sapan on or about the six-month anniversary of the Distribution date. The number of shares to be granted shall be determined by dividing the total value to be awarded by the average closing price of the Class A Common Stock of the Company for the twenty trading days prior to the
and/or
Table of Contents
date of grant. The Special Equity Award shall be subject to terms substantially similar to the terms contained in the agreements historically used by Cablevision for restricted stock or restricted stock unit awards for its senior executives, except that the forfeiture restrictions for the Special Equity Award shall expire on the third anniversary of the grant, and the grant shall be subject to performance objectives to be determined by our Compensation Committee at the time of grant. Although not guaranteed, it is currently expected that the types of performance objectives applicable to the Special Equity Award will be substantially similar to the AMC performance objectives contained in Mr. Sapan's March 2011 Cablevision restricted stock grant agreement.
 
If, prior to the Scheduled Expiration Date, Mr. Sapan's employment with the Company is terminated (i) by the Company or (ii) by him for Good Reason, and at the time of any such termination Cause does not exist, then, subject to his execution of the Company's then standard separation agreement (modified to reflect terms of the employment agreement) which separation agreement will include, without limitation, general releases by him as well as non-competition, non-solicitation, non-disparagement, confidentiality and other provisions substantially similar to (and not more restrictive than) those set forth in the agreement (a "Separation Agreement"), we will provide him with the following benefits and rights:
 
(a) A cash severance payment equal to two times the sum of his annual base salary and annual target bonus will be made on the 90th day after the termination of his employment;
 
(b) Each of the Company's outstanding long-term cash performance awards granted under the plans of the Company and, prior to the Distribution date, Cablevision will immediately vest in full and will be paid to the same extent that other members of senior management receive payment for such awards as determined by our Compensation Committee (subject to the satisfaction of any applicable performance objectives);
 
(c) Each of his outstanding long-term cash awards (including any deferred compensation awards under the long-term cash award program) that are not subject to performance criteria granted under the plans of the Company and, prior to the Distribution date, Cablevision will immediately vest in full and will be payable on the 90th day after the termination of his employment;
 
(d) (i) All of the restrictions on his outstanding restricted stock and restricted stock units granted under the plans of the Company (including the Special Equity Award) and an outstanding restricted stock of Cablevision and MSG will immediately be eliminated, (ii) deliveries with respect to all such restricted stock that are not subject to performance criteria will be made to him immediately after the effective date of the Separation Agreement, (iii) payment and deliveries with respect to all such restricted stock units that are not subject to performance criteria will be made to him on the 90th day after the termination of his employment, and (iv) payments or deliveries with respect to his restricted stock and restricted stock units that are subject to performance criteria will be made with respect to the Special Equity Award, only to the extent our Compensation Committee determines that such performance criteria have been satisfied, as soon as practicable after such determination, and with respect to other awards only if, when and to the same extent that other executive officers receive payment or deliveries for such awards as determined by our Compensation Committee (subject to satisfaction of any applicable performance objectives);
time-based
 
(e) Each of his outstanding stock options and stock appreciation awards under the plans of the Company and any outstanding stock options or stock appreciation awards of Cablevision or MSG held by him as of the effective date of the Separation Agreement will immediately vest and become exercisable and he will have the right to exercise each of those options and stock appreciation awards for the remainder of the term of the option or award; and
 
(f) A prorated annual bonus for the year in which such termination occurred to the same extent that other executive officers receive payment of bonuses for such year as determined by our Compensation Committee in its sole discretion (and subject to the satisfaction of any applicable performance objectives), payable at the same time annual bonuses for such year are payable to other executive officers, and, if not previously paid, his annual bonus for the preceding year, to the same extent that other members of senior management receive payment of annual bonuses for such preceding year as determined by our Compensation Committee in its sole discretion (and subject to the satisfaction of any applicable performance objectives), which annual bonus shall be payable at the same time annual bonuses for such preceding year are payable to other members of senior management.
Table of Contents
If Mr. Sapan ceases to be an employee of the Company or any of its affiliates prior to the Scheduled Expiration Date as a result of his death or physical or mental disability, Mr. Sapan (or his estate or beneficiary) will be provided with the benefits and rights set forth in (b) through (f) of the preceding paragraph, and, in the event of his death, such longer period to exercise his then outstanding stock options and stock appreciation awards as may otherwise be permitted under the applicable plan and award letter.
 
If, after the Scheduled Expiration Date, Mr. Sapan's employment with the Company is terminated (i) by the Company, (ii) by him for Good Reason, or (iii) by him without Good Reason but only if he had provided the Company with at least six months' advance written notice of his intent to terminate his employment and such written notice specifies an effective date of termination no sooner than the first day after the Scheduled Expiration Date, or (iv) as a result of his death or disability, and at the time of any such termination, Cause does not exist, then, subject to (except in the case of his death) his execution of a Separation Agreement, he or his estate or beneficiary, as the case may be, will be provided with the benefits and rights set forth above in (b) through (f) of the next preceding paragraph.
 
If, prior to, on, or after the Scheduled Expiration Date, Mr. Sapan ceases to be employed by the Company for any reason other than his being terminated for Cause, he will have three years to exercise outstanding stock options and stock appreciation awards, unless he is afforded a longer period for exercise pursuant to his employment agreement or any applicable award letter. In no event, however, will stock options or stock appreciation rights remain exercisable beyond their regularly scheduled term (except as may otherwise be permitted under the applicable award in the case of death).
 
Upon the termination of Mr. Sapan's employment with the Company, except as otherwise specifically provided in the employment agreement, his rights to benefits and payments under the Company's pension and welfare plans (other than severance benefits) and any outstanding long-term cash or equity awards will be determined in accordance with the then current terms and provisions of such plans, agreements and awards under which such benefits and payments (including such long-term cash or equity awards) were granted.
 
The employment agreement contains certain covenants by Mr. Sapan, including a noncompetition agreement that restricts Mr. Sapan's ability to engage in competitive activities until the first anniversary of the termination of his employment with the Company.
 
For purposes of Mr. Sapan's employment agreement, the following definitions apply:
 
"Cause" is defined as (1) commission of an act of fraud, embezzlement, misappropriation, willful misconduct, gross negligence or breach of fiduciary duty against the Company or an affiliate thereof, or (2) commission of any act or omission that results in, or may reasonably be expected to result in, a conviction, plea of no contest, plea of nolo contendere or imposition of unadjudicated probation for any crime involving moral turpitude or any felony.
 
"Change in Control" of the Company means the acquisition, in a transaction or a series of related transactions, by any person or group, other than Charles F. Dolan or members of the immediate family of Charles F. Dolan or trusts for the benefit of Charles F. Dolan or his immediate family (or an entity or entities controlled by any of them) or any employee benefit plan sponsored or maintained by the Company, of the power to direct the management of the Company or substantially all its assets (as constituted immediately prior to such transaction or transactions).
 
Termination for "Good Reason" means that (1) without Mr. Sapan's consent, (A) Mr. Sapan's base salary or annual bonus target is reduced, (B) the Company requires that Mr. Sapan's principal office be located more than fifty miles from Manhattan, (C) the Company materially breaches its obligations to Mr. Sapan under his employment agreement, (D) Mr. Sapan is no longer the President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company, (E) Mr. Sapan no longer reports directly to the Chairman (or an Executive Chairman) of the Board of Directors of the Company, or (F) Mr. Sapan's responsibilities are materially diminished, (2) Mr. Sapan has given the Company written notice, referring specifically to this definition, that he does not consent to such action, (3) the Company has not corrected such action within 15 days of receiving such notice, and (4) Mr. Sapan voluntarily terminates his employment within 90 days following the happening of the action described in subsection (1) of this definition.
Table of Contents
Edward A. Carroll
 
On April 16, 2010, Rainbow Media Enterprises, a subsidiary of RMH, entered into an employment agreement with Edward A. Carroll. The agreement provides for Mr. Carroll's employment as President, National Programming Services through April 15, 2013. Mr. Carroll's current title is Chief Operating Officer of the Company. The employment agreement provides for a minimum annual base salary of $950,000 (subject to review and potential increase by the Company in its discretion) and an annual target bonus opportunity equal to 100% of his annual base salary in the discretion of the Company. He will be eligible for our standard benefits programs and to participate in our long-term equity and other incentive programs, in each case on the same basis as similarly situated executives at the Company.
 
Mr. Carroll's employment agreement provides severance benefits if Mr. Carroll's employment is terminated prior to April 15, 2013 (1) involuntarily by the Company or (2) by Mr. Carroll for Good Reason, and at the time of such termination under clauses (1) or (2) Cause does not exist. These benefits consist of the payment of an amount in cash equal to not less than two times the sum of Mr. Carroll's annual base salary and his annual target bonus as in effect at that time. In addition, to the extent termination occurs prior to the payment of an annual bonus for the preceding year, Mr. Carroll shall remain eligible to receive an annual bonus for the preceding year if, when and to the same extent that other similarly situated employees receive payment of bonuses for such year as determined by Cablevision's compensation committee in its sole discretion (and subject to the satisfaction of any applicable performance objectives). All benefits would be conditioned on Mr. Carroll executing a Separation Agreement.
 
In connection with any termination of Mr. Carroll's employment, other than as specifically provided above, (i) all equity or cash incentive grants or awards he may then have outstanding will be treated in accordance with their terms, and (ii) he shall not be eligible for any annual bonus with respect to his or the Company's performance during the calendar year in which termination occurs.
 
For purposes of Mr. Carroll's employment agreement the following definitions apply:
 
"Cause" means, as determined by the Board of Directors (or an appropriate committee thereof) of the Company, (i) commission of an act of fraud, embezzlement, misappropriation, willful misconduct, gross negligence or breach of fiduciary duty against the Company or an affiliate thereof, or (ii) commission of any act or omission that results in a conviction, plea of no contest, plea of , or imposition of unadjudicated probation for any crime involving moral turpitude or any felony.
nolo contendere
 
Termination for "Good Reason" means that (1) without Mr. Carroll's consent, (A) his base salary or annual bonus target is reduced, (B) his title is reduced, (C) he reports directly to someone other than the Chairman or the President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company or a Chairman, President, Chief Executive Officer, Vice Chairman or Chief Operating Officer of Cablevision, or (D) the Company requires that his principal office be located more than 50 miles from Manhattan, (2) he has given the Company written notice, referring specifically to this letter and definition, that he does not consent to such action, (3) the Company has not corrected such action within 30 days of receiving such notice, and (4) he voluntarily terminates his employment within 90 days following the happening of the action described in subsection (1) above.
 
Sean S. Sullivan
 
On August 17, 2010, Sean S. Sullivan agreed to the terms set forth in an employment offer letter from Cablevision, which provides for Mr. Sullivan's employment as Chief Corporate Officer of RMH. Mr. Sullivan's current title is Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. The agreement expires on the anniversary of his start date (for purposes of Mr. Sullivan's agreement, the "Reference Date"), which was September 20, 2010, and provides for a base salary of $575,000 and an annual target bonus opportunity equal to 60% of his annual base salary in the discretion of the Company. He is eligible for our standard benefits programs and to participate in our long-term incentive programs, in each case on the same basis as similarly situated executives at the Company. The agreement provides that the then-existing long-term incentive program contemplated that a similarly situated employee would be recommended to Cablevision's compensation committee annually for a cash and equity award with a target value of $500,000 (as determined by Cablevision's
24-month
Table of Contents
compensation committee), subject to three-year cliff vesting. In addition, the agreement provides for a special bonus of $150,000, payable within 30 days of Mr. Sullivan's start date (which has been paid) and a second special bonus of $150,000, payable on the first anniversary of his start date, provided that his employment with the Company has not been terminated by the Company for Cause and he has not voluntarily terminated his employment with the Company prior to the first anniversary of his start date.
 
The agreement provides severance benefits if Mr. Sullivan's employment is terminated prior to the Reference Date by the Company for any reason other than Cause. These benefits consist of an amount equal to the greater of (a) his prorated base salary from the effective date of the termination of his employment through the Reference Date and (b) six months of his base salary. All payments would be conditioned on Mr. Sullivan executing a Separation Agreement. In addition, in the event his employment is involuntarily terminated by the Company for any reason other than Cause, the Company will pay Mr. Sullivan the amount owed to him on account of the special bonus, if any, to the extent not previously paid. In connection with any termination of employment, all of Mr. Sullivan's equity and cash incentive awards will be treated in accordance with their terms.
 
For purposes of the agreement relating to Mr. Sullivan's employment, "Cause" means (i) commission of an act of fraud, embezzlement, misappropriation, willful misconduct, gross negligence or breach of fiduciary duty against the Company or an affiliate thereof, or (ii) commission of any act or omission that results in a conviction, plea of no contest, plea of , or imposition of unadjudicated probation for any crime involving moral turpitude or any felony.
nolo contendere
 
Key Elements of 2011 Compensation from the Company
 
As a newly-formed entity, we did not have any executive officers or pay any compensation during 2009 or 2010. The following summarizes the principal components of 2011 compensation for each of our NEOs based upon employment agreements and compensation arrangements that will be in place at the time of the Distribution. The amounts set forth below have been annualized. Actual amounts paid will be prorated based upon the date of the Distribution. Except as noted, we have not yet determined the form of any long-term incentives.
 
 
In addition, these NEOs are expected to receive other benefits and perquisites as discussed above.
Table of Contents
Transition of Awards Granted by Cablevision in 2011 to Certain of Our NEOs
 
Each of our NEOs who was employed at RMH on March 8, 2011 (Messrs. Sapan, Carroll, Sullivan and Gallagher) received annual incentive awards, restricted stock awards and performance awards from Cablevision in 2011. Following is a description of how these 2011 awards will be affected by the Distribution. The treatment of awards made prior to 2011 is described under " Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards." The awards received by Mr. Dolan from Cablevision in 2011 are not subject to the adjustments set forth in this section.
 
Annual Incentive Awards
 
The performance objectives applicable to annual incentive awards granted by Cablevision in 2011 to our NEOs who were employed at RMH on March 8, 2011 are based on the executive's individual performance and on the financial and operating performance of the RMH business alone. Because the RMH business will be operated by AMC Networks following the Distribution, the 2011 annual incentive awards currently in place for these NEOs previously employed at RMH will remain in force without substantive change after the occurrence of the Distribution, except that AMC Networks will assume the responsibility for determining achievement of performance criteria and administering any payouts.
 
Restricted Stock Awards
 
There currently are no performance criteria applicable to restricted stock awards granted by Cablevision in 2011 to our NEOs who were employed at RMH on March 8, 2011. Following the Distribution, these restricted stock awards will be cancelled and reissued in the form of AMC Networks restricted stock awards under our Employee Stock Plan (see " Our Employee Stock Plan"). When these awards are cancelled and reissued, performance criteria will apply to restricted stock awards granted to these NEOs whose compensation is potentially subject to Section 162(m) of the Code. Vesting of restricted stock awards to those individuals is subject to the Company achieving a performance condition designed to achieve tax deductibility under section 162(m). The performance condition will require the Company to achieve a target rate of growth in AOCF of the Company over the base year of 2010.
 
Performance Awards
 
Performance awards granted by Cablevision in 2011 to our NEOs who were employed at RMH on March 8, 2011 currently contain performance measures based on Cablevision's financial results. Following the Distribution, these awards will be cancelled and replaced with awards issued under AMC Networks' cash incentive plan (see " Our Cash Incentive Plan") and will contain performance measures based solely on AMC Networks' revenue, business unit AOCF and business unit free cash flow results.
 
Performance awards to be granted to these NEOs in 2011 will be payable in 2014 if we achieve specified targets of incremental net revenues ($366 million) and business unit AOCF ($122 million) and a measure of cumulative free cash flow ($1.2 billion) through December 31, 2013. These targets are intended to measure our ongoing operating performance and are subject to various adjustments such as for certain impacts of the Distribution such as the elimination of management fees and corporate allocations to Cablevision and the inclusion of costs to operate the business as a separate, stand-alone public entity, as well as acquisitions and dispositions and investments in new business initiatives and exclude all charges for long-term performance-based compensation. In determining achievement of the 2011 performance awards, net revenues, business unit AOCF and cumulative business unit free cash flow will be weighted at 30%, 50% and 20%, respectively. The awards provide for a potential payout on a sliding scale such that the actual payment may range from zero (if both incremental net revenues and business unit AOCF fail to reach at least 60% of the targets and cumulative business unit free cash flow fails to reach at least 87% of the target) to 200% (if, for example, incremental net revenues equal or exceed 125% of the target, incremental business unit AOCF equals or exceeds 135% of the target and cumulative business unit free cash flow equals or exceeds 117% of the target). If we do not achieve threshold levels of performance, the award will not provide for any payment. If we exceed threshold levels but do not achieve the targeted amounts, or if we achieve one target but not all three, the award will provide for partial payments. In addition, if results exceed the desired targets, recipients will receive payments in excess of the target award for the exceptional performance.
Table of Contents
We believe that the targets set for the performance awards, are ambitious and reflect desired above-market performance. In determining the threshold levels of performance, the Cablevision compensation committee considered, among other factors, AMC Networks' five-year plan and the degree of difficulty in achieving the targets. The Cablevision compensation committee believes that the lowest levels on the sliding scale should be achieved, although there can be no assurance this will occur. As the payout scale increases, the likelihood of achievement decreases and the payouts increase. Our Compensation Committee will have the authority to amend or waive the performance targets under these awards and to make interpretations thereof and adjustments thereto.
 
Historical Compensation Information
 
All of the information set forth in the following table reflects compensation earned during 2010 based upon services rendered to Cablevision by Mr. Dolan, and is based upon services rendered to RMH by Messrs. Sapan, Carroll, Sullivan and Gallagher. The services rendered by these executives in 2010 were, in some instances, in capacities not equivalent to the positions in which they will serve the Company or our subsidiaries. The information below is therefore not necessarily indicative of the compensation that each NEO will receive in 2011. For information on the compensation of these executives, see " Key Elements of 2011 Compensation from the Company."
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
Grants of Cablevision Plan-Based Awards
 
The table below presents information regarding awards granted in 2010 to each NEO under Cablevision's plans, including estimated possible and future payouts under non-equity incentive plan awards and other restricted stock and stock option awards. See " Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards" for a discussion of the impact of the Distribution on certain of the awards discussed in the following table.
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
Outstanding Cablevision Equity Awards at 2010 Fiscal Year-End
 
The table below shows (i) each grant of stock options and stock appreciation rights of Cablevision that are still unexercised and outstanding and (ii) the aggregate number of shares of unvested restricted stock of Cablevision outstanding for our NEOs as of December 31, 2010. See " Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards" for a discussion of the impact of the Distribution on certain of the awards discussed in the following table.
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
Cablevision Option Exercises and Stock Vested
 
The table below shows any exercises of Cablevision stock options during 2010 and awards of Cablevision restricted stock that vested during 2010. See " Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards" for a discussion of the impact of the Distribution on certain of the awards discussed in the following table.
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Pension Benefits
 
The table below shows the present value of accumulated benefits payable to the NEOs, including the number of years of service credited to each NEO, under the defined benefit pension plans as of December 31, 2010.
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan
 
The Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan is a tax-qualified defined benefit plan that generally covers regular full-time and part-time nonunion employees of Cablevision and certain of its affiliates who have completed one year of service. A notional account is maintained for each participant under the plan, including each of our NEOs, which consists of (i) annual allocations made by Cablevision as of the end of each year on behalf of each participant who has completed 800 hours of service during the year that range from 3% to 9% of the participant's compensation, based on the participant's age, and (ii) monthly interest credits based on the average of the annual rate of interest on the U.S. Treasury Bonds for the months of September, October and November of the prior year. Compensation includes all direct cash compensation received while a participant as part of the participant's primary compensation structure (excluding bonuses, fringe benefits, and other compensation that is not received on a regular basis), and before deductions for elective deferrals (in accordance with the Code limits, the maximum compensation taken into account in determining benefits was limited to $245,000 in 2010).
30-year
 
A participant's interest in the cash balance account is subject to vesting limitations for the first three years of employment. A participant's account will vest in full upon his or her termination due to death, disability or retirement after attaining age 65. Upon retirement or other termination of employment with Cablevision, the participant may elect a distribution of the vested portion of the cash balance account. Any amounts remaining in the plan will continue to be credited with interest until the account is paid. The normal form of benefit payment for an unmarried participant is a single life annuity and the normal form of benefit payment for a married participant is a 50% joint and survivor annuity. The participant, with spousal consent if applicable, can waive the normal form and elect a single life annuity or a lump sum.
 
Cablevision Excess Cash Balance Plan
 
Cablevision's Excess Cash Balance Plan is a non-qualified deferred compensation plan that is intended to provide eligible participants, including each of our NEOs, with the portion of their benefit that cannot be paid to them under the Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan due to Code limits on the amount of compensation (as defined in the Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan) that can be taken into account in determining benefits under tax-qualified plans ($245,000 in 2010). Cablevision maintains a notional excess cash balance account for each eligible participant, and for each calendar year, credits these accounts with the portion of the allocation that could not be made on his behalf under the Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan due to the compensation limitation. In addition, Cablevision credits each notional excess cash balance account monthly with interest at the same rate used under the Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan. A participant vests in the excess cash balance account according to the same schedule in the Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan. The excess cash balance account, to the extent vested, is paid in a lump sum to the participant as soon as practicable following his or her retirement or other termination of employment with Cablevision.
Table of Contents
Nonqualified Supplemental Benefit Plan
 
Mr. Dolan is the only NEO who participates in Cablevision's Nonqualified Supplemental Benefit Plan. The Nonqualified Supplemental Benefit Plan provides actuarially determined pension benefits for certain employees of Cablevision or its subsidiaries and affiliates who were previously employed by CSSC, L.L.C., successor to Cablevision Systems Services Corporation ("CSSC"), which is wholly owned by Mr. Dolan and his spouse, and which provided management services to Cablevision Company (the predecessor of Cablevision) and to certain affiliates of Cablevision. The Nonqualified Supplemental Benefit Plan was designed to provide participants, in combination with certain qualified benefit plans maintained by Cablevision and certain qualified retirement plans formerly maintained by CSSC, with the same retirement benefits they would have enjoyed had they remained employees of CSSC and continued to participate in the former CSSC qualified plans.
 
The defined benefit feature of the Nonqualified Supplemental Benefit Plan provides that, upon attaining the later of age 65 or the completion of five years of service, a participant will receive an annual benefit equal to the lesser of (i) 75% of his or her average compensation (not including bonuses and overtime) for his or her three most highly compensated years or (ii) the maximum benefit permitted by the Internal Revenue Code (the maximum in 2010 was $195,000 for employees who retire at age 65), reduced by the amount of any benefits paid to the participant under the qualified defined benefit plan formerly maintained by CSSC as well as benefits under the Cash Balance Pension Plan and Excess Cash Balance Plan.
 
Cablevision Nonqualified Deferred Compensation
 
The table below shows (i) the contributions made by the NEOs and by Cablevision in 2010, (ii) aggregate earnings on each NEO's account balance in 2010 and (iii) the account balance of such executive officer under the Cablevision Excess Savings Plan as of December 31, 2010.
 
 
 
 
Cablevision 401(k) Plan
 
Under the Cablevision 401(k) Savings Plan (the "Cablevision 401(k) Plan"), a tax-qualified retirement savings plan, participating employees, including executive officers, may contribute into their plan accounts a percentage of their eligible pay on a before-tax basis as well as a percentage of their eligible pay on an after-tax basis. Cablevision matches 50% of the first 6% of eligible pay contributed by participating employees. The Cablevision matching contributions are subject to vesting limitations for the first three years of employment.
Table of Contents
Cablevision Excess Savings Plan
 
The Cablevision Excess Savings Plan is a non-qualified deferred compensation plan that operates in conjunction with the Cablevision 401(k) Plan. An employee is eligible to participate in the Cablevision Excess Savings Plan for a calendar year if his compensation (as defined in the Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan described above) in the preceding year exceeded (or would have exceeded, if the employee had been employed for the entire year) the IRS limit on the amount of compensation that can be taken into account in determining contributions under tax-qualified retirement plans ($245,000 in 2010) and he makes an election to participate prior to the beginning of the year. An eligible employee whose contributions to the Cablevision 401(k) Plan are limited as a result of this compensation limit or as a result of reaching the maximum 401(k) deferral limit ($16,500 or $22,000 if 50 or over, for 2010) can continue to make pre-tax contributions under the Cablevision Excess Savings Plan of up to 6% of his eligible pay. In addition, Cablevision will make matching contributions of up to 50% of the first 6% of eligible pay contributed by the employee. A participant is always fully vested in his own contributions and vests in Cablevision matching contributions over three years (subject to full vesting upon death, disability or retirement after attaining age 65). Account balances under the Cablevision Excess Savings Plan are credited monthly with the rate of return earned by the Stable Value Fund offered as an investment alternative under the Cablevision 401(k) Plan. Distributions are made in a lump sum as soon as practicable after the participant's termination of employment with Cablevision.
 
Our Retirement Benefits
 
After the Distribution date, the Company does not intend to maintain a defined benefit pension plan. Employees of the Company who participate in the Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan and the Cablevision Excess Cash Balance Plan will stop accruing benefits thereunder as of the Distribution date. Benefits accrued under the Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan will remain in the Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan. The actuarially-determined amount of any unfunded liability with respect to the accrued benefits of the Company employees in the Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan will be paid by the Company to Cablevision.
 
Following the Distribution, the Company will offer a 401(k) plan and an excess savings plan to its employees, and is evaluating enhancements to the employer-provided contributions under such plans. Participant accounts in the Cablevision 401(k) Plan and Cablevision Excess Savings Plan (collectively, the "Cablevision 401(k) Plans") relating to Company employees will be transferred to the Company. Liabilities for benefits under the Cablevision Excess Savings Plan will be transferred and assumed by the Company.
 
The actuarial present values of the accumulated pension benefits of Messrs. Dolan, Sapan, Sullivan and Gallagher, each of whom participated in the Cablevision Cash Balance Pension Plan and the Cablevision Excess Cash Balance Plan as of the end of 2010, are reported in the Pension Benefits Table herein. Information concerning the Cablevision Excess Savings Plan as of the end of 2010 is reported in the Non-Qualified Deferred Compensation Table herein.
 
Termination and Severance
 
This section describes the payments that would be received by our NEOs upon various termination of employment scenarios. The information under "Separation from the Company" is based upon the provisions of each executive officer's current employment agreement or arrangement, if any, with the Company as described under " Employment Agreements" and assumes that the NEO was employed by the Company under that agreement or arrangement at December 31, 2010. The information under "Separation from Cablevision" for Messrs. Dolan and Sapan is based upon their employment agreements as executives of Cablevision as in effect as of December 31, 2010. This information is presented to illustrate the payment each executive officer would have received from Cablevision under the various termination scenarios. The consummation of the Distribution is not a termination of employment with Cablevision for these purposes. The Company would have no liability for the payment of any amounts to Messrs. Dolan and Sapan with respect to the amounts shown as the payments they would receive from Cablevision.
Table of Contents
Separation from the Company
 
Payments may be made to employees upon the termination of their employment with the Company depending upon the circumstances of their termination, which include termination by the Company without cause, termination by the employee for good reason, other voluntary termination by the employee, retirement, death, disability, or termination following a change in control of the Company or following a going-private transaction. Certain of these circumstances are addressed in employment agreements between the Company and the executives. For a description of termination provisions in the employment agreements, see " Employment Agreements" above. In addition, future award agreements for any long-term incentives will also address some of these circumstances.
 
The following table sets forth the estimated cash severance benefits payable by the Company to each of its NEOs as of December 31, 2010 in connection with their current employment agreements, if any, with the Company.
 
 
In addition, the above table does not include any amounts with respect to accelerated vesting or payment of any Company long-term cash or equity incentives, given that the Company had not granted any such awards as of December 31, 2010. The above table similarly does not reflect any amounts with respect to accelerated vesting or payment of outstanding Cablevision long-term cash or equity incentives. In the case of Mr. Dolan, such awards will be the responsibility of Cablevision (and not the Company). In the case of Mr. Sapan, he would be entitled to the following upon a termination without Cause by the Company, for Good Reason by Mr. Sapan, or due to his death or disability: (i) restricted stock vesting  $6,662,538; (ii) stock option vesting  $7,524,772; (iii) performance awards vesting  $4,650,000; (iv) deferred compensation award vesting  $878,432; and (v) annual bonus payment  $2,560,000. In the case of Messrs. Carroll, Sullivan and Gallagher, the treatment of such awards is the same as that described below under " Quantification of Termination and Severance Payable by Cablevision." The outstanding Cablevision long-term cash and equity incentive awards held by Mr. Dolan may, however, be subject to accelerated vesting and/or payment by Cablevision (not by the Company) under certain types of termination of his employment with Cablevision and, in the case of Messrs. Dolan, Sapan, Carroll, Sullivan and Gallagher, may be subject to accelerated vesting and/or payment in connection with certain types of Cablevision change in control or Cablevision going private transactions.
 
We expect that, over time, our executive officers will receive long-term awards from the Company, and, as a result, actual aggregate potential termination payments in the future will be materially higher in certain of the termination scenarios.
 
Separation from Cablevision
 
This section presents historical information concerning payments that would have been made to our NEOs upon termination of their employment with Cablevision at December 31, 2010. The amount of these payments would have depended upon the circumstances of their termination, which include termination without cause, termination by the executive for good reason, other voluntary termination by the executive, retirement, death, disability, or termination following a change in control or following a going-private transaction. Payments in such circumstances would have also been affected by the terms of employment agreements between Cablevision and our NEOs that were in effect at such time as well as by the terms of applicable award agreements.
Table of Contents
Cablevision Award Agreements
 
Under the applicable Cablevision award agreements, vesting of restricted stock, stock options and stock appreciation rights granted to employees, including to our NEOs, may be affected upon a "change of control" of Cablevision or a going private transaction (as defined in of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934). A "change of control" is defined in the Cablevision award agreements as the acquisition by any person or group, other than Charles F. Dolan or members of his immediate family (or trusts for the benefit of Charles F. Dolan or his immediate family) or any employee benefit plan sponsored or maintained by Cablevision, of (1) the power to direct the management of substantially all of the cable television systems then owned by Cablevision in the New York City metropolitan area, or (2) after any fiscal year of Cablevision in which Cablevision's cable television systems in the New York City metropolitan area contributed in the aggregate less than a majority of the net revenues of Cablevision and its consolidated subsidiaries, the power to direct the management of Cablevision or substantially all of its assets. Upon a change in control, as defined, the restricted stock, stock options and stock appreciation rights may be converted into either a right to receive an amount of cash based upon the highest price per share of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock paid in the transaction resulting in the change of control, or, as long as the surviving entity is a public company, into a corresponding award with equivalent profit potential in the surviving entity, at the election of the Cablevision compensation committee. Upon a going private transaction, the restricted stock, stock options and stock appreciation rights would be converted into a right to receive an amount of cash based upon the highest price per share of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock paid in the transaction. Following the change of control or going private transaction, the award of restricted stock, stock options or stock appreciation rights will become payable on the earlier to occur of (1) the date on which the award was originally scheduled to vest or (2) the date on which the recipient's employment with Cablevision or the surviving entity is terminated (A) by Cablevision or the surviving entity other than for cause or (B) by the recipient for good reason, if such termination occurs within three years after the change of control or going private transaction, or by the recipient for any reason if such termination occurs at least six months, but not more than nine months, after completion of the change of control or going private transaction. In addition, the amount payable under the award agreement will include interest from the date of the change of control or going private transaction.
Rule 13e-3
 
Under the Cablevision applicable award agreements, vesting of restricted stock, stock options and stock appreciation rights granted to employees, including our NEOs, may be forfeited or accelerated in certain other circumstances. Under stock option or stock appreciation rights award agreements, upon termination for cause, the entire award is forfeited. Upon termination by Cablevision without cause, termination by the employee, death, disability or retirement, the unvested portion of the award is forfeited; provided, however, that only with respect to stock options granted in 2006, upon death, the entire award is immediately vested. Depending on the type of termination and specific option grant, the time to exercise the vested portion varies from 90 days to three years. With respect to stock options granted in March 2009, depending on the type of termination, the time to exercise the vested option varies from 90 days to the remainder of the term. In no event is this period later than the expiration date, except in the case of death, in which the time to exercise may be extended for one year after the expiration date. Under restricted stock award agreements, upon any termination for any reason prior to the third anniversary of the grant date other than death or change of control or going private transaction, the entire award is forfeited; upon death, the entire award is immediately vested. Under the applicable award agreements for performance awards, upon termination for cause, the entire award is forfeited. Under the applicable award agreements for all performance awards, upon a change in control, the entire award vests and is immediately payable, regardless of the performance objectives. Under subsequent performance award agreements, upon any termination for any reason prior to the payment date other than death, the entire award is forfeited. Upon death before the end of the performance period, a pro rata portion of the award will vest and be immediately payable; upon death after the end of the performance period but prior to the payment date, the entire award will be payable upon the payment date. In the event of a going private transaction, the entire award vests and is immediately payable, regardless of the performance objectives.
 
Under the applicable Cablevision award agreements for deferred compensation awards, upon termination for cause, the entire award is forfeited. Upon death or disability, the then current award amount outstanding on
Table of Contents
that date is immediately payable. Upon termination by Cablevision without cause, termination by the employee or retirement prior to the second anniversary of the grant date, the entire award is forfeited. Upon termination by Cablevision without cause, termination by the employee or retirement after the second anniversary of the grant date, the then-current award amount outstanding on the date of termination vests on a pro rata basis and the pro rata portion is payable (adjusted, if applicable, for any amount that may have been paid out on the fifth anniversary of the date of grant). Upon a change in control, the entire award vests and is immediately payable. The award agreements for deferred compensation do not provide for any special benefits in the event of a going private transaction.
 
Quantification of Termination and Severance Payable by Cablevision
 
The following tables set forth a quantification of estimated severance and other benefits payable to our NEOs under various circumstances regarding the termination of their employment. In calculating these severance and other payments, we have taken into consideration or otherwise assumed the following:
 
 
Benefits Payable As a Result of Voluntary Termination of Employment by Employee*
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Benefits Payable As a Result of Termination of Employment Due to Retirement*
 
 
 
 
Benefits Payable As a Result of Termination of Employment by Cablevision for Cause
 
In the event of termination by Cablevision for cause, none of our NEOs would have been entitled to any payments at December 31, 2010.
 
Benefits Payable As a Result of Termination of Employment by Cablevision Without Cause*
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Benefits Payable As a Result of Termination of Employment by Employee For Good Reason*
 
 
 
Table of Contents
Benefits Payable As a Result of Termination of Employment Due to Death*
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
Benefits Payable As a Result of Termination of Employment Due to Disability*
 
 
 
 
Benefits Payable As a Result of Termination of Employment In Connection with a Change in Control or Going Private Transaction(1)*
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Our Equity Compensation Plan Information
 
We plan to adopt an Employee Stock Plan and a Stock Plan for Non-Employee Directors, both of which are discussed below.
 
Our Employee Stock Plan
 
Prior to the Distribution, we will adopt an Employee Stock Plan (the "Employee Stock Plan"), subject to the approval of CSC Holdings as our sole stockholder at such time.
 
A form of the Employee Stock Plan has been filed as an exhibit to the registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part, and the following description of the Employee Stock Plan is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Employee Stock Plan as so filed.
Table of Contents
Overview
 
The purpose of the Employee Stock Plan is to compensate employees of the Company and its affiliates who are responsible for the management and growth of the business of the Company and its affiliates and to advance the interest of the Company by encouraging and enabling the acquisition of a personal proprietary interest in the Company by employees upon whose judgment and keen interest the Company and its affiliates are largely dependent for the successful conduct of their operations. It is anticipated that the acquisition of such a proprietary interest in the Company will stimulate the efforts of these employees on behalf of the Company and its affiliates, and strengthen their desire to remain with the Company and its affiliates. It is also expected that the opportunity to acquire such a proprietary interest will enable the Company and its affiliates to attract and retain desirable personnel. The Employee Stock Plan provides for grants of incentive stock options (as defined in Section 422A of the Code), non-qualified stock options, stock appreciation rights, restricted shares, restricted stock units and other equity-based awards (collectively, "Awards"). The Employee Stock Plan will terminate, and no more Awards will be granted, after ten years from the effective date of the plan (unless sooner terminated by our Board of Directors or our Compensation Committee). The termination of the Employee Stock Plan will not affect previously granted Awards.
 
Shares Subject to the Employee Stock Plan; Other Limitations
 
The Employee Stock Plan will be administered by the Company's Compensation Committee. Awards may be granted under the Employee Stock Plan to such employees of the Company and its affiliates as the Compensation Committee may determine. An "affiliate" is defined in the Employee Stock Plan to mean any entity controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the Company or any other affiliate and also includes any entity in which the Company owns at least five percent of the outstanding equity interests. Cablevision's compensation committee will be authorized to grant Awards under the Employee Stock Plan with respect to outstanding equity awards of Cablevision in connection with the Distribution. Such awards may include options or rights with exercise prices that are less than the fair market value of the underlying shares in order to preserve the intrinsic value of the outstanding Cablevision equity awards prior to the Distribution. The total number of shares of the Company's Class A Common Stock that may be issued pursuant to Awards under the Employee Stock Plan may not exceed an aggregate of 5,000,000, which may be either treasury shares or authorized and unissued shares. To the extent that (i) an Award is paid, settled or exchanged or expires, lapses, terminates or is cancelled for any reason without the issuance of shares, (ii) any shares under an Award are not issued because of payment or withholding obligations or (iii) restricted shares revert back to the Company prior to the lapse of the restrictions or are applied by the Company for purposes of tax withholding obligations, then the Compensation Committee may also grant Awards with respect to such shares or restricted shares. Awards payable only in cash or property other than shares do not reduce the aggregate remaining number of shares with respect to which Awards may be made under the Employee Stock Plan and shares relating to any other Awards that are settled in cash or property other than shares, when settled, will be added back to the aggregate remaining number of shares with respect to which Awards may be made under the Employee Stock Plan. Any shares underlying Awards that the Company becomes obligated to make through the assumption of, or in substitution for, outstanding awards previously granted by an acquired entity shall not count against the shares available to be delivered pursuant to Awards under the Employee Stock Plan. No single employee may be issued Awards during any one calendar year for, or that relate to, a number of shares exceeding 2,000,000. In the event that any dividend or other distribution (whether in the form of cash, shares, other securities, or other property), recapitalization, forward or reverse stock split, reorganization, merger, consolidation, spin-off, combination, repurchase, share exchange, liquidation, dissolution or other similar corporate transaction or event affects shares such that the failure to make an adjustment to an Award would not fairly protect the rights represented by the Award in accordance with the essential intent and principles thereof (each such event, an "Adjustment Event"), then the Compensation Committee will, in such manner as it may determine to be equitable in its sole discretion, adjust any or all of the terms of an outstanding Award (including, without limitation, the number of shares covered by such outstanding Award, the type of property to which the Award is subject and the exercise price of such Award).
Table of Contents
As a result of the Distribution, options with respect to approximately 1,745,900 shares of the Company's Class A Common Stock and stock appreciation rights with respect to approximately 28,000 shares of the Company's Class A Common Stock will be issued under the Employee Stock Plan in respect of outstanding Cablevision options and stock appreciation rights previously issued to employees of the Company and Cablevision. In addition, as a result of the Distribution, approximately 562,000 restricted shares of the Company's Class A Common Stock will be issued under the Employee Stock Plan in respect of Cablevision restricted shares granted in 2011 to employees of the Company that will be automatically cancelled and converted into shares of our restricted Class A Common Stock. The number of shares we will issue will be based upon the relative trading prices of the Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock and our Class A Common Stock during a ten trading-day period following the Distribution date. See "Shares Eligible for Future Sale  Employee Stock Awards" and " Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards."
 
Awards
 
All employees of the Company and its affiliates will be eligible to receive Awards under the Employee Stock Plan. Under the Employee Stock Plan, the Company may grant options and stock appreciation rights, which will be exercisable at a price determined by the Compensation Committee on the date of the Award grant, which price will be no less than the fair market value of a share of Class A Common Stock on the date the option or stock appreciation right is granted. Other than in the case of the death of a participant, such options and stock appreciation rights may be exercised for a term fixed by the Compensation Committee but no longer than ten years from the date of grant. An award agreement may provide that, in the event the participant dies while the option or stock appreciation right is outstanding, the option or stock appreciation right will remain outstanding until the first anniversary of the participant's death, whether or not such first anniversary occurs after such ten-year period. Upon its exercise, a stock appreciation right will be settled (and an option may be settled, in the Compensation Committee's discretion) for an amount equal to the excess of the fair market value of a share of Class A Common Stock on the date of exercise over the exercise price of the stock appreciation right (or option).
 
The Company may also grant restricted shares and restricted stock units. A restricted share is a share of Class A Common Stock that is registered in the participant's name, but that is subject to certain transfer forfeiture restrictions for a period of time as specified in the participant's award agreements. The recipient of a restricted share will have the rights of a stockholder, subject to any restrictions and conditions specified by the Compensation Committee in the recipient's award agreement. Notwithstanding the previous sentence, unless the Compensation Committee determines otherwise, all ordinary cash dividends paid upon any restricted share prior to its vesting will be retained by the Company for the account of the relevant participant and upon vesting will be paid to the relevant participant.
and/or
 
A restricted stock unit is an unfunded, unsecured right to receive a share of Class A Common Stock (or cash or other property) at a future date upon the satisfaction of the conditions specified by the Compensation Committee in the award agreement. Unless otherwise provided by the Compensation Committee, a restricted stock unit will also carry a dividend equivalent right representing an unfunded and unsecured promise to pay to the relevant participant, upon the vesting of the restricted stock unit, an amount equal to the ordinary cash dividends that would have been paid upon any share underlying a restricted stock unit had such shares been issued.
 
The Compensation Committee may grant other equity-based or equity-related awards to participants subject to terms and conditions it may specify. These awards may entail the transfer of shares or payment in cash based on the value of shares.
 
Under the Employee Stock Plan, the Compensation Committee will have the authority, in its discretion, to add performance criteria as a condition to any employee's exercise of a stock option or stock appreciation right, or the vesting or payment of any restricted shares or restricted stock units, granted under the Employee Stock Plan. Additionally, the Employee Stock Plan specifies certain performance criteria that may, in the case of certain executive officers of the Company, be conditions precedent to the vesting of bonus award shares or restricted shares granted to such executives under the Employee Stock Plan. The performance criteria may be determined by reference to the performance of the Company, an affiliate or a business unit, program,
Table of Contents
production, network or service thereof or any combination of the foregoing. Such criteria may also be measured on a per customer, subscriber, sponsor, viewer (or available viewer), basic or diluted share basis or any combination of the foregoing and may reflect absolute performance, incremental performance or comparative performance to other companies (or their products or services) determined on a gross, net, GAAP or non-GAAP basis, with respect to one or more of the following: (i) net or operating income or other measures of profit; (ii) measures of revenue; (iii) earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA); (iv) cash flow, free cash flow, adjusted operating cash flow and similar measures; (v) return on equity, investment, assets or capital; (vi) gross or operating margins or savings; (vii) performance relative to budget, forecast or market expectations; (viii) market share or penetration, subscriber or customer acquisition or retention, ratings or viewership; (ix) operating metrics relating to sales, subscriptions or customer service or satisfaction; (x) capital spending management or product or service deployments; (xi) achievement of strategic business objectives such as acquisitions, dispositions or investments; (xii) a specified increase in the fair market value of the Company's Class A Common Stock; (xiii) a specified increase in the private market value of the Company; (xiv) the price of the Company's Class A Common Stock; (xv) earnings per share; and/or (xvi) total shareholder return.
 
Amendment; Termination
 
The Board of Directors or the Compensation Committee may discontinue the Employee Stock Plan at any time and from time to time may amend or revise the terms of the Employee Stock Plan or any award agreement, as permitted by applicable law, except that it may not (a) make any amendment or revision to an outstanding award agreement in a manner unfavorable to a participant (other than if immaterial), without the consent of the participant or (b) make any amendment or revision without the approval of the stockholders of the Company if such approval is required by the rules of NASDAQ. Consent of the participant will not be required solely pursuant to the previous sentence in respect of any adjustment made in light of an Adjustment Event, except to the extent the terms of an award agreement expressly refer to an Adjustment Event, in which case such terms will not be amended in a manner unfavorable to a participant (other than if immaterial) without such participant's consent.
 
U.S. Federal Tax Implications of Certain Awards under the Employee Stock Plan
 
The following summary generally describes the principal Federal (but not state and local) income tax consequences of certain awards under the Employee Stock Plan. It is general in nature and is not intended to cover all tax consequences that may apply to a particular participant or the Company. The provisions of the Code and the regulations thereunder relating to these matters are complex and their impact in any one case may depend upon the particular circumstances.
 
Incentive Stock Options
 
An employee will not be subject to tax upon the grant of an incentive stock option (an "ISO") or upon the exercise of an ISO. However, the excess of the fair market value of the shares on the date of exercise over the exercise price paid will be included in the employee's alternative minimum taxable income. Whether the employee is subject to the alternative minimum tax will depend on his or her particular circumstances. The employee's basis in the shares received will be equal to the exercise price paid, and the holding period in such shares will begin on the day following the date of exercise. If an employee disposes of the shares on or after (i) the second anniversary of the date of grant of the ISO and (ii) the first anniversary of the date of exercise of the ISO (the "statutory holding period"), the employee will recognize a capital gain or loss in an amount equal to the difference between the amount realized on such disposition and his or her basis in the shares.
 
Nonstatutory Stock Options
 
For the grant of an option that is not intended to be (or does not qualify as) an ISO, an employee will not be subject to tax upon the grant of such an option (a "nonstatutory stock option"). Upon exercise of a nonstatutory stock option, an amount equal to the excess of the fair market value of the shares acquired on the date of exercise over the exercise price paid is taxable to an employee as ordinary income, and such amount is generally deductible by the Company. This amount of income will be subject to income tax withholding and employment taxes. An employee's basis in the shares received will equal the fair market value of the shares
Table of Contents
on the date of exercise, and an employee's holding period in such shares will begin on the day following the date of exercise.
 
Restricted Stock
 
An employee will not be subject to tax upon receipt of an award of shares subject to forfeiture conditions and transfer restrictions (the "restrictions") under the Employee Stock Plan unless the employee makes the election referred to below. Upon lapse of the restrictions, an employee will recognize ordinary income equal to the fair market value of the shares on the date of lapse (less any amount the employee may have paid for the shares), and such income will be subject to income tax withholding and employment taxes. An employee's basis in the shares received will be equal to the fair market value of the shares on the date the restrictions lapse, and an employee's holding period in such shares begins on the day after the restrictions lapse. If any dividends are paid on such shares prior to the lapse of the restrictions they will be includible in an employee's income during the restricted period as additional compensation (and not as dividend income) and will be subject to income tax withholding and employment taxes.
 
If permitted by the applicable award agreement, an employee may elect, within 30 days after the date of the grant of the restricted stock, to recognize immediately (as ordinary income) the fair market value of the shares awarded (less any amount an employee may have paid for the shares), determined on the date of grant (without regard to the restrictions). Such income will be subject to income tax withholding and employment taxes at such time. This election is made pursuant to Section 83(b) of the Code and the regulations thereunder. If an employee makes this election, the employee's holding period will begin the day after the date of grant, dividends paid on the shares will be subject to the normal rules regarding distributions on stock, and no additional income will be recognized by the employee upon the lapse of the restrictions. However, if the employee forfeits the restricted shares before the restrictions lapse, no deduction or capital loss will be available to the employee (even though the employee previously recognized income with respect to such forfeited shares).
 
In the taxable year in which an employee recognizes ordinary income on account of shares awarded to the employee, the Company generally will be entitled to a deduction equal to the amount of income recognized by the employee. In the event that the restricted shares are forfeited by an employee after having made the Section 83(b) election referred to above, the Company generally will include in our income the amount of our original deduction.
 
Stock Appreciation Rights
 
An employee will not be subject to tax upon the grant of a stock appreciation right. Upon exercise of a stock appreciation right, an amount equal to the cash the fair market value (measured on the date of exercise) of shares receivable by the employee in respect of a stock appreciation right will be taxable to the employee as ordinary income, and such amount generally will be deductible by the Company. This amount of income will be subject to income tax withholding and employment taxes. An employee's basis in any shares received will be equal to the fair market value of such shares on the date of exercise, and an employee's holding period in such shares will begin on the day following the date of exercise.
and/or
 
Restricted Stock Units
 
An employee will not be subject to tax upon the grant of a restricted stock unit. Upon vesting of a restricted stock unit, the fair market value of the shares covered by the award on the vesting date will be subject to employment taxes. Upon distribution of the cash shares underlying a restricted stock unit, an employee will recognize as ordinary income an amount equal to the cash fair market value (measured on the Distribution date) of the shares received, and such amount will generally be deductible by the Company. This amount of income will generally be subject to income tax withholding on the date of Distribution. An employee's basis in any shares received will be equal to the fair market value of the shares on the date of Distribution, and an employee's holding period in such shares will begin on the date of distribution. If any dividend equivalent amounts are paid to an employee, they will be includible in the employee's income as additional compensation (and not as dividend income) and will be subject to income and employment tax withholding.
and/or
and/or
Table of Contents
Disposition of Shares
 
Unless stated otherwise above, upon the subsequent disposition of shares acquired under any of the preceding awards, an employee will recognize capital gain or loss based upon the difference between the amount realized on such disposition and the employee's basis in the shares, and such amount will be long-term capital gain or loss if such shares were held for more than 12 months. Currently, capital gain is generally taxed at a maximum rate of 15% if the property is held more than one year.
 
Section 162(m) Deductibility Rules
 
The Company generally is not entitled to a tax deduction with respect to any amount that represents compensation in excess of $1 million paid to "covered employees" that is not "qualified performance-based compensation" under Section 162(m) of the Code. To the extent possible, the Company intends to utilize the benefits of certain transition rules under Section 162(m) to insure the deductibility of compensation in excess of $1 million.
 
Our Stock Plan for Non-Employee Directors
 
Prior to the Distribution, we will adopt a Stock Plan for Non-Employee Directors (the "Director Stock Plan"), subject to the approval of CSC Holdings as our sole stockholder at such time.
 
A form of the Director Stock Plan has been filed as an exhibit to the registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part, and the following description of the Director Stock Plan is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Director Stock Plan as so filed.
 
Overview
 
We believe that the Company's ability to attract and retain capable persons as non-employee directors will be enhanced if it can provide its non-employee directors with equity-based awards and that the Company will benefit from encouraging a sense of proprietorship of such persons stimulating the active interest of such persons in the development and financial success of the Company. The Director Stock Plan provides for potential grants of non-qualified stock options, restricted stock units and other equity-based awards (collectively, "Director Awards"). The Director Stock Plan will terminate, and no more Director Awards will be granted, after ten years from the effective date of the plan (unless sooner terminated by our Board of Directors or our Compensation Committee). The termination of the Director Stock Plan will not affect previously granted Director Awards.
 
Shares Subject to the Director Stock Plan; Other Limitations
 
The Director Stock Plan will be administered by the Company's Compensation Committee. However, Cablevision's compensation committee will be authorized to grant Awards under the Director Stock Plan with respect to outstanding equity awards of Cablevision in connection with the Distribution. Such Awards may include options with exercise prices that are less than the fair market value of the underlying shares in order to preserve the intrinsic value of the outstanding Cablevision equity awards prior to the Distribution. Director Awards may be granted under the Director Stock Plan to members of the Board of Directors who are not current employees of the Company or its subsidiaries as the Compensation Committee may determine. Immediately following the Distribution, there will be 11 non-employee directors who will be eligible to participate in the Director Stock Plan. In addition, non-employee directors of Cablevision will receive grants under the Director Stock Plan in connection with the Distribution in respect of their outstanding awards issued by Cablevision. The total number of shares of the Company's Class A Common Stock that may be issued pursuant to Director Awards under the Director Stock Plan may not exceed an aggregate of 165,000, which may be either treasury shares or authorized and unissued shares. To the extent that (i) a Director Award is paid, settled or exchanged or expires, lapses, terminates or is cancelled for any reason without the issuance of shares or (ii) any shares under a Director Award are not issued because of payment or withholding obligations, then the Compensation Committee may also grant Director Awards with respect to such shares. Director Awards payable only in cash or property other than shares do not reduce the aggregate remaining number of shares with respect to which Director Awards may be made under the Director Stock Plan and shares relating to any other Director Awards that are settled in cash or property other than shares, when settled, will be added back to the aggregate remaining number of shares with respect to which Director Awards may be made under the Director Stock Plan.
Table of Contents
Any shares underlying Awards that the Company becomes obligated to make through the assumption of, or in substitution for, outstanding awards previously granted by an acquired entity shall not count against the shares available to be delivered pursuant to Awards under the Director Stock Plan. In the event that any dividend or other distribution (whether in the form of cash, shares, other securities, or other property), recapitalization, forward or reverse stock split, reorganization, merger, consolidation, spin-off, combination, repurchase, share exchange, liquidation, dissolution or other similar corporate transaction or event affects shares such that the failure to make an adjustment to a Director Award would not fairly protect the rights represented by the Director Award in accordance with the essential intent and principles thereof (each such event, a "Director Stock Plan Adjustment Event"), then the Compensation Committee will, in such manner as it may determine to be equitable in its sole discretion, adjust any or all of the terms of an outstanding Director Award (including, without limitation, the number of shares covered by such outstanding Director Award, the type of property to which the Director Award is subject and the exercise price of such Director Award).
 
As a result of the Distribution, options with respect to approximately 19,900 shares of the Company's Class A Common Stock will be issued to directors under the Director Stock Plan with respect to outstanding Cablevision stock options and approximately 61,600 shares of the Company's Class A Common Stock will be issued to Cablevision directors under the Director Stock Plan in connection with Cablevision's outstanding restricted stock units. See "Shares Eligible for Future Sale  Non-Employee Director Stock Awards" and " Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards."
 
Director Awards
 
Under the Director Stock Plan, the Company may grant options to participants. The options will be exercisable at a price determined by the Compensation Committee on the date of the Director Award grant, which price will be no less than the fair market value of a share of Class A Common Stock on the date the option is granted, and will otherwise be subject to such terms and conditions as specified by the Compensation Committee, provided that, unless determined otherwise by the Compensation Committee, such options will be fully vested and exercisable on the date of grant. Each option granted pursuant to the Director Stock Plan will terminate upon the earlier to occur of (i) the expiration of ten years following the date upon which the option is granted and (ii) a period fixed by the Compensation Committee in the award agreement, however, an award agreement may provide that in the event that a participant dies while an option is exercisable, the option will remain exercisable by the participant's estate or beneficiary only until the first anniversary of the participant's date of death and whether or not such first anniversary occurs prior to or following the expiration of the relevant period referred to above. Upon its exercise, an option may be settled, in the Compensation Committee's discretion, for an amount equal to the excess of the fair market value of a share of Class A Common Stock on the date of exercise over the exercise price of the option.
 
The Company may also grant restricted stock units to participants. A restricted stock unit is an unfunded, unsecured right to receive a share of Class A Common Stock (or cash or other property) at a future date upon the satisfaction of the conditions specified by the Compensation Committee in the award agreement. Unless otherwise provided by the Compensation Committee, such restricted stock units will be fully vested on the date of grant and will also carry a dividend equivalent right representing an unfunded and unsecured promise to pay to the relevant participant an amount equal to the ordinary cash dividends that would have been paid upon any share underlying a restricted stock unit had such shares been issued. If a restricted stock unit is not fully vested at the date of grant, the dividend equivalent right will not apply until such restricted stock unit is vested.
 
The Compensation Committee may grant other equity-based or equity-related awards to non-employee directors subject to terms and conditions it may specify. These awards may entail the transfer of shares or payment in cash based on the value of shares.
 
Amendment; Termination
 
The Board of Directors or the Compensation Committee may discontinue the Director Stock Plan at any time and from time to time may amend or revise the terms of the Director Stock Plan or any award agreement, as permitted by applicable law, except that it may not (a) make any amendment or revision in a manner unfavorable to a participant (other than if immaterial), without the consent of the participant or (b) make any amendment or revision without the approval of the stockholders of the Company if such
Table of Contents
approval is required by the rules of NASDAQ. Consent of the participant will not be required solely pursuant to the previous sentence in respect of any adjustment made in light of a Director Stock Plan Adjustment Event, except to the extent the terms of an award agreement expressly refer to a Director Stock Plan Adjustment Event, in which case such terms will not be amended in a manner unfavorable to a participant (other than if immaterial) without such participant's consent.
 
U.S. Federal Tax Implications of Options and Restricted Stock Units Under the Director Stock Plan
 
The following summary generally describes the principal Federal (but not state and local) income tax consequences of the issuance and exercise of options and restricted stock units under the Director Stock Plan. It is general in nature and is not intended to cover all tax consequences that may apply to a particular participant or the Company. The provisions of the Code and the regulations thereunder relating to these matters are complex and subject to change and their impact in any one case may depend upon the particular circumstances.
 
A non-employee director will not realize any income, and the Company will not be entitled to a deduction, at the time that a stock option is granted under the Director Stock Plan. Upon exercising an option, a non-employee director will realize ordinary income (not as capital gain), and the Company will be entitled to a corresponding deduction, in an amount equal to the fair market value on the exercise date of the shares subject to the option over the exercise price of the option. The non-employee director will have a basis in the shares received as a result of the exercise, for purposes of computing capital gain or loss, equal to the fair market value of those shares on the exercise date and the non-employee director's holding period in the shares received will commence on the day after the date of exercise. If an option is settled by the Company in cash, shares or a combination thereof, the non-employee directors will recognize ordinary income at the time of settlement equal to the fair market value of such cash, shares or combination thereof, and the Company will be entitled to a corresponding deduction.
 
A non-employee director will not realize any income, and the Company will not be entitled to a deduction, at the time that a restricted stock unit is granted under the Director Stock Plan. Upon payment or settlement of a restricted stock unit award in Class A Common Stock or cash, the non-employee director will recognize ordinary income, and the Company will be entitled to a corresponding deduction, equal to the fair market value of any Class A Common Stock or cash received.
 
Our Cash Incentive Plan
 
Prior to the Distribution, we will adopt a Cash Incentive Plan (the "CIP"), subject to the approval of CSC Holdings as our sole stockholder at such time.
 
A form of the CIP has been filed as an exhibit to the registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part, and the following description of the CIP is qualified in its entirety by reference to the CIP as so filed.
 
Overview
 
The purposes of the CIP are (i) to advance the interest of the Company and its stockholders by providing a means to motivate the employees of the Company and its affiliates, upon whose judgment, initiative and efforts the continued success, growth and development of the Company is dependent; (ii) to link the rewards of the employees of the Company and its affiliates to the achievement of specific performance objectives and goals when so desired; (iii) to assist the Company and its affiliates in maintaining a competitive total compensation program that serves to attract and retain the most highly qualified individuals; and (iv) to permit the grant and payment of awards that are deductible to the Company pursuant to Section 162(m) of the Code when so desired. The CIP provides for cash awards. No awards shall be made under this Plan after the five-year anniversary of the Distribution.
 
As a result of the Distribution, performance awards will be issued under the CIP with substantially identical terms and our performance objectives in respect of outstanding Cablevision performance awards previously issued to employees of the Company and Cablevision. See " Compensation Discussion and Analysis  Cablevision Elements of In-Service Compensation  Performance Awards" and " Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards."
Table of Contents
CIP Awards
 
The Plan will be administered by the Company's Compensation Committee. Awards may be granted under the CIP to such employees of the Company or an affiliate of the Company, as the Compensation Committee may determine. An "affiliate" is defined in the CIP to mean any entity controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the Company or any other affiliate and also includes any entity in which the Company owns at least five percent of the outstanding equity interests. The CIP provides for two types of cash awards: Long-Term Incentive Awards and Annual Incentive Awards. Long-Term Incentive Awards may be subject to such terms and conditions (including the performance criteria described below) as the Compensation Committee determines; however, no Long-Term Incentive Award will cover a period of more than ten years. In no event may any covered employee be granted Long-Term Incentive Awards that are intended to satisfy the requirements of Section 162(m) in any fiscal year of the Company exceeding in the aggregate $10 million. Annual Incentive Awards may also be subject to such terms and conditions (including the performance criteria described below) as the Compensation Committee determines. In no event may any covered employee be granted Annual Incentive Awards that are intended to satisfy the requirements of Section 162(m) in any fiscal year of the Company exceeding in the aggregate $10 million.
 
The Compensation Committee may establish one or more conditions which must be satisfied in order for an employee to be entitled to an award under the CIP. The CIP specifies that, to the extent that an award under the CIP is intended to qualify for deductibility under Section 162(m), the payment of the award will be conditioned on the satisfaction of one or more of the performance criteria listed below over a period or periods selected by the Compensation Committee. The performance criteria may be determined by reference to the performance of the Company, an affiliate or a business unit, program, production, network or service thereof or any combination of the foregoing. Such criteria may also be measured on a per customer, subscriber, sponsor, viewer (or available viewer), basic or diluted share basis or any combination of the foregoing and may reflect absolute performance, incremental performance or comparative performance to other companies (or their products or services) determined on a gross, net, GAAP or non-GAAP basis, with respect to one or more of the following: (i) net or operating income or other measures of profit; (ii) measures of revenue; (iii) earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA); (iv) cash flow, free cash flow, adjusted operating cash flow and similar measures; (v) return on equity, investment, assets or capital; (vi) gross or operating margins or savings; (vii) performance relative to budget, forecast or market expectations; (viii) market share or penetration, subscriber or customer acquisition or retention, ratings or viewership; (ix) operating metrics relating to sales, subscriptions or customer service or satisfaction; (x) capital spending management or product or service deployments; (xi) achievement of strategic business objectives such as acquisitions, dispositions or investments; (xii) a specified increase in the fair market value of the Company's Class A Common Stock; (xiii) a specified increase in the private market value of the Company; (xiv) the price of the Company's Class A Common Stock; (xv) earnings per share; and/or (xvi) total shareholder return.
 
If the Compensation Committee establishes conditions to the entitlement of a Long-Term Incentive Award or Annual Incentive Award for a covered employee relating to the achievement of performance criteria, the Compensation Committee must determine whether the performance criteria have been met with respect to the employee and, if they have, so certify and ascertain the amount of the applicable Long-Term Incentive Award or Annual Incentive Award. No Long-Term Incentive Award or Annual Incentive Award (if contingent on such performance criteria) will be paid until such certification is made by the Compensation Committee.
 
Amendment; Termination
 
The Board of Directors or the Compensation Committee may discontinue the CIP at any time and from time to time may amend or revise the terms of the CIP, as permitted by applicable law, except that it may not amend or revise, in any manner unfavorable to a recipient (other than if immaterial), any Long-Term Incentive Award, without the consent of the recipient of that Long-Term Incentive Award.
 
Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards
 
Cablevision has issued options to purchase, and stock appreciation rights in respect of, its Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock. In connection with the Distribution, each Cablevision option outstanding (whether
Table of Contents
held by a Cablevision employee or our employee) will become two options: one will be an option to acquire Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock and one an option to acquire our Class A Common Stock. Similarly, each Cablevision right outstanding (whether held by a Cablevision employee or our employee) will become a right with respect to Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock and a right with respect to our Class A Common Stock. The options and the rights with respect to our Class A Common Stock will be issued under our Employee Stock Plan. The existing exercise price will be allocated between the existing Cablevision options/rights and our new options/rights based upon the average of the volume weighted average prices ("VWAP") of the Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock and our Class A Common Stock for each trading day in the ten trading-day period immediately following the Distribution, and the underlying share amount will take into account the distribution ratio (i.e., the number of shares of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock in respect of which one share of our Class A Common Stock will be issued). The Cablevision options/rights and our new options/rights will not be exercisable during a period beginning on a date prior to the Distribution determined by Cablevision in its sole discretion, and continuing until the exercise prices of the Cablevision options/rights and our new options/rights are determined after the Distribution, or such longer period as Cablevision or we determine is necessary with respect to our and Cablevision's respective awards. Other than the split of the Cablevision options and rights and the allocation of the existing exercise price, upon issuance of our new options and rights there will be no additional adjustment to the existing Cablevision options and rights in connection with the Distribution and the terms of each employee's applicable Cablevision award agreement will continue to govern the Cablevision options and rights. The options and rights that we issue in respect of outstanding Cablevision stock options and rights will be affected by a change in control or going private transaction of the Company or Cablevision, as set forth in the terms of the award agreement.
 
Cablevision has issued restricted stock to its employees which vests according to a vesting schedule that was established when the shares were issued. In connection with the Distribution, and except as described in the next paragraph, each holder of Cablevision restricted shares will receive one share of our Class A Common Stock in respect of every four Cablevision restricted shares. Our shares will be subject to the same conditions and restrictions as the Cablevision restricted shares in respect of which they are issued. Following the Distribution, if a holder of Cablevision restricted stock forfeits such restricted stock and therefore forfeits our accompanying shares, Cablevision has agreed that our restricted shares will be returned to us.
 
Cablevision restricted share awards made in 2011 to persons who, on the date of Distribution, remain our employees will be cancelled, and such employees will be granted equivalent replacement restricted share awards with respect to our Class A Common Stock. The replacement award will cover a number of restricted shares of our Class A Common Stock with a value equal to the value of Cablevision shares covered by the cancelled award, rounded down to the nearest share. The value of our Class A Common Stock and the Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock for this purpose will be based upon the average of the VWAPs of the Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock and our Class A Common Stock, respectively, for each trading day in the ten trading-day period immediately following the Distribution. Cablevision restricted share awards issued in 2011 to persons who transfer from Cablevision to us within 365 days of the Distribution will be cancelled and such employees will be granted equivalent replacement restricted share awards with respect to our Class A Common Stock, based upon the average of the VWAPs of the Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock and our Class A Common Stock, respectively, for each trading day in the ten trading-day period immediately following the date of transfer. Our shares will be subject to substantially equivalent conditions and restrictions as the Cablevision restricted shares they replace. Cablevision's restricted share awards granted in 2011 to our executive officers whose compensation is potentially subject to Section 162(m) of the Code provide that the vesting of such grants will be subject to meeting certain Company-based performance criteria, as specified in the award agreement.
 
Cablevision has issued restricted stock units to its non-employee directors which represent unfunded, unsecured rights to receive shares of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock (or cash or other property) at a future date upon the satisfaction of the conditions specified by the Compensation Committee in the award agreement. Such restricted stock units were fully vested on the date of grant. In connection with the Distribution, each holder of a restricted stock unit will receive one share of our Class A Common Stock in respect of every four Cablevision restricted stock units owned on the record date upon the Distribution and continue to be entitled to a share of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock (or cash or other property) in accordance with the award agreement. Such shares of Class A Common Stock will be issued
Table of Contents
under our Director Stock Plan. Cablevision has issued to its non-employee directors options to purchase its Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock, and such options are fully vested. In connection with the Distribution, each Cablevision option will become two options: one will be an option to acquire Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock and one an option to acquire our Class A Common Stock. The allocation of exercise price between the existing non-employee director Cablevision options and our new non-employee director options and the number of shares subject to those new options will be determined in the same manner as described above for our options/rights to be issued under our Employee Stock Plan at the time of the Distribution.
 
As a result of the Distribution, there will be outstanding options to acquire approximately 1,745,900 shares of our Class A Common Stock and stock appreciation rights with respect to approximately 28,000 shares of our Class A Common Stock, most of which will be held by employees of Cablevision and its affiliates other than us. In addition, approximately 2,200,000 shares of our Class A Common Stock will be distributed by Cablevision in respect of outstanding Cablevision restricted shares, most of which will be to employees of Cablevision and its affiliates other than us. In addition, as a result of the Distribution, restricted shares of the Company's Class A Common Stock will be issued under the Employee Stock Plan in respect of Cablevision restricted shares granted in 2011 to employees of the Company that will be automatically cancelled and converted into shares of our restricted Class A Common Stock. The number of shares we will issue will be based upon a pricing period for the Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock and our Class A Common Stock following the Distribution, as described above.
ten-day
 
Since 2008, Cablevision has made annual grants of three-year performance awards to executives and certain other members of management of the Company under Cablevision's 2006 CIP. To the extent required by the terms of the applicable award agreement, the performance objectives in an employee's award agreement will be adjusted to reflect the exclusion of our business from the business of Cablevision.
 
The performance awards made in 2011 to holders who are our employees immediately following the Distribution, or who transfer from Cablevision to us within 365 days of the Distribution, will be cancelled and such employees will be granted awards under the CIP having substantially similar terms, including an identical target amount, as the Cablevision performance awards they replace, other than the fact that performance will be measured based on our performance (instead of Cablevision performance).
 
Deferred compensation awards granted by Cablevision pursuant to Cablevision's Long-Term Incentive Plan (which was superseded by Cablevision's 2006 CIP) will be unaffected by the Distribution.
 
With respect to outstanding long-term cash and equity awards, the Company and Cablevision will not be regarded as competitive entities of each other for purposes of any non-compete provisions contained in the applicable award agreements. With respect to all outstanding Cablevision awards (and our options and stock appreciation rights issued in connection with such awards) holders of such awards will continue to vest in them so long as they remain employed by the Company, Cablevision or affiliates of either entity, provided that an employee who moves between the Company or one of its subsidiaries, on the one hand, and Cablevision or one of its subsidiaries, on the other hand, at a time when the two entities are no longer affiliates will not continue to vest in our awards and such change will constitute a termination of employment for purposes of the award agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Mr. Dolan will continue to vest in his outstanding Cablevision awards (as well as in Company stock options and stock appreciation rights issued upon the Distribution with respect to such outstanding Cablevision awards) based solely on his continued service with Cablevision and not in respect of his continued service with the Company.
 
We will not be responsible for any payments associated with any annual, long-term cash or deferred compensation award granted by Cablevision to Mr. Dolan that is outstanding as of the Distribution. Payment of such awards will be the sole responsibility of Cablevision. Payments of any annual, long-term cash or deferred compensation awards granted to Messrs. Sapan, Carroll, Sullivan and Gallagher will continue to be the responsibility of the Company.
 
The performance awards, deferred compensation awards and stock appreciation rights applicable to our employees will be assigned by Cablevision to us and will be assumed by us.
Table of Contents
 
 
Financing Transactions in Connection with the Distribution
 
As part of the Distribution, we will issue an aggregate of $2,425,000,000 in new senior secured and senior unsecured debt of the Company. This indebtedness will consist of:
 
 
We refer to the senior secured term loans and the senior notes as the New AMC Networks Debt.
 
Cablevision Debt Exchange
 
A portion of the proceeds of the New AMC Networks Debt will be used to repay all outstanding Company debt (including debt of RNS but excluding capital leases) and approximately $1,275,000,000 of the New AMC Networks Debt will be issued to CSC Holdings, which will use such New AMC Networks Debt to satisfy and discharge outstanding Cablevision or CSC Holdings debt.
 
CSC Holdings will accomplish such satisfaction and discharge of the outstanding debt by entering into a transaction with the Exchange Entities, whereby CSC Holdings will exchange a portion of the New AMC Networks Debt for outstanding Cablevision or CSC Holdings debt, a substantial portion of which will have been acquired from Cablevision's lenders by the Exchange Entities for this purpose. Following the exchange, we expect that affiliates of the Exchange Entities, in an unrelated transaction, will syndicate our senior secured term loans to several lenders and distribute our senior unsecured notes in an exempt offering.
 
Senior Secured Credit Facilities
 
In connection with the Distribution, we expect to enter into new credit facilities that will provide for an aggregate amount of approximately $2,425,000,000 in financing, consisting of the following:
 
 
We refer to the revolving credit facility and the term loan facilities collectively as the senior secured credit facilities.
 
We will describe the terms and covenants of the senior secured credit facilities in a Current Report on after we enter into definitive agreements relating thereto. We expect that the revolving credit facility will be available for working capital and for general corporate purposes. The revolving credit facility will be undrawn on the Distribution date.
Form 8-K
 
Senior Notes
 
In connection with the Distribution, we will issue $700,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of senior notes, under an indenture between us and U.S. Bank, National Association, as Trustee, dated as of the Distribution date.
 
We will describe the terms and covenants of the senior notes in a Current Report on after we enter into definitive agreements relating thereto.
Form 8-K
Table of Contents
 
 
Relationship Between Cablevision and Us After the Distribution
 
Following the Distribution, we will be a separate, stand-alone public company and Cablevision will have no continuing common stock ownership interest in us. As described under "The Distribution  Results of the Distribution," both Cablevision and we will be under the control of Charles F. Dolan, members of his family and certain related family entities immediately following the Distribution. See "Unaudited Pro Forma Consolidated Financial Information" and Note 12 of "Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements" for information concerning historical intercompany payments between us and Cablevision.
 
For purposes of governing the ongoing relationships between Cablevision and us after the Distribution and to provide for an orderly transition, Cablevision and we have entered or will enter into the agreements described in this section prior to the Distribution.
 
Certain of the agreements summarized in this section have been included as exhibits to the registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part, and the following summaries of those agreements are qualified in their entirety by reference to the agreements.
 
Distribution Agreement
 
We have entered into the Distribution Agreement with Cablevision and CSC Holdings as part of a series of transactions pursuant to which we have received or will receive prior to the Distribution all of the limited liability company interests in RMH, the wholly-owned indirect subsidiary of Cablevision through which Cablevision has historically conducted the AMC Networks business. The Distribution Agreement has been filed as an exhibit to the registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part, and the following description of the Distribution Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Distribution Agreement as so filed.
 
Under the Distribution Agreement, Cablevision will distribute our common stock to its common stockholders.
 
As part of the Distribution, we will incur approximately $2,425,000,000 of New AMC Networks Debt, consisting of $1,725,000,000 aggregate principal amount of senior secured term loans and $700,000,000 aggregate principal amount of senior unsecured notes. A portion of the proceeds of the New AMC Networks Debt will be used to repay all outstanding Company debt (excluding capital leases) and approximately $1,275,000,000 of the New AMC Networks Debt will be issued to CSC Holdings, which will use such New AMC Networks Debt to satisfy and discharge outstanding Cablevision or CSC Holdings debt.
 
CSC Holdings will accomplish such satisfaction and discharge of the outstanding debt by entering into a transaction with the Exchange Entities, whereby Cablevision or CSC Holdings will exchange a portion of the New AMC Networks Debt for outstanding Cablevision or CSC Holdings debt, a substantial portion of which will have been acquired from Cablevision's lenders by the Exchange Entities for this purpose. Following the exchange, we expect that affiliates of the Exchange Entities, in an unrelated transaction, will syndicate our senior secured term loans to several lenders and distribute our senior unsecured notes in an exempt offering. We refer to these transactions as the "Financing Transactions." See "Description of Financing Transactions and Certain Indebtedness."
 
Under the Distribution Agreement, Cablevision provides us with indemnities with respect to liabilities, damages, costs and expenses arising out of any of (i) Cablevision's businesses (other than businesses of ours); (ii) certain identified claims or proceedings; (iii) any breach by Cablevision of its obligations under the Distribution Agreement; and (iv) any untrue statement or omission in the Registration Statement or the Information Statement relating to Cablevision and its subsidiaries. We will provide Cablevision with indemnities with respect to liabilities, damages, costs and expenses arising out of any of (i) our businesses; (ii) any breach by the Company of its obligations under the Distribution Agreement; and (iii) any untrue statement or omission in the Registration Statement or Information Statement other than any such statement or omission relating to Cablevision and its subsidiaries.
Table of Contents
In the Distribution Agreement we release Cablevision from any claims we might have arising out of:
 
 
The Distribution Agreement also provides that Cablevision will have the sole and absolute discretion to determine whether to proceed with the Distribution, including the form, structure and terms of any transactions to effect the Distribution and the timing of and satisfaction of conditions to the consummation of the Distribution.
 
The Distribution Agreement also provides for access to records and information, cooperation in defending litigation, as well as methods of resolution for certain disputes.
 
Contribution Agreement
 
As part of the series of transactions described above under " Distribution Agreement," we have entered into a Contribution Agreement with Cablevision and CSC Holdings pursuant to which CSC Holdings contributed to us, on the effective date of the Contribution Agreement, 100% of the limited liability company interests in RMH. In consideration of this contribution, we (i) issued, on the effective date of the Contribution Agreement, shares of our common stock to CSC Holdings and (ii) will issue, on the Distribution date, approximately $1,275,000,000 of New AMC Networks Debt to Cablevision or CSC Holdings. The Contribution Agreement does not provide for any ongoing obligations for any party following the Distribution.
 
Financing Arrangements
 
In connection with the Financing Transactions, we have entered or will enter into various agreements with CSC Holdings relating to the issuance of our debt and the subsequent exchange of that debt in satisfaction of outstanding debt of Cablevision or CSC Holdings. See "Description of Financing Transactions and Certain Indebtedness  Financing Transactions in Connection with the Distribution  Cablevision Debt Exchange."
 
Transition Services Agreement
 
We have entered into a Transition Services Agreement with Cablevision under which, in exchange for the fees specified in such agreement, Cablevision has agreed to provide transition services with regard to such areas as tax, information systems, risk management and employee services, compensation and benefits. Under the Transition Services Agreement, we will also provide certain services to MSG on behalf of Cablevision in connection with the MSG Distribution. A form of the Transition Services Agreement has been filed as an exhibit to the registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part, and the following description of the Transition Services Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Transition Services Agreement as so filed.
 
We have agreed to provide transition services to Cablevision with regard to our information technology systems that we and Cablevision may share. The Company and Cablevision, as parties receiving services under the agreement, agree to indemnify the party providing services for losses incurred by such party that arise out of or are otherwise in connection with the provision by such party of services under the agreement, except to the extent that such losses result from the providing party's gross negligence, willful misconduct or breach of its obligations under the agreement. Similarly, each party providing services under the agreement agrees to indemnify the party receiving services for losses incurred by such party that arise out of or are otherwise in connection with the indemnifying party's provision of services under the agreement if such losses result from the providing party's gross negligence, willful misconduct or breach of its obligations under the agreement. We believe that the terms
Table of Contents
and conditions of the Transition Services Agreement are as favorable to us as those available from unrelated parties for a comparable arrangement.
 
Tax Disaffiliation Agreement
 
We have entered into a Tax Disaffiliation Agreement with Cablevision that governs Cablevision's and our respective rights, responsibilities and obligations with respect to taxes and tax benefits, the filing of tax returns, the control of audits and other tax matters. The Tax Disaffiliation Agreement has been filed as an exhibit to the registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part, and the following description of the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement as so filed. References in this summary description of the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement to the terms "tax" or "taxes" mean taxes as well as any interest, penalties, additions to tax or additional amounts in respect of such taxes.
 
We and our eligible subsidiaries currently join with Cablevision in the filing of a consolidated return for U.S. federal income tax purposes and also join with Cablevision in the filing of certain consolidated, combined, and unitary returns for state, local, and other applicable tax purposes. However, for periods (or portions thereof) beginning after the Distribution, we generally will not join with Cablevision in the filing of any federal, state, local or other applicable consolidated, combined or unitary tax returns.
 
Under the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement, with certain exceptions, Cablevision will generally be responsible for all of our U.S. federal, state, local and other applicable income taxes for any taxable period or portion of such period ending on or before the Distribution date. With certain exceptions, we will generally be responsible for all other taxes (including certain New York City income taxes) for all taxable periods ending on or before the Distribution date, and all taxes that are attributable to us or one of our subsidiaries after the Distribution date.
 
Notwithstanding the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement, under U.S. Treasury Regulations, each member of a consolidated group is severally liable for the U.S. federal income tax liability of each other member of the consolidated group. Accordingly, with respect to periods in which we have been included in Cablevision's consolidated group, we could be liable to the U.S. government for any U.S. federal income tax liability incurred, but not discharged, by any other member of such consolidated group. However, if any such liability were imposed, we would generally be entitled to be indemnified by Cablevision for tax liabilities allocated to Cablevision under the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement.
 
We will be responsible for filing all tax returns for any period ending after the Distribution date that include us or one of our subsidiaries other than any consolidated, combined or unitary income tax return for periods after such date (if any) that includes us or one of our subsidiaries, on the one hand, and Cablevision or one of its subsidiaries (other than us or any of our subsidiaries), on the other hand. Where possible, we have waived the right to carry back any losses, credits, or similar items to periods ending prior to or on the Distribution date, however, if we cannot waive the right, we would be entitled to receive the resulting refund or credit, net of any taxes incurred by Cablevision with respect to the refund or credit.
 
Generally, we will have the authority to conduct all tax proceedings, including tax audits, relating to taxes or any adjustment to taxes for which we are responsible for filing a return under the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement, and Cablevision will have the authority to conduct all tax proceedings, including tax audits, relating to taxes or any adjustment to taxes for which Cablevision is responsible for filing a return under the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement. However, if one party acknowledges a liability to indemnify the other party for a tax to which such proceeding relates, and provides evidence to the other party of its ability to make such payment, the first-mentioned party will have the authority to conduct such proceeding. The Tax Disaffiliation Agreement further provides for cooperation between Cablevision and the Company with respect to tax matters, the exchange of information and the retention of records that may affect the tax liabilities of the parties to the agreement.
 
Finally, the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement requires that neither we nor any of our subsidiaries will take, or fail to take, any action where such action, or failure to act, would be inconsistent with or preclude the
Table of Contents
Distribution from qualifying as a tax-free transaction to Cablevision and its stockholders under Section 355 of the Code, or would otherwise cause holders of Cablevision stock receiving our stock in the Distribution to be taxed as a result of the Distribution and certain transactions undertaken in connection with the Distribution. Additionally, for the two-year period following the Distribution, we may not engage in certain activities that may jeopardize the tax-free treatment of the Distribution to Cablevision and its stockholders, unless we receive Cablevision's consent or otherwise obtain a ruling from the IRS or a legal opinion, in either case reasonably satisfactory to Cablevision, that the activity will not alter the tax-free status of the Distribution to Cablevision and its stockholders. Such restricted activities include:
 
 
Furthermore, the Tax Disaffiliation Agreement limits our ability to pre-pay, pay down, redeem, retire, or otherwise acquire a portion of the New AMC Networks Debt. Moreover, we must indemnify Cablevision and its subsidiaries, officers and directors for any taxes, resulting from action or failure to act, if such action or failure to act precludes the Distribution from qualifying as a tax-free transaction (including taxes imposed as a result of a violation of the restrictions set forth above).
 
Employee Matters Agreement
 
Upon completion of the Distribution, we will have in place an Employee Matters Agreement with Cablevision that will allocate assets, liabilities and responsibilities with respect to certain employee compensation and benefit plans and programs and certain other related matters. A form of the Employee Matters Agreement has been filed as an exhibit to the registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part, and the following description of the Employee Matters Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Employee Matters Agreement as so filed.
 
In general, our employees currently participate in various Cablevision retirement, health and welfare, and other employee benefit plans. After the Distribution, it is anticipated that our employees will generally participate in similar plans and arrangements established and maintained by the Company; however, we will continue to be a participating company in certain Cablevision employee benefit plans during a transition period. Effective as of the Distribution date, we and Cablevision will each be responsible for our respective employees and compensation plans.
 
For a description of the impact of the Distribution on holders of Cablevision options, restricted stock and other awards, see "Executive Compensation  Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards."
 
Consulting Agreement
 
We have historically paid a management fee pursuant to a consulting agreement between CSC Holdings and certain of our subsidiaries. Cablevision and its subsidiaries will no longer be obligated under that agreement to provide any management services to our subsidiaries. We will terminate the consulting agreement on the Distribution date and will not replace such agreement. We were charged management fees of $26.5 million in 2010.
Table of Contents
AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology Services Agreement
 
AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, a wholly-owned indirect subsidiary of AMC Networks, has entered into services agreements with Madison Square Garden, L.P. and Fuse Networks LLC, for the provision by AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology of certain transponder services and technical support services in connection therewith.
 
Other Arrangements and Agreements with Cablevision
 
The Company has also entered into a number of commercial and technical arrangements and agreements with Cablevision and its subsidiaries, none of which will be material to the Company. These will include arrangements for the Company's use of equipment, offices and other premises, provision of technical and transport services and vendor services, and access to technology. Cablevision is a party to affiliation agreements with each of AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel relating to the carriage of those programming networks on Cablevision's cable systems.
 
See "Business  Legal Proceedings  DISH Network Contract Dispute" for a description of our agreement with Cablevision on the control and funding of, and distribution of any proceeds from, the pending litigation with DISH Network.
 
Equity Administration Agreement
 
Upon completion of the Distribution, we will have in place an Equity Administration Agreement with MSG that will set forth responsibilities and liabilities of the parties regarding vesting, exercise and forfeiture of stock options, stock appreciation rights and restricted shares: (i) of the Company that are held by employees or former employees of MSG; and (ii) of MSG that are held by employees or former employees of the Company.
 
Dolan Family Arrangements
 
Aircraft Arrangements
 
RMH has entered into a Time Sharing Agreement with CSC Transport, Inc. ("CSC Transport"), a subsidiary of Cablevision, pursuant to which CSC Transport leases to RMH on a "time-sharing" basis a Gulfstream Aerospace G-V aircraft and three helicopters. RMH pays CSC Transport an amount equal to the actual non-fuel expenses of each flight it elects to utilize and 200% of the actual fuel usage for such flights, but not exceeding the maximum amount payable under Federal Aviation Administration ("FAA") rules. In calculating the amounts payable under the agreement, RMH and CSC Transport will allocate in good faith the treatment of any flight that is for the benefit of both RMH and Cablevision. The agreement becomes effective as of the Distribution date.
 
RMH has entered into a Time Sharing Agreement with Dolan Family Office, LLC ("DFO LLC"), a company controlled by Charles F. Dolan, the Executive Chairman and a director of the Company. Under this agreement, DFO LLC has agreed to sublease to RMH on a "time sharing" basis, a Gulfstream Aerospace GIV-SP aircraft. The Company pays DFO LLC an amount equal to the actual non-fuel expenses of each flight it elects to utilize and 200% of the actual fuel usage for such flights, but not exceeding the maximum amount payable under FAA rules. The agreement becomes effective as of the Distribution date.
 
RMH has entered into an Aircraft Dry Lease Agreement, effective as of the Distribution date, with New York Aircam Corp., an entity owned by Patrick F. Dolan, a director of the Company, pursuant to which RMH may lease a Cessna aircraft owned by that entity at a cost of $650 per hour plus the actual costs of operating the aircraft during the lease periods. RMH is also responsible for obtaining and paying the cost of the flight crew to operate the aircraft. RMH and CSC Transport have also entered into an Aircraft Management Agreement, pursuant to which CSC Transport has agreed to provide pilots and certain other services in connection with the use by RMH of the Cessna aircraft leased by it under the dry lease with New York Aircam Corp. The agreement provides for a fee of $100 per month in addition to reimbursement of certain expenses incurred by CSC Transport in connection with the provision of services thereunder.
Table of Contents
Each of the foregoing agreements has been included as an exhibit to the registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part, and the foregoing summaries are qualified in their entirety by reference to the agreements as so filed.
 
In addition, from time to time, certain other services of the Company may be made available to members of the Dolan family and to entities owned by them. It is the policy of the Company to receive reimbursement for the costs of these services. There were no reimbursements in 2010.
 
See "Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters" for a description of registration rights agreements among Dolan family interests and the Company.
 
Certain Relationships and Potential Conflicts of Interest
 
Following the Distribution, there will be an overlap between the senior management of the Company and Cablevision. Charles F. Dolan will serve as the Executive Chairman of the Company and as the Chairman of Cablevision. In addition, immediately following the Distribution, eight of the members of our Board of Directors will also serve as directors of Cablevision MSG concurrently with their service on our Board of Directors. Therefore, these directors may have actual or apparent conflicts of interest with respect to matters involving or affecting each company. For example there will be the potential for a conflict of interest when we, Cablevision or MSG consider certain acquisitions and other corporate opportunities that may be suitable for us and either or both of them. Also, conflicts may arise if there are issues or disputes under the commercial arrangements that will exist between Cablevision or MSG and us. See "Description of Capital Stock  Certain Corporate Opportunities and Conflicts." In addition, after the Distribution, certain of our officers and directors will continue to own Cablevision and MSG stock and options to purchase Cablevision or MSG stock, as well as cash performance awards with any payout based on the performance of Cablevision or MSG. These ownership interests could create actual, apparent or potential conflicts of interest when these individuals are faced with decisions that could have different implications for the Company and Cablevision or MSG. See " Related Party Transaction Approval Policy" below for a discussion of certain procedures we will institute to help ameliorate any such potential conflicts that may arise.
and/or
 
The Company's amended and restated certificate of incorporation will acknowledge that the Company may have overlapping directors and officers with Cablevision and its subsidiaries and successors or MSG and its subsidiaries and successors and that the Company may engage in material business transactions with such entities. The Company will renounce its rights to certain business opportunities and the Company's amended and restated certificate of incorporation will provide that in certain circumstances our directors and officers will not have liability to the Company or its stockholders for breach of any fiduciary duty by reason of the fact that any such individual directs a corporate opportunity to Cablevision or any of its subsidiaries or MSG or any of its subsidiaries instead of the Company, or does not refer or communicate information regarding such corporate opportunity to the Company. These provisions in our amended and restated certificate of incorporation will also expressly validate certain contracts, agreements, arrangements and transactions (and amendments, modifications or terminations thereof) between the Company and Cablevision, MSG any of their respective subsidiaries and will provide that, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the actions of the overlapping directors and officers in connection therewith are not breaches of fiduciary duties owed to the Company or its stockholders. See "Description of Capital Stock  Certain Corporate Opportunities and Conflicts." A form of our amended and restated certificate of incorporation has been filed as an exhibit to an amendment to the registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part, and the foregoing description of our amended and restated certificate of incorporation is qualified in its entirety by reference to the amended and restated certificate of incorporation as so filed.
and/or
 
Prior to the Distribution, the members of the Dolan family group have entered into an agreement with the Company in which they will agree that during the period beginning on the Distribution date, the Dolan family group must obtain the prior approval of a majority of the Company's Independent Directors prior to acquiring common stock of the Company through a tender offer that results in members of the Dolan family group owning more than 50% of the total number of outstanding shares of common stock of the Company. For purposes of this agreement, the term "Independent Directors" means the directors of the
12-month
Table of Contents
Company who have been determined by our Board of Directors to be independent directors for purposes of NASDAQ corporate governance standards.
 
Related Party Transaction Approval Policy
 
We have adopted a written policy whereby an Independent Committee of our Board of Directors will review and approve or take such other action as it may deem appropriate with respect to transactions involving the Company and its subsidiaries, on the one hand, and in which any director, officer, greater than 5% stockholder of the Company or any other "related person" as defined in Item 404 of of the SEC ("Item 404") has or will have a direct or indirect material interest. This approval requirement will cover any transaction that meets the related party disclosure requirements of the SEC as set forth in Item 404, which currently apply to transactions (or any series of similar transactions) in which the amount involved exceeds $120,000. To simplify the administration of the approval process under this policy, the Independent Committee may, where appropriate, establish guidelines for certain of those transactions. The policy will not cover decisions on compensation or benefits or the hiring or retention of any person. The hiring or retention of executive officers will be determined by our full Board of Directors. Compensation of executive officers is subject to the approval of our Compensation Committee. This policy also will not cover any pro rata distributions to all Company stockholders, including a pro rata distribution of our Class A Common Stock to holders of our Class A Common Stock and our Class B Common Stock to holders of our Class B Common Stock. No director on an Independent Committee will participate in the consideration of a related party transaction with that director or any related person of that director.
Regulation S-K
 
Following the Distribution, our Board of Directors will also adopt a special approval policy for transactions with Cablevision and its subsidiaries or with MSG and its subsidiaries (collectively, the "Other Company") whether or not such transactions qualify as "related party" transactions described above. Under this policy, the Independent Committee will oversee approval of all transactions and arrangements between the Company and its subsidiaries, on the one hand, and the Other Company, on the other hand, in which the amount exceeds the dollar threshold set forth in Item 404 (currently $120,000). To simplify the administration of the approval process under this policy, the Independent Committee may, where appropriate, establish guidelines for certain of these transactions. The approval requirement will not apply to the implementation and administration of these intercompany arrangements under the related party transaction approval policy but will cover any amendments, modifications, terminations or extensions, other than ministerial, nonsubstantive amendments or modifications, as well as the handling and resolution of any disputes. Our executive officers and directors who are also senior executives or directors of the Other Company may participate in the negotiation, execution, implementation, amendment, modification, or termination of these intercompany arrangements, as well as in any resolution of disputes thereunder, on behalf of either or both of the Company and the Other Company, in each case under the direction of an Independent Committee or the comparable committee of the board of directors of the Other Company.
 
Our related party transaction approval policy cannot be amended or terminated without the prior approval of a majority of the independent directors and by a majority of the directors elected by our Class B Common Stockholders. For purposes of this policy, "independent directors" means those directors who have been determined by our Board to be independent directors for purposes of NASDAQ corporate governance standards.
Table of Contents
 
 
Beneficial Ownership of Stock
 
This table shows the number and percentage of shares of our Class A common stock and our Class B common stock that will be owned of record and beneficially at the time of the Distribution by each director and each named executive officer of the Company named in the summary compensation table. The table also shows the name, address and the number and percentage of shares owned by persons beneficially owning more than five (5%) percent of any class at the time of the Distribution. All information in the table is based upon information available to Cablevision as of May 31, 2011 as to the ownership of Cablevision common stock and is presented as if the Distribution has occurred prior to the dates of ownership information used in the table.
 
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
 
 
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
 
 
Charles F. Dolan, members of his family and related family entities, by virtue of their ownership of Class B Common Stock, are able collectively to control stockholder decisions on matters in which holders of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock vote together as a class, and to elect up to 75% of the Company's Board of Directors. In addition, Charles F. Dolan, members of his family and related family entities have entered into a Class B stockholders agreement that has the effect of causing the voting power of these Class B stockholders to be cast as a block on all matters on which the holders of Class B Common Stock are entitled to vote. A purpose of this agreement is to consolidate the Dolan family control of the Company.
 
Charles F. Dolan, all other holders of Class B Common Stock (other than the Charles F. Dolan Children Trusts), the Dolan Children's Foundation, the Dolan Family Foundation and the Company have entered into a registration rights agreement (the "Dolan Registration Rights Agreement"), which will become effective upon consummation of the Distribution. Under this agreement, the Company will provide the parties to the Dolan Registration Rights Agreement (the "Dolan Parties") (and, in certain cases, transferees and pledgees of shares of Class B Common Stock owned by these parties) with certain demand and piggy-back registration rights with respect to their shares of Class A Common Stock (including those issued upon conversion of shares of Class B Common Stock). The Dolan Parties are expected to receive in the Distribution approximately 8.1 million shares of Class B Common Stock (the "Dolan Shares"), which are expected to represent approximately 60% of our Class B Common Stock, as well as approximately 2.0 million shares of Class A Common Stock, which are expected to represent approximately 3% of our Class A Common Stock. Such shares of Class B Common Stock and Class A Common Stock, collectively, are expected to represent approximately 14% of our Common Stock and approximately 43% of the aggregate voting power of our Common Stock.
 
The Charles F. Dolan Children Trusts (the "Children Trusts") and the Company have entered into a registration rights agreement (the "Children Trusts Registration Rights Agreement"), which will become effective upon consummation of the Distribution. Under this agreement, the Company will provide the Children Trusts (and, in certain cases, transferees and pledgees of shares of Class B Common Stock owned by these parties) with certain demand and piggy-back registration rights with respect to their shares of Class A Common Stock (including those issued upon conversion of shares of Class B Common Stock). The Children Trusts are expected to receive in the Distribution approximately 5.5 million shares of Class B Common Stock (the "Children Trust Shares"), which are expected to represent approximately 40% of our Class B Common Stock, as well as approximately 0.3 million shares of Class A Common Stock, which are expected to represent less than 1% of our Class A Common Stock. Such shares of Class B Common Stock and Class A Common Stock, collectively, are expected to represent approximately 8% of our Common Stock and approximately 28% of the aggregate voting power of our Common Stock.
Table of Contents
In the Children Trusts Registration Rights Agreement, each Children Trust agrees that in the case of any sale or disposition of its shares of Class B Common Stock (other than to Charles F. Dolan or other Dolan family interests) by such Children Trust, or of any of the Children Trust Shares by any other Dolan family interest to which such shares of Class B Common Stock are transferred, such stock will be converted to Class A Common Stock. The Dolan Registration Rights Agreement does not include a comparable conversion obligation, and the conversion obligation in the Children Trusts Registration Rights Agreement does not apply to the Dolan Shares.
 
Forms of the Dolan Registration Rights Agreement and the Children Trusts Registration Rights Agreement have been filed as exhibits to the registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part, and the foregoing discussion of those agreements is qualified in its entirety by reference to those agreements so filed.
Table of Contents
 
 
Sales or the availability for sale of substantial amounts of our Class A Common Stock in the public market could adversely affect the prevailing market price for such stock. Upon completion of the Distribution, we will have outstanding an aggregate of approximately 57.9 million shares of our Class A Common Stock and 13.5 million shares of our Class B Common Stock based upon the shares of Cablevision common stock outstanding on May 31, 2011, excluding treasury stock and assuming no exercise of outstanding options. We will also have an additional number of shares of Class A Common Stock outstanding in respect of Cablevision restricted stock granted in 2011 to our employees. See " Employee Stock Awards." All of the shares of Class A Common Stock will be freely tradable without restriction or further registration under the Securities Act unless the shares are owned by our "affiliates" as that term is defined in the rules under the Securities Act. Shares held by "affiliates" may be sold in the public market only if registered or if they qualify for an exemption from registration or in compliance with Rule 144 under the Securities Act, which is summarized below. Further, as described below, we plan to file a registration statement to cover the shares issued under our Employee Stock Plan.
 
Rule 144
 
In general, under Rule 144 as currently in effect, an affiliate would be entitled to sell within any three-month period a number of shares of Class A Common Stock that does not exceed the greater of:
 
 
Sales under Rule 144 are also subject to certain holding period requirements, manner of sale provisions and notice requirements and to the availability of current public information about us.
 
Employee Stock Awards
 
In connection with the Distribution we will issue under our Employee Stock Plan options with respect to approximately 1,745,900 shares of our Class A Common Stock and stock appreciation rights with respect to approximately 28,000 shares of our Class A Common Stock, all in respect of previously outstanding awards by Cablevision. We will also issue additional shares of Class A Common Stock under our Employee Stock Plan in respect of Cablevision restricted stock granted in 2011 to our employees and cancelled in connection with the Distribution, in an amount based on the relative trading prices of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock and our Class A Common Stock during a ten period following the Distribution date. See "Executive Compensation  Treatment of Outstanding Options, Rights, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Other Awards," for a discussion of these issuances under our Employee Stock Plan.
trading-day
 
In addition, we anticipate making other equity-based awards to our employees in the future. We currently expect to file a registration statement under the Securities Act to register shares to be issued under our Employee Stock Plan, including the options, stock appreciation rights and restricted stock that will be granted in connection with the Distribution. Shares covered by such registration statement, other than shares issued to affiliates, generally will be freely tradable without further registration under the Securities Act.
 
Non-Employee Director Stock Awards
 
We also currently expect to file a registration statement under the Securities Act to register shares to be issued under our Director Stock Plan, including the options with respect to approximately 19,900 shares of the Company's Class A Common Stock that will be issued in respect of previously outstanding Cablevision stock options and approximately 61,600 shares of the Company's Class A Common Stock that will be issued in connection with Cablevision's restricted stock units, in each case held by Cablevision directors. These options and shares will be granted, issued and fully vested as of the Distribution date. Shares covered by such registration statement, other than shares issued to affiliates, generally will be freely tradable without further registration under the Securities Act.
Table of Contents
 
Registration Rights Agreements
 
Charles F. Dolan, all other holders of Class B Common Stock (other than the Charles F. Dolan Children Trusts), the Dolan Children's Foundation, the Dolan Family Foundation and the Company have entered into the Dolan Registration Rights Agreement, which will become effective upon consummation of the Distribution. Under this agreement, the Company will provide the Dolan Parties (and, in certain cases, transferees and pledgees of shares of Class B Common Stock owned by these parties) with certain demand and piggy-back registration rights with respect to their shares of Class A Common Stock (including those issued upon conversion of shares of Class B Common Stock). The Dolan Parties are expected to receive in the Distribution approximately 8.1 million shares of Class B Common Stock, which are expected to represent approximately 60% of our Class B Common Stock, as well as approximately 2.0 million shares of Class A Common Stock, which are expected to represent approximately 3% of our Class A Common Stock. Such shares of Class B Common Stock and Class A Common Stock, collectively, are expected to represent approximately 14% of our Common Stock and approximately 43% of the aggregate voting power of our Common Stock.
 
The Children Trusts and the Company have entered into the Children Trusts Registration Rights Agreement, which will become effective upon consummation of the Distribution. Under this agreement, the Company will provide the Children Trusts (and, in certain cases, transferees and pledgees of shares of Class B Common Stock owned by these parties) with certain demand and piggy-back registration rights with respect to their shares of Class A Common Stock (including those issued upon conversion of shares of Class B Common Stock). The Children Trusts are expected to receive in the Distribution approximately 5.5 million shares of Class B Common Stock, which are expected to represent approximately 40% of our Class B Common Stock, as well as approximately 0.3 million shares of Class A Common Stock, which are expected to represent less than 1% of our Class A Common Stock. Such shares of Class B Common Stock and Class A Common Stock, collectively, are expected to represent approximately 8% of our Common Stock and 28% of the aggregate voting power of our Common Stock.
 
Forms of the Dolan Registration Rights Agreement and the Children Trusts Registration Rights Agreement have been filed as exhibits to the registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part, and the foregoing discussion of those agreements is qualified in its entirety by reference to those agreements as so filed.
Table of Contents
 
 
We are currently authorized to issue 10,000 shares of common stock. Prior to the Distribution we will amend our certificate of incorporation to provide authorization for us to issue 495,000,000 shares of capital stock, of which 360,000,000 shares will be Class A Common Stock, par value $.01 per share, 90,000,000 shares will be Class B Common Stock, par value $.01 per share, and 45,000,000 shares will be Preferred Stock, par value $.01 per share. The amended certificate of incorporation will provide that our common stock and preferred stock will have the rights described below.
 
Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock
 
All shares of our common stock currently outstanding are fully paid and non-assessable, not subject to redemption and without preemptive or other rights to subscribe for or purchase any proportionate part of any new or additional issues of stock of any class or of securities convertible into stock of any class.
 
Voting
 
Holders of Class A Common Stock are entitled to one vote per share. Holders of Class B Common Stock are entitled to ten votes per share. All actions submitted to a vote of stockholders are voted on by holders of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock voting together as a single class, except for the election of directors and as otherwise set forth below. With respect to the election of directors, holders of Class A Common Stock will vote together as a separate class and be entitled to elect 25% of the total number of directors constituting the whole Board of Directors and, if such 25% is not a whole number, then the holders of Class A Common Stock, voting together as a separate class, will be entitled to elect the nearest higher whole number of directors that is at least 25% of the total number of directors. Holders of Class B Common Stock, voting together as a separate class, will be entitled to elect the remaining directors.
 
If, however, on the record date for any stockholders meeting at which directors are to be elected, the number of outstanding shares of Class A Common Stock is less than 10% of the total number of outstanding shares of both classes of common stock, the holders of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock will vote together as a single class with respect to the election of directors and the holders of Class A Common Stock will not have the right to elect 25% of the total number of directors but will have one vote per share for all directors and the holders of Class B Common Stock will have ten votes per share for all directors. (On the date of the Distribution, we anticipate that the number of outstanding shares of Class A Common Stock will represent approximately 81% of the total number of outstanding shares of both classes of common stock.)
 
If, on the record date for notice of any stockholders meeting at which directors are to be elected, the number of outstanding shares of Class B Common Stock is less than 12/% of the total number of outstanding shares of both classes of common stock, then the holders of Class A Common Stock, voting as a separate class, would continue to elect a number of directors equal to 25% of the total number of directors constituting the whole Board of Directors and, in addition, would vote together with the holders of Class B Common Stock, as a single class, to elect the remaining directors to be elected at such meeting, with the holders of Class A Common Stock entitled to one vote per share and the holders of Class B Common Stock entitled to ten votes per share.
1
2
 
In addition, under our amended and restated certificate of incorporation, the affirmative vote or consent of the holders of at least 66/% of the outstanding shares of Class B Common Stock, voting separately as a class, is required for the authorization or issuance of any additional shares of Class B Common Stock and for any amendment, alteration or repeal of any provisions of our amended and restated certificate of incorporation which would affect adversely the powers, preferences or rights of the Class B Common Stock. The number of authorized shares of Class A Common Stock may be increased or decreased (but not below the number of shares thereof then outstanding) by the affirmative vote of the holders of the majority of the common stock. Our amended and restated certificate of incorporation does not provide for cumulative voting.
2
3
Table of Contents
Advance Notification of Stockholder Nominations and Proposals
 
Our amended and restated by-laws will establish advance notice procedures with respect to stockholder proposals and nomination of candidates for election as directors other than nominations made by or at the direction of our Board of Directors. In particular, stockholders must notify our corporate secretary in writing prior to the meeting at which the matters are to be acted upon or directors are to be elected. The notice must contain the information specified in our amended and restated by-laws. To be timely, the notice must be received by our corporate secretary not less than 60 or more than 90 days prior to the date of the stockholders' meeting, provided that if the date of the meeting is publicly announced or disclosed less than 70 days prior to the date of the meeting, the notice must be given not more than 10 days after such date is first announced or disclosed.
 
No Stockholder Action by Written Consent
 
Our amended and restated certificate of incorporation will provide that, except as otherwise provided as to any series of preferred stock in the terms of that series, no action of stockholders required or permitted to be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting of stockholders, without prior notice and without a vote, and the power of the stockholders to consent in writing to the taking of any action without a meeting is specifically denied.
 
Conversions
 
The Class A Common Stock has no conversion rights. The Class B Common Stock is convertible into Class A Common Stock in whole or in part at any time and from time to time on the basis of one share of Class A Common Stock for each share of Class B Common Stock. In certain circumstances certain holders of our Class B Common Stock will be required to convert their Class B Common Stock to Class A Common Stock prior to transferring such stock. See "Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters  Beneficial Ownership of Stock."
 
Dividends
 
Holders of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock are entitled to receive dividends equally on a per share basis if and when such dividends are declared by the Board of Directors from funds legally available therefor. No dividend may be declared or paid in cash or property or shares of either Class A Common Stock or Class B Common Stock unless the same dividend is paid simultaneously on each share of the other class of common stock. In the case of any stock dividend, holders of Class A Common Stock are entitled to receive the same dividend on a percentage basis (payable in shares of or securities convertible to shares of Class A Common Stock and other securities of us or any other person) as holders of Class B Common Stock receive (payable in shares of or securities convertible into shares of Class A Common Stock, shares of or securities convertible into shares of Class B Common Stock and other securities of us or any other person). The distribution of shares or other securities of the Company or any other person to common stockholders is permitted to differ to the extent that the common stock differs as to voting rights and rights in connection with certain dividends.
 
Liquidation
 
Holders of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock share with each other on a ratable basis as a single class in the net assets available for distribution in respect of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock in the event of a liquidation.
 
Other Terms
 
Neither the Class A Common Stock nor the Class B Common Stock may be subdivided, consolidated, reclassified or otherwise changed, except as expressly provided in our amended and restated certificate of incorporation, unless the other class of common stock is subdivided, consolidated, reclassified or otherwise changed at the same time, in the same proportion and in the same manner.
Table of Contents
In any merger, consolidation or business combination the consideration to be received per share by holders of either Class A Common Stock or Class B Common Stock must be identical to that received by holders of the other class of common stock, except that in any such transaction in which shares of capital stock are distributed, such shares may differ as to voting rights only to the extent that voting rights differ in our amended and restated certificate of incorporation between Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock.
 
Transfer Agent
 
The transfer agent and registrar for the Class A Common Stock is Wells Fargo Shareowner Services.
 
Preferred Stock
 
Under our amended and restated certificate of incorporation, our Board of Directors will be authorized, without further stockholder action, to provide for the issuance of up to 45,000,000 shares of preferred stock in one or more series. The powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights, and qualifications, limitations or restrictions, including dividend rights, voting rights, conversion rights, terms of redemption and liquidation preferences, of the preferred stock of each series will be fixed or designated by the Board of Directors pursuant to a certificate of designations. There will be no shares of our preferred stock outstanding at the time of the Distribution. Any issuance of preferred stock may adversely affect the rights of holders of our common stock and may render more difficult certain unsolicited or hostile attempts to take over the Company.
 
Certain Corporate Opportunities and Conflicts
 
Our amended and restated certificate of incorporation will recognize that certain directors and officers of the Company (the "Overlap Persons") may serve as directors, officers, employees, consultants and agents of Cablevision and its subsidiaries and successors MSG and its subsidiaries and successors (each of the foregoing is an "Other Entity") and will provide that if a director or officer of the Company who is an Overlap Person is presented or offered, or otherwise acquires knowledge of, a potential transaction or matter that may constitute or present a business opportunity for the Company or any of its subsidiaries, in which the Company or any of its subsidiaries could have an interest or expectancy (any such transaction or matter, and any such actual or potential business opportunity, a "Potential Business Opportunity"), (i) such director or officer will, to the fullest extent permitted by law, have no duty or obligation to refrain from referring such Potential Business Opportunity to any Other Entity and, if such director or officer refers such Potential Business Opportunity to an Other Entity, such director or officer shall have no duty or obligation to refer such Potential Business Opportunity to the Company or to any of its subsidiaries or to give any notice to the Company or to any of its subsidiaries regarding such Potential Business Opportunity (or any matter related thereto), (ii) if such director refers a Potential Business Opportunity to an Other Entity, such director or officer will not be liable to the Company or to any of its subsidiaries, as a director, officer, stockholder or otherwise, for any failure to refer such Potential Business Opportunity to the Company, or for referring such Potential Business Opportunity to any Other Entity, or for any failure to give any notice to the Company regarding such Potential Business Opportunity or any matter relating thereto, (iii) any Other Entity may participate, engage or invest in any such Potential Business Opportunity notwithstanding that such Potential Business Opportunity may have been referred to such Other Entity by an Overlap Person, and (iv) if a director or officer who is an Overlap Person refers a Potential Business Opportunity to an Other Entity, then, as between the Company its subsidiaries on the one hand, and such Other Entity, on the other hand, the Company and its subsidiaries shall be deemed to have renounced any interest, expectancy or right in or to such Potential Business Opportunity or to receive any income or proceeds derived therefrom solely as a result of such director or officer having been presented or offered, or otherwise acquiring knowledge of such Potential Business Opportunity unless in each case referred to in clause (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv), all of the following conditions are satisfied: (A) such Potential Business Opportunity was expressly presented or offered to the director or officer of the Company solely in his or her capacity as a director or officer of the Company; (B) the director or officer believed that the Company possessed, or would reasonably be expected to be able to possess, the resources necessary to exploit such Potential Business Opportunity; and (C) substantially all of
and/or
and/or
Table of Contents
such opportunity, at the time it is presented to the Overlap Person, is, and is expected to remain, an "Independent Film Network;" provided, that the Company or any of its subsidiaries is directly engaged in that business at the time the Potential Business Opportunity is presented or offered to the Overlap Person. For purposes of this provision in our amended and restated certificate of incorporation, an "Independent Film Network" means a nationally distributed cable television network that (i) has at least fifty million viewing subscribers in the United States, (ii) at least 75% of its (x) programming is comprised of and (y) revenues are derived from, independent films and other programming relating to the world of independent film, and (iii) is not targeted to sports fans or music fans (including, without limitation, such network does not feature a material portion of music or sports-related programming). In our amended and restated certificate of incorporation, the Company has renounced to the fullest extent permitted by law, any interest or expectancy in any Potential Business Opportunity that is not a Restricted Potential Business Opportunity. In the event that our Board of Directors declines to pursue a Restricted Potential Business Opportunity, the Overlap Persons are free to refer such Restricted Potential Business Opportunity to an Other Entity.
 
Our amended and restated certificate of incorporation will provide that no contract, agreement, arrangement or transaction (or any amendment, modification or termination thereof) entered into between the Company any of its subsidiaries, on the one hand, and an Other Entity, on the other hand, before the Company ceased to be an indirect, wholly-owned subsidiary of Cablevision shall be void or voidable or be considered unfair to the Company or any of its subsidiaries because an Other Entity is a party thereto, or because any directors, officers or employees of an Other Entity was present at or participated in any meeting of the Board of Directors, or a committee thereof, of the Company or of any subsidiary of the Company, that authorized the contract, agreement, arrangement or transaction (or any amendment, modification or termination thereof), or because his, her or their votes were counted for such purpose. The Company may from time to time enter into and perform, and cause or permit any of its subsidiaries to enter into and perform, one or more contracts, agreements, arrangements or transactions (or amendments, modifications or supplements thereto) with an Other Entity. To the fullest extent permitted by law, no such contract, agreement, arrangement or transaction (nor any such amendments, modifications or supplements), nor the performance thereof by the Company or any subsidiary of the Company or an Other Entity, shall be considered contrary to any fiduciary duty owed to the Company (or to any subsidiary of the Company, or to any stockholder of the Company or any of its subsidiaries) by any director or officer of the Company (or by any director or officer of any subsidiary of the Company) who is an Overlap Person. To the fullest extent permitted by law, no director or officer of the Company or any subsidiary of the Company who is an Overlap Person thereof shall have or be under any fiduciary duty to the Company (or to any subsidiary of the Company, or to any stockholder of the Company or any of its subsidiaries) to refrain from acting on behalf of the Company or an Other Entity, or any of their respective subsidiaries, in respect of any such contract, agreement, arrangement or transaction or performing any such contract, agreement, arrangement or transaction in accordance with its terms and each such director or officer of the Company or any subsidiary of the Company who is an Overlap Person shall be deemed to have acted in good faith and in a manner such person reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the Company, and shall be deemed not to have breached his or her duties of loyalty to the Company (or to any subsidiary of the Company, or to any stockholders of the Company or any of its subsidiaries) and not to have derived an improper personal benefit therefrom.
and/or
 
No amendment, repeal or adoption of any provision inconsistent with the foregoing provisions will have any effect upon (a) any agreement between the Company or a subsidiary thereof and any Other Entity, that was entered into before the time of such amendment or repeal or adoption of any such inconsistent provision (the "Amendment Time"), or any transaction entered into in connection with the performance of any such agreement, whether such transaction is entered into before or after the Amendment Time, (b) any transaction entered into between the Company or a subsidiary thereof and any Other Entity, before the Amendment Time, (c) the allocation of any business opportunity between the Company or any subsidiary thereof and any Other Entity before the Amendment Time, or (d) any duty or obligation owed by any director or officer of the Company or any subsidiary of the Company (or the absence of any such duty or obligation) with respect to any Potential Business Opportunity which such director or officer was offered, or of which such director or officer otherwise became aware, before the Amendment Time (regardless of whether any proceeding relating to any of the above is commenced before or after the Amendment Time).
Table of Contents
 
Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporation Law
 
Section 203 of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware prohibits certain transactions between a Delaware corporation and an "interested stockholder." An "interested stockholder" for this purpose is a stockholder who is directly or indirectly a beneficial owner of 15% or more of the aggregate voting power of a Delaware corporation. This provision prohibits certain business combinations between an interested stockholder and a corporation for a period of three years after the date on which the stockholder became an interested stockholder, unless: (1) prior to the time that a stockholder became an interested stockholder, either the business combination or the transaction which resulted in the stockholder becoming an interested stockholder is approved by the Company's Board of Directors, (2) the interested stockholder acquired at least 85% of the aggregate voting power of the Company in the transaction in which the stockholder became an interested stockholder, or (3) the business combination is approved by a majority of the Board of Directors and the affirmative vote of the holders of two-thirds of the aggregate voting power not owned by the interested stockholder at or subsequent to the time that the stockholder became an interested stockholder. These restrictions do not apply if, among other things, the Company's certificate of incorporation contains a provision expressly electing not to be governed by Section 203. Our amended and restated certificate of incorporation will not contain such an election. However, our Board of Directors exercised its right under Section 203 to approve the acquisition of our common stock in the Distribution by Dolan family members and entities. This will have the effect of making Section 203 inapplicable to transactions between the Company, on the one hand, and Dolan family members and entities, on the other hand.
 
Limitation on Personal Liability
 
We have provided, consistent with the Delaware General Corporation Law, in our amended and restated certificate of incorporation that a director of the Company shall not be personally liable to the Company or its stockholders for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director, except for liability for:
 
 
Neither the amendment nor repeal of such provision will eliminate or reduce the effect of such provision in respect of any matter occurring, or any cause of action, suit or claim that, but for such provision, would accrue or arise prior to such amendment or repeal.
Table of Contents
 
 
Section 145 of the Delaware General Corporation Law provides that a corporation may indemnify any current or former director, officer or employee or other individual against expenses, judgments, fines and amounts paid in settlement in connection with civil, criminal, administrative or investigative actions or proceedings, other than a derivative action by or in the right of the corporation, if the director, officer, employee or other individual acted in good faith and in a manner he or she reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, and, with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, if he or she had no reasonable cause to believe his or her conduct was unlawful. A similar standard is applicable in the case of derivative actions, except that indemnification only extends to expenses incurred in connection with the defense or settlement of such actions, and the statute requires court approval before there can be any indemnification where the person seeking indemnification has been found liable to the corporation. The statute provides that it is not exclusive of other indemnification that may be granted by a corporation's by-laws, disinterested director vote, stockholder vote, agreement or otherwise.
 
Our certificate of incorporation will provide that each person who was or is made or is threatened to be made a party to any action or proceeding by reason of the fact that such person, or a person of whom such person is the legal representative, is or was a director or officer of the Company or is or was serving at our request as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, including service with respect to employee benefit plans, will be indemnified and held harmless by us to the fullest extent authorized by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended. Such rights are not exclusive of any other right which any person may have or thereafter acquire under any statute, provision of the certificate of incorporation, by-law, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors or otherwise. Our certificate of incorporation will also specifically authorize us to maintain insurance and to grant similar indemnification rights to our employees or agents.
 
The Distribution Agreement between us and Cablevision provides for indemnification by us of Cablevision and its directors, officers and employees and by Cablevision of us and our directors, officers and employees for some liabilities, including liabilities under the Securities Act and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The amount of these indemnity obligations is unlimited.
Table of Contents
 
 
We have filed with the SEC a registration statement under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and the rules and regulations promulgated under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 with respect to the shares of our Class A Common Stock being distributed to Cablevision stockholders in the Distribution. This Information Statement does not contain all of the information set forth in the registration statement and its exhibits and schedules, to which reference is made hereby. Statements in this Information Statement as to the contents of any contract, agreement or other document are qualified in all respects by reference to such contract, agreement or document. If we have filed any of those contracts, agreements or other documents as an exhibit to the registration statement, you should read the full text of such contract, agreement or document for a more complete understanding of the document or matter involved. For further information with respect to us and our Class A Common Stock, we refer you to the registration statement, including the exhibits and the schedules filed as a part of it.
 
We intend to furnish the holders of our Class A Common Stock with annual reports and proxy statements containing financial statements audited by an independent public accounting firm and file with the SEC quarterly reports for the first three quarters of each fiscal year containing interim unaudited financial information. We also intend to furnish other reports as we may determine or as required by law.
 
The registration statement of which this Information Statement forms a part and its exhibits and schedules, and other documents which we file with the SEC can be inspected and copied at, and copies can be obtained from, the SEC's public reference room. Please call the SEC at for further information on the public reference room. In addition, our SEC filings are available to the public at the SEC's website at You can also obtain reports, proxy statements and other information about us at NASDAQ's website at http://www.nasdaq.com.
1-800-SEC-0330
http://www.sec.gov.
 
Information that we file with the SEC after the date of this Information Statement may supersede the information in this Information Statement. You may read these reports, proxy statements and other information and obtain copies of such documents and information as described above.
 
No person is authorized to give any information or to make any representations other than those contained in this Information Statement, and, if given or made, such information or representations must not be relied upon as having been authorized. Neither the delivery of this Information Statement nor any distribution of securities made hereunder shall imply that there has been no change in the information set forth or in our affairs since the date hereof.
Table of Contents
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
The Board of Directors
AMC Networks Inc.:
 
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of AMC Networks Inc. and subsidiaries as of December 31, 2010 and 2009, and the related consolidated statements of operations, stockholder's equity (deficiency) and cash flows for each of the years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2010. In connection with our audits of the consolidated financial statements, we also have audited the related consolidated financial statement schedule as listed in the index to Item 15. These consolidated financial statements and consolidated financial statement schedule are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these consolidated financial statements and consolidated financial statement schedule based on our audits.
 
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements, assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the consolidated financial position of AMC Networks Inc. and subsidiaries as of December 31, 2010 and 2009, and the results of their operations and their cash flows for each of the years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2010, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles. Also, in our opinion, the related consolidated financial statement schedule referred to above, when considered in relation to the basic consolidated financial statements taken as a whole, presents fairly, in all material respects, the information set forth therein.
 
/s/ KPMG LLP
 
New York, New York
June 8, 2011
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Nature of Operations
 
AMC Networks Inc. and its subsidiaries (the "Company" or "AMC Networks") represent certain entertainment businesses and assets owned and operated as integral parts of Cablevision Systems Corporation (Cablevision Systems Corporation and its subsidiaries are referred to as "Cablevision"), consisting of the following reportable segments:
 
 
On December 16, 2010, Cablevision's board of directors authorized Cablevision's management to move forward with the spin-off of Rainbow Media Holdings LLC ("RMH"), the direct wholly-owned subsidiary of AMC Networks, to Cablevision's stockholders (the "Distribution"). It is anticipated that the spin-off will be in the form of a pro rata distribution to all stockholders of Cablevision, with holders of Cablevision NY Group ("CNYG") Class A Common Stock receiving Class A Common Stock of AMC Networks and holders of CNYG Class B Common Stock receiving Class B Common Stock of AMC Networks. Both Cablevision and AMC Networks will continue to be controlled by the Dolan family through their ownership of Class B Common Stock.
 
As part of the Distribution, the Company expects to incur approximately $2,425,000 of new debt (the "New AMC Networks Debt"), consisting of $1,725,000 aggregate principal amount of senior secured term loans and $700,000 aggregate principal amount of senior unsecured notes. A portion of the proceeds of the New AMC Networks Debt will be used to repay all outstanding Company debt (excluding capital leases) (see Note 8) and, as partial consideration for Cablevision's contribution of the membership interests of RMH to the Company, approximately $1,250,000 (net of discount) of New AMC Networks Debt will be issued to CSC Holdings, which will use such New AMC Networks Debt to satisfy and discharge outstanding Cablevision or CSC Holdings debt.
 
Completion of the Distribution is subject to a number of external conditions, including the effectiveness of a Form 10 Information Statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the finalization of the terms and conditions of the required financing.
Table of Contents
 
 
On June 6, 2011, Cablevision's board of directors approved the Distribution and Cablevision contributed all of the membership interests of RMH to the Company. The Company expects to become a public company on June 30, 2011, the date of the Distribution. Holders of record of CNYG Class A Common Stock as of the close of business on June 16, 2011, the record date for the Distribution, will receive one share of AMC Networks Class A Common Stock for every four shares of CNYG Class A Common Stock held. Holders of record of CNYG Class B Common Stock as of the close of business on the record date will receive one share of AMC Networks Class B Common Stock for every four shares of CNYG Class B Common Stock held. Immediately prior to the Distribution, the Company will be an indirect wholly-owned subsidiary of Cablevision.
 
On December 31, 2010, RMH transferred its membership interests in News 12 Networks ("News 12"), Rainbow Advertising Sales Corporation ("RASCO") and certain other businesses to wholly-owned subsidiaries of Cablevision in contemplation of the Distribution (see Note 5). Assets and liabilities related to those entities have been reclassified as assets distributed to Cablevision in 2010 and liabilities distributed to Cablevision in 2010 on the Company's consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2009. Amounts due from or to those distributed entities that were previously eliminated in consolidation are now being presented as amounts due from affiliates, note receivable from affiliate or amounts due to affiliates on the Company's consolidated balance sheets.
 
Basis of Presentation
 
The Company's consolidated financial statements were prepared in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP"), and have been derived from the consolidated financial statements and accounting records of Cablevision and reflect certain assumptions and allocations (see Notes 12, 13 and 18). The financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company could differ from those that might have resulted had the Company been operated autonomously or as an entity independent of Cablevision.
 
The consolidated financial statements presented do not reflect any changes that may occur in the Distribution related to the New AMC Networks Debt. The Company is expected to have a capital structure different from the capital structure presented in the consolidated financial statements and accordingly, interest expense is not necessarily indicative of the interest expense that the Company would have incurred as a separate independent entity.
 
 
Principles of Consolidation
 
The accompanying consolidated financial statements include the accounts of the Company and its wholly-owned subsidiaries. All significant intercompany transactions and balances are eliminated in consolidation.
 
Revenue Recognition
 
The Company recognizes affiliation fee revenue from distributors that carry the Company's programming services under multi-year contracts, commonly referred to as "affiliation agreements." The programming services are delivered throughout the terms of the agreements and the Company recognizes revenue as programming is provided.
 
Advertising revenues are recognized when commercials are aired. In certain advertising sales arrangements, the Company's programming businesses guarantee specified viewer ratings for their programming. For these types of transactions, a portion of such revenue is deferred if the guaranteed viewer ratings are not met and is subsequently recognized either when the Company provides the required additional advertising time, the guarantee obligation contractually expires or performance requirements become remote.
Table of Contents
 
 
Revenues derived from other sources are recognized when services are provided or events occur.
 
Multiple-Element Transactions
 
If there is objective and reliable evidence of fair value for all elements of accounting in a multiple-element arrangement, the arrangement consideration is allocated to the separate elements of accounting based on relative fair values. There may be cases in which there is objective and reliable evidence of the fair value of undelivered items in an arrangement but no such evidence for the delivered items. In those cases, the Company utilizes the residual method to allocate the arrangement consideration. Under the residual method, the amount of consideration allocated to the delivered items equals the total arrangement consideration less the aggregate fair value of the undelivered items. In determining fair value, the Company refers to historical transactions or comparable cash transactions.
 
On January 1, 2011, the Company adopted Accounting Standards Update ("ASU") Multiple-Deliverable Revenue Arrangements, which is applicable on a prospective basis to revenue arrangements entered into or materially modified on or after January 1, 2011. ASU eliminates the residual method of allocating arrangement consideration to deliverables, requires the use of the relative selling price method and requires that the Company determine its best estimate of selling price in a manner consistent with that used to determine the price to sell the deliverable on a stand-alone basis.
No. 2009-13,
No. 2009-13
 
Technical and Operating Expenses
 
Costs of revenues, including but not limited to license fees, amortization of program rights, participation and residual costs and programming and production costs, origination, transmission, uplinking and other operating costs, are classified as technical and operating expenses in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations.
 
Advertising and Distribution Expenses
 
Advertising costs are charged to expense when incurred and are recorded to selling, general and administrative expenses in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations. Advertising costs were $92,184, $86,728 and $86,435 for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009, and 2008, respectively. Marketing, distribution and general and administrative costs related to the exploitation of owned original programming are expensed as incurred and are recorded to selling, general and administrative expenses.
 
Cash and Cash Equivalents
 
The Company's cash investments are placed with money market funds and financial institutions that are investment grade as rated by Standard & Poor's and Moody's Investors Service. The Company selects money market funds that predominantly invest in marketable, direct obligations issued or guaranteed by the United States government or its agencies, commercial paper, fully collateralized repurchase agreements, certificates of deposit, and time deposits.
 
The Company considers the balance of its investment in funds that substantially hold securities that mature within three months or less from the date the fund purchases these securities to be cash equivalents. The carrying amount of cash and cash equivalents either approximates fair value due to the short-term maturity of these instruments or are at fair value.
 
Accounts Receivable
 
The Company periodically assesses the adequacy of valuation allowances for uncollectible accounts receivable by evaluating the collectability of outstanding receivables and general factors such as length of time
Table of Contents
 
 
individual receivables are past due, historical collection experience, and the economic and competitive environment.
 
Investments
 
Investment securities and investment securities pledged as collateral are classified as trading securities and are stated at fair value with realized and unrealized holding gains and losses included in net income (loss).
 
Program Rights
 
Rights to programming, including feature films and episodic series, acquired under license agreements are stated at the lower of amortized cost or net realizable value. Such licensed rights along with the related obligations are recorded at the contract value when a license agreement is executed, unless there is uncertainty with respect to either cost, acceptability or availability. If such uncertainty exists, those rights and obligations are recorded at the earlier of when the uncertainty is resolved or when the license period begins. Costs are amortized to technical and operating expense on a straight-line basis over a period not to exceed the respective license periods.
 
The Company's owned original programming is primarily produced by independent production companies, with the remainder produced by the Company. Owned original programming costs, including estimated participation and residual costs, qualifying for capitalization as program rights are amortized to technical and operating expense over their estimated useful lives, commencing upon the first airing, based on attributable revenue for airings to date as a percentage of total projected attributable revenue. Projected program usage is based on the historical performance of similar content. Estimated attributable revenue can change based upon programming market acceptance, levels of affiliation fee revenue and advertising revenue, and program usage. Accordingly, the Company periodically reviews revenue estimates and planned usage and revises its assumptions if necessary, which could impact the timing of amortization expense or result in an impairment charge.
 
The Company periodically reviews the programming usefulness of its licensed and owned original program rights based on a series of factors, including ratings, type and quality of program material, standards and practices, and fitness for exhibition. If it is determined that film or other program rights have no future programming usefulness, a write-off of the unamortized cost is recorded in technical and operating expense. Other than those recorded in connection with VOOM HD's restructuring activities (see Note 4), impairment charges of $1,122 and $7,778 were recorded for the years ended December 31, 2010 and 2009, respectively. There were no impairment charges recorded for the year ended December 31, 2008.
 
Long-Lived and Indefinite-Lived Assets
 
Property and equipment are carried at cost. Equipment under capital leases is recorded at the present value of the total minimum lease payments. Depreciation is calculated on the straight-line basis over the estimated useful lives of the assets or, with respect to equipment under capital leases and leasehold improvements, amortized over the shorter of the lease term or the assets' useful lives and reported in depreciation and amortization in the consolidated statements of operations.
 
Intangible assets established in connection with business acquisitions consist of affiliation agreements and affiliate relationships, advertiser relationships, other intangibles and goodwill. Amortizable intangible assets are amortized on a straight-line basis over their respective estimated useful lives. Goodwill and identifiable intangible assets acquired in prior acquisitions, which have indefinite useful lives, are not amortized.
Table of Contents
 
 
Impairment of Long-Lived and Indefinite Lived Assets
 
The Company's long-lived and indefinite-lived assets at December 31, 2010 include property and equipment, net of $68,977, other amortizable intangible assets, net of $364,882, identifiable indefinite-lived intangible assets of $19,900 and goodwill of $83,173. These assets accounted for approximately 29% of the Company's consolidated total assets as of December 31, 2010.
 
The Company reviews its long-lived assets (property and equipment, and intangible assets subject to amortization that arose from acquisitions) for impairment whenever events or circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of an asset may not be recoverable. If the sum of the expected cash flows, undiscounted and without interest, is less than the carrying amount of the asset, an impairment loss is recognized as the amount by which the carrying amount of the asset exceeds its fair value.
 
Goodwill and indefinite-lived intangible assets, which represent Sundance Channel trademarks of $19,900, are tested annually for impairment during the first quarter ("annual impairment test date") and upon the occurrence of certain events or substantive changes in circumstances.
 
The Company is required to determine goodwill impairment using a two-step process. The first step of the goodwill impairment test is used to identify potential impairment by comparing the fair value of a reporting unit with its carrying amount, including goodwill utilizing an enterprise-value based premise approach. If the carrying amount of a reporting unit exceeds its fair value, the second step of the goodwill impairment test is performed to measure the amount of goodwill impairment loss, if any. The second step of the goodwill impairment test compares the implied fair value of the reporting unit's goodwill with the carrying amount of that goodwill. If the carrying amount of the reporting unit's goodwill exceeds the implied fair value of that goodwill, an impairment loss is recognized in an amount equal to that excess. The implied fair value of goodwill is determined in the same manner as the amount of goodwill that would be recognized in a business combination. For the purpose of evaluating goodwill impairment at the annual impairment test date, the Company had five reporting units, which recognized goodwill. These reporting units are AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel, which are included in the National Networks reportable segment, and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, which is included in the International and Other reportable segment.
 
The goodwill balance as of December 31, 2010 by reporting unit is as follows:
 
 
In assessing the recoverability of the Company's goodwill and other long-lived assets, the Company must make assumptions regarding estimated future cash flows and other factors to determine the fair value of the respective assets. These estimates and assumptions could have a significant impact on whether an impairment charge is recognized and also the magnitude of any such charge. Fair value estimates are made at a specific point in time, based on relevant information. These estimates are subjective in nature and involve uncertainties and matters of significant judgments and therefore cannot be determined with precision. Changes in assumptions could significantly affect the estimates. Estimates of fair value are primarily determined using discounted cash flows and comparable market transactions. These valuations are based on estimates and assumptions including projected future cash flows, discount rate, and determination of appropriate market
Table of Contents
 
 
comparables and determination of whether a premium or discount should be applied to comparables. These valuations also include assumptions for the projected number of subscribers and the projected average rates per basic and viewing subscribers and growth in fixed price contractual arrangements used to determine affiliation fee revenue, access to program rights and the cost of such program rights, amount of programming time that is advertiser supported, number of advertising spots available and the sell through rates for those spots, average fee per advertising spot, and operating margins, among other assumptions. If these estimates or material related assumptions change in the future, the Company may be required to record impairment charges related to the Company's long-lived assets.
 
Based on the Company's annual impairment test during the first quarter of 2010, the Company's reporting units had significant safety margins, representing the excess of the estimated fair value of each reporting unit less its respective carrying value (including goodwill allocated to each respective reporting unit). In order to evaluate the sensitivity of the estimated fair value calculations of the Company's reporting units on the annual impairment calculation for goodwill, the Company applied hypothetical 10%, 20% and 30% decreases to the estimated fair values of each reporting unit. These hypothetical decreases of 10%, 20% and 30% would have no impact on the goodwill impairment analysis for any of the Company's reporting units with the exception of Sundance Channel. For Sundance Channel, which had a goodwill carrying value of $28,930 at December 31, 2010, a 23% reduction in its estimated fair value would result in a goodwill impairment test step one failure. A step one failure would require the Company to perform the second step of the goodwill impairment test to measure the amount of implied fair value of goodwill and, if required, the recognition of a goodwill impairment loss.
 
The impairment test for identifiable indefinite-lived intangible assets consists of a comparison of the estimated fair value of the intangible asset with its carrying value. If the carrying value of the indefinite-lived intangible asset exceeds its fair value, an impairment loss is recognized in an amount equal to that excess.
 
The Company's indefinite-lived trademark intangible assets relate to the Company's Sundance Channel trademarks, which were valued using a relief-from-royalty method in which the expected benefits are valued by discounting estimated royalty revenue over projected revenues covered by the trademarks. The Sundance Channel related trademarks were recorded in June 2008 when the Company completed transactions which resulted in the 100% acquisition of Sundance Channel L.L.C. Significant judgments inherent in a valuation include the selection of appropriate discount and royalty rates, estimating the amount and timing of estimated future cash flows and identification of appropriate continuing growth rate assumptions. The discount rates used in the analysis are intended to reflect the risk inherent in the projected future cash flows generated by the respective intangible assets.
 
Based on the Company's annual impairment test during the first quarter of 2010, the Company's Sundance Channel related trademarks identifiable indefinite-lived intangible assets had significant safety margins, representing the excess of the identifiable indefinite-lived intangible assets estimated fair value less their respective carrying values. In order to evaluate the sensitivity of the fair value calculations of the Company's identifiable indefinite-lived intangible assets, the Company applied hypothetical 10%, 20% and 30% decreases to the estimated fair value of the Company's identifiable indefinite-lived intangible assets. These hypothetical 10%, 20% and 30% decreases in estimated fair value would not have resulted in an impairment of the Company's identifiable indefinite-lived intangible assets other than the hypothetical fair value decline at 30% would have resulted in an impairment charge of approximately $1,600.
Table of Contents
 
 
Program Rights Obligations
 
Amounts payable subsequent to December 31, 2010 related to program rights obligations included in the consolidated balance sheet are as follows:
 
 
Off balance sheet program rights obligations at December 31, 2010 that have not yet met the criteria to be recorded in the consolidated balance sheet are $67,927, which are payable: $66,790 in 2011, $1,137 in 2012 and $0 thereafter.
 
Deferred Carriage Fees
 
Deferred carriage fees represent amounts principally paid or payable to cable television distributors, direct broadcast satellite distributors and telecommunications companies to obtain additional subscribers guarantee carriage of certain programming services and are amortized as a reduction of revenue over the period of the related guarantee arrangement (4 to 13 years).
and/or
 
The Company recorded an impairment charge of $15,034 in 2008, included in depreciation and amortization, for the write-off of deferred carriage fees of $15,034 at VOOM HD after DISH Network ceased the distribution of VOOM in May 2008 (see Note 15).
 
Deferred Financing Costs
 
Costs incurred to obtain debt are deferred and amortized to interest expense ratably over the life of the related debt.
 
Income Taxes
 
The Company's provision for income taxes is based on current period income, changes in deferred tax assets and liabilities and changes in estimates with regard to uncertain tax positions. Deferred tax assets are subject to an ongoing assessment of realizability. The Company provides deferred taxes for the outside basis difference of its investment in partnerships. Interest and penalties, if any, associated with uncertain tax positions are included in income tax expense.
 
The Company was included in the consolidated federal and certain state and local income tax returns of Cablevision for the periods presented. The income tax expense or benefit presented in the consolidated statements of operations is based upon the taxable income of the Company on a separate tax return basis. There is no tax sharing agreement in place between the Company and Cablevision. Tax losses generated by the Company and utilized by the Cablevision group have been reflected as deemed capital distributions from the Company to its parent. Such distributions amounted to $20,066 and $41,066 for the years ended December 31, 2009 and 2008, respectively. The Company's estimated taxable income for the year ended December 31, 2010 is expected to be offset by current year tax losses of the Cablevision group. As such, a deemed capital contribution of $52,824 has been recorded for the year ended December 31, 2010. The
Table of Contents
 
 
Company made certain state income tax payments in excess of the current liability of the Company computed on a separate tax return basis. Such payments have been reflected as deemed capital distributions from the Company to Cablevision. Such distributions with regard to tax payments made amounted to $696, $491 and $529 for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008, respectively.
 
Comprehensive Income (Loss)
 
Comprehensive income (loss) for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009, and 2008 equals net income (loss) for the respective periods. Accumulated comprehensive income in the Company's consolidated balance sheets as of December 31, 2010 and 2009 is zero.
 
Share-Based Compensation
 
Cablevision charges the Company expenses or benefits related to its various employee stock plans. Cablevision records share-based compensation expense during the period based on the fair value of the portion of share-based payment awards that are ultimately expected to vest. Cablevision uses the Black-Scholes valuation model in determining the fair value of stock options and stock appreciation rights ("SARs") and uses the closing price on the date of grant to determine the fair value of restricted shares. Shared-based payment awards are expensed on a straight-line basis over the requisite service period. As the obligations related to stock option and restricted share awards under the Cablevision employee stock plans are satisfied by Cablevision, the allocation to the Company of its proportionate share of the related expenses is reflected as a deemed capital contribution in the accompanying consolidated financial statements. The Company satisfies obligations related to SAR awards under the Cablevision employee stock plans and the allocation to the Company of its proportionate share of the related expense is accrued in employee related costs in the Company's consolidated balance sheets. Refer to Note 18 for further discussion of Cablevision's Equity Plans.
 
Foreign Currency Transactions
 
The Company distributes programming in certain territories outside of the United States. Accordingly, it has a limited number of trade receivables denominated in a foreign currency, primarily Canadian dollars. The Company recognized $(116), $291 and $(731) of foreign currency transaction (losses) gains for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008, respectively, related to those receivables denominated in a foreign currency from affiliation agreements with foreign distributors. Such amounts are included in miscellaneous, net in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations.
Table of Contents
 
 
Cash Flows
 
During 2010, 2009 and 2008, the Company's non-cash investing and financing activities and other supplemental data were as follows:
 
 
Derivative Financial Instruments
 
The Company accounts for derivative financial instruments as either assets or liabilities measured at fair value. The Company, at times, uses derivative instruments to manage its exposure to market risks from changes in certain equity prices and interest rates and does not hold or issue derivative instruments for speculative or trading purposes. These derivative instruments are not designated as hedges, and changes in the fair values of these derivatives are recognized in earnings as gains (losses) on derivative contracts.
 
Use of Estimates in Preparation of Financial Statements
 
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent liabilities at the date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
Table of Contents
 
 
Commitments and Contingencies
 
Liabilities for loss contingencies arising from claims, assessments, litigation, fines and penalties and other sources are recorded when it is probable that a liability has been incurred and the amount of the contingency can be reasonably estimated.
 
 
Sundance Channel L.L.C.
 
On June 16, 2008, certain wholly-owned subsidiaries of RMH completed transactions which resulted in the 100% acquisition of Sundance Channel L.L.C. ("Sundance Channel") from NBC Universal (which was a subsidiary of General Electric Company ("General Electric")), CBS Corporation's Showtime Networks ("CBS"), and two entities controlled by individuals. The purchase price of $472,464 was paid through an exchange of 12,742,033 shares of common stock of General Electric held by certain subsidiaries of RMH valued, based on the closing price at the acquisition date, at $369,137, and a net cash payment of $103,327. The aggregate purchase price for financial statement purposes including the effect of working capital adjustments of $3,189 and closing costs of $6,763, and excluding $87,716 of net deferred tax adjustments as described below, was $482,416. In the first transaction, General Electric received all of the General Electric common stock held by certain subsidiaries of RMH, and the RMH subsidiaries received a 100% interest in a newly formed subsidiary of General Electric, which held cash and General Electric's ownership interest in Sundance Channel. In subsequent transactions, this newly formed subsidiary used the cash contributed to it by General Electric and additional cash contributions by the Company to purchase the remaining interests in Sundance Channel.
 
Prior to the Sundance Channel acquisition, the outstanding monetization contracts held by subsidiaries of RMH covering the General Electric common stock exchanged in the transaction were terminated, the associated collateralized indebtedness was settled and, accordingly, the General Electric common stock was no longer pledged to support that indebtedness. The subsidiaries of RMH that were parties to these contracts paid the counterparties an aggregate of $368,097 to settle the monetization contracts. To fund the $368,097 of cash payments required to settle the monetization contracts and to fund the $103,327 net cash acquisition payment, the Company borrowed $210,000 under the Rainbow National Services LLC revolving credit facility (see Note 8) and used cash on hand for the remaining amount.
 
The Company accounted for the acquisition of Sundance Channel under the purchase method of accounting in accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 141. Under the purchase method of accounting, the total purchase price was allocated to the identifiable tangible and intangible assets acquired and the liabilities assumed based on their fair values. The excess of the purchase price over those fair values was recorded as goodwill. The fair value assigned to the identifiable tangible and intangible assets acquired and liabilities assumed are based upon assumptions developed by management and other information compiled by management, including a purchase price allocation analysis. As a result of the non-taxable transfer of the General Electric common stock and the settlement of the related monetization contracts in connection with the acquisition, the purchase price and resulting purchase price allocation were reduced by the related net deferred tax effects of $87,716 to $394,700. The results of Sundance Channel's operations have been included in the consolidated financial statements from the date of acquisition. Sundance Channel is included in the Company's National Networks reportable segment and is a separate reporting unit for goodwill impairment testing.
Table of Contents
 
 
The following table provides the allocation of the purchase price to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed:
 
 
 
 
 
In December 2008, the Company decided to discontinue funding the domestic programming business of VOOM HD. In connection with this decision the Company has recorded restructuring expense (credits) in 2008, 2009 and 2010.
 
During 2008, in addition to the amounts related to VOOM HD, the Company recorded net severance expense of $82 related to the elimination of positions at certain programming businesses.
Table of Contents
 
 
The following table summarizes the VOOM HD restructuring expense recognized during 2008, 2009 and 2010:
 
 
 
 
At December 31, 2010, aggregate restructuring liabilities of $58 were classified as current other accrued expenses in the accompanying consolidated balance sheet.
 
 
On December 16, 2010, Cablevision announced that its board of directors authorized Cablevision's management to move forward with the leveraged spin-off of RMH to Cablevision's stockholders (see Note 1). In contemplation of the Distribution, on December 31, 2010 RMH transferred its membership interests in News 12 (regional news programming services), RASCO (a cable television advertising company) and certain other businesses to wholly-owned subsidiaries of Cablevision. This distribution amounted to $41,273 and was recorded as a deemed capital distribution in the accompanying consolidated statement of stockholder's equity (deficiency). No gain or loss was recognized in connection with this distribution between entities under common control. The operating results of these transferred entities through the date of the transfer have been classified in the consolidated statements of operations as discontinued operations for all periods presented.
Table of Contents
 
 
Operating results of discontinued operations for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008 are summarized below:
 
 
The assets and liabilities of the transferred businesses have been classified in the consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2009 as assets and liabilities distributed to Cablevision on December 31, 2010 and consist of the following:
 
 
Promissory Note
 
In September 2009, RMH and one of the other businesses transferred to Cablevision agreed to the terms of a promissory note having an initial principal amount of $0 and increasing from time to time by advances made by RMH, with an interest rate of 8.625%. Amounts advanced are repayable on demand by RMH. As of December 31, 2010 and 2009, RMH had extended advances against this promissory note aggregating $16,832 and $3,492, respectively. The note is reflected as a note receivable from affiliate and the payable at December 31, 2009 is reflected as liabilities distributed to Cablevision in 2010 since the entity that received the advances was distributed to a subsidiary of Cablevision prior to December 31, 2010 and is no longer consolidated by the Company. Interest income recognized by RMH related to this note amounted to $660 and $38 for the years ended December 31, 2010 and 2009, respectively. On January 31, 2011, RMH distributed to a subsidiary of Cablevision, all of its rights, title and interest in and to the promissory note. This distribution will be reflected as a capital distribution in the accompanying consolidated statement of stockholder's equity (deficiency) in the Company's consolidated financial statements as of and for the three months ended March 31, 2011.
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Property and equipment (including equipment under capital leases) consist of the following assets, which are depreciated or amortized on a straight-line basis over the estimated useful lives shown below:
 
 
Depreciation expense on property and equipment (including capital leases) amounted to $19,805, $22,828 and $23,193, respectively, for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008.
 
At December 31, 2010 and 2009, the gross amount of equipment and related accumulated amortization recorded under capital leases were as follows:
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
The following table summarizes information relating to the Company's acquired intangible assets at December 31, 2010 and 2009:
 
 
 
 
 
The Company has historically been able to renew affiliation agreements upon expiration and has factored its experience with such renewals in estimating the future cash flows associated with its affiliation agreements and affiliate relationship intangible assets.
Table of Contents
 
 
There were no accumulated impairment losses related to goodwill for any periods as of December 31, 2010.
 
In March 2009, the Company recorded an adjustment to the preliminary purchase price allocation amounting to $89 related to the acquisition of Sundance Channel.
 
 
Credit Facility Debt
 
Rainbow National Services LLC ("RNS"), an indirect wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company, which owns the interests in American Movie Classics Company LLC ("AMC LLC"), a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company and its subsidiaries, which includes WE: Women's Entertainment LLC ("WE LLC"), and The Independent Film Channel LLC ("IFC LLC"), has an $800,000 senior secured credit facility (the "RNS Credit Facility"), which consists of a $500,000 term A loan facility and a $300,000 revolving credit facility. The term A loan facility matures June 30, 2013 and the revolving credit facility matures June 30, 2012. The RNS Credit Facility allows RNS to utilize up to $50,000 of the revolving credit facility for letters of credit and up to $5,000 for a swing loan. Further, the RNS Credit Facility provides for an incremental facility of up to $925,000, provided that it be for a minimum amount of $100,000. There are no commitments from the lenders to fund an incremental facility other than the $280,000 incremental revolver supplement (the "RNS Incremental Revolver") entered into on June 3, 2008 discussed below. Whenever incremental facilities are established, RNS and the lenders must enter into a supplement to the RNS Credit Facility with terms and conditions that are no more restrictive than those of the RNS Credit Facility.
 
In June 2008, RNS borrowed $210,000 under its revolving credit facility in connection with the Company's acquisition of Sundance Channel (see Note 3). Further, during 2008, RNS borrowed $66,000 under the revolving credit facility and repaid $25,000 and $51,000 of the outstanding balance under the term loan facility and the revolving credit facility, respectively. In 2009, RNS repaid $25,000 and $95,000 of the outstanding balance under the term loan facility and the revolving credit facility, respectively. In 2010, RNS repaid $25,000 and $80,000 of the outstanding balance under the term loan facility and the revolving credit facility, respectively. Outstanding borrowings under the term loan facility and revolving credit facility were $425,000 and $50,000, respectively, at December 31, 2010. RNS had $250,000 in undrawn revolver commitments at December 31, 2010.
 
Borrowings under the RNS Credit Facility are direct obligations of RNS which are guaranteed jointly and severally by substantially all of RNS' subsidiaries and by Rainbow Programming Holdings LLC, the direct parent to RNS, and a wholly-owned subsidiary of RMH, and are secured by the pledge of the stock of RNS and the stock of substantially all of RNS' subsidiaries and all of the other assets of RNS and substantially all of RNS' subsidiaries (subject to certain limited exceptions). Cablevision is not a guarantor of, and has not otherwise had any obligations relating to, the RNS Credit Facility or any of the Company's other indebtedness (see below).
 
Borrowings under the RNS Credit Facility bear interest based on either the Base Rate (the greater of the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.5% and the prime rate (as defined in the RNS Credit Facility)) or the Eurodollar Rate (as defined in the RNS Credit Facility). The interest rate under the RNS Credit Facility varies, depending on RNS' cash flow ratio (as defined in the RNS Credit Facility), from 1.0% to 1.5% over the Eurodollar Rate for Eurodollar-based borrowings and from zero to 0.5% over the Base Rate for Base Rate borrowings. At December 31, 2010, the weighted average interest rate on both the term A loan facility and amounts drawn under the original revolving credit facility was 1.26%.
 
The borrowings under the RNS Credit Facility may be repaid without penalty at any time. The term A loan is to be repaid in quarterly installments of $12,500 in 2011 and 2012, and $162,500 beginning on March 31, 2013 through its maturity date in June 2013. Any amounts outstanding under the revolving credit facility are due at maturity on June 30, 2012.
Table of Contents
 
 
The RNS Credit Facility contains various financial and other covenants. As defined in the RNS Credit Facility, the financial covenants consist of (i) a minimum ratio of operating cash flow to total interest expense for each quarter of 1.75 to 1, (ii) a maximum cash flow ratio of total indebtedness to operating cash flow of 6.25 to 1, and (iii) a maximum senior secured leverage ratio of senior secured debt to operating cash flow of 5.50 to 1. Additional covenants include restrictions on indebtedness, guarantees, liens, investments, dividends and distributions and transactions with affiliates.
 
RNS was in compliance with all of its financial covenants under its RNS Credit Facility and RNS Incremental Revolver as of December 31, 2010.
 
RNS is obligated to pay fees of 0.375% per annum on any undrawn revolver commitment.
 
Incremental Revolver
 
On June 3, 2008, RNS entered into the RNS Incremental Revolver whereby RNS received commitments from lenders in the amount of $280,000. The interest rate under the RNS Incremental Revolver is 2.0% over the Eurodollar rate for Eurodollar-based borrowings and 1.0% over the Base Rate for Base Rate borrowings (as defined in the RNS Incremental Revolver). The RNS Incremental Revolver matures on June 30, 2012 and the terms and conditions of the RNS Incremental Revolver are no more restrictive than those of the RNS Credit Facility. RNS is obligated to pay fees of 0.375% per annum on any undrawn portion of the RNS Incremental Revolver commitment balance. Borrowings under the RNS Incremental Revolver may be repaid without penalty at any time. There were no borrowings outstanding under the RNS Incremental Revolver facility at December 31, 2010.
 
In connection with the RNS Incremental Revolver, RNS incurred deferred financing costs of $2,941, which are being amortized to interest expense over the four-year term of the RNS Incremental Revolver.
 
Senior and Senior Subordinated Notes
 
As of December 31, 2010, RNS' notes outstanding consist of $300,000 aggregate principal amount of 8/% senior notes due September 1, 2012, and $325,000 aggregate principal amount of 10/% senior subordinated notes due September 1, 2014. The senior notes and the senior subordinated notes were discounted $2,163 and $3,915, respectively, upon original issuance in 2004. These notes are guaranteed by substantially all of RNS' subsidiaries. Principal covenants include a limitation on the incurrence of additional indebtedness based upon a maximum ratio of total indebtedness to cash flow (as defined in the indentures) of 6.0 to 1, limitations on dividends and distributions, and limitations on investments and the ability to incur liens (according to the terms of the senior note indenture).
3
4
3
8
 
RNS may redeem the senior notes, in whole or in part, at any time, at a redemption price equal to 100% of face value. The senior subordinated notes are redeemable, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to 103.458% of face value, which decreases to 101.729% on or after September 1, 2011 and 100% on or after September 1, 2012. The notes are redeemable at the redemption price plus accrued and unpaid interest through the redemption date.
 
The indentures under which the senior notes and the senior subordinated notes were issued contain various other covenants, which are generally less restrictive than those contained in the RNS Credit Facility. RNS was in compliance with all of its financial covenants under its senior notes and senior subordinated notes as of December 31, 2010.
 
RNS has no independent assets or operations of its own, the guarantees under the senior notes and the senior subordinated notes are full and unconditional and joint and several, and the net assets of any subsidiaries of RNS other than the subsidiary guarantors are minor. There are no restrictions on the ability of RNS or any of the
Table of Contents
 
 
subsidiary guarantors to obtain funds from its subsidiaries by dividend or loan. Cablevision is not a guarantor of, and has not otherwise had any obligations relating to, the RNS senior and senior subordinated notes.
 
Summary of Five-Year Debt Maturities
 
Total amounts payable by the Company under its various debt obligations (excluding capital leases) outstanding as of December 31, 2010, during the five years subsequent to December 31, 2010 are as follows:
 
 
RMH Promissory Note with Madison Square Garden
 
As of December 31, 2009, Madison Square Garden, L.P., a subsidiary of The Madison Square Garden Company ("MSG"), an affiliate of Cablevision, had extended advances aggregating $190,000 to RMH. On January 28, 2010, in connection with the spin-off of MSG from Cablevision, the advances were replaced with a promissory note from RMH to Madison Square Garden, L.P. having a principal amount of $190,000, an interest rate of 3.25% and a maturity date of June 30, 2010. In March 2010, the $190,000 of indebtedness was repaid by the Company to MSG, including $914 of interest accrued from January 28, 2010 through the date of repayment, which was funded by a capital contribution from Cablevision.
 
 
To manage interest rate risk, the Company enters into interest rate swap contracts from time to time to adjust the proportion of total debt that is subject to variable rates. Such contracts effectively fix the borrowing rates on floating rate debt to limit the exposure against the risk of rising rates. The Company does not enter into interest rate swap contracts for speculative or trading purposes and it only enters into interest rate swap contracts with financial institutions that are rated investment grade. The Company monitors the financial institutions that are counterparties to its interest rate swap contracts and diversifies its swap contracts among various counterparties to mitigate exposure to any single financial institution. There were no outstanding interest rate swap contracts as of December 31, 2010 and 2009.
 
In November 2008, the Company entered into interest rate swap contracts with a notional amount of $450,000 to effectively fix borrowing rates on a substantial portion of the Company's floating rate debt. The interest rate swap contracts matured in November 2009. These contracts were not designated as hedges for accounting purposes. For the year ended December 31, 2009, realized losses were $3,237 and for the year ended December 31, 2008, unrealized losses resulting from changes in the fair value of the Company's interest rate swap contracts and realized losses resulting from net cash interest expense aggregated $2,843. These losses are reflected in loss on interest rate swap contracts, net in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations.
 
The Company had also entered into various transactions to limit the exposure against equity price risk on its 12,742,033 shares of common stock of General Electric. The Company had monetized all of its stock holdings in General Electric through the execution of prepaid forward contracts, collateralized by an equivalent amount of the respective underlying stock. These monetization contracts were terminated in 2008 (see discussion below). The Company received cash proceeds upon execution of the prepaid forward contracts which were reflected as collateralized indebtedness. The Company separately accounted for the equity
Table of Contents
 
 
derivative component of the prepaid forward contracts. These equity derivatives were not designated as hedges for accounting purposes. Therefore, the net increases or decreases in the fair value of the equity derivative component of the prepaid forward contracts are included in gain on equity derivative contracts in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations.
 
The following represents the impact and location of the Company's derivative instruments within the consolidated statements of operations for the years ended December 31, 2009 and 2008:
 
 
For the year ended December 31, 2008, the Company recorded a loss on investments of $(103,238) representing the net decreases in the fair values of the shares of common stock of General Electric pledged as collateral for the period. There were no such losses for the years ended December 31, 2010 and 2009 as such shares of common stock were disposed of in 2008.
 
2008 Settlements of Collateralized Indebtedness
 
In connection with the acquisition of Sundance Channel in June 2008 (see Note 3), the Company terminated the monetization contracts relating to the 12,742,033 shares of common stock of General Electric owned by the Company by settling the related collateralized indebtedness and equity derivative contracts which resulted in the Company making a net cash payment to the counterparties aggregating $368,097. The Company recognized a $66,447 gain on the General Electric equity derivative contracts. In connection with the termination, the Company recognized a loss of $2,424, representing the difference between the carrying value and the redemption value of the collateralized indebtedness, which is reflected as a loss on extinguishment of debt in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2008.
 
The following table summarizes the settlement of the Company's collateralized indebtedness relating to General Electric common stock settled in 2008.
 
 
 
The fair value hierarchy is based on inputs to valuation techniques that are used to measure fair value that are either observable or unobservable. Observable inputs reflect assumptions market participants would use in pricing an asset or liability based on market data obtained from independent sources while unobservable
Table of Contents
 
 
inputs reflect a reporting entity's pricing based upon their own market assumptions. The fair value hierarchy consists of the following three levels:
 
 
The following table presents for each of these hierarchy levels, the Company's financial assets that are measured at fair value on a recurring basis at December 31, 2010 and 2009:
 
 
 
 
The Company's cash equivalents at December 31, 2010 and 2009 are classified within Level I of the fair value hierarchy because they are valued using quoted market prices.
 
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
 
The following methods and assumptions were used to estimate fair value of each class of financial instruments for which it is practicable to estimate that value:
 
Credit Facility Debt, Senior Notes and Senior Subordinated Notes
 
The fair values of each of the Company's debt instruments are based on quoted market prices for the same or similar issues or on the current rates offered to the Company for instruments of the same remaining maturities.
 
The carrying values and estimated fair values of the Company's financial instruments, excluding those that are carried at fair value in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets, are summarized as follows:
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
Fair value estimates related to the Company's debt instruments presented above are made at a specific point in time, based on relevant market information and information about the financial instrument. These estimates are subjective in nature and involve uncertainties and matters of significant judgments and therefore cannot be determined with precision. Changes in assumptions could significantly affect the estimates.
 
 
Certain subsidiaries of the Company lease office space and equipment under long-term non-cancelable operating lease agreements with non-affiliates which expire at various dates through 2020. The leases generally provide for fixed annual rentals plus certain other costs or credits. Costs associated with such operating leases are recognized on a straight-line basis over the initial lease term. The difference between rent expense and rent paid is recorded as deferred rent. Rent expense for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008 amounted to $12,363, $14,078 and $14,219, respectively.
 
The minimum future annual payments for the Company's operating leases with non-affiliates related to continuing operations (with initial or remaining terms in excess of one year) during the next five years from January 1, 2011 through December 31, 2015 and thereafter, at rates now in force are as follows:
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Future minimum capital lease payments as of December 31, 2010 are as follows:
 
 
 
Allocations
 
The Company provides services to and receives services from affiliates of Cablevision. The consolidated financial statements of the Company reflect the application of certain cost allocation policies of Cablevision. Management believes that these allocations have been made on a reasonable basis. However, it is not practicable to determine whether the charged amounts represent amounts that might have been incurred on a stand-alone basis, including as a separate independent publicly owned company, as there are no company-specific or comparable industry benchmarks with which to make such estimates. Further, as many of these transactions are conducted between subsidiaries under common control of Cablevision, amounts charged for these services may not represent amounts that might have been received or incurred if the transactions were based upon arm's length negotiations. Explanations of the composition and the amounts of the more significant transactions and charges, not explained elsewhere in the accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements, are described below.
Table of Contents
 
 
The following is a summary of the revenues and expenses included in the Company's consolidated statements of operations related to transactions with or charges from affiliates of Cablevision:
 
 
Revenues, net
 
The Company recorded affiliation fee revenues earned, net of amortization of deferred carriage fees, under affiliation agreements with companies owned by or affiliated with Cablevision. AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology (formerly, Rainbow Network Communications) has entered into agreements with affiliates of Cablevision to provide various transponder, technical and support services through 2020. Additionally, the Company provides various studio production services to affiliates of Cablevision.
 
Operating Expenses
 
Program Rights Charges
 
The Company charged affiliates of Cablevision for the right to exhibit and promote films under contracts between the Company and third parties, for which the charges are reflected as a reduction of the related technical and operating expenses.
 
Production Services
 
The Company provides various studio production services to affiliates of Cablevision, for which the charges are reflected as a reduction of the related technical and operating expenses.
Table of Contents
 
 
Other Support Functions
 
Affiliates of Cablevision provide various digital media and administrative support functions which primarily include salaries and facilities costs charged to the Company.
 
Health and Welfare Plans
 
Employees of the Company participate in health and welfare plans sponsored by Cablevision. Health and welfare benefit costs have generally been charged by Cablevision based upon the proportionate number of participants in the plans.
 
Corporate General and Administrative Costs, net
 
General and administrative costs, including costs of maintaining corporate headquarters, facilities and common support functions (such as executive management, human resources, legal, finance, tax, accounting, audit, treasury, risk management, strategic planning, information technology, etc.), have been charged to the Company by Cablevision. Additionally, the Company charges affiliates of Cablevision for a portion of the Company's leased facilities utilized by such affiliates. Such costs allocated to the Company have been included in selling, general and administrative expenses and such cost reimbursements are recorded as a reduction to selling, general and administrative expenses.
 
Management Fees
 
The Company has historically paid Cablevision a management fee pursuant to a consulting agreement between Cablevision and certain of the Company's subsidiaries. The Company expects that, at the time of the Distribution, it will terminate such agreement.
 
Advertising
 
The Company incurs advertising expenses charged by subsidiaries and affiliates of Cablevision.
 
Sales Support and Other Functions, net
 
Affiliates of Cablevision provide advertising sales support functions to the Company, which primarily include salaries and general and administrative costs, which are recorded as a charge to selling, general and administrative expenses. Additionally, the Company provides affiliation support functions to an affiliate of Cablevision, which primarily include salaries, facilities, and general and administrative costs. These charges are recorded as a reduction to selling, general and administrative expenses.
 
Share-based Compensation and Long-Term Incentive Plans Expense
 
Cablevision charges the Company its proportionate share of expenses or benefits related to Cablevision's employee stock plans and Cablevision's long-term incentive plans. Such amounts are included in selling, general and administrative expenses in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations, and if not funded or satisfied by the Company, reflected as capital contributions from Cablevision in the Company's consolidated financial statements. Refer to Note 18 for further discussion of Cablevision's Equity Plans. The long-term incentive plans are funded by the Company and aggregate liabilities of $28,934 and $25,265 related to these plans are included in accrued employee related costs and other long-term liabilities in the Company's consolidated balance sheets at December 31, 2010 and 2009, respectively. These liabilities include certain performance-based awards for which the performance criteria had not been met as of December 31, 2010 as such awards are based on achievement of certain performance criteria through December 31, 2012. The Company has accrued the amount that it currently believes will ultimately be paid based upon the performance
Table of Contents
 
 
criteria established for these performance-based awards. If it is subsequently determined that the performance criteria for such awards is not probable of being achieved, the Company would reverse the accrual in respect of such award at that time.
 
Treatment of Long-Term Incentive Plans After the Distribution
 
In 2010, 2009 and 2008, Cablevision granted three-year performance awards to certain executive officers and other members of the Company's management under Cablevision's 2006 Cash Incentive Plan. The performance metrics in each employee's award agreement are required to be adjusted to reflect the exclusion of the Company from the business of Cablevision. Amounts applicable to employees of the Company are and will continue to be reflected as liabilities in the Company's consolidated balance sheets until settled.
 
Deferred compensation awards granted by Cablevision pursuant to Cablevision's Long-Term Incentive Plan (which was superseded by the Cash Incentive Plan in 2006) will be similarly unaffected by the Distribution. Amounts applicable to employees of the Company are and will continue to be reflected as liabilities in the Company's consolidated balance sheets until settled.
 
 
Cablevision sponsors a non-contributory, qualified defined benefit cash balance pension plan (the "Cash Balance Pension Plan"), a non-contributory non-qualified defined benefit excess cash balance plan (the "Excess Cash Balance Plan"), a qualified defined contribution 401(k) savings plan and a non-qualified excess savings plan in which certain employees of the Company participate. In connection with the Cash Balance Pension Plan and the Excess Cash Balance Plan (collectively, the "Pension Plans"), the Company is charged by Cablevision for credits made into an account established for each participant. Such credits are based upon a percentage of eligible base pay and a market-based rate of return. The Company also makes matching contributions for a portion of employee voluntary contributions to the 401(k) savings and excess savings plan. Total expense related to these plans was $7,285, $6,973 and $5,049 for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008, respectively. The Company does not provide postretirement benefits for any of its employees.
 
 
For the periods presented, the Company's taxable income or loss was included in the consolidated federal and certain state and local income tax returns of Cablevision. The income tax expense or benefit is based on the taxable income of the Company on a separate tax return basis. There is no tax sharing agreement in place between the Company and Cablevision. Accordingly, since Cablevision does not reimburse the Company for the tax benefit received by Cablevision for the utilization of the Company's net operating loss carry forwards ("NOLs"), the Company reflects the reduction of the associated deferred tax asset for the Company's NOLs utilized by Cablevision as a deemed capital distribution in the year utilized.
Table of Contents
 
 
Income tax expense (benefit) attributable to continuing operations consists of the following components:
 
 
The income tax benefit attributable to the Company's discontinued operations was classified as deferred income tax benefit for all periods presented (see Note 5).
 
The income tax expense (benefit) attributable to continuing operations differs from the amount derived by applying the statutory federal rate to pretax income principally due to the effect of the following items:
 
Table of Contents
 
 
The tax effects of temporary differences which give rise to significant portions of deferred tax assets or liabilities at December 31, 2010 and 2009 are as follows:
 
 
At December 31, 2010, the Company had consolidated federal net operating loss carry forwards of approximately $260,000 expiring on various dates from 2021 through 2025.
 
At December 31, 2010, the Company had foreign tax credit carry forwards of approximately $10,000 expiring on various dates from 2014 through 2019.
 
AMC LLC and VOOM HD are treated as partnerships for income tax purposes. Accordingly, the Company records deferred income taxes for the outside basis difference with regard to its investment in these partnerships.
 
Deferred tax assets have resulted from the Company's future deductible temporary differences. In assessing the realizability of deferred tax assets, management considers whether it is more likely than not that some portion or all of the deferred tax asset will not be realized. The Company's ability to realize its deferred tax assets depends upon the generation of sufficient future taxable income to allow for the realization of its deductible temporary differences. If such estimates and related assumptions change in the future, the Company may be required to record a valuation allowance against its deferred tax assets resulting in additional income tax expense in the Company's consolidated statement of operations. Management evaluates the realizability of the deferred tax assets and the need for valuation allowances quarterly. As of December 31, 2010, based on current facts and circumstances, management believes that it is more likely than not that the Company will
Table of Contents
 
 
realize the benefit of its gross deferred tax assets, except those deferred tax assets against which a valuation allowance has been recorded which relate to certain local tax credit carry forwards. The Company increased the valuation allowance by $1,398, $1,309, and $1,189 in 2010, 2009 and 2008, respectively.
 
Certain adjustments to the net deferred tax asset will be recorded as adjustments to equity as of the Distribution date. Deferred tax assets and liabilities presented have been measured using the estimated applicable corporate tax rates historically used by Cablevision for the periods presented. However, primarily due to different state and local apportionment factors that will be applicable to the Company as of the Distribution date, the estimated applicable corporate tax rate used to measure deferred taxes will be lower on a stand-alone basis. In addition, the Company may reduce its deferred tax asset with regard to certain compensation awards if it is anticipated that a portion thereof may not be realized as a tax deduction pursuant to Code Section 162(m).
 
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending amount of the unrecognized tax benefit associated with uncertain tax positions (excluding associated deferred tax benefits and accrued interest) is as follows:
 
 
As of December 31, 2010, if all uncertain tax positions were sustained at the amounts reported or expected to be reported in the Company's tax returns, the elimination of the Company's unrecognized tax benefits, net of the deferred tax impact, would decrease income tax expense by $59,923.
 
Interest expense of $746, net of the associated deferred tax benefit of $302, has been recognized during the year ended December 31, 2010 and is included in income tax expense in the consolidated statement of operations. At December 31, 2010, accrued interest on uncertain tax positions of $966 and $1,823 are included in other accrued expenses and other long-term liabilities, respectively, in the consolidated balance sheet.
 
During January 2011, the audit of AMC LLC was concluded by the City of New York with regard to the unincorporated business tax for 2003 through 2005 and the audit was settled for an amount that approximates the related unrecognized tax benefit recorded as of December 31, 2010.
 
At the time of the Distribution, unrecognized tax benefits of approximately $55,000, excluding accrued interest, will be eliminated through an adjustment to equity with regard to uncertain tax positions that will be an obligation of Cablevision. The Company will not be responsible for uncertain tax positions taken in periods prior to the Distribution other than for certain local income taxes. Changes in the liabilities for uncertain tax positions will be recognized in the interim period in which the positions are effectively settled or there is a change in factual circumstances.
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Commitments
 
Future cash payments required under arrangements pursuant to contracts entered into by the Company in the normal course of business as of December 31, 2010 are as follows:
 
 
See Note 8 for a discussion of the Company's long-term debt. See Note 11 for a discussion of the Company's leases. See Note 2 for a discussion of the Company's program rights obligations.
 
 
 
DISH Network was issued a 20% interest in VOOM HD, the Company's subsidiary operating VOOM, and that 20% interest will not be diluted until $500,000 in cash has been invested in VOOM HD by the Company. On the fifth or eighth anniversary of the effective date of the investment agreement, the termination of the affiliation agreement by DISH Network, or other specified events, DISH Network has a put right to require a wholly-owned subsidiary of RMH to purchase all of its equity interests in VOOM HD at fair value. On the seventh or tenth anniversary of the effective date of the investment agreement, or the second
Table of Contents
 
 
anniversary date of the termination of the affiliation agreement by DISH Network, a wholly-owned subsidiary of RMH has a call right to purchase all of DISH Network's ownership in VOOM HD at fair value. The table above does not include any future payments that would be required upon the exercise of the put right, if any.
 
Legal Matters
 
DISH Network Contract Dispute
 
In 2005, subsidiaries of the Company entered into agreements with EchoStar Communications Corporation and its affiliates by which EchoStar Media Holdings Corporation acquired a 20% interest in VOOM HD and EchoStar Satellite LLC (the predecessor to DISH Network) agreed to distribute VOOM on DISH Network for a term. The affiliation agreement with DISH Network for such distribution provides that if VOOM HD fails to spend $100,000 per year (subject to reduction to the extent that the number of offered channels is reduced to fewer than 21), up to a maximum of $500,000 in the aggregate, on VOOM, DISH Network may seek to terminate the agreement under certain circumstances. On January 30, 2008, DISH Network purported to terminate the affiliation agreement, effective February 1, 2008, based on its assertion that VOOM HD had failed to comply with this spending provision in 2006. On January 31, 2008, VOOM HD sought and obtained a temporary restraining order from New York Supreme Court for New York County prohibiting DISH Network from terminating the affiliation agreement. In conjunction with its request for a temporary restraining order, VOOM HD also requested a preliminary injunction and filed a lawsuit against DISH Network asserting that DISH Network did not have the right to terminate the affiliation agreement. In a decision filed on May 5, 2008, the court denied VOOM HD's motion for a preliminary injunction. On or about May 13, 2008, DISH Network ceased distribution of VOOM on its DISH Network. On May 27, 2008, VOOM HD amended its complaint to seek damages for DISH Network's improper termination of the affiliation agreement. On June 24, 2008, DISH Network answered VOOM HD's amended complaint and EchoStar Satellite LLC asserted counterclaims alleging breach of contract and breach of the duty of good faith and fair dealing with respect to the affiliation agreement. On July 14, 2008, VOOM HD replied to DISH Network's counterclaims. The Company believes that the counterclaims asserted by DISH Network are without merit. VOOM HD and DISH Network each filed cross-motions for summary judgment. In November 2010, the court denied both parties' cross-motions for summary judgment. The court also granted VOOM HD's motion for sanctions based on DISH Network's spoliation of evidence and its motion to exclude DISH Network's principal damages expert. The trial will be scheduled after DISH Network's appeal of the latter two rulings.
15-year
 
Broadcast Music, Inc. Matter
 
Broadcast Music, Inc. ("BMI"), an organization that licenses the performance of musical compositions of its members, has alleged that certain of the Company's subsidiaries require a license to exhibit musical compositions in its catalog. BMI agreed to interim fees based on revenues covering certain periods (generally the period commencing from the launch or acquisition of each of our programming networks). In May 2011, the parties reached an agreement with respect to the license fees for an amount that approximates amounts previously accrued, which were $7,040 and $6,065 at December 31, 2010 and 2009, respectively.
 
Other Legal Matters
 
On April 15, 2011, Thomas C. Dolan, who is expected to become a director of the Company and who is a director and Executive Vice President, Strategy and Development, in the Office of the Chairman at Cablevision, filed a lawsuit against Cablevision and RMH, in New York Supreme Court. The lawsuit raises compensation-related claims (seeking approximately $11,000) related to events in 2005. The matter is being handled under the direction of an independent committee of the board of directors of Cablevision. It is
Table of Contents
 
 
expected that in the Distribution Agreement, Cablevision will indemnify the Company and RMH against any liabilities and expenses related to this lawsuit. Based on the Company's assessment of this possible loss contingency, no provision has been made for this matter in the accompanying consolidated financial statements.
 
In addition to the matters discussed above, the Company is party to various lawsuits and claims in the ordinary course of business. Although the outcome of these other matters cannot be predicted with certainty and the impact of the final resolution of these other matters on the Company's results of operations in a particular subsequent reporting period is not known, management does not believe that the resolution of these matters will have a material adverse effect on the financial position of the Company or the ability of the Company to meet its financial obligations as they become due.
 
 
As discussed in Note 1, the Company classifies its operations into two reportable segments: National Networks, and International and Other. These reportable segments are strategic business units that are managed separately.
 
The Company generally allocates all corporate overhead costs, and includes such costs as executive salaries and benefits, costs of maintaining corporate headquarters, facilities and common support functions (such as human resources, legal, finance, tax, accounting, audit, treasury, risk management, strategic planning and information technology) as well as sales support functions and creative and production services to the Company's two reportable segments.
 
The Company evaluates segment performance based on several factors, of which the primary financial measure is business segment adjusted operating cash flow (defined as operating income (loss) before depreciation and amortization, share-based compensation expense or benefit and restructuring expense or credit), a non-GAAP measure. The Company has presented the components that reconcile adjusted operating cash flow to operating income, an accepted GAAP measure. Information as to the operations of the Company's reportable segments is set forth below.
 
 
Inter-segment eliminations are primarily revenues recognized by the International and Other segment for the licensing of program rights by the national programming networks and transmission revenues recognized by AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology.
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Reconciliation (by Segment and in Total) of Adjusted Operating Cash Flow to Operating Income (Loss) from Continuing Operations
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
A reconciliation of reportable segment amounts to the Company's consolidated balances is as follows:
 
 
 
Substantially all revenues and assets of the Company are attributed to or located in the United States.
 
 
Financial instruments that may potentially subject the Company to a concentration of credit risk consist primarily of cash and cash equivalents and trade accounts receivable. Cash is invested in money market funds and bank time deposits. The Company monitors the financial institutions and money market funds where it invests its cash and cash equivalents with diversification among counterparties to mitigate exposure to any single financial institution. The Company's emphasis is primarily on safety of principal and liquidity and secondarily on maximizing the yield on its investments.
Table of Contents
 
 
The following individual customers accounted for the following percentages of the Company's net revenues for the years ended December 31:
 
 
At December 31, 2009, Customer 2 represented 11% of the Company's net trade receivable balances.
 
 
Cablevision's Equity Plans
 
Cablevision is authorized to grant under its 2006 Employee Stock Plan incentive stock options, nonqualified stock options, restricted shares, restricted stock units, SARs and other equity-based awards. Options and SARs under the 2006 Employee Stock Plan must be granted with an exercise price of not less than the fair market value of a share of CNYG's Class A Common Stock on the date of grant and must expire no later than 10 years from the date of grant (or up to one additional year in the case of the death of a holder). The terms and conditions of awards granted under the 2006 Employee Stock Plan, including vesting and exercisability, are determined by Cablevision's compensation committee of the board of directors and may be based upon performance criteria.
 
Cablevision is also authorized to grant under its 2006 Stock Plan for Cablevision's Non-Employee Directors nonqualified stock options, restricted stock units and other equity-based awards. Options under this plan must be granted with an exercise price of not less than the fair market value of a share of CNYG's Class A Common Stock on the date of grant and must expire no later than 10 years from the date of grant (or up to one additional year in the case of the death of a holder). The terms and conditions of awards granted under the Cablevision 2006 Stock Plan for Non-Employee Directors, including vesting and exercisability, are determined by Cablevision's compensation committee of the board of directors. Unless otherwise provided in an applicable award agreement, options granted under this plan will be fully vested and exercisable, and restricted stock units granted under this plan will be fully vested, upon the date of grant. In 2010 and 2009, Cablevision granted its non-employee directors an aggregate of 52,151 and 68,496 restricted stock units, respectively, which vested on the date of grant. A portion of the expense recorded by Cablevision relating to these awards was allocated to the Company. The Cablevision 2006 Employee Stock Plan and the 2006 Stock Plan for Cablevision's Non-Employee Directors are collectively referred to as the "Cablevision 2006 Stock Plans."
 
Options awarded under the Cablevision 2006 Stock Plans were typically scheduled to vest over three years in 33/% annual increments and to expire either in 5.5 years or 10 years from the grant date. Restricted shares under the Cablevision 2006 Stock Plans were typically subject to three-year cliff vesting. Options and restricted stock units issued to non-employee directors have been fully vested on the date of grant.
1
3
 
Previously, Cablevision had a 1996 Employee Stock Plan under which it was authorized to grant incentive stock options, nonqualified stock options, restricted shares, restricted stock units, SARs, and bonus awards and a 1996 Stock Plan for Cablevision's Non-Employee Directors under which it was authorized to grant options and restricted stock units. The Cablevision 1996 Employee Stock Plan expired in February 2006 and the Cablevision 1996 Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan expired in May 2006. These plans provided that the exercise price of stock options and SARs could not be less than the fair market value per share of CNYG's Class A Common Stock on the date the option was granted and the option expired no later than 10 years from the date of grant (or up to one additional year in the case of the death of a holder of nonqualified options). The Cablevision 2006 Stock Plans, 1996 Employee Stock Plan, and the 1996 Stock Plan for Cablevision's Non-Employee Directors are collectively referred to as the "Cablevision Stock Plans."
Table of Contents
 
 
Performance-based options awarded under the 1996 Employee Stock Plan were typically subject to approximately two-year or three-year cliff vesting, with exercisability subject to achievement of specific performance criteria. Performance-based options expire ten years from the date of grant (or up to one additional year in the case of the death of the holder). Cablevision has 495,400 performance-based options and 145,428 SARs outstanding at December 31, 2010 of which 10,000 and 47,015, respectively, are held by Company employees.
 
Options and performance-based option compensation expense is based on awards that are ultimately expected to vest. Share-based compensation (which includes options, performance options, restricted stock, restricted stock units and SARs) has been reduced for estimated forfeitures. Forfeitures were estimated based on historical experience.
 
On February 9, 2010, Cablevision distributed to its stockholders all of the outstanding common stock of MSG, a company which owns the sports, entertainment and media businesses previously owned and operated by Cablevision's Madison Square Garden segment (the "MSG Distribution"). The MSG Distribution took the form of a distribution by Cablevision of one share of MSG Class A Common Stock for every four shares of CNYG Class A Common Stock and one share of MSG Class B Common Stock for every four shares of CNYG Class B Common Stock. In connection with the MSG Distribution, and as provided for in Cablevision's equity plans, each outstanding restricted share of CNYG Class A Common Stock remained outstanding and the holder received a distribution of shares of MSG Class A Common Stock based on the distribution ratio. In addition, each stock option and SAR outstanding at the effective date of the MSG Distribution became two options and SARs, one with respect to CNYG Class A Common Stock and one with respect to MSG Class A Common Stock. The existing exercise price of each option/SAR was allocated between the existing Cablevision option/SAR and the MSG option/SAR based on the weighted average trading price of MSG's and Cablevision's common stock for the ten trading days subsequent to the MSG Distribution and the underlying share amount took into account the 1:4 distribution ratio. As a result of this adjustment, 82.63% of the pre-MSG Distribution exercise price of options/rights was allocated to the Cablevision options/rights and 17.37% was allocated to the new MSG options/rights. This modification did not result in any additional compensation expense for the year ended December 31, 2010. As a result of the MSG Distribution, certain employees of the Company hold options and SARs with respect to MSG Class A Common Stock. In addition, as a result of the MSG Distribution, certain employees of Cablevision hold restricted shares, options and SARs with respect to MSG Class A Common Stock. A portion of the expense recorded by Cablevision related to these awards was allocated to the Company.
Table of Contents
 
 
The following table presents the share-based compensation expense (income) recorded for 2010, 2009 and 2008 relating to Company employees participating in the Cablevision Stock Plans and the portion of share-based compensation expense relating to Cablevision corporate employees and directors that was allocated to the Company (including expenses related to MSG share-based awards held by Company employees and Cablevision corporate employees and directors):
 
 
Valuation Assumptions  Stock Options and SARs
 
Cablevision calculates the fair value of each option award on the date of grant and for each SAR on the date of grant and at the end of each reporting period using the Black-Scholes option pricing model. Cablevision's computation of expected life was determined based on historical experience of similar awards, giving consideration to the contractual terms of the share-based awards and vesting schedules or the simplified method (the average of the vesting period and option term), if applicable. The interest rate for periods within the contractual life of the share-based award is based on interest yields for U.S. Treasury instruments in effect at the time of grant and as of December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008 for SARs. Cablevision's computation of expected volatility is based on historical volatility of its common stock.
 
The following assumptions were used to calculate the fair value of stock option awards granted by Cablevision in 2009, which were granted with a 5.5 year term:
 
Table of Contents
 
 
There were no options granted by Cablevision during 2010 and 2008.
 
Share-Based Payment Award Activity
 
The following table summarizes activity relating to Company employees who held Cablevision stock options for the year ended December 31, 2010:
 
 
 
 
The following table summarizes activity relating to Company employees who held Cablevision restricted shares for the year ended December 31, 2010:
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
The following table summarizes the vested shares outstanding relating to Company employees who held Cablevision SARs at December 31, 2010. There were no unvested SARs outstanding as of December 31, 2010.
 
 
 
 
As of December 31, 2010, there was $13,833 of total unrecognized compensation cost related to Company employees who held unvested Cablevision and MSG options and restricted shares. The unrecognized compensation cost is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of approximately 1 year SARs held by Company employees are fully vested.
 
Treatment of Share-Based Payment Awards After the Distribution
 
In connection with the Distribution, each Cablevision stock option and SAR will become two options/rights. Cablevision options will be converted into options to acquire CNYG Class A Common Stock and options to acquire the Company's Class A Common Stock. Cablevision rights will be converted into rights with respect to the cash value of CNYG Class A Common Stock and rights with respect to the cash value of the Company's Class A Common Stock. The options and the rights with respect to the Company's Class A Common Stock will be issued under a new AMC Networks Inc. Employee Stock Plan and an AMC Networks Inc. Non-Employee Director Plan, as applicable. The existing exercise price will be allocated between the existing Cablevision options/rights and the Company's new options/rights based upon the respective market prices of the CNYG Class A Common Stock and the Company's Class A Common Stock and taking into account the distribution ratio. Further, in the Distribution, shares of the Company's Class A Common Stock will be issued in respect of the restricted stock issued by Cablevision based upon the distribution ratio. The Company's shares will be restricted on the same basis as the Cablevision restricted shares in respect of which they are issued.
 
 
The following is a summary of the Company's selected quarterly financial data for the years ended December 31, 2010 and 2009:
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
As set forth in the table above, there have been changes in the level of the Company's revenues, net from quarter to quarter and/or changes from year to year due primarily to increased advertising revenue and, to a lesser extent, other revenue items. In addition, the Company's operating expenses have also changed from quarter to quarter and/or year over year due primarily to the timing of the exhibition, promotion and marketing of program rights. Further, legal expenses in the fourth quarter of 2009, primarily related to the DISH Network contract dispute (see Note 15) and restructuring expense or credits in a period have also affected the level of the Company's operating expenses. Lastly, in addition to the changes in operating income, non-operating income and expense items such as interest income and expense, loss on interest rate swap contracts and income tax expense also impact quarter over quarter and year over year net income.
 
 
Repayment of Revolving Credit Facility
 
From January 1, 2011 through March 22, 2011, the Company repaid the entire outstanding balance under the RNS revolving credit facility of $50,000 at December 31, 2010. Amounts outstanding under the revolving credit facility at December 31, 2010 have been classified in the accompanying consolidated balance sheet as long-term liabilities as the amounts are not due until maturity on June 30, 2012.
 
Senior Notes Redemption
 
In April 2011, RNS issued a notice of redemption to holders of the RNS 8/% senior notes due September 2012. In connection therewith, on May 13, 2011, RNS redeemed 100% of the outstanding senior notes at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the notes of $300,000, plus accrued and unpaid interest of $5,250 to the redemption date. In order to fund the May 13, 2011 redemption, in May 2011 the Company borrowed $300,000 under its $300,000 revolving credit facility. The Company used cash on hand to fund the payment of accrued and unpaid interest of $5,250. In connection with the redemption, the Company will recognize a loss on extinguishment of debt of $1,183, representing the write-off of the related unamortized deferred financing costs.
3
4
 
Cash Distribution to Cablevision
 
On June 3, 2011, the Company made a cash capital distribution of approximately $21,000 to Cablevision.
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Nature of Operations
 
AMC Networks Inc. and its subsidiaries (the "Company" or "AMC Networks") represent certain entertainment businesses and assets owned and operated as integral parts of Cablevision Systems Corporation (Cablevision Systems Corporation and its subsidiaries are referred to as "Cablevision"), consisting of the following reportable segments:
 
 
On December 16, 2010, Cablevision's board of directors authorized Cablevision's management to move forward with the spin-off of Rainbow Media Holdings LLC ("RMH"), the direct wholly-owned subsidiary of AMC Networks, to Cablevision's stockholders (the "Distribution"). It is anticipated that the spin-off will be in the form of a pro rata distribution to all Cablevision stockholders, with holders of Cablevision NY Group ("CNYG") Class A Common Stock receiving Class A Common Stock of AMC Networks and holders of CNYG Class B Common Stock receiving Class B Common Stock of AMC Networks. Both Cablevision and AMC Networks will continue to be controlled by the Dolan family through their ownership of Class B Common Stock.
 
As part of the Distribution, the Company expects to incur approximately $2,425,000 of new debt (the "New AMC Networks Debt"), consisting of $1,725,000 aggregate principal amount of senior secured term loans and $700,000 aggregate principal amount of senior unsecured notes. A portion of the proceeds of the New AMC Networks Debt will be used to repay all outstanding Company debt (excluding capital leases) and, as partial consideration for Cablevision's contribution of the membership interests of RMH to the Company, approximately $1,250,000 (net of discount) of New AMC Networks Debt will be issued to CSC Holdings, which will use such New AMC Networks Debt to satisfy and discharge outstanding Cablevision or CSC Holdings debt.
 
Completion of the Distribution is subject to a number of external conditions, including the effectiveness of a Form 10 Information Statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC") and the finalization of the terms and conditions of the required financing. In March 2011, Cablevision received a favorable letter ruling from the Internal Revenue Service ("IRS").
 
On June 6, 2011, Cablevision's board of directors approved the Distribution and Cablevision contributed all of the membership interests of RMH to the Company. The Company expects to become a public company
Table of Contents
 
 
on June 30, 2011, the date of the Distribution. Holders of record of CNYG Class A Common Stock as of the close of business on June 16, 2011, the record date for the Distribution, will receive one share of AMC Networks Class A Common Stock for every four shares of CNYG Class A Common Stock held. Holders of record of CNYG Class B Common Stock as of the close of business on the record date will receive one share of AMC Networks Class B Common Stock for every four shares of CNYG Class B Common Stock held. Immediately prior to the Distribution, the Company will be an indirect wholly-owned subsidiary of Cablevision.
 
 
The accompanying unaudited consolidated financial statements of the Company have been prepared in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP") and with the instructions to and Article 10 of of the SEC for interim financial information. Accordingly, these unaudited consolidated financial statements do not include all the information and notes required for complete annual financial statements.
Form 10-Q
Regulation S-X
 
The accompanying interim unaudited consolidated financial statements should be read in conjunction with the Company's audited consolidated financial statements and notes thereto for the year ended December 31, 2010.
 
The Company's consolidated financial statements have been derived from the consolidated financial statements and accounting records of Cablevision and reflect certain assumptions and allocations. The financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company could differ from those that might have resulted had the Company been operated autonomously or as an entity independent of Cablevision.
 
The consolidated financial statements presented do not reflect any changes that may occur in the Distribution related to the New AMC Networks Debt. The Company is expected to have a capital structure different from the capital structure presented in the consolidated financial statements and accordingly, interest expense is not necessarily indicative of the interest expense that the Company would have incurred as a separate independent entity.
 
The consolidated financial statements as of March 31, 2011 and for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010 presented herein are unaudited; however, in the opinion of management, such consolidated financial statements include all adjustments, consisting solely of normal recurring adjustments, necessary for a fair presentation of the results for the periods presented. All significant intercompany transactions and balances have been eliminated in consolidation.
 
The results of operations for the interim periods are not necessarily indicative of the results that might be expected for future interim periods or for the full year ending December 31, 2011.
 
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent liabilities at the date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reported period. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
 
Comprehensive income for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010 equals net income for the same periods.
 
Recently Adopted Accounting Pronouncements
 
In December 2010, the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB") issued Accounting Standards Update ("ASU") Intangibles  Goodwill and Other (Topic 350): When to Perform Step 2 of the
No. 2010-28,
Table of Contents
 
 
Goodwill Impairment Test for Reporting Units with Zero or Negative Carrying Amounts. ASU modifies Step 1 of the goodwill impairment test for reporting units with zero or negative carrying amounts. For those reporting units, an entity is required to perform Step 2 of the goodwill impairment test if it is more likely than not that a goodwill impairment exists. In determining whether it is more likely than not that a goodwill impairment exists, an entity should consider whether there are any adverse qualitative factors indicating that an impairment may exist. The Company adopted ASU effective January 1, 2011.
No. 2010-28
No. 2010-28
 
The FASB issued ASU Fair Value Measurements and Disclosures (Topic 820): Improving Disclosures about Fair Value Measurement, that outlines certain new disclosures and clarifies some existing disclosure requirements about fair value measurement as set forth in Accounting Standards Codification Topic which became effective and was adopted by the Company on January 1, 2011.
No. 2010-06,
820-10
 
In October 2009, the FASB issued ASU Multiple-Deliverable Revenue Arrangements, which provides amendments that (a) update the criteria for separating consideration in multiple-deliverable arrangements, (b) establish a selling price hierarchy for determining the selling price of a deliverable, and (c) replace the term "fair value" in the revenue allocation guidance with the term "selling price" to clarify that the allocation of revenue is based on entity-specific assumptions. ASU eliminates the residual method of allocating arrangement consideration to deliverables, requires the use of the relative selling price method and requires that a vendor determine its best estimate of selling price in a manner consistent with that used to determine the price to sell the deliverable on a stand-alone basis. ASU requires a vendor to significantly expand the disclosures related to multiple-deliverable revenue arrangements with the objective to provide information about the significant judgments made and changes to those judgments and how the application of the relative selling-price method affects the timing or amount of revenue recognition. ASU was adopted on a prospective basis to revenue arrangements entered into or materially modified on or after January 1, 2011.
No. 2009-13,
No. 2009-13
No. 2009-13
No. 2009-13
 
 
For purposes of the unaudited consolidated statements of cash flows, the Company considers the balance of its investments in funds that substantially hold securities that mature within three months or less from the date the fund purchases these securities to be cash equivalents. The carrying amount of cash and cash equivalents either approximates fair value due to the short-term maturity of these instruments or are at fair value.
Table of Contents
 
 
During the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010, the Company's non-cash investing and financing activities and other supplemental data were as follows:
 
 
Promissory Note
 
In September 2009, RMH and one of the businesses transferred to Cablevision on December 31, 2010 agreed to the terms of a promissory note having an initial principal amount of $0 and increasing from time to time by advances made by RMH, with an interest rate of 8.625%. Amounts advanced are repayable on demand by RMH. As of December 31, 2010, RMH had extended advances against this promissory note aggregating $16,832. Interest income recognized by RMH related to this note amounted to $120 and $80 for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010, respectively. On January 31, 2011, RMH distributed to a subsidiary of Cablevision, all of its rights, title and interest in and to the promissory note. This distribution amounting to $17,113, including principal and accrued and unpaid interest, is reflected as a capital distribution in the accompanying consolidated statement of stockholder's equity for the three months ended March 31, 2011.
 
 
For the periods presented, the Company's taxable income or loss was included in the consolidated federal and certain state and local income tax returns of Cablevision. The income tax expense or benefit is based on the taxable income of the Company on a separate tax return basis. There is no tax sharing agreement in place between the Company and Cablevision. Accordingly, since the Company does not reimburse Cablevision for the tax benefit received by the Company for the utilization of Cablevision's net operating loss carry forwards ("NOLs"), the Company reflects the utilization of Cablevision's NOLs as a deemed capital contribution in the period of utilization. As such, deemed capital contributions of $19,075 and $9,476 have been recorded for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010, respectively. The Company made certain state income tax payments in excess of the current liability of the Company computed on a separate tax return basis. Such payments have been reflected as deemed capital distributions from the Company to Cablevision. Such distributions with regard to tax payments made amounted to $152 for the three months ended March 31, 2011.
Table of Contents
 
 
The Company recorded income tax expense attributable to continuing operations of $23,136 for the three months ended March 31, 2011, representing an effective tax rate of 44%. The effective tax rate was higher than the federal statutory rate of 35% due primarily to state income tax expense of $2,803, tax expense of $385 resulting from an increase in the valuation allowance with regard to certain local income tax credit carry forwards and tax expense of $1,523, including accrued interest, related to uncertain tax positions.
 
The Company recorded income tax expense attributable to continuing operations of $17,906 for the three months ended March 31, 2010, representing an effective tax rate of 43%. The effective tax rate was higher than the federal statutory rate of 35% due primarily to state income tax expense of $2,276, tax expense of $358 resulting from an increase in the valuation allowance with regard to certain local income tax credit carry forwards and tax expense of $395, including accrued interest, related to uncertain tax positions.
 
At March 31, 2011, the Company had consolidated federal net operating loss carry forwards of approximately $260,000 expiring on various dates from 2021 through 2025.
 
At March 31, 2011, the Company had foreign tax credit carry forwards of approximately $11,000 expiring on various dates from 2014 through 2020.
 
Certain adjustments to the deferred tax assets and liabilities will be recorded as adjustments to equity as of the Distribution date. Deferred tax assets and liabilities presented have been measured using the estimated applicable corporate tax rates historically used by Cablevision for the periods presented. However, on a stand-alone basis with a different geographic mix of income, the estimated applicable corporate tax rate used to measure deferred taxes is expected to be lower due to a lower overall state effective tax rate. In addition, the Company may reduce its deferred tax asset with regard to certain compensation awards if it is anticipated that a portion thereof may not be realized as a tax deduction pursuant to Internal Revenue Code Section 162(m).
 
In January 2011, the Company settled the City of New York audit with regard to the unincorporated business tax for the years 2003 through 2005 for $2,253, including accrued interest, which approximated the related unrecognized tax benefit recorded as of December 31, 2010. In April 2011, the Company was notified that the City of New York will audit the unincorporated business tax for the years 2006 through 2008.
 
The liability for uncertain tax positions, excluding accrued interest and associated deferred tax benefits, as of March 31, 2011 is $64,780. At the time of the Distribution, liabilities for uncertain tax positions of approximately $56,000, excluding accrued interest, will be eliminated through an adjustment to equity with regard to uncertain tax positions that will be an obligation of Cablevision. The Company will not be responsible for uncertain tax positions taken in periods prior to the Distribution other than for certain local income taxes.
Table of Contents
 
 
 
The following table summarizes information relating to the Company's acquired intangible assets at March 31, 2011 and December 31, 2010:
 
 
 
 
The fair value hierarchy is based on inputs to valuation techniques that are used to measure fair value that are either observable or unobservable. Observable inputs reflect assumptions market participants would use in pricing an asset or liability based on market data obtained from independent sources while unobservable
Table of Contents
 
 
inputs reflect a reporting entity's pricing based upon their own market assumptions. The fair value hierarchy consists of the following three levels:
 
 
The following table presents for each of these hierarchy levels, the Company's financial assets and financial liabilities that are measured at fair value on a recurring basis at March 31, 2011 and December 31, 2010:
 
 
 
 
The Company's cash equivalents at March 31, 2011 and December 31, 2010 are classified within Level I of the fair value hierarchy because they are valued using quoted market prices.
 
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
 
The following methods and assumptions were used to estimate fair value of each class of financial instruments for which it is practicable to estimate that value:
 
Credit Facility Debt, Senior Notes and Senior Subordinated Notes
 
The fair values of each of the Company's debt instruments are based on quoted market prices for the same or similar issues or on the current rates offered to the Company for instruments of the same remaining maturities.
 
The carrying values and estimated fair values of the Company's financial instruments, excluding those that are carried at fair value in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets are summarized as follows:
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
Fair value estimates related to the Company's debt instruments presented above are made at a specific point in time, based on relevant market information and information about the financial instrument. These estimates are subjective in nature and involve uncertainties and matters of significant judgments and therefore cannot be determined with precision. Changes in assumptions could significantly affect the estimates.
 
 
The Company classifies its operations into two reportable segments: National Networks, and International and Other. These reportable segments are strategic business units that are managed separately.
 
The Company generally allocates all corporate overhead costs, and includes such costs as executive salaries and benefits, costs of maintaining corporate headquarters, facilities and common support functions (such as human resources, legal, finance, tax, accounting, audit, treasury, risk management, strategic planning and information technology) as well as sales support functions and creative and production services to the Company's two reportable segments.
 
The Company evaluates segment performance based on several factors, of which the primary financial measure is business segment adjusted operating cash flow (defined as operating income (loss) before depreciation and amortization, share-based compensation expense or benefit and restructuring expense or credit), a non-GAAP measure. The Company has presented the components that reconcile adjusted operating cash flow to operating income, an accepted GAAP measure. Information as to the operations of the Company's reportable segments is set forth below.
 
 
Inter-segment eliminations are primarily revenues recognized by the International and Other segment for the licensing of program rights by the national programming networks and transmission revenues recognized by AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology.
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Reconciliation (by Segment and in Total) of Adjusted Operating Cash Flow to Operating Income (Loss) from Continuing Operations
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
A reconciliation of reportable segment amounts to the Company's consolidated balances is as follows:
 
 
 
Substantially all revenues and assets of the Company are attributed to or located in the United States.
 
 
Financial instruments that may potentially subject the Company to a concentration of credit risk consist primarily of cash and cash equivalents and trade accounts receivable. Cash is invested in money market funds and bank time deposits. The Company monitors the financial institutions and money market funds where it invests its cash and cash equivalents with diversification among counterparties to mitigate exposure to any single financial institution. The Company's emphasis is primarily on safety of principal and liquidity and secondarily on maximizing the yield on its investments.
Table of Contents
 
 
The following individual customers accounted for the following percentages of the Company's net revenues for the three months ended March 31,:
 
 
At March 31, 2011, Customer 2 represented 11% of the Company's net trade receivable balances.
 
 
DISH Network Contract Dispute
 
In 2005, subsidiaries of the Company entered into agreements with EchoStar Communications Corporation and its affiliates by which EchoStar Media Holdings Corporation acquired a 20% interest in VOOM HD and EchoStar Satellite LLC (the predecessor to DISH Network, LLC ("DISH Network")) agreed to distribute VOOM on DISH Network for a term. The affiliation agreement with DISH Network for such distribution provides that if VOOM HD fails to spend $100,000 per year (subject to reduction to the extent that the number of offered channels is reduced to fewer than 21), up to a maximum of $500,000 in the aggregate, on VOOM, DISH Network may seek to terminate the agreement under certain circumstances. On January 30, 2008, DISH Network purported to terminate the affiliation agreement, effective February 1, 2008, based on its assertion that VOOM HD had failed to comply with this spending provision in 2006. On January 31, 2008, VOOM HD sought and obtained a temporary restraining order from the New York Supreme Court for New York County prohibiting DISH Network from terminating the affiliation agreement. In conjunction with its request for a temporary restraining order, VOOM HD also requested a preliminary injunction and filed a lawsuit against DISH Network asserting that DISH Network did not have the right to terminate the affiliation agreement. In a decision filed on May 5, 2008, the court denied VOOM HD's motion for a preliminary injunction. On or about May 13, 2008, DISH Network ceased distribution of VOOM on its DISH Network. On May 27, 2008, VOOM HD amended its complaint to seek damages for DISH Network's improper termination of the affiliation agreement. On June 24, 2008, DISH Network answered VOOM HD's amended complaint and asserted counterclaims alleging breach of contract and breach of the duty of good faith and fair dealing with respect to the affiliation agreement. On July 14, 2008, VOOM HD replied to DISH Network's counterclaims. The Company believes that the counterclaims asserted by DISH Network are without merit. VOOM HD and DISH Network each filed cross-motions for summary judgment. In November 2010, the court denied both parties' cross-motions for summary judgment. The court also granted VOOM HD's motion for sanctions based on DISH Network's spoliation of evidence and its motion to exclude DISH Network's principal damages expert. The trial will be scheduled after DISH Network's appeal of the latter two rulings, which is pending.
15-year
 
Broadcast Music, Inc. Matter
 
Broadcast Music, Inc. ("BMI"), an organization that licenses the performance of musical compositions of its members, had alleged that certain of the Company's subsidiaries require a license to exhibit musical compositions in its catalog. BMI agreed to interim fees based on revenues covering certain periods (generally the period commencing from the launch or acquisition of each of the Company's programming networks). In May 2011, the parties reached an agreement with respect to the license fees for an amount that approximated amounts previously accrued, which were $7,226 and $7,040 at March 31, 2011 and December 31, 2010, respectively.
Table of Contents
 
 
Other Legal Matters
 
On April 15, 2011, Thomas C. Dolan, who is expected to become a director of the Company and who is a director and Executive Vice President, Strategy and Development, in the Office of the Chairman at Cablevision, filed a lawsuit against Cablevision and RMH in New York Supreme Court. The lawsuit raises compensation-related claims (seeking approximately $11,000) related to events in 2005. The matter is being handled under the direction of an independent committee of the board of directors of Cablevision. It is expected that in the Distribution Agreement, Cablevision will indemnify the Company and RMH against any liabilities and expenses related to this lawsuit. Based on the Company's assessment of this possible loss contingency, no provision has been made for this matter in the accompanying consolidated financial statements.
 
In addition to the matter discussed above, the Company is party to various lawsuits and claims in the ordinary course of business. Although the outcome of these other matters cannot be predicted with certainty and the impact of the final resolution of these other matters on the Company's results of operations in a particular subsequent reporting period is not known, management does not believe that the resolution of these matters will have a material adverse effect on the financial position of the Company or the ability of the Company to meet its financial obligations as they become due.
 
 
Share-Based Payment Award Activity
 
The following table summarizes activity relating to Company employees who held Cablevision restricted shares for the three months ended March 31, 2011:
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Allocations
 
The Company provides services to and receives services from affiliates of Cablevision. The consolidated financial statements of the Company reflect the application of certain cost allocation policies of Cablevision. Management believes that these allocations have been made on a reasonable basis. However, it is not practicable to determine whether the charged amounts represent amounts that might have been incurred on a stand-alone basis, including as a separate independent publicly owned company, as there are no company-specific or comparable industry benchmarks with which to make such estimates. Further, as many of these transactions are conducted between subsidiaries under common control of Cablevision, amounts charged for these services may not represent amounts that might have been received or incurred if the transactions were based upon arm's length negotiations.
 
The following is a summary of the revenues and expenses included in the Company's consolidated statements of income for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and 2010 related to transactions with or charges from affiliates of Cablevision:
 
 
Revenues, net
 
The Company recorded affiliation fee revenues earned, net of amortization of deferred carriage fees, under affiliation agreements with companies owned by or affiliated with Cablevision. AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology has entered into agreements with affiliates of Cablevision to provide various transponder, technical and support services through 2020.
Table of Contents
 
 
Operating Expenses
 
Production Services
 
The Company provides various studio production services to affiliates of Cablevision, for which the charges are reflected as a reduction of the related expenses.
 
Other Support Functions
 
Affiliates of Cablevision provide various digital media and administrative support functions which primarily include salaries and facilities costs charged to the Company.
 
Health and Welfare Plans
 
Employees of the Company participate in health and welfare plans sponsored by Cablevision. Health and welfare benefit costs have generally been charged by Cablevision based upon the proportionate number of participants in the plans.
 
Corporate General and Administrative Costs, net
 
General and administrative costs, including costs of maintaining corporate headquarters, facilities and common support functions (such as executive management, human resources, legal, finance, tax, accounting, audit, treasury, risk management, strategic planning, information technology, etc.), have been charged to the Company by Cablevision. Additionally, the Company charges affiliates of Cablevision for a portion of the Company's leased facilities utilized by such affiliates. Such costs allocated to the Company have been included in selling, general and administrative expenses and such cost reimbursements are recorded as a reduction to selling, general and administrative expenses.
 
Management Fees
 
The Company has historically paid Cablevision a management fee pursuant to a consulting agreement between Cablevision and certain of the Company's subsidiaries. The Company expects that, at the time of the Distribution, it will terminate such agreement.
 
Advertising
 
The Company incurs advertising expenses charged by subsidiaries and affiliates of Cablevision.
 
Sales Support and Other Functions, net
 
Affiliates of Cablevision provide advertising sales support functions to the Company, which primarily include salaries and general and administrative costs, which are recorded as a charge to selling, general and administrative expenses. Additionally, the Company provides affiliation support functions to an affiliate of Cablevision, which primarily include salaries, facilities, and general and administrative costs. These charges are recorded as a reduction to selling, general and administrative expenses.
 
Share-based Compensation and Long-Term Incentive Plans Expense
 
Cablevision charges the Company its proportionate share of expenses or benefits related to Cablevision's employee stock plans and Cablevision's long-term incentive plans. Such amounts are included in selling, general and administrative expenses in the accompanying consolidated statements of income, and if not funded or satisfied by the Company, reflected as capital contributions from Cablevision in the Company's
Table of Contents
 
 
consolidated financial statements. The long-term incentive plans are funded by the Company and aggregate liabilities of $21,293 and $28,934 related to these plans are included in accrued employee related costs and other long-term liabilities in the Company's consolidated balance sheets at March 31, 2011 and December 31, 2010, respectively. These liabilities include certain performance-based awards for which the performance criteria had not been met as of March 31, 2011 as such awards are based on achievement of certain performance criteria through December 31, 2013. The Company has accrued the amount that it currently believes will ultimately be paid based upon the performance criteria established for these performance-based awards. If it is subsequently determined that the performance criteria for such awards is not probable of being achieved, the Company would reverse the accrual in respect of such award at that time.
 
Treatment of Long-Term Incentive Plans After the Distribution
 
In 2011 and 2010, Cablevision granted three-year performance awards to certain executive officers and other members of the Company's management under Cablevision's 2006 Cash Incentive Plan. To the extent required by the terms of the applicable award agreement, the performance metrics in an employee's award agreement will be adjusted to reflect the exclusion of the Company from the business of Cablevision. Amounts applicable to employees of the Company are and will continue to be reflected as liabilities in the Company's consolidated balance sheets until settled.
 
Deferred compensation awards granted by Cablevision pursuant to Cablevision's Long-Term Incentive Plan (which was superseded by the Cash Incentive Plan in 2006) will be similarly unaffected by the Distribution. Amounts applicable to employees of the Company are and will continue to be reflected as liabilities in the Company's consolidated balance sheets until settled.
 
 
Senior Notes Redemption
 
In April 2011, Rainbow National Services LLC ("RNS"), a wholly-owned indirect subsidiary of the Company, issued a notice of redemption to holders of its 8/% senior notes due September 2012. In connection therewith, on May 13, 2011, RNS redeemed 100% of the outstanding senior notes at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the notes of $300,000, plus accrued and unpaid interest of $5,250 to the redemption date. In order to fund the May 13, 2011 redemption, in May 2011 the Company borrowed $300,000 under its $300,000 revolving credit facility. The Company used cash on hand to fund the payment of accrued and unpaid interest of $5,250. In connection with the redemption, the Company will recognize a loss on extinguishment of debt of $1,183, representing the write-off of the related unamortized deferred financing costs.
3
4
 
Cash Distribution to Cablevision
 
On June 3, 2011, the Company made a cash capital distribution of approximately $21,000 to Cablevision.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20110628165413.txt.gz
TIME:20110628165413
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
Table of Contents
S&C Draft of June 28, 2011
 
 
     Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
Table of Contents
7.75% Senior Notes due 2021
On June 22, 2011, AMC Networks Inc. (the "Company") and certain of its subsidiaries entered into a purchase agreement (the "Purchase Agreement") with Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and JPMorgan Chase Funding Inc., as selling noteholders (the "Selling Noteholders"), and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, as representatives of the initial purchasers (the "Initial Purchasers"). Pursuant to the Purchase Agreement, the Selling Noteholders will sell to the Initial Purchasers $700 million in aggregate principal amount of the Company's 7.75% Senior Notes due 2021 (the "Notes") in connection with an offering of the Notes (the "Offering") to qualified institutional buyers under Rule 144A of the Securities Act of 1933 (the "Securities Act") and to non-U.S. persons outside the United States in reliance on Regulation S under the Securities Act. The Offering is expected to close on June 30, 2011 (the "Closing Date"), subject to customary closing conditions. On the Closing Date, the Company expects to issue the Notes to CSC Holdings, LLC ("CSC Holdings"), the Company's parent, as partial consideration for the transfer to the Company of the AMC Networks business on June 6, 2011 pursuant to the Contribution Agreement, dated as of June 6, 2011 (the "Contribution Agreement"), among the Company, CSC Holdings and Cablevision Systems Corporation. The Company expects that CSC Holdings will transfer the Notes to the Selling Noteholders on the Closing Date in satisfaction and discharge of certain existing debt of CSC Holdings.
Interest on the Notes will accrue at the rate of 7.75% per annum and will be payable semi-annually in arrears on January 15 and June 15 of each year, commencing on January 15, 2012. The Notes will mature on July 15, 2021.
The Notes will be redeemable in whole or in part, at any time on or after July 15, 2016, at a redemption price equal to 103.875% of the principal amount thereof (plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, if any, to the date of such repurchase), declining annually to 100% of the principal amount thereof (plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, if any, to the date of such repurchase) beginning on July 15, 2019.
In addition, if the Company experiences certain change of control events, the holders of the Notes may require the Company to repurchase for cash all or a portion of their Notes at a price equal to 101% of the principal amount thereof (plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, if any, to the date of such repurchase).
The notes will be guaranteed on a senior unsecured basis by each of the Company's existing and future domestic restricted subsidiaries, subject to certain exceptions.
Senior Secured Credit Facility
On June 22, 2011, the Company determined the pricing of a senior secured credit facility that it expects to enter into pursuant to a Credit Agreement (the "Credit Agreement") to be dated as of June 30, 2011, among the Company, as the Borrower, certain subsidiaries of the Borrower, as
Table of Contents
restricted subsidiaries, JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, Collateral Agent and L/C Issuer, the lenders party thereto and the other financial institutions party thereto.
The Credit Agreement is expected to provide the Company with senior secured credit facilities consisting of a $1,130 million Term Loan A Facility (the "Term A Facility"), a $595 million Term Loan B Facility (the "Term B Facility") and a $500 million revolving credit facility (the "Revolving Facility"). The Company expects to issue approximately $577 million of borrowings under the Term B Facility (the "Contribution Loans") to CSC Holdings as partial consideration for the transfer to the Company of the AMC Networks business on June 6, 2011 pursuant to the Contribution Agreement. The Company expects that CSC Holdings will transfer the Contribution Loans to the Selling Noteholders on the Closing Date in satisfaction and discharge of certain existing debt of CSC Holdings. The Company does not expect to draw on the Revolving Facility on the Closing Date.
Although the Company expects the lenders under the senior secured credit facilities to fund the Company's borrowings under these facilities on the Closing Date, they are not obligated to do so and there can be no assurance that any such funding will be available. The funding of the senior secured credit facilities on the Closing Date is also subject to customary closing conditions.
Borrowings under the Credit Agreement will bear interest at a floating rate, which at the option of the Company may be (1) for the Term A Facility and the Revolving Facility, either (a) a base rate plus an additional rate ranging from 0.50% to 1.25% per annum (determined based on a cash flow ratio), or (b) a Eurodollar rate plus an additional rate ranging from 1.50% to 2.25% per annum (determined based on a cash flow ratio), and (2) for the Term B Facility, either (a) 2.00% per annum above the base rate, or (b) 3.00% per annum above a Eurodollar rate (and subject to a LIBOR floor of 1.00% per annum).
The Credit Agreement will require the Company to pay a commitment fee of between 0.25% and 0.50% (determined based on a cash flow ratio) in respect of the average daily unused commitments under the Revolving Facility. The Company will also be required to pay customary letter of credit fees, as well as fronting fees, to banks that issue letters of credit pursuant to the Credit Agreement.
All obligations under the Credit Agreement will be guaranteed by certain of the Company's existing and future direct and indirect domestic subsidiaries that are not designated as unrestricted subsidiaries in accordance with the Credit Agreement (the "Subsidiary Guarantors"). All obligations under the Credit Agreement, including the guarantees of those obligations, will be secured by certain assets of the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors.
The Credit Agreement will contain customary affirmative and negative covenants and will also require the Company to comply with the following financial covenants: (i) a maximum ratio of net debt to annual operating cash flow (each to be defined in the Credit Agreement) of 7.00:1 initially, and decreasing in increments to 5.50:1 for periods on and after January 1, 2015; and (ii) a minimum ratio of annual operating cash flow to annual total interest expense (to be defined in the Credit Agreement) of 2.50:1 initially, increasing to 2.75:1 for periods on and after January 1, 2014.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrants have duly caused this report to be signed on their behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Dated: June 28, 2011


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20110701170347.txt.gz
TIME:20110701170347
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
     Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Table of Contents
7.75% Senior Notes due 2021
     On June 30, 2011 (the "Closing Date"), AMC Networks Inc. ("AMC Networks") issued $700 million in aggregate principal amount of its 7.75% Senior Notes due 2021 (the "Notes") to CSC Holdings, LLC ("CSC Holdings"), as partial consideration for the transfer to AMC Networks of the AMC Networks business on June 6, 2011. The transfer was made pursuant to the Contribution Agreement, dated as of June 6, 2011 (the "Contribution Agreement"), among AMC Networks, CSC Holdings and Cablevision Systems Corporation ("Cablevision"), and was in connection with the spin-off of AMC Networks from Cablevision (the "Spin-Off"), which was completed on June 30, 2011.
     CSC Holdings, which was until the Spin-Off the direct parent of AMC Networks, transferred the Notes on the Closing Date to Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and JPMorgan Chase Funding Inc. (the "Selling Noteholders"), in satisfaction and discharge of certain existing debt of CSC Holdings. Pursuant to a Purchase Agreement, dated as of June 22, 2011, among the Company, the Selling Noteholders and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, as representatives of the initial purchasers (the "Initial Purchasers"), the Selling Noteholders sold the Notes on the Closing Date to Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, as representatives of the initial purchasers (the "Initial Purchasers") in connection with the offering of the Notes (the "Offering") to qualified institutional buyers under Rule 144A of the Securities Act of 1933 (the "Securities Act") and to non-U.S. persons outside the United States in reliance on Regulation S under the Securities Act.
     The Notes were issued under an indenture dated as of June 30, 2011 (the "Indenture"), among AMC Networks, certain of its subsidiaries, as Guarantors, and U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee.
     Interest on the Notes accrues at the rate of 7.75% per annum and is payable semi-annually in arrears on January 15 and July 15 of each year, commencing on January 15, 2012. The Notes mature on July 15, 2021.
     The Notes may be redeemed, in whole or in part, at any time on or after July 15, 2016, at a redemption price equal to 103.875% of the principal amount thereof (plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, if any, to the date of such repurchase), declining annually to 100% of the principal amount thereof (plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, if any, to the date of such repurchase) beginning on July 15, 2019.
     In addition, if AMC Networks experiences a Change of Control (as defined in the Indenture), the holders of the Notes may require AMC Networks to repurchase for cash all or a portion of their Notes at a price equal to 101% of the principal amount thereof (plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, if any, to the date of such repurchase).
Table of Contents
     The notes are guaranteed on a senior unsecured basis by each of AMC Networks' existing and future domestic restricted subsidiaries (the "Subsidiary Guarantors"), subject to certain exceptions.
     The Indenture contains certain affirmative and negative covenants applicable to AMC Networks and its restricted subsidiaries. These include restrictions on AMC Networks' ability to incur additional indebtedness, make investments in entities that are not "Restricted Subsidiaries" (as defined in the Indenture), place liens on its assets, enter into certain affiliate transactions and make certain restricted payments, including restrictions on AMC Networks' ability to pay dividends on its common stock.
     The Indenture has been filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and the description of the Indenture contained herein is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Indenture, which is incorporated into this Item 1.01 by reference.
     In connection with the Offering, AMC Networks entered into the registration rights agreement, dated as of June 30, 2011 (the "Registration Rights Agreement"), among AMC Networks, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Initial Purchasers, pursuant to which AMC Networks agreed to file a registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") with respect to an offer to exchange the Notes for registered notes which will have terms identical in all material respects to the Notes except that the registered notes will not contain terms that provide for restrictions on transfer, and use its commercially reasonable best efforts to cause the exchange offer registration statement to be declared effective by the SEC by July 1, 2012. In certain circumstances, AMC Networks may be required to file a shelf registration statement with the SEC registering the resale of the Notes by the holders thereof, in lieu of an exchange offer to such holders. AMC Networks will be required to pay specified additional interest on the Notes if it fails to comply with its registration obligations under the Registration Rights Agreement.
     The Registration Rights Agreement has been filed as Exhibit 99.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and the description of the Registration Rights Agreement contained herein is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Registration Rights Agreement, which is incorporated into this Item 1.01 by reference.
Senior Secured Credit Facility
     On June 30, 2011, AMC Networks, as Borrower, and certain of its subsidiaries, as restricted subsidiaries, entered into a Credit Agreement (the "Credit Agreement") with JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, Collateral Agent and L/C Issuer, the lenders party thereto and the other financial institutions party thereto.
     The Credit Agreement provides AMC Networks with senior secured credit facilities consisting of a $1,130 million Term Loan A Facility (the "Term A Facility"), a $595 million Term Loan B Facility (the "Term B Facility") and a $500 million revolving credit facility (the "Revolving Facility"). On the Closing Date, AMC Networks issued approximately $577 million of borrowings under the Term B Facility (the "Contribution Loans") to CSC Holdings as partial consideration for the transfer to AMC Networks of the AMC Networks business on June 6, 2011
Table of Contents
pursuant to the Contribution Agreement. Pursuant to separate Payment in Satisfaction of Revolving Loan Agreements, dated as of June 22, 2011, between CSC Holdings and each of the Selling Noteholders, CSC Holdings transferred the Contribution Loans to the Selling Noteholders in satisfaction and discharge of certain existing debt of CSC Holdings. The Revolving Facility was not drawn upon on the Closing Date.
     Borrowings under the Credit Agreement bear interest at a floating rate, which at the option of AMC Networks may be (1) for the Term A Facility and the Revolving Facility, either (a) a base rate plus an additional rate ranging from 0.50% to 1.25% per annum (determined based on a cash flow ratio), or (b) a Eurodollar rate plus an additional rate ranging from 1.50% to 2.25% per annum (determined based on a cash flow ratio), and (2) for the Term B Facility, either (a) 2.00% per annum above the base rate, or (b) 3.00% per annum above a Eurodollar rate (and subject to a LIBOR floor of 1.00% per annum).
     The Credit Agreement requires AMC Networks to pay a commitment fee of between 0.25% and 0.50% (determined based on a cash flow ratio) in respect of the average daily unused commitments under the Revolving Facility. AMC Networks is also required to pay customary letter of credit fees, as well as fronting fees, to banks that issue letters of credit pursuant to the Credit Agreement.
     All obligations under the Credit Agreement are guaranteed by certain of AMC Networks' existing and future domestic restricted subsidiaries in accordance with the Credit Agreement. All obligations under the Credit Agreement, including the guarantees of those obligations, are secured by certain assets of AMC Networks and these subsidiaries.
     The Credit Agreement contains certain affirmative and negative covenants similar to those contained in the Indenture and also requires AMC Networks to comply with the following financial covenants: (i) a maximum ratio of net debt to annual operating cash flow (each defined in the Credit Agreement) of 7.00:1 initially, and decreasing in increments to 5.50:1 for periods on and after January 1, 2015; and (ii) a minimum ratio of annual operating cash flow to annual total interest expense (as defined in the Credit Agreement) of 2.50:1 initially, increasing to 2.75:1 for periods on and after January 1, 2014.
     The Credit Agreement has been filed as Exhibit 99.3 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and the description of the Credit Agreement contained herein is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Credit Agreement, which is incorporated into this Item 1.01 by reference.
     On June 28, 2011, the following persons were elected as directors of AMC Networks effective at the time of the distribution by Cablevision Systems Corporation ("Cablevision") of all of the common stock of AMC Networks to the stockholders of Cablevision (the "Distribution"):
Table of Contents
     Elected by the holder of AMC Networks Class A Common Stock:
     Elected by the holder of AMC Networks Class B Common Stock:
     Information concerning these individuals, including biographies and compensation information, is included in AMC Networks' Form 10 registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). Such information is incorporated by reference into this Form 8-K.
     Messrs. Ashe, Tow (Chairman) and Wright have been appointed to serve as members of the Audit Committee of the AMC Networks Board of Directors. The Board of Directors has determined that each member of the Audit Committee is "independent" within the meaning of the rules of both The NASDAQ Stock Market LLC and the SEC, has not participated in the preparation of the financial statements of AMC Networks or any current subsidiary of AMC Networks at any time during the past three years, is able to read and understand fundamental financial statements, including balance sheets, income statements and cash flow statements, and is an "audit committee financial expert" within the meaning of the rules of the SEC.
     Messrs. Ashe (Chairman) and Tow have been appointed to serve as members of the Compensation Committee of the AMC Board of Directors. The Board of Directors has determined that each member of the Compensation Committee is "independent" under the rules of The NASDAQ Stock Market LLC.
     On June 28, 2010, AMC Networks filed its amended and restated certificate of incorporation which, among other things, effected a reclassification of its common stock so that its outstanding common stock was reclassified into 57,813,256.75 shares of Class A Common Stock and 13,534,418.25 shares of Class B Common Stock. The amended and restated
Table of Contents
certificate of incorporation, including such reclassification information, has been filed as Exhibit 99.4 to this Form 8-K.
     On June 30, 2010, AMC Networks' amended and restated by-laws became effective. The amended and restated by-laws have been filed as Exhibit 99.5 to this Form 8-K.
     On June 30, 2011, Cablevision effected the distribution of all of AMC's outstanding common stock. In the Distribution, each holder of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock of record as of the close of business, New York City time, on June 16, 2011 (the "record date"), received one share of AMC Class A Common Stock for every four shares of Cablevision NY Group Class A Common Stock held on the record date. Each record holder of Cablevision NY Group Class B Common Stock received one share of AMC Class B Common Stock for every four shares of Cablevision NY Group Class B Common Stock held on the record date. In the Distribution, an aggregate of 57,813,256.75 shares of AMC Class A Common Stock and 13,534,418.25 shares of AMC Class B Common Stock were issued.
Table of Contents
     (d)
     99.1 Indenture, dated June 30, 2011, between AMC Networks Inc., the subsidiaries of AMC Networks named therein, as Guarantors, and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee.
     99.2 Registration Rights Agreement dated June 30, 2011 between AMC Networks Inc., the subsidiaries of AMC Networks named therein, and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, as representatives of the several initial purchasers.
     99.3 Credit Agreement dated June 30, 2011 among AMC Networks Inc., as the Borrower, certain subsidiaries of AMC Networks named therein, as restricted subsidiaries, JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, Collateral Agent and L/C Issuer, the lenders party thereto and the other financial institutions party thereto.
     99.4 Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation of AMC Networks Inc.
     99.5 Amended and Restated By-Laws of AMC Networks Inc.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Dated: July 1, 2011

Exhibit 99.1
EXECUTION VERSION
 
 
 
 
 
 
          INDENTURE, dated as of June 30, 2011, among AMC Networks Inc., a Delaware corporation (hereinafter called the "Company"), the Guarantors (as defined herein) and U.S. Bank National Association, a national banking association, as trustee (hereinafter called the "Trustee").
          The Company has duly authorized the creation of an issue of its 7.75% Senior Notes due 2021 (hereinafter called the "Initial Securities," and together with any Exchange Securities (as defined herein) and any Additional Securities, the "Securities"), of substantially the tenor and amount hereinafter set forth, and to provide therefor the Company has duly authorized the execution and delivery of this Indenture.
          Upon the issuance of the Exchange Securities, if any, or the effectiveness of the Exchange Offer Registration Statement (as defined herein) or, under certain circumstances, the effectiveness of the Shelf Registration Statement (as defined herein), this Indenture shall be subject to, and shall be governed by, the provisions of the Trust Indenture Act that are required to be part of this Indenture and shall to the extent applicable be governed by such provisions.
          NOW, THEREFORE, THIS INDENTURE WITNESSETH:
          For and in consideration of the premises and the purchase of the Securities by the Holders thereof, it is mutually covenanted and agreed, for the equal and proportionate benefit of all Holders of the Securities, as follows:
          .
Section 101. Definitions
          For all purposes of this Indenture, except as otherwise expressly provided or unless the context otherwise requires:
     (a) the terms defined in this Article have the meanings assigned to them in this Article and include the plural as well as the singular;
     (b) all other terms used herein which are defined in the Trust Indenture Act, either directly or by reference therein, have the meanings assigned to them therein;
     (c) all accounting terms not otherwise defined herein have the meanings assigned to them in accordance with GAAP (as defined herein); and
     (d) the words "herein", "hereof" and "hereunder" and other words of similar import refer to this Indenture as a whole and not to any particular Article, Section or other subdivision.
 
          "Acquired Indebtedness" means Indebtedness of a Person (a) existing at the time such Person is merged with or into the Company or a Subsidiary or becomes a Subsidiary or (b) assumed in connection with the acquisition of assets from such Person.
          "Additional Securities" means an unlimited maximum aggregate principal amount of 7.75% Senior Notes due 2021 (other than the Initial Securities and Exchange Securities) issued under this Indenture in accordance with Section 303 and subject to Section 1007 hereof.
          "Affiliate" means, with respect to any specified Person, any other Person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by or under direct or indirect common control with such specified Person. For the purposes of this definition, "," when used with respect to any specified Person, means the power to direct the management and policies of such Person, directly or indirectly, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise, and the terms "" and "" have meanings correlative to the foregoing.
control
controlling
controlled
          "Affiliation Agreement" means any agreement between the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries and a distributor pursuant to which such distributor agrees, among other things, to distribute and exhibit to its subscribers programming of the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be.
          "Agent Members" has the meaning specified in Section 313.
          "Annual Operating Cash Flow" means, as of any date, Operating Cash Flow for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters covered by the then most recent report furnished or deemed furnished to the Trustee and the Holders of Securities under Section 703.
          "Asset Sale" means:
Notwithstanding the preceding, the following items shall be deemed not to be Asset Sales:
 
 
          "Bankruptcy Law" has the meaning specified in Section 501.
          "Beneficial Owner" has the meaning assigned to such term in Rule 13d-3 and Rule 13d-5 under the Exchange Act. The terms "Beneficially Owns" and "Beneficially Owned" shall each have a corresponding meaning.
          "Board Resolution" means a copy of a resolution certified by the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of the Company to have been duly adopted by the Board of Directors and to be in full force and effect on the date of such certification and delivered to the Trustee.
          "Book-Entry Security" means a Security represented by a Global Security and registered in the name of the nominee of the Depository.
          "Business Day" means each Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday and Friday that is not a day on which banking institutions in The City of New York are authorized or obligated by law, regulation or executive order to close.
          "Cablevision" means Cablevision Systems Corporation, a Delaware corporation.
          "Capital Stock" means, with respect to any Person, any and all shares, interests, participations or other equivalents (however designated) of such Person's capital stock whether now outstanding or issued after the date of this Indenture, including, without limitation, all Common Stock, Preferred Stock and Disqualified Stock.
          "Capitalized Lease Obligation" means any obligation of a Person to pay rent or other amounts under a lease (or other agreement conveying the right to use) with respect to any property, whether real, personal or mixed, which obligation is required to be accounted for as a capital lease on the balance sheet of such Person in accordance with GAAP, and the amount of such Capitalized Lease Obligation shall be the amount so required to be accounted for as a capital lease.
 
          "Cash Equivalents" means:
 
          "Cash Flow Ratio" means, as of any date, the ratio of (a) the sum of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of all Net Debt outstanding on such date determined on a consolidated basis, but excluding all Interest Swap Obligations and all Monetization Indebtedness, plus (but without duplication of Indebtedness supported by letters of credit) the aggregate undrawn face amount of all letters of credit outstanding on such date to (b) Annual Operating Cash Flow.
          "Change of Control" means the occurrence of any of the following:
 
          "Collateral Documents" means, collectively, the security agreement and each of the other agreements, instruments or documents that creates or purports to create a Lien for the benefit of the "secured parties" named in the Credit Agreement.
          "Commission" means the United States Securities and Exchange Commission and any successor thereto.
          "Common Stock" means, with respect to any Person, any and all shares, interests and participations (however designated and whether voting or non-voting) in such Person's common equity, whether now outstanding or issued after the date of this Indenture, and includes, without limitation, all series and classes of such common stock.
          "Company" means the Person named as the "Company" in the first paragraph of this instrument, until a successor Person shall have become such pursuant to the applicable provisions of this Indenture, and thereafter "Company" shall mean such successor Person. To the extent necessary to comply with the requirements of the provisions of Trust Indenture Act Sections 310 through 317 as they are applicable to the Company, the term "Company" shall include any other obligor with respect to the Securities for the purposes of complying with such provisions.
          "Company Request" or "Company Order" means a written request or order signed in the name of the Company (a) by its Chairman, Chief Executive Officer, a Vice Chairman, its President or a Vice President and (b) by its Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer, its Secretary or an Assistant Secretary and delivered to the Trustee; , , that such written request or order may be signed by any two of the officers or directors listed in clause (a) above in lieu of being signed by one of such officers or directors listed in such clause (a) and one of the officers listed in clause (b) above.
provided
however
          "Consolidated Secured Leverage Ratio" means, as of any date, the ratio of:
 
          "Continuing Directors" means, as of any date of determination, any member of the board of directors of the Company who:
          "Corporate Trust Office" means the office of the Trustee at which at any particular time its corporate trust business shall be administered, which office on the date hereof is located at 100 Wall Street, 16 Floor, New York, New York 10005.
th
          "corporation" includes corporations, associations, partnerships, limited liability companies, companies and business trusts.
          "Credit Agreement" means that certain credit agreement, dated as of the date of this Indenture, by and among the Company, certain of its Subsidiaries, JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, the other agents party thereto and the lenders party thereto from time to time, as amended, modified, renewed, refunded, replaced, restated, restructured, increased, substituted or refinanced in whole or in part from time to time, regardless of whether such amendment, modification, renewal, refunding, replacement, restatement, restructuring, increase, substitution or refinancing is with the same financial institutions or otherwise.
          "Credit Facilities" means one or more debt or borrowing facilities (including, without limitation, the Credit Agreement), commercial paper facilities or indentures, in each case with banks or other institutional lenders or a trustee, providing for revolving credit loans, term loans, receivables financing (including through the sale of receivables to such lenders or to special purpose entities formed to borrow from such lenders against such receivables), letters of credit or issuances of notes, in each case, as amended, modified, renewed, refunded, replaced, restated, restructured, increased, substituted or refinanced in whole or in part from time to time, regardless of whether such amendment, modification, renewal, refunding, replacement, restatement, restructuring, increase, substitution or refinancing is with the same financial institutions or otherwise.
          "Cumulative Cash Flow Credit" means the sum of:
 
          For purposes of this definition, the net proceeds in property other than cash received by the Company as contemplated by clauses (b) and (c) above shall be valued at the Fair Market Value thereof as of the date of receipt by the Company.
          "Cumulative Interest Expense" means, for the period commencing on July 1, 2011 and ending on the last day of the most recent month preceding the proposed Restricted Payment for which financial information is available, the aggregate of the interest expense of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, including interest expense attributable to Capitalized Lease Obligations.
          "Debt" with respect to any Person means, without duplication, any liability, whether or not contingent:
 
          "Debt" does not include:
          "Default" means any event that is, or after notice or passage of time or both would be, an Event of Default.
          "Deferred Carriage Fee Amortization" means the amount identified in the Company's consolidated statement of cash flows on the line identified as "Amortization of Deferred Carriage Fees" and determined in accordance with GAAP.
          "Depository" means, with respect to the Securities issued in the form of one or more Book-Entry Securities, The Depository Trust Company or another Person designated as Depository by the Company, which must be a clearing agency registered under the Exchange Act.
          "Disqualified Stock" means any Capital Stock of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary which, by its terms (or by the terms of any security into which it is convertible or for which it is exchangeable), or upon the happening of any event, matures or is mandatorily redeemable, pursuant to a sinking fund obligation or otherwise, or is redeemable at the option of the holder thereof, in whole or in part, on or prior to the maturity date of the Securities.
          "Distribution Agreement" means the Distribution Agreement dated as of June 6, 2011, between the Company and CSC Holdings, LLC, relating to, , the contribution of the Programming Network Business to the Company.
inter alia
          "Distribution Transaction" means (i) the contribution to the Company of the Programming Network Business from CSC Holdings, LLC in exchange for the issuance or transfer to CSC Holdings, LLC of common stock of the Company, the notes and loans under the Credit Agreement, (ii) the distribution by CSC Holdings, LLC of the Company's common stock to Cablevision, and (iii) the distribution by Cablevision of the Company's common stock to the common shareholders of Cablevision, in each case pursuant to the Distribution Agreement.
          "Dolan Family Interests" means (i) any Dolan Family Member, (ii) any trusts for the benefit of any Dolan Family Members, (iii) any estate or testamentary trust of any Dolan Family Member for the benefit of any Dolan Family Members, (iv) any executor, administrator, conservator or legal or personal representative of any Person or Persons specified in clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) above to the extent acting in such capacity on behalf of any Dolan Family Member or Members and not individually, (v) any corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other similar entity, in each case 80% of which is owned and controlled by any of the foregoing
 
or combination of the foregoing, and (vi) The Dolan Family Foundation, a New York not-for-profit corporation.
          "Dolan Family Members" means Charles F. Dolan, his spouse, his descendants and any spouse of any of such descendants.
          "Domestic Subsidiary" means any Restricted Subsidiary other than a Restricted Subsidiary that is (i) a "controlled foreign corporation" under Section 957 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (other than any such entity that Guarantees Indebtedness of the Company or of any of its other Domestic Subsidiaries), or (ii) a Subsidiary of an entity described in the preceding clause (i).
          "Equity Interests" means Capital Stock and all warrants, options or other rights to acquire Capital Stock (but excluding any debt security that is convertible into, or exchangeable for, Capital Stock).
          "Event of Default" has the meaning specified in Article Five.
          "Exchange Act" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
          "Exchange Offer" means the offer by the Company to the Holders of the Initial Securities or any Additional Securities to exchange all of the Initial Securities or such Additional Securities, as the case may be, for Exchange Securities, as provided for in the Registration Rights Agreement.
          "Exchange Offer Registration Statement" means the Exchange Offer Registration Statement as defined in the Registration Rights Agreement.
          "Exchange Securities" has the meaning specified in the first recital of this Indenture and refers to any Securities containing terms substantially identical to the Initial Securities and Additional Securities (except that (a) such Exchange Securities shall not contain terms with respect to transfer restrictions and shall be registered under the Securities Act, and (b) certain provisions relating to an increase in the stated rate of interest thereon shall be eliminated) that are issued and exchanged for the Initial Securities or Additional Securities in accordance with the Exchange Offer, as provided for in the Registration Rights Agreement and this Indenture.
          "Existing Indebtedness" means the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries (other than Indebtedness under the Credit Agreement) in existence on the date of this Indenture after giving effect to the application of the proceeds of (i) the Securities and (ii) any borrowings made under the Credit Agreement on the date of this Indenture.
          "Fair Market Value" means the price that would be paid in an arm's length transaction between an informed and willing seller under no compulsion to sell and an informed and willing buyer under no compulsion to buy, as determined, unless otherwise specified, in good faith by the board of directors or senior management, whose determination in all cases shall be conclusive.
 
          "Generally Accepted Accounting Principles" or "GAAP" means U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, as in effect on the date of determination, consistently applied.
          "Global Security" means one or more Securities evidencing all or a part of the Securities to be issued as Book-Entry Securities, issued to the Depository in accordance with Section 303 and bearing the legend prescribed in Section 206 and, in the case of a Restricted Security, the legend prescribed in Section 205.
          "Guarantee" means, as to any Person, a guarantee other than by endorsement of negotiable instruments for collection in the ordinary course of business, direct or indirect, in any manner including, without limitation, by way of a pledge of assets or through letters of credit or reimbursement agreements in respect thereof, of all or any part of any Indebtedness of another Person.
          "Guarantors" means:
and their respective successors and assigns until released from their obligations under their Note Guarantees and this Indenture in accordance with the terms of this Indenture.
          "Hedging Obligations" means, with respect to any specified Person, the obligations of such Person under:
          "Holder" means a Person in whose name a Security is registered in the Security Register.
          "Indebtedness" with respect to any Person means the Debt of such Person; that, for purposes of the definition of "" (including the term "" to the extent incorporated in such definition) and for purposes of the definition of "," the term "" shall not be interpreted to extend to a Guarantee under which recourse is limited to the Capital Stock of an entity that is not a Restricted Subsidiary.
provided
Indebtedness
Debt
Event of Default
Guarantee
 
          "Indenture" means this instrument as originally executed (including all exhibits and schedules hereto) and as it may from time to time be supplemented or amended by one or more indentures supplemental hereto entered into pursuant to the applicable provisions hereof.
          "Initial Interest Payment Date" has the meaning specified in Section 301.
          "Initial Securities" has the meaning specified in the recitals to this Indenture.
          "Insignificant Subsidiary" means any Subsidiary designated by the Company as an "Insignificant Subsidiary;" that the total assets of all Subsidiaries that are so designated do not in the aggregate at any time exceed 3% of the assets of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as reflected on the Company's most recent consolidating balance sheet prepared in accordance with GAAP.
provided
          "Interest Payment Date" means the Stated Maturity of an installment of interest on the Securities.
          "Interest Swap Obligations" means, with respect to any Person, the obligations of such Person pursuant to any arrangement with any other Person whereby, directly or indirectly, such Person is entitled to receive from time to time periodic payments calculated by applying either a floating or a fixed rate of interest on a stated notional amount in exchange for periodic payments made by such Person calculated by applying a fixed or a floating rate of interest on the same notional amount.
          "Investment" means any advance, loan, account receivable (other than an account receivable arising in the ordinary course of business or owing to the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary from any Unrestricted Subsidiary for management or other services or other overhead or shared expenses allocated in the ordinary course of business provided by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary to such Unrestricted Subsidiary), or other extension of credit (excluding, however, accrued and unpaid interest in respect of any advance, loan or other extension of credit) or any capital contribution to (by means of transfers of property to others, payments for property or services for the account or use of others, or otherwise), any purchase or ownership of any stock, bonds, notes, debentures or other securities (including, without limitation, any interests in any limited liability company, partnership, joint venture or any similar enterprise) of, or any bank accounts with or Guarantee of any Indebtedness or other obligations of, any Unrestricted Subsidiary or Affiliate that is not a Subsidiary; that (a) the term "" shall not include any transaction that would otherwise constitute an Investment of the Company or a Subsidiary to the extent that the consideration provided by the Company or such Subsidiary in connection therewith consists of Capital Stock of the Company (other than Disqualified Stock) and (b) the term "" shall not be interpreted to extend to a guarantee under which recourse is limited to the Capital Stock of an entity that is not a Restricted Subsidiary.
provided
Investment
Guarantee
          "Investment Grade Rating" means (1) a rating of BBB- or better, in the case of S&P (or its equivalent under any successor Rating Categories of S&P) and a rating of Baa3 or better, in the case of Moody's (or its equivalent under any successor Rating Categories of Moody's), or (2) in each case, if a Rating Agency in the foregoing clause (1) ceases to rate the
 
Securities for reasons outside the control of the Company, an equivalent Rating Category of any other Rating Agency.
          "Lease" means any capital lease, operating lease, equipment lease, real property lease or other lease.
          "Lien" means any lien, security interest, charge or encumbrance of any kind (including any conditional sale or other title retention agreement, any lease in the nature of a security interest and any agreement to give any security interest). A Person shall be deemed to own subject to a Lien any property which such Person has acquired or holds subject to the interest of a vendor or lessor under a conditional sale agreement, capital lease or other title retention agreement.
          "Liquidated Damages" means all liquidated damages then owing pursuant to Section 4 of the Registration Rights Agreement, or, in the case of Additional Securities, the applicable section of the registration rights agreement entered into with respect to those Additional Securities.
          "Material Subsidiary" means a Subsidiary (or Subsidiaries which together constitute a Material Subsidiary) that meets any of the following conditions:
          "Maturity" when used with respect to any Security means the date on which the principal of such Security becomes due and payable as therein or herein provided whether at the Stated Maturity, by declaration of acceleration or otherwise.
          "Monetization Indebtedness" means any Indebtedness of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary thereof issued in connection with a Monetization Transaction; that, (i) on the date of its incurrence, the purchase price or principal amount of such Monetization Indebtedness does not exceed the Fair Market Value of the securities that are the subject of such Monetization Transaction on such date and (ii) the obligations of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries with respect to the purchase price or principal amount of such Monetization Indebtedness (x) may be satisfied in full by delivery of the securities that are the subject of such Monetization Transaction and any related options on such securities or any proceeds received by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary thereof on account of such options; that if the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary no longer owns sufficient securities that were the subject of such Monetization Transaction and/or related options on such securities to satisfy in full the obligations of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries under such Monetization Indebtedness, such Indebtedness shall no longer be deemed to be Monetization Indebtedness, and (y) are not secured by any Liens on any of the Company's or its Restricted Subsidiaries' assets
provided
provided
 
other than the securities that are the subject of such Monetization Transaction and the related options on such securities.
          "Monetization Transaction" means a transaction pursuant to which (i) securities received pursuant to an Asset Sale are sold, transferred or otherwise conveyed (including by way of a forward purchase agreement, prepaid forward sale agreement, secured borrowing or similar agreement) within 180 days of such Asset Sale and (ii) the Company receives (including by way of borrowing under Monetization Indebtedness) not less than 75% of the Fair Market Value of such securities in the form of cash.
          "Moody's" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc. and its successors.
          "Net Debt" means, as to the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries as at any date of determination, the aggregate amount of all Indebtedness of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries, less the aggregate amount of Qualified Cash of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries as of such date in an aggregate amount not to exceed 33% of Operating Cash Flow for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters covered by the then most recent report furnished or deemed furnished to the Trustee and the Holders of Securities under Section 703.
          "Net Proceeds" means the aggregate cash proceeds, including payments in respect of deferred payment obligations (to the extent corresponding to the principal, but not the interest component, thereof) received by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries in respect of any Asset Sale (including, without limitation, any cash received upon the sale or other disposition of any non-cash consideration received in any Asset Sale), net of (1) the direct costs relating to such Asset Sale, including, without limitation, legal, accounting, investment banking and brokerage fees, and sales commissions, and any relocation expenses incurred as a result thereof, (2) taxes paid or payable as a result thereof, in each case, after taking into account any available tax credits or deductions and any tax sharing arrangements, (3) amounts required to be applied to the repayment of Indebtedness or other liabilities, secured by a Lien on the asset or assets that were the subject of such Asset Sale, or is required to be paid as a result of such sale, (4) any reserve for adjustment in respect of the sale price of such asset or assets established in accordance with GAAP and (5) appropriate amounts to be provided by the Company or its Restricted Subsidiaries as a reserve against liabilities associated with such Asset Sale, including, without limitation, pension and other post employment benefit liabilities, liabilities related to environmental matters and liabilities under any indemnification obligations associated with such Asset Sale, all as determined in accordance with GAAP.
          "Note Guarantee" means a Guarantee of the Securities pursuant to this Indenture.
          "Offer Amount" has the meaning specified in Section 1108.
          "Offer Period" has the meaning specified in Section 1108.
          "Offering Memorandum" means the final offering memorandum, dated June 22, 2011, relating to the sale of the Initial Securities.
 
          "Officers' Certificate" means a certificate signed by (a) the Chairman, Chief Executive Officer, a Vice Chairman, the President, a Vice President or the Treasurer of the Company and (b) the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of the Company and delivered to the Trustee; , , that such certificate may be signed by two of the officers or directors listed in clause (a) above in lieu of being signed by one of such officers or directors listed in such clause (a) and one of the officers listed in clause (b) above.
provided
however
          "Operating Cash Flow" means, for any period, the following for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP: (a) aggregate operating revenues minus (b) aggregate operating expenses (including technical, programming, sales, selling, general and administrative expenses and salaries and other compensation, in each case net of amounts allocated to Affiliates, but excluding depreciation and amortization (but, for the avoidance of doubt, depreciation and amortization shall not include the amortization of programming expenses (films, series, shows and other content), which is treated as an operating expense), charges and credits relating to employee stock plans, and restructuring charges and credits and, to the extent otherwise included in operating expenses, any losses resulting from a write-off or write-down of Investments by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary in Affiliates), plus (c), without duplication, Deferred Carriage Fee Amortization; , , that for purposes of determining Operating Cash Flow for any period (A) there shall be excluded all management fees paid to the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary during such period by any Unrestricted Subsidiary other than any such amounts settled in cash to the extent not in excess of 5% of Operating Cash Flow for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries as determined without including any such fees, (B) there shall be excluded operating expenses in connection with the Distribution Transaction in an amount not to exceed $5.0 million in the aggregate, (C) the amount of Operating Cash Flow attributable to any non-wholly owned Restricted Subsidiary shall be included only to the extent of the Company's direct or indirect economic interest in the Equity Interests of such non-wholly owned Restricted Subsidiary; , that the amount of Operating Cash Flow attributable to all non-wholly owned Restricted Subsidiaries shall in no event exceed 10% of the total Operating Cash Flow for such period, and (D) Operating Cash Flow for such period shall be increased or reduced, as the case may be, by the Operating Cash Flow of assets or businesses acquired or disposed of (that in each case it has an impact on Annual Operating Cash Flow of at least $1.0 million) (including by means of any redesignation of any Subsidiary pursuant to Section 1012) by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary on or after the first day of such period, determined on a pro forma basis (it being agreed that such pro forma calculations may be based upon GAAP as applied in the preparation of the financial statements for the Company, delivered in accordance with Section 703 rather than as applied in the financial statements of the entity whose assets were acquired and may include, in the Company's discretion, a reasonable estimate of savings resulting from any such acquisition or disposition (1) that have been realized, (2) for which the steps necessary for realization have been taken, or (3) for which the steps necessary for realization are reasonably expected to be taken within 12 months of the date of such acquisition or disposition), as though the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary acquired or disposed of such assets on the first day of such period. For purposes of this definition, operating revenues and operating expenses shall exclude any non-recurring, non-cash items in excess of $2,500,000. Operating Cash Flow may also be adjusted to normalize an acceleration of programming expenses (films, series, shows and other content) required to be recognized in accordance with GAAP when the program's useful life is shortened or otherwise changed from
provided
however
provided
provided
 
the originally projected useful life. Furthermore, to the extent the programs are abandoned and, to the extent that the amortization of such programming expenses are, in accordance with GAAP, required to be accelerated into the year of such impairment, the Company may treat such costs as being amortized over a period equal to the original projected useful life. In the event of any suspension of carriage by any party to an Affiliation Agreement during renewal negotiations of such Affiliation Agreement or upon the expiration or termination of, or during disputes under, such Affiliation Agreement, the Operating Cash Flow calculation (except for the purposes of (i) calculating Cumulative Cash Flow Credit and (ii) calculating the Cash Flow Ratio in clause (21) of the definition of Permitted Investments) may be adjusted (the "Carriage Suspension Adjustment") to include the Operating Cash Flow attributable to the affected Affiliation Agreement from the corresponding period one year prior to each period during which such suspension of carriage continues, but in any event not to exceed three months, provided that the Carriage Suspension Adjustment shall be limited only to the Operating Cash Flow attributable to one Affiliation Agreement during any three-month period being tested.
          "Opinion of Counsel" means a written opinion of counsel, who may be counsel for the Company.
          "Outstanding" when used with respect to Securities means, as of the date of determination, all Securities theretofore authenticated and delivered under this Indenture, except:
          , , that, in determining whether the Holders of the requisite principal amount of Outstanding Securities have given any request, demand, direction, consent or waiver hereunder, Securities owned by the Company or any other obligor upon the Securities, or any Affiliate of the Company, or such other obligor, shall be disregarded and deemed not to be Outstanding, except that, in determining whether the Trustee shall be protected in relying upon any such request, demand, direction, consent or waiver, only Securities which a Responsible Officer of the Trustee actually knows to be so owned shall be so disregarded. Securities so owned which have been pledged in good faith may be regarded as Outstanding if the pledgee establishes to the satisfaction of the Trustee the pledgee's right so to act with respect to such Securities and that the
provided
however
 
pledgee is not the Company or any other obligor upon the Securities or any Affiliate of the Company or such other obligor.
          "Paying Agent" means any Person authorized by the Company to pay the principal of or interest on any Securities on behalf of the Company.
          "Permitted Additional Secured Obligations" means obligations under any other Indebtedness (other than subordinated Indebtedness), including, without limitation, under any Credit Facility, secured by Liens; that immediately after giving effect to the incurrence of such obligations, the Consolidated Secured Leverage Ratio of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries would be less than or equal to 4.75 to 1.0.
provided
          "Permitted Affiliate Payments" means (a) payments under equity and other compensation incentive programs to employees and directors of the Company or any of its current or former Affiliates in the ordinary course of business; that, in the case of employees or directors of former Affiliates, such payments relate to awards granted prior to the consummation of the Distribution Transaction, and (b) payments due and payable under the Distribution Transaction Agreements (as defined in the Credit Agreement).
provided
          "Permitted Business" means any business conducted or proposed to be conducted (as described in the Offering Memorandum) by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries on the date of this Indenture and other businesses reasonably related or ancillary thereto.
          "Permitted Debt" has the meaning specified in Section 1007.
          "Permitted Investments" means:
 
 
          "Permitted Liens" means the following types of Liens:
 
 
 
 
          "Permitted Refinancing Indebtedness" means:
 
 
          "Person" means any individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, association, joint-stock company, trust, unincorporated organization or government or any agency or political subdivision thereof.
          "Physical Security" has the meaning specified in Section 303.
          "Predecessor Security" of any particular Security means every previous Security evidencing all or a portion of the same debt as that evidenced by such particular Security; and, for the purposes of this definition, any Security authenticated and delivered under Section 306 in exchange for a mutilated security or in lieu of a lost, destroyed or stolen Security shall be deemed to evidence the same debt as the mutilated, lost, destroyed or stolen Security.
          "Preferred Stock" means, with respect to any Person, any and all shares, interests, participations or other equivalents (however designated) of such Person's preferred or preference stock, whether now outstanding or issued after the date of this Indenture, and includes, without limitation, all classes and series of preferred or preference stock.
          "Programming Network Business" means (i) the programming businesses conducted by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries as of the date of this Indenture and which collectively consist of the programming networks currently known as AMC, IFC, Sundance Channel and WEtv and (ii) the other programming and related assets contributed to the Company pursuant to the Distribution Agreement.
          "Purchase Date" has the meaning specified in Section 1108.
 
          "Qualified Cash" means, of any Person, all cash and Cash Equivalents of such Person in deposit or securities accounts in which the Collateral Agent (as defined in the Credit Agreement) has "control" pursuant to and within the meaning of Section 9-104 and/or 9-106 of the UCC pursuant to the terms and conditions set forth in the Security Agreement (as defined in the Credit Agreement) or any other Collateral Document.
          "Qualified Equity Offering" means (i) an offer and sale of Equity Interests (other than Disqualified Stock) of the Company pursuant to a registration statement that has been declared effective by the Commission pursuant to the Securities Act (other than a registration statement on Form S-8 or otherwise relating to equity securities issuable under any employee benefit plan of the Company) or (ii) any private placement of Equity Interests (other than Disqualified Stock) of the Company to any Person other than a Subsidiary.
          "Qualified Institutional Buyer" or "QIB" shall have the meaning specified in Rule 144A under the Securities Act.
          "Rating Agency" means (1) each of S&P and Moody's and (2) if S&P or Moody's ceases to rate the Securities for reasons outside the control of the Company, a "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" within the meaning of Rule 15c-3-1(c)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act selected by the Company, which shall be substituted for S&P or Moody's, as the case may be.
          "Rating Category" means (1) with respect to S&P, any of the following categories (any of which may include a "+" or "" at the end thereof): AAA, AA, A, BBB, BB, B, CCC, CC, C and D (or equivalent successor categories), (2) with respect to Moody's, any of the following categories any of which may include a "1," "2" or "3" at the end thereof: Aaa, Aa, A, Baa, Ba, B, Caa, Ca, C and D (or equivalent successor categories), and (3) the equivalent of any such categories of S&P or Moody's used by another Rating Agency, if applicable.
          "Receivables and Related Assets" means:
          "Redemption Date", when used with respect to any Security to be redeemed, means the date fixed for such redemption by or pursuant to this Indenture.
          "Redemption Price" has the meaning specified in Section 1107.
 
          "Registration Rights Agreement" means (1) with respect to the Initial Securities, the Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of the date of this Indenture, among the Company, the Guarantors and the initial purchasers of the Initial Securities, and (2) with respect to any Additional Securities, any registration rights agreement among the Company and the other parties thereto relating to the registration by the Company of such Additional Securities under the Securities Act.
          "Regular Record Date" for the interest payable on any Interest Payment Date means the January 1 or July 1 (whether or not a Business Day), as the case may be, next preceding such Interest Payment Date.
          "Regulation S Global Security" has the meaning specified in Section 303.
          "Replacement Assets" means any combination of (i) non-current assets that shall be used or useful in a Permitted Business or (ii) all or substantially all the assets of a Permitted Business or a majority of the Voting Stock of any Person engaged in a Permitted Business (including by means of a merger, consolidation or other business combination permitted under this Indenture) that shall become on the date of acquisition thereof a Restricted Subsidiary.
          "Repurchase Offer" has the meaning specified in Section 1108.
          "Responsible Officer", when used with respect to the Trustee, means any vice president, any assistant vice president, any trust officer or assistant trust officer or any other officer of the Trustee customarily performing functions similar to those performed by any of the above designated officers or assigned by the Trustee to administer corporate trust matters and also means, with respect to a particular corporate trust matter, any other officer to whom such matter is referred because of his knowledge of and familiarity with the particular subject.
          "Restricted Investment" means any Investment other than a Permitted Investment.
          "Restricted Payment" means:
 
          Notwithstanding the foregoing, Restricted Payments shall not include (a) payments by any Restricted Subsidiary to the Company or any other Restricted Subsidiary or (b) any Permitted Investment or designation of a Restricted Subsidiary as an Unrestricted Subsidiary permitted under Section 1012.
          "Restricted Security" has the meaning specified in Section 205.
          "Restricted Subsidiary" means any Subsidiary, whether existing on the date of this Indenture or created subsequent thereto, designated from time to time by the Company as a "Restricted Subsidiary"; , , that no Subsidiary that is not a Securitization Subsidiary can be or remain so designated unless (a) at least 67% of each of the total equity interest and the voting control of such Subsidiary is owned, directly or indirectly, by the Company or another Restricted Subsidiary and (b) such Subsidiary is not restricted, pursuant to the terms of any loan agreement, note, indenture or other evidence of indebtedness, from
provided
however
(it being understood that a financial covenant any of the components of which are directly impacted by the taking of the action (e.g., the payment of a dividend) itself (such as a minimum net worth test) would be deemed to be a restriction on the foregoing actions, while a financial covenant none of the components of which is directly impacted by the taking of the action (e.g., the payment of a dividend) itself (such as a debt to cash flow test) would not be deemed to
 
be a restriction on the foregoing actions); and that the Company may, from time to time, redesignate any Restricted Subsidiary as an Unrestricted Subsidiary in accordance with Section 1012.
provided further
          "Rule 144A Global Security" has the meaning specified in Section 303.
          "S&P" means Standard & Poor's Financial Services LLC, a subsidiary of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc., and its successors.
          "Securities Act" means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
          "Securities Issue Date" means June 30, 2011 with respect to the Initial Securities, the date of original issuance of the Exchange Securities with respect to the Exchange Securities and the date of original issuance of the Additional Securities with respect to any Additional Securities.
          "Securitization Subsidiary" means a Restricted Subsidiary that is established for the limited purpose of acquiring and financing Receivables and Related Assets and engaging in activities ancillary thereto; that (a) no portion of the Indebtedness of a Securitization Subsidiary is Guaranteed by or is recourse to the Company or any other Restricted Subsidiary (other than recourse for customary representations, warranties, covenants and indemnities, none of which relates to the collectability of the Receivables and Related Assets) and (b) none of the Company or any other Restricted Subsidiary has any obligation to maintain or preserve such Securitization Subsidiary's financial condition.
provided
          "Security" and "Securities" have the meaning specified in the second paragraph of this Indenture, such terms to include the Initial Securities, the Exchange Securities and any Additional Securities. The Initial Securities, the Exchange Securities and any Additional Securities shall be treated as a single class for all purposes under this Indenture.
          "Security Register" and "Security Registrar" have the respective meanings specified in Section 305.
          "Senior Indebtedness" means, with respect to any Person, all principal of (premium, if any) and interest (including interest accruing on or after the filing of any petition in bankruptcy or for reorganization relating to such Person whether or not a claim for post filing interest is allowed in such proceedings) with respect to all Indebtedness of such Person; provided that Senior Indebtedness shall not include
          (a) any Indebtedness of such Person that, by its terms or the terms of the instrument creating or evidencing such Indebtedness, is expressly subordinate in right of payment to the Securities;
          (b) any Guarantee of Indebtedness of any subsidiary of such Person if recourse against such Guarantee is limited to the Capital Stock or other equity interests of such subsidiary;
 
          (c) any obligation of such Person to any subsidiary of such Person or, in the case of a Restricted Subsidiary, to the Company or any other Subsidiary; or
          (d) any Indebtedness of such Person (and any accrued and unpaid interest in respect thereof) that is subordinate or junior in any respect to any other Indebtedness or other obligation of such Person.
          "Shelf Registration Statement" means the Shelf Registration Statement as defined in the Registration Rights Agreement.
          "Significant Subsidiary" means any Subsidiary that would constitute a "significant subsidiary" within the meaning of Article 1 of Regulation S-X promulgated pursuant to the Exchange Act, as such Regulation is in effect on the date of this Indenture.
          "Special Record Date" means a date fixed by the Trustee for the payment of any Defaulted Interest pursuant to Section 307.
          "Stated Maturity", when used with respect to any Security or any installment of interest thereon, means the date specified in such Security as the fixed date on which the principal of such Security or such installment of interest is due and payable.
          "Stock Payment" means, with respect to any Person, the payment or declaration of any dividend, either in cash or in property (except dividends payable in common stock or common shares of Capital Stock of such Person), or the making by such Person of any other distribution, on account of any shares of any class of its Capital Stock, now or hereafter outstanding, or the redemption, purchase, retirement or other acquisition or retirement for value by such Person, directly or indirectly, of any shares of any class of its Capital Stock, now or hereafter outstanding, other than the redemption, purchase, defeasance or other acquisition or retirement for value of any Disqualified Stock at its mandatory redemption date or other maturity date.
          "subsidiary" means, as to a particular parent entity at any time, any entity of which more than 50% of the outstanding Voting Stock or other equity interest entitled ordinarily to vote in the election of the directors or other governing body (however designated) of such entity is at the time beneficially owned or controlled directly or indirectly by such parent corporation, by one or more such entities or by such parent corporation and one or more such entities.
          "Subsidiary" means any subsidiary of the Company.
          "Suspended Covenants" has the meaning specified in Section 1016.
          "Suspension Condition" has the meaning specified in Section 1016.
          "Transactions" means the transactions contemplated by (i) the Distribution Transaction, (ii) the Credit Agreement and (iii) the offering of the Initial Securities.
 
          "Trust Indenture Act" means the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended, and as in force at the date as of which this instrument was executed, except as provided in Section 905; , , that, in the event that the Trust Indenture Act of 1939 is amended after such date, "Trust Indenture Act" means, to the extent required by any such amendment, the Trust Indenture Act of 1939 as so amended.
provided
however
          "Trustee" means the Person named as the "Trustee" in the first paragraph of this Indenture, until a successor Trustee shall have become such pursuant to the applicable provisions of this Indenture, and thereafter "Trustee" shall mean such successor Trustee.
          "UCC" has the meaning given to such term in the Collateral Documents.
          "Unrestricted Subsidiary" means any Subsidiary that is not a Restricted Subsidiary.
          "Voting Stock" means any Capital Stock having voting power under ordinary circumstances to vote in the election of the directors of a corporation (irrespective of whether or not at the time stock of any other class or classes shall have or might have voting power by reason of the happening of any contingency).
          "Weighted Average Life to Maturity" means, when applied to any Indebtedness at any date, the number of years obtained by dividing:
          .
Section 102. Other Definitions
 
          .
Section 103. Compliance Certificates and Opinions
          Upon any application or request by the Company to the Trustee to take any action under any provision of this Indenture, the Company shall furnish to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate stating that all conditions precedent, if any, provided for in this Indenture (including any covenant compliance with which constitutes a condition precedent) relating to the proposed action have been complied with and an Opinion of Counsel stating that in the opinion of such counsel all such conditions precedent, if any, have been complied with, except that, in the case of any such application or request as to which the furnishing of such documents is specifically required by any provision of this Indenture relating to such particular application or request, no additional certificate or opinion need be furnished.
          Every certificate or opinion (other than the certificates required by Section 1019) with respect to compliance with a condition or covenant provided for in this Indenture shall include:
     (a) a statement that each individual signing such certificate or opinion has read such covenant or condition and the definitions herein relating thereto;
     (b) a brief statement as to the nature and scope of the examination or investigation upon which the statements or opinion contained in such certificate or opinion are based;
     (c) a statement that, in the opinion of each such individual, he has made such examination or investigation as is necessary to enable him to express an informed opinion as to whether or not such covenant or condition has been complied with; and
     (d) a statement as to whether, in the opinion of each such individual, such condition or covenant has been complied with.
          .
Section 104. Form of Documents Delivered to Trustee
          In any case where several matters are required to be certified by, or covered by an opinion of, any specified Person, it is not necessary that all such matters be certified by, or covered by the opinion of, only one such Person, or that they be so certified or covered by only one document, but one such Person may certify or give an opinion with respect to some matters and one or more other such Persons as to other matters, and any such Person may certify or give an opinion as to such matters in one or several documents.
          Any certificate or opinion of an officer of the Company may be based, insofar as it relates to legal matters, upon a certificate or opinion of, or representations by, counsel, unless such officer knows, or in the exercise of reasonable care should know, that the certificate or opinion or representations with respect to the matters upon which his certificate or opinion is based are erroneous. Any such certificate or Opinion of Counsel may be based, insofar as it relates to factual matters, upon a certificate or opinion of, or representations by, an officer or officers of the Company stating that the information with respect to such factual matters is in the possession of the Company, unless such counsel knows, or in the exercise of reasonable care
 
should know, that the certificate or opinion or representations with respect to such matters are erroneous.
          Where any Person is required to make, give or execute two or more applications, requests, consents, certificates, statements, opinions or other instruments under this Indenture, they may, but need not, be consolidated and form one instrument.
          .
Section 105. Acts of Holders
          (a) Any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other action provided by this Indenture to be given or taken by Holders may be embodied in and evidenced by one or more instruments of substantially similar tenor signed by such Holders in person or by agent duly appointed in writing; and, except as herein otherwise expressly provided, such action shall become effective when such instrument or instruments are delivered to the Trustee and, where it is hereby expressly required, to the Company. Such instrument or instruments (and the action embodied therein and evidenced thereby) are herein sometimes referred to as the "Act" of the Holders signing such instrument or instruments. Proof of execution of any such instrument or of a writing appointing any such agent shall be sufficient for any purpose of this Indenture and (subject to Trust Indenture Act Section 315) conclusive in favor of the Trustee and the Company, if made in the manner provided in this Section 105.
          (b) The fact and date of the execution by any Person of any such instrument or writing may be proved in any reasonable manner that the Trustee deems sufficient.
          (c) The ownership of Securities shall be proved by the Security Register.
          (d) If the Company shall solicit from the Holders any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act, the Company may, at its option, by or pursuant to a Board Resolution, fix in advance a record date for the determination of such Holders entitled to give such request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act, but the Company shall have no obligation to do so. Notwithstanding Trust Indenture Act Section 316(c), any such record date shall be the record date specified in or pursuant to such Board Resolution, which shall be a date not more than 30 days prior to the first solicitation of Holders generally in connection therewith and no later than the date such solicitation is completed.
          If such a record date is fixed, such request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act may be given before or after such record date, but only the Holders of record at the close of business on such record date shall be deemed to be Holders for the purposes of determining whether Holders of the requisite proportion of Securities then Outstanding have authorized or agreed or consented to such request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act, and for this purpose the Securities then Outstanding shall be computed as of such record date; that no such request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act by the Holders on such record date shall be deemed effective unless it shall become effective pursuant to the provisions of this Indenture not later than six months after the record date.
provided
 
          (e) Any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act by the Holder of any Security shall bind every future Holder of the same Security or the Holder of every Security issued upon the registration of transfer thereof or in exchange therefor or in lieu thereof, in respect of anything done, suffered or omitted to be done by the Trustee, any Paying Agent or the Company in reliance thereon, whether or not notation of such action is made upon such Security.
          .
Section 106. Notices, Etc. to Trustee and Company
          Any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or Act of Holders or other document provided or permitted by this Indenture to be made upon, given or furnished to, or filed with,
          (a) the Trustee by any Holder, the agents under the Credit Agreement or the Company shall be sufficient for every purpose hereunder if made, given, furnished or delivered, in writing (which may be delivered via electronic mail or facsimile), to or with the Trustee at its Corporate Trust Office, Attention: Corporate Trust Services; or
          (b) the Company by the Trustee or by any Holder shall be sufficient for every purpose hereunder (unless otherwise herein expressly provided) if made, given, furnished or delivered in writing to the Company addressed to AMC Networks Inc., 11 Penn Plaza, New York, New York 10001, Attention: James G. Gallagher, Esq. or at any other address previously furnished in writing to the Trustee by the Company.
          .
Section 107. Notice to Holders; Waiver
          Where this Indenture provides for notice to Holders of any event, such notice shall be sufficiently given (unless otherwise herein expressly provided) if in writing and mailed, first-class postage prepaid, to each Holder affected by such event, at his address as it appears in the Security Register, not later than the latest date, and not earlier than the earliest date, prescribed for the giving of such notice. In any case where notice to Holders is given by mail, neither the failure to mail such notice, nor any defect in any notice so mailed, to any particular Holder shall affect the sufficiency of such notice with respect to other Holders. Any notice when mailed to a Holder in the aforesaid manner shall be conclusively deemed to have been received by such Holder whether or not actually received by such Holder.
          Where this Indenture provides for notice in any manner, such notice may be waived in writing by the Person entitled to receive such notice, either before or after the event, and such waiver shall be the equivalent of such notice. Waivers of notice by Holders shall be filed with the Trustee, but such filing shall not be a condition precedent to the validity of any action taken in reliance upon such waiver.
          In case by reason of the suspension of regular mail service or by reason of any other cause, it shall be impracticable to mail notice of any event as required by any provision of this Indenture, then any method of giving such notice as shall be satisfactory to the Trustee shall be deemed to be a sufficient giving of such notice.
 
          .
Section 108. Conflict of Any Provision of Indenture with Trust Indenture Act
          If and to the extent that any provision of this Indenture limits, qualifies or conflicts with the duties imposed by Trust Indenture Act Sections 310 to 318, inclusive, or conflicts with any provision (an "incorporated provision") required by or deemed to be included in this Indenture by operation of such Trust Indenture Act Sections, such imposed duties or incorporated provision shall control. If any provision of this Indenture modifies or excludes any provision of the Trust Indenture Act that may be so modified or excluded, the latter provision shall be deemed to apply to this Indenture as so modified or excluded, as the case may be.
          .
Section 109. Effect of Headings and Table of Contents
          The Article and Section headings herein and the Table of Contents are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction hereof.
          .
Section 110. Successors and Assigns
          All covenants and agreements in this Indenture by the Company shall bind its respective successors and assigns, whether so expressed or not.
          .
Section 111. Separability Clause
          In case any provision in this Indenture or in the Securities shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
          .
Section 112. Benefits of Indenture
          Nothing in this Indenture or in the Securities, express or implied, shall give to any Person (other than the parties hereto and their successors hereunder, any Paying Agent and the Holders) any benefit or any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this Indenture.
          .
Section 113. Governing Law; Waiver of Jury Trial
          This Indenture and the Securities shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York, without regard to conflicts of laws principles.
          This Indenture is subject to the provisions of the Trust Indenture Act that are required to be part of this Indenture and shall, to the extent applicable, be governed by such provisions.
          EACH OF THE COMPANY AND THE TRUSTEE HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS INDENTURE, THE SECURITIES OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
 
          .
Section 114. Legal Holidays
          In any case where any Interest Payment Date, any date established for payment of Defaulted Interest pursuant to Section 307, or any Maturity with respect to any Security shall not be a Business Day, then (notwithstanding any other provision of this Indenture or of the Securities) payment of interest or principal need not be made on such date, but may be made on the next succeeding Business Day with the same force and effect as if made on the Interest Payment Date, or date established for payment of Defaulted Interest pursuant to Section 307, or Maturity, and no interest shall accrue with respect to such payment for the period from and after such Interest Payment Date, or date established for payment of Defaulted Interest pursuant to Section 307, or Maturity, as the case may be, to the next succeeding Business Day.
          .
Section 115. No Recourse Against Others
          A director, officer, employee or stockholder, as such, of the Company shall not have any liability for any obligations of the Company under the Securities or this Indenture or for any claim based on, in respect of or by reason of such obligations or their creation. Each Holder by accepting any of the Securities waives and releases all such liability.
          .
Section 116. U.S.A. Patriot Act
          The parties hereto acknowledge that in accordance with Section 326 of the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001, as amended from time to time (the "USA Patriot Act"), the Trustee, like all financial institutions and in order to help fight the funding of terrorism and money laundering, is required to obtain, verify, and record information that identifies each person or legal entity that establishes a relationship or opens an account with the Trustee. The parties to this Indenture agree that they shall provide the Trustee with such information as it may request in order for the Trustee to satisfy the requirements of the USA Patriot Act.
          
Section 117. Force Majeure
          In no event shall the Trustee be responsible or liable for any failure or delay in the performance of its obligations hereunder arising out of or caused by, directly or indirectly, forces beyond its control, including, without limitation, to the extent beyond its control, strikes, work stoppages, accidents, acts of war or terrorism, civil or military disturbances, nuclear or natural catastrophes or acts of God, and interruptions, loss or malfunctions of utilities, communications or computer (software and hardware) services; it being understood that the Trustee shall use reasonable efforts which are consistent with accepted practices in the banking industry to prevent such actions from occurring and to resume performance as soon as practicable under the circumstances.
 
          .
Section 201. Forms Generally; Incorporation of Form in Indenture
          The Securities and the Trustee's certificate of authentication with respect thereto shall be in substantially the forms set forth in this Article, with such appropriate legends, insertions, omissions, substitutions and other variations as are required or permitted by this Indenture and may have such letters, numbers or other marks of identification and such legends or endorsements placed thereon as may be required to comply with the rules of any securities exchange or as may, consistently herewith, be determined by the officers executing such Securities, as evidenced by their execution of the Securities. Any portion of the text of any Security may be set forth on the reverse thereof, with an appropriate reference thereto on the face of the Security. Each Security shall be dated the date of its authentication.
          The definitive Securities shall be typewritten, printed, lithographed, engraved or otherwise produced or produced by any combination of these methods or may be produced in any other manner permitted by the rules of any securities exchange on which the Securities may be listed, all as determined by the officers executing such Securities, as evidenced by their execution of such Securities.
          .
Section 202. Form of Face of Security
          [THIS SECURITY IS ISSUED WITH ORIGINAL ISSUE DISCOUNT FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 1271 ET SEQ. OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE. A HOLDER MAY OBTAIN THE ISSUE PRICE, AMOUNT OF ORIGINAL ISSUE DISCOUNT, ACCRUAL PERIODS, ORIGINAL ISSUE DATE AND YIELD TO MATURITY FOR SUCH SECURITY BY SUBMITTING A REQUEST FOR SUCH INFORMATION TO THE FOLLOWING ADDRESS: AMC NETWORKS INC., 11 PENN PLAZA, NEW YORK, NEW YORK 10001, ATTENTION: JAMES G. GALLAGHER, ESQ.]
*
          AMC Networks Inc., a Delaware corporation (herein called the "Company," which term includes any successor entity under the Indenture hereinafter referred to), for value received, hereby promises to pay to _________________ or registered assigns the principal sum of ______ Dollars on July 15, 2021, at the office or agency of the Company referred to below,
 
and to pay interest thereon on [ ], and semiannually thereafter, on January 15 and July 15 in each year from the Securities Issue Date or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for at the rate of 7.75% per annum until the principal hereof is paid or duly provided for, and (to the extent lawful) to pay on demand interest on any overdue interest at the rate borne by the Securities from the date of the Interest Payment Date on which such overdue interest becomes payable to the date payment of such interest has been made or duly provided for.
**
          [The Holder of this Security is entitled to the benefits of the Registration Rights Agreement, dated June 30, 2011 (the "Registration Rights Agreement"), among the Company, the Guarantors named therein and the Initial Purchasers named therein. Subject to the terms of the Registration Rights Agreement, in the event an exchange offer (the "Exchange Offer") for this Initial Security is not consummated or a registration statement under the Securities Act with respect to resales of this Security (the "Shelf Registration Statement") is not declared effective by the Commission on or prior to the 400 calendar day following June 30, 2011, in either case, in accordance with the Registration Rights Agreement, the aforesaid interest rate borne by this Security shall be increased by one-quarter of one percent per annum for the first 90 days following June 30, 2011. Such interest rate shall increase by an additional one-quarter of one percent per annum thereafter, up to a maximum aggregate increase of one half of one percent per annum. Subject to the terms of the Registration Rights Agreement, upon consummation of the Exchange Offer or the effectiveness of a Shelf Registration Statement, as the case may be, the interest rate borne by this Security shall be reduced to 7.75% per annum.]***
th
          If any interest has accrued on this Security in respect of any period prior to the issuance of this Security, such interest shall be payable in respect of such period at the rate or rates borne by the Predecessor Security surrendered in exchange for this Security from time to time during such period. The interest so payable, and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date shall, as provided in such Indenture, be paid to the Person in whose name this Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest, which shall be the January 1 or July 1 (whether or not a Business Day), as the case may be, next preceding such Interest Payment Date. Any such interest not so punctually paid or duly provided for, and interest on such defaulted interest at the interest rate borne by this Security, to the extent lawful, shall forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on such Regular Record Date, and may be paid to the Person in whose name this Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest to be fixed by the Trustee, notice whereof shall be given to Holders of Securities not less than 10 days prior to such Special Record Date, or may be paid at any time in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Securities may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, all as more fully provided in the Indenture. Payment of the principal
 
 
of and interest on this Security shall be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in The City of New York, or at such other office or agency of the Company as may be maintained for such purpose, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts; , , that payment of interest may be made at the option of the Company by check mailed to the address of the Person entitled thereto as such address shall appear on the Security Register.
provided
however
          Interest on the Securities shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months.
          Reference is hereby made to the further provisions of this Security set forth on the reverse hereof, which further provisions shall for all purposes have the same effect as if set forth at this place.
          Unless the certificate of authentication hereon has been duly executed by the Trustee referred to on the reverse hereof by manual signature, this Security shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Indenture, or be valid or obligatory for any purpose.
          IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this instrument to be duly executed under its corporate seal.
          .
Section 203. Form of Reverse of Security
          This Security is one of a duly authorized issue of securities of the Company designated as its 7.75% Senior Notes due 2021 (herein called the "Securities"), which may be issued under an indenture, dated as of June 30, 2011 (herein called the "Indenture"), among the Company, the Guarantors named therein and U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee (herein called the "Trustee," which term includes any successor trustee under the Indenture), to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto reference is hereby made for a statement of the respective rights, limitations of rights, duties, obligations and immunities thereunder of the Company, the Trustee, the holders of the Senior Indebtedness and the Holders of the Securities, and of the terms upon which the Securities are, and are to be, authenticated and delivered. This Security is one of the series designated on the face hereof, initially limited in aggregate principal amount to $700,000,000; , , that the Company may from time to time, without notice to or the consent of the Holders of Securities, create and issue further Securities of this series (the "Additional Securities") having the same terms and ranking equally and ratably with the Securities of this series in all respects and with the same CUSIP number as the Securities of this series, or in all respects except for payment of interest accruing prior to the issue date of such Additional Securities or except for the first payment of interest following the issue date of such Additional Securities. Any Additional Securities shall be consolidated and form a single series with the Securities and shall have the same terms as to status, redemption and otherwise as the Securities. Any Additional Securities may be issued pursuant to authorization provided by a Board Resolution, a supplement to the Indenture, or under an Officers' Certificate pursuant to the
provided
however
 
Indenture. No Additional Securities may be issued if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing with respect to the Securities of this series.
          [This Security is exchangeable under certain circumstances as provided in the Indenture for the Exchange Securities (as defined under the Indenture) issued under the Indenture. Unless the context otherwise requires, the Securities and Exchange Securities shall constitute one series for all purposes under the Indenture, including without limitation amendments and waivers.]
*
          On or after July 15, 2016, the Company may redeem Securities, at its option in whole or in part at any time and from time to time, at the redemption prices (expressed as percentages of principal amount) set forth below, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, to the applicable Redemption Date, if redeemed during the twelve month period beginning on July 15 of the years indicated below:
          Any redemption of this Security shall be made pursuant to the provisions of Sections 1101 through 1106 of the Indenture.
          If an Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, the principal of all the Securities may be declared due and payable in the manner and with the effect provided in the Indenture.
          This Security does not have the benefit of any sinking fund obligations.
          The Indenture permits, with certain exceptions as therein provided, the amendment thereof and the modification of the rights and obligations of the Company and the rights of the Holders under the Indenture at any time by the Company and the Trustee with the consent of the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities at the time Outstanding. The Indenture also contains provisions permitting the Holders of specified percentages in aggregate principal amount of the Securities at the time Outstanding, on behalf of the Holders of all the Securities, to waive compliance by the Company with certain provisions of the Indenture and certain past defaults under the Indenture and their consequences. Any such consent or waiver by or on behalf of the Holder of this Security shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders of this Security and of any Security issued upon the registration of transfer hereof or in exchange herefor or in lieu hereof whether or not notation of such consent or waiver is made upon this Security.
          No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Security or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and
 
 
unconditional, to pay the principal of and interest on this Security at the times, place, and rate, and in the coin or currency, herein prescribed.
          As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, the transfer of this Security is registrable on the Security Register of the Company, upon surrender of this Security for registration of transfer at the office or agency of the Company maintained for such purpose in The City of New York, duly endorsed by, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company and the Security Registrar duly executed by, the Holder hereof or his attorney duly authorized in writing, and thereupon one or more new Securities, of authorized denominations and for the same aggregate principal amount, shall be issued to the designated transferee or transferees.
          The Securities are issuable only in registered form without coupons in minimum denominations of $2,000 and any integral multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof. As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, the Securities are exchangeable for a like aggregate principal amount of Securities of a different authorized denomination, as requested by the Holder surrendering the same.
          No service charge shall be made for any registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, but the Company may require payment of a sum sufficient to pay all documentary, stamp or similar issue or transfer taxes or other governmental charges payable in connection with any registration of transfer or exchange.
          Prior to the time of due presentment of this Security for registration of transfer, the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee may treat the Person in whose name this Security is registered as the owner hereof for all purposes, whether or not this Security be overdue, and neither the Company, the Trustee nor any agent shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
          This Security shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York, without regard to conflicts of laws principles thereof.
          All terms used in this Security that are defined in the Indenture shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Indenture.
          FOR VALUE RECEIVED, the undersigned hereby sells, assigns and transfers this Security to
 
 
and hereby irrevocably constitutes and appoints _______________________ his attorney to transfer the same on the books of the Company, with full power of substitution in the premises.
          In connection with any transfer of all or any portion of the Security evidenced by this certificate for as long as such Security is a Restricted Security, the undersigned confirms that such Security is being transferred:
          Unless one of the boxes above is checked, the Trustee shall refuse to register all or any portion of the Security evidenced by this certificate in the name of any person other than the registered holder thereof (or hereof); , , that the Trustee may, in its sole discretion, register the transfer of such Security if it has received such certifications, legal opinions and/or other information as it has reasonably requested to confirm that such transfer is being made pursuant to an exemption from, or in a transaction not subject to, the registration requirements of the Securities Act.
provided
however
NOTE: The signature to this assignment must correspond with the name as written upon the face of this Security in every particular, without alteration or enlargement, or any change whatever.
          The undersigned represents and warrants that it is purchasing this Security for its own account or an account with respect to which it exercises sole investment discretion and that it and any such account is a "qualified institutional buyer" within the meaning of Rule 144A under the Securities Act and is aware that the sale to it is being made in reliance on Rule 144A and acknowledges that it has received such information regarding the Company as the undersigned has requested pursuant to Rule 144A (including the information specified in Rule 144(d)(4)) or has determined not to request such information and that it is aware that the transferor is relying upon the undersigned's foregoing representations in order to claim the exemption from registration provided by Rule 144A.
 
          The following exchanges of a part of this Security in global form for definitive Securities or of definitive Securities for a part of this Security in global form have been made:
          .
Section 204. Form of Trustee's Certificate of Authentication
          This is one of the Securities referred to in the within-mentioned Indenture.
Dated:
          .
Section 205. Form of Legend on Restricted Securities
          During the period beginning on the Securities Issue Date with respect to a Security that is not an Exchange Security and ending on the later of the date occurring one year after such date and the date on which such Security is (a) freely transferable in accordance with Rule 144 by a person that is not an "affiliate" (as defined in Rule 144) of the Company where no conditions under Rule 144 are then applicable (other than the holding period requirement of paragraph (d) of Rule 144 so long as such holding period requirement is satisfied at such time of determination), (b) does not bear any restrictive legends relating to the Securities Act and (c) does not bear a restrictive CUSIP number, any such Security issued or owned during the period set forth above, as the case may be, and any Security (other than an Exchange Security) issued upon registration of transfer of, or in exchange for, or in lieu of, such Security shall be deemed a "Restricted Security" and shall be subject to the restrictions on transfer provided in the legend set forth below; , , that the term "Restricted Security" shall not include (a) any Security which is issued upon transfer of, or in exchange for, any Security which is not a Restricted Security, (b) any Security (other than an Exchange Security) as to which such restrictions on transfer have been terminated in accordance with Section 314 or (c) any Exchange
provided
however
 
Security issued pursuant to an Exchange Offer. Any Restricted Security shall bear a legend in substantially the following form:
     THE SECURITIES HAVE NOT BEEN REGISTERED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED (THE "SECURITIES ACT"), OR ANY STATE SECURITIES LAWS. NEITHER THIS SECURITY NOR ANY INTEREST OR PARTICIPATION HEREIN MAY BE REOFFERED, SOLD, ASSIGNED, TRANSFERRED, PLEDGED, ENCUMBERED OR OTHERWISE DISPOSED OF IN THE ABSENCE OF SUCH REGISTRATION OR UNLESS SUCH TRANSACTION IS EXEMPT FROM, OR NOT SUBJECT TO, REGISTRATION AS SET FORTH BELOW. BY ITS ACQUISITION HEREOF, THE HOLDER (1) REPRESENTS THAT (A) IT IS A "QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER" (AS DEFINED IN RULE 144A UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT ("RULE 144A")), OR (B) IT IS NOT A U.S. PERSON AND IS ACQUIRING THIS SECURITY IN AN OFFSHORE TRANSACTION, (2) AGREES TO OFFER, SELL, PLEDGE OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER SUCH SECURITY PRIOR TO THE DATE WHICH IS ONE YEAR AFTER THE DATE OF ORIGINAL ISSUE HEREOF ONLY (A) TO THE COMPANY, (B) PURSUANT TO A REGISTRATION STATEMENT WHICH HAS BEEN DECLARED EFFECTIVE UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT, (C) FOR SO LONG AS THE SECURITIES ARE ELIGIBLE FOR RESALE PURSUANT TO RULE 144A UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT ("RULE 144A") TO A PERSON IT REASONABLY BELIEVES IS A "QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER" AS DEFINED IN RULE 144A THAT PURCHASES FOR ITS OWN ACCOUNT OR FOR THE ACCOUNT OF A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER TO WHOM NOTICE IS GIVEN THAT THE TRANSFER IS BEING MADE IN RELIANCE ON RULE 144A, (D) OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES PURSUANT TO OFFERS AND SALES TO NON-U.S. PERSONS IN AN OFFSHORE TRANSACTION PURSUANT TO REGULATION S UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT IN A TRANSACTION MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS OF RULE 904 UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OR (E) PURSUANT TO ANOTHER AVAILABLE EXEMPTION FROM THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES ACT, SUBJECT TO THE COMPANY'S AND THE TRUSTEE'S RIGHT PRIOR TO ANY SUCH OFFER, SALE OR TRANSFER PURSUANT TO CLAUSE (D) PRIOR TO THE END OF THE 40 DAYS DISTRIBUTION COMPLIANCE PERIOD WITHIN THE MEANING OF REGULATION S UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OR PURSUANT TO CLAUSE (E) TO REQUIRE THE DELIVERY OF AN OPINION OF COUNSEL, CERTIFICATION AND/OR OTHER INFORMATION SATISFACTORY TO EACH OF THEM.
          .
Section 206. Form of Legend for Book-Entry Securities
          Any Global Security authenticated and delivered hereunder shall bear a legend (which would be in addition to any other legends required in the case of a Restricted Security) in substantially the following form:
     THIS SECURITY IS A GLOBAL SECURITY WITHIN THE MEANING OF THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO AND IS REGISTERED IN THE
 
NAME OF A DEPOSITORY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF. THIS SECURITY MAY NOT BE EXCHANGED IN WHOLE OR IN PART FOR A SECURITY REGISTERED, AND NO TRANSFER OF THIS SECURITY IN WHOLE OR IN PART MAY BE REGISTERED, IN THE NAME OF ANY PERSON OTHER THAN SUCH DEPOSITORY OR ITS NOMINEE EXCEPT IN THE LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES DESCRIBED IN THE INDENTURE.
     UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY (55 WATER STREET, NEW YORK, NEW YORK 10041) TO THE ISSUER OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER, EXCHANGE OR PAYMENT AND SUCH CERTIFICATE ISSUED IN EXCHANGE FOR THIS CERTIFICATE IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO., OR SUCH OTHER NAME AS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL, SINCE THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN.
          .
Section 301. Title and Terms
          The aggregate principal amount of Initial Securities that may be authenticated and delivered under this Indenture is limited to $700,000,000 and the aggregate principal amount of Exchange Securities and Additional Securities is unlimited, except, in each case, for Securities authenticated and delivered upon registration of transfer of, or in exchange for, or in lieu of, other Securities pursuant to Section 303, 304, 305, 306 or 906.
          The Securities shall be known and designated as the "7.75% Senior Notes due 2021" of the Company. Their Stated Maturity shall be July 15, 2021, and they shall bear interest at the rate of 7.75% per annum (except as otherwise provided for in the form of Security) from the relevant Securities Issue Date, or the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for on a given Security or a Security surrendered in exchange for such Security, as the case may be, payable on the relevant Initial Interest Payment Date (as defined below) and semiannually thereafter on January 15 and July 15 of each year and at said Stated Maturity, until the principal thereof is paid or duly provided for. The term "Initial Interest Payment Date" means (a) with respect to any Security other than the Initial Securities, the first January 15 or July 15 occurring after the Securities Issue Date for such Security and (b) with respect to each Initial Security, January 15, 2012. The Initial Securities, the Exchange Securities and any Additional Securities issued hereunder shall rank .
pari passu
          The principal of and interest on the Securities shall be payable at the office or agency of the Company maintained for such purpose in The City of New York, or at such other office or agency of the Company as may be maintained for such purpose; , ,
provided
however
 
that, at the option of the Company, cash interest may be paid by check mailed to addresses of the Persons entitled thereto as such addresses shall appear on the Security Register.
          The Securities are subject to redemption at the option of the Company on terms and in the manner set forth in Sections 1101 through 1107 hereof and the Securities are subject to repurchase at the option of Holders on terms and in the manner set forth in Section 1108 hereof.
          The Securities shall be senior unsecured obligations of the Company and shall rank in right of payment with all existing and future unsubordinated indebtedness of the Company.
pari passu
          .
Section 302. Denominations
          The Securities shall be issuable only in registered form without coupons and only in minimum denominations of $2,000 and any integral multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof.
          .
Section 303. Execution, Authentication, Delivery and Dating
          The Securities shall be executed on behalf of the Company by any one of the following: its Chairman, Chief Executive Officer, one of its Vice Chairmen, its President, one of its Vice Presidents. The signature of any of these officers on the Securities may be manual or facsimile.
          Securities bearing the manual or facsimile signatures of individuals who were at any time the proper officers of the Company shall bind the Company, notwithstanding that such individuals or any of them have ceased to hold such offices prior to the authentication and delivery of such Securities or did not hold such offices at the date of such Securities.
          The Trustee shall, except as set forth in the following sentences, upon Company Order) authenticate and deliver (a) the Initial Securities for original issue in an aggregate principal amount of up to $700,000,000, (b) the Exchange Securities for issue only in a registered Exchange Offer pursuant to the Registration Rights Agreement for a like principal amount of the Initial Securities or Additional Securities, if any, and (c) Additional Securities as set forth below. In connection with any surrender of a Security for registration of transfer pursuant to Section 305, the Trustee shall, upon receipt of the surrendering Holder's certificate of transfer in lieu of a Company Order, authenticate and deliver Securities in aggregate principal amount equal to the Securities so surrendered, in such denominations and registered in such names as such surrendering Holder shall specify in such written instructions (and such Securities shall, if so specified in such instructions, be issued in global form as a Rule 144A Global Security or a Regulation S Global Security (each as defined below), registered in the name of the Depositary or the nominee of the Depositary).
          Each Security shall be dated the date of its authentication.
          No Security endorsed thereon shall be entitled to any benefit under this Indenture or be valid or obligatory for any purpose unless there appears on such Security a certificate of authentication substantially in the form provided for herein duly executed by the Trustee by
 
manual signature of one of its duly authorized signatories, and such certificate upon any Security shall be conclusive evidence, and the only evidence, that such Security has been duly authenticated and delivered hereunder and is entitled to the benefits of this Indenture.
          In case the Company, pursuant to Article Eight, shall be consolidated or merged with or into any other Person or shall convey, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of substantially all of its properties and assets to any Person, and the successor Person resulting from such consolidation, or surviving such merger, or into which the Company shall have been merged, or the successor Person which shall have received a conveyance, transfer, Lease or other disposition as aforesaid, shall have executed an indenture supplemental hereto with the Trustee pursuant to Article Eight, any of the Securities authenticated or delivered prior to such consolidation, merger, conveyance, transfer, Lease or other disposition may, from time to time, at the request of the successor Person, be exchanged for other Securities executed in the name of the successor Person with such changes in phraseology and form as may be appropriate, but otherwise in substance of like tenor as the Securities surrendered for such exchange and of like principal amount; and the Trustee, upon written order of the successor Person, shall authenticate and deliver Securities as specified in such request for the purpose of such exchange. If Securities shall at any time be authenticated and delivered in any new name of a successor Person pursuant to this Section 303 in exchange or substitution for or upon registration of transfer of any Securities, such successor Person, at the option of any Holder but without expense to such Holder, shall provide for the exchange of all Securities at the time Outstanding held by such Holder for Securities authenticated and delivered in such new name.
          Except as described below, the Securities shall be deposited with, or on behalf of, the Depository, and registered in the name of the Depository or the nominee of the Depository in the form of one or more global note certificates (each a "Rule 144A Global Security"), for credit to the respective accounts of the beneficial owners of the Securities represented thereby. The Rule 144A Global Securities shall bear the legend set forth in Section 206 and, in the case of Restricted Securities, the legend set forth in Section 205.
          Securities purchased by persons outside the United States pursuant to sales in accordance with Regulation S under the Securities Act shall be deposited with, or on behalf of, the Depository, and registered in the name of the Depository or the nominee of the Depository in the form of one or more global note certificates (each a "Regulation S Global Security"), for credit to the respective accounts of the beneficial owners of the Securities represented thereby (or such other accounts as they may direct). Securities represented by a Regulation S Global Security shall not be exchangeable for Securities in registered definitive form (each a "Physical Security") until the expiration of the "40-day restricted period" within the meaning of Rule 903(c)(3) of Regulation S under the Securities Act. During this 40-day restricted period, Regulation S Global Securities may only be held through Euroclear System and Clearstream Banking, S.A., unless transferred to a person that takes delivery through a Rule 144A Global Security. The Regulation S Global Securities shall bear the legend set forth in Section 206 and, in the case of Restricted Securities, the legend set forth in Section 205.
          The two paragraphs immediately preceding shall not have effect until such time as the Trustee shall be instructed (in a Company Order or in a Holder's instruction upon surrender for registration of transfer) to register the transfer of the Initial Securities upon surrender thereof
 
as a Rule 144A Global Security or a Regulation S Global Security, and until such time the Initial Securities shall be issued in certificated form in such denominations and registered in the name of such Holders as shall be set forth in a Company Order (with respect to the initial authentication and delivery of the Initial Securities) or in a Holder's certificate of transfer upon surrender for registration of transfer, as set forth in this Section 303.
          The Company may, subject to Article Ten of this Indenture and applicable law, issue under this Indenture Additional Securities and Exchange Securities therefor; , , that the Company may not issue any Additional Securities if an Event of Default with respect to any Outstanding Securities shall have occurred and be continuing at the time of such issuance. All Securities issued under this Indenture shall be treated as a single class for all purposes under this Indenture.
provided
however
          .
Section 304. Temporary Securities
          Pending the preparation of definitive Securities, the Company may execute, and upon Company Order the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, temporary Securities which are typewritten, printed, lithographed, engraved or otherwise produced or produced by any combination of these methods, in any authorized denomination, substantially of the tenor of the definitive Securities in lieu of which they are issued and with such appropriate insertions, omissions, substitutions and other variations as the officers executing such Securities may determine, as conclusively evidenced by their execution of such Securities.
          If temporary Securities are issued, the Company shall cause definitive Securities to be prepared without unreasonable delay. After the preparation of definitive Securities, the temporary Securities shall be exchangeable for definitive Securities upon surrender of the temporary Securities at the office or agency of the Company designated for such purpose pursuant to Section 1002, without charge to the Holder. Upon surrender for cancellation of any one or more temporary Securities, the Company shall execute and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver in exchange therefor a like principal amount of definitive Securities of authorized denominations. Until so exchanged, the temporary Securities shall in all respects be entitled to the same benefits under this Indenture as definitive Securities.
          .
Section 305. Registration, Registration of Transfer and Exchange
          The Company shall cause to be kept at the Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee a register (the register maintained in such office and in any other office or agency designated pursuant to Section 1002 being herein sometimes referred to as the "Security Register") in which, subject to such reasonable regulations as it may prescribe, the Company shall provide for the registration of Securities and of transfers of Securities. The Trustee is hereby initially appointed "Security Registrar" for the purpose of registering Securities and transfers of Securities as herein provided. Such Security Register shall distinguish between Initial Securities, Exchange Securities and Additional Securities.
          Except as otherwise described in this Article Three, upon surrender for registration of transfer of any Security at the office or agency of the Company designated pursuant to Section 1002 for such purpose, the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall
 
authenticate and deliver, in the name of the designated transferee or transferees, one or more new Securities of any authorized denomination or denominations and of a like aggregate principal amount.
          At the option of the Holder, Securities may be exchanged for other Securities of any authorized denomination or denominations and of a like aggregate principal amount upon surrender of the Securities to be exchanged at such office or agency. Whenever any Securities are so surrendered for exchange, the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, the Securities which the Holder making the exchange is entitled to receive; no exchange of Initial Securities or Additional Securities for Exchange Securities shall occur until an Exchange Offer Registration Statement shall have been declared effective by the Commission, the Trustee shall have received an Officers' Certificate confirming that the Exchange Offer Registration Statement has been declared effective by the Commission and the Initial Securities or Additional Securities to be exchanged for the Exchange Securities shall be canceled by the Trustee.
provided that
          All Securities issued upon any registration of transfer or exchange of Securities shall be the valid obligations of the Company, evidencing the same debt, and (subject to the provisions in the Initial Securities regarding the payment of additional interest) entitled to the same benefits under this Indenture, as the Securities surrendered upon such registration of transfer or exchange.
          Every Security presented or surrendered for registration of transfer, or for exchange, shall (if so required by the Company or the Security Registrar) be duly endorsed, or be accompanied by a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company and the Security Registrar, duly executed by the Holder thereof or his attorney duly authorized in writing.
          Every Restricted Security shall be subject to, and no transfer shall be made other than in accordance with, the restrictions on transfer provided in the legend set forth on the form of the face of each Restricted Security and the restrictions set forth in this Article Three, and the Holder of each Restricted Security, by such Holder's acceptance thereof, agrees to be bound by such restrictions on transfer.
          The Security Registrar shall notify the Company of any proposed transfer of a Restricted Security to any Person.
          No service charge shall be made for any registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, but the Company may require payment of a sum sufficient to pay all documentary, stamp or similar issue or transfer taxes or other governmental charges that may be imposed in connection with any registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, other than exchanges pursuant to Section 303, 304 or 906 not involving any transfer.
          The Company shall not be required to issue, register the transfer of or exchange any Security during a period beginning at the opening of business 15 days before an Interest Payment Date and ending on the close of business on such Interest Payment Date.
 
          The Trustee shall have no obligation or duty to monitor, determine or inquire as to compliance with any restrictions on transfer imposed under this Indenture or under applicable law with respect to any transfer of any interest in any Security (including any transfers between or among Agent Members or beneficial owners of interests in any Global Security) other than to require delivery of such certificates and other documentation or evidence as are expressly required by, and to do so if and when expressly required by the terms of, this Indenture, and to examine the same to determine substantial compliance as to form with the express requirements hereof.
          .
Section 306. Mutilated, Destroyed, Lost and Stolen Securities
          If (a) any mutilated Security is surrendered to the Trustee, or (b) the Company and the Trustee receive evidence to their satisfaction of the destruction, loss or theft of any Security, and there is delivered to the Company and the Trustee such security or indemnity satisfactory to them to save each of them and any agent of them harmless, then, in the absence of notice to the Company or the Trustee that such Security has been acquired by a bona fide purchaser, the Company shall execute and upon Company Order the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, in exchange for any such mutilated Security or in lieu of any such destroyed, lost or stolen Security, a replacement Security of like tenor and principal amount, and bearing a number not contemporaneously outstanding.
          In case any such mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Security has become or is about to become due and payable, the Company in its discretion may, instead of issuing a replacement Security, pay such Security.
          Upon the issuance of any replacement Securities under this Section 306, the Company may require the payment of a sum sufficient to pay all documentary, stamp or similar issue or transfer taxes or other governmental charges that may be imposed in relation thereto and any other expenses (including the fees and expenses of the Trustee) connected therewith.
          Every replacement Security issued pursuant to this Section 306 in lieu of any destroyed, lost or stolen Security shall constitute a contractual obligation of the Company, whether or not the destroyed, lost or stolen Security shall be at any time enforceable by anyone, and shall be entitled to all benefits of this Indenture equally and proportionately with any and all other Securities duly issued hereunder.
          The provisions of this Section 306 are exclusive and shall preclude (to the extent lawful) all other rights and remedies with respect to the replacement or payment of mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Securities.
          .
Section 307. Payment of Interest; Interest Rights Preserved
          Interest on any Security which is payable, and is punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date shall be paid to the Person in whose name that Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest.
 
          Any interest on any Security which is payable, but is not punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date and interest on such defaulted interest at the interest rate borne by the Securities, to the extent lawful (such defaulted interest and interest thereon herein collectively called "Defaulted Interest"), shall forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on the relevant Regular Record Date by virtue of having been such Holder; and such Defaulted Interest may be paid by the Company, at its election in each case, as provided in Subsection (a) or (b) below:
     (a) The Company may elect to make payment of any Defaulted Interest to the Persons in whose names the Securities (or their respective Predecessor Securities) are registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest, which shall be fixed in the following manner. The Company shall notify the Trustee in writing of the amount of Defaulted Interest proposed to be paid on each Security and the date of the proposed payment, and at the same time the Company shall deposit with the Trustee an amount of money equal to the aggregate amount proposed to be paid in respect of such Defaulted Interest or shall make arrangements satisfactory to the Trustee for such deposit prior to the date of the proposed payment, such money when deposited to be held in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled to such Defaulted Interest as in this Subsection provided. Thereupon the Trustee shall fix a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest that shall be not more than 15 days and not less than 10 days prior to the date of the proposed payment and not less than 10 days after the receipt by the Trustee of the notice of the proposed payment. The Trustee shall promptly notify the Company of such Special Record Date. In the name and at the expense of the Company, the Trustee shall cause notice of the proposed payment of such Defaulted Interest and the Special Record Date therefor to be mailed, first-class postage prepaid, to each Holder at his address as it appears in the Security Register, not less than 10 days prior to such Special Record Date. Notice of the proposed payment of such Defaulted Interest and the Special Record Date therefor having been so mailed, such Defaulted Interest shall be paid to the Persons in whose names the Securities (or their respective Predecessor Securities) are registered at the close of business on such Special Record Date and shall no longer be payable pursuant to the following Subsection (b).
     (b) The Company may make payment of any Defaulted Interest in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Securities may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, if, after notice given by the Company to the Trustee of the proposed payment pursuant to this Subsection, such payment shall be deemed practicable by the Trustee.
          Subject to the foregoing provisions of this Section 307, each Security delivered under this Indenture upon registration of transfer of or in exchange for or in lieu of any other Security shall carry the rights to interest accrued and unpaid, and to accrue, which were carried by such other Security.
 
          .
Section 308. Persons Deemed Owners
          Prior to the time of due presentment for registration of transfer, the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee may treat the Person in whose name any Security is registered as the owner of such Security for the purpose of receiving payment of principal of and (subject to Section 307) interest on such Security and for all other purposes whatsoever, whether or not such Security be overdue, and neither the Company, the Trustee nor any agent of the Company or the Trustee shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
          .
Section 309. Cancellation
          All Securities surrendered for payment, registration of transfer or exchange shall, if surrendered to any Person other than the Trustee, be delivered to the Trustee and shall be promptly canceled by it. The Company may at any time deliver to the Trustee for cancellation any Securities previously authenticated and delivered hereunder which the Company may have acquired in any manner whatsoever, and all Securities so delivered shall be promptly canceled by the Trustee. No Securities shall be authenticated in lieu of or in exchange for any Securities canceled as provided in this Section 309, except as expressly permitted by this Indenture. All canceled Securities held by the Trustee shall be disposed of by the Trustee in accordance with its customary procedures.
          .
Section 310. Computation of Interest
          Interest on the Securities shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months.
          .
Section 311. Registration Rights of Holders of Initial Securities
          Pursuant to the terms of the Registration Rights Agreement, Holders of Initial Securities and Additional Securities, if applicable, shall be entitled to the benefits of the Registration Rights Agreement.
          .
Section 312. ISIN and CUSIP Numbers
          The Company in issuing the Securities may use "ISIN" and "CUSIP" numbers (if then generally in use) in addition to serial numbers, and, if so, the Trustee shall use such "ISIN" and "CUSIP" numbers in addition to serial numbers in notices of repurchase as a convenience to Holders; that any such notice may state that no representation is made as to the correctness of such numbers either as printed on the Securities or as contained in any notice of a repurchase and that reliance may be placed only on the serial or other identification numbers printed on the Securities, and any such repurchase shall not be affected by any defect in or omission of such "ISIN" or "CUSIP" numbers. The Company shall promptly notify the Trustee in writing of any change in the "ISIN" or "CUSIP" numbers.
provided
          .
Section 313. Book-Entry Provisions for Global Securities
          (a) The Global Securities initially shall (i) be registered in the name of the Depository or the nominee of such Depository, (ii) be delivered to the Trustee as custodian for
 
such Depository and (iii) bear legends as set forth in Section 206 and, in the case of Restricted Securities in the form of Global Securities, Section 205.
          Members of, or participants in, the Depository ("Agent Members") shall have no rights under this Indenture with respect to any Global Security held on their behalf by the Depository, or the Trustee as its custodian, or under the Global Security, and the Depository may be treated by the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee as the absolute owner of the Global Security for all purposes whatsoever. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing herein shall prevent the Company, the Trustee or any agent of the Company or the Trustee from giving effect to any written certification, proxy or other authorization furnished by the Depository or impair, as between the Depository and its Agent Members, the operation of customary practices governing the exercise of the rights of a Holder of any Security.
          (b) Transfers of Global Securities shall be limited to transfers in whole, but not in part, to the Depository, its successors or their respective nominees. Interests of beneficial owners in a Rule 144A Global Security may be transferred or exchanged for interests in a Regulation S Global Security, and interests of beneficial owners in a Regulation S Global Security may be transferred or exchanged for interests in a Rule 144A Global Security, in each case in accordance with the rules and procedures of the Depository and the provisions of Section 314. Interests of beneficial owners in the Global Securities may be transferred or exchanged for Physical Securities in accordance with the rules and procedures of the Depository and the provisions of Section 314.
          In addition, Physical Securities shall be transferred to all beneficial owners in exchange for their beneficial interests in a Global Security if (i) the Depository (x) notifies the Company that it is unwilling or unable to continue as a depository for such Global Security or (y) if at any time the Depository ceases to be a clearing agency registered under the Exchange Act and, in either case, a successor depository is not appointed by the Company within 90 days, (ii) there shall have occurred and be continuing an Event of Default with respect to the Securities represented by such Global Security and the Trustee has received a written request from the Depository or (iii) the Company at any time notifies the Trustee, in writing, that it elects not to have Securities represented by a Global Security.
          Except as provided above, any Security authenticated and delivered upon registration of transfer of, or in exchange for, or in lieu of, any Global Security, whether pursuant to this Section 313, Section 304, 305, 306 or 906 or otherwise, shall also be a Global Security and bear the legend specified in Section 206.
          (c) In connection with any transfer or exchange of a portion of the beneficial interest in any Global Security to beneficial owners pursuant to paragraph (b), the Security Registrar shall (if one or more Physical Securities are to be issued) reflect on its books and records the date and a decrease in the principal amount of the Global Security in an amount equal to the principal amount of the beneficial interest in the Global Security to be transferred, and the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, one or more Physical Securities of like tenor and principal amount of authorized denominations.
 
          (d) In connection with the transfer of Global Securities as an entirety to beneficial owners pursuant to paragraph (b), the Global Securities shall be deemed to be surrendered to the Trustee for cancellation, and the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, to each beneficial owner identified by the Depository in exchange for its beneficial interest in the Global Securities, an equal aggregate principal amount of Physical Securities of like tenor of authorized denominations.
          (e) Any Physical Security delivered in exchange for an interest in a Global Security pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section 313 shall, except as otherwise provided by clause (i)(x) of paragraph (a) and by paragraph (e) of Section 314, bear the legend set forth in Section 205.
          (f) The Holder of any Global Security may grant proxies and otherwise authorize any person, including Agent Members and persons that may hold interests through Agent Members, to take any action that a Holder is entitled to take under this Indenture or the Securities.
          .
Section 314. Special Transfer Provisions
          (a) . The following provisions shall apply with respect to the registration of any proposed transfer of a Restricted Security to any non-U.S. person:
Transfers to Non-U.S. Persons
     (i) the Security Registrar shall register the transfer of any Restricted Security if (x) the requested transfer is not prior to the later of the date which is one year (or such other period as may be prescribed by Rule 144 under the Securities Act or any successor provision thereunder) after the later of the original issue date of such Security (or of any Predecessor Security) or the date on which such Security is (a) freely transferable in accordance with Rule 144 by a person that is not an "affiliate" (as defined in Rule 144) of the Company where no conditions under Rule 144 are then applicable (other than the holding period requirement of paragraph (d) of Rule 144 so long as such holding period requirement is satisfied at such time of determination), (b) does not bear any restrictive legends relating to the Securities Act and (c) does not bear a restrictive CUSIP number or (y) the proposed transferee has checked the box provided for on the form of Security stating, and has provided to the Security Registrar such certifications, opinions and other information as the Security Registrar may (and, if so directed by the Company, shall) require, stating that such Security is being transferred pursuant to offers and sales to non-U.S. persons that occur outside the United States within the meaning of Regulation S under the Securities Act; and
     (ii) the Security Registrar shall register the transfer of any Restricted Security if the proposed transferor is an Agent Member holding a beneficial interest in a Rule 144A Global Security, upon receipt by the Security Registrar of (x) the certificate stating that such Security is being transferred pursuant to offers and sales to non-U.S. Persons that occur outside the United States in compliance with Rule 903 or 904 of Regulation S under the Securities Act and (y) instructions given in accordance with the Depository's and the Security Registrar's procedures;
 
whereupon the Security Registrar shall reflect on its books and records the date of such transfer and (A) (if the transfer involves a transfer of a beneficial interest in a Rule 144A Global Security) a decrease in the principal amount of such Rule 144A Global Security in an amount equal to the principal amount to be transferred and (B) an increase in the principal amount of a Regulation S Global Security in an amount equal to the principal amount to be transferred.
          (b) . The following provisions shall apply with respect to the registration of any proposed transfer of a Restricted Security to a person purporting to be a QIB (excluding transfers to non-U.S. persons):
Transfers to QIBs
     (i) the Security Registrar shall register the transfer of any Restricted Security if such transfer is being made by a proposed transferor who has checked the box provided for on the form of Security stating, or who has otherwise advised the Company and the Security Registrar in writing, that the transfer has been made in compliance with the exemption from registration under the Securities Act provided under Rule 144A to a transferee who has signed the certification provided for on the form of Security stating, or has otherwise advised the Company and the Security Registrar in writing, that such transferee represents and warrants that it is purchasing the Security for its own account or an account with respect to which it exercises sole investment discretion and that each of it and any such account is a QIB within the meaning of Rule 144A and is aware that the sale to it is being made in reliance on Rule 144A and acknowledges that it has received such information regarding the Company as it has requested pursuant to Rule 144A or has determined not to request such information and that it is aware that the transferor is relying upon the foregoing representations in order to claim the exemption from registration provided by Rule 144A; and
     (ii) the Security Registrar shall register the transfer of any Restricted Security if the proposed transferee is an Agent Member, and the Securities to be transferred consist of Physical Securities which after transfer are to be evidenced by an interest in the Rule 144A Global Security, upon receipt by the Security Registrar of instructions given in accordance with the Depository's and the Security Registrar's procedures, the Security Registrar shall reflect on the Security Register the date and an increase in the principal amount of the Rule 144A Global Security in an amount equal to the principal amount of the Physical Securities to be transferred, and the Trustee shall cancel the Physical Securities so transferred.
          (c) . The following provisions shall apply with respect to the exchange of beneficial interests in the Regulation S Global Securities for beneficial interests in the Rule 144A Global Securities prior to the expiration of the 40-day restricted period:
Transfers during the 40-day Restricted Period
     (i) the requested transfer is not prior to the later of (a) the date which is one year (or such other period as may be prescribed by Rule 144 under the Securities Act or any successor provision thereunder) after the later of the original issue date of such Security (or of any Predecessor Security) and (b) the date on which such Security is (I) freely transferable in accordance with Rule 144 by a person that is not an "affiliate" (as defined in Rule 144) of the Company where no conditions under Rule 144 are then
 
applicable (other than the holding period requirement of paragraph (d) of Rule 144 so long as such holding period requirement is satisfied at such time of determination), (II) does not bear any restrictive legends relating to the Securities Act and (III) does not bear a restrictive CUSIP number; and
     (ii) the transferor delivers to the Security Registrar a written certificate that the Securities are being transferred to a Person (a) who the transferor reasonable believes to be a QIB, (b) who represents and warrants that it is purchasing the Security for its own account or an account with respect to which it exercises sole investment discretion and that it and any such account is a QIB within the meaning of Rule 144A under the Securities Act and is aware that the sale to it is being made in reliance on Rule 144A and acknowledges that it has received such information regarding the Company as the undersigned has requested pursuant to Rule 144A (including the information specified in Rule 144(d)(4)) or has determined not to request such information and that it is aware that the transferor is relying upon the undersigned's foregoing representations in order to claim the exemption from registration provided by Rule 144A and (c) in accordance with all applicable securities laws of the states of the United States and other jurisdictions.
          (d) . If a Holder proposes to transfer a Security pursuant to any exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act other than as provided for by Sections 314(a) and 314(b), the Security Registrar shall only register such transfer or exchange if such transferor delivers to the Security Registrar and the Trustee an Opinion of Counsel satisfactory to the Company and the Security Registrar that such transfer is in compliance with the Securities Act and the terms of this Indenture; that the Company may, based upon the opinion of its counsel, instruct the Security Registrar by a Company Order not to register such transfer in any case where the proposed transferee is not a QIB or a non-U.S. person.
Other Transfers
provided
          (e) . Upon the registration of transfer, exchange or replacement of Restricted Securities, the Security Registrar shall deliver only Securities that bear the legend set forth in Section 205 unless the circumstances contemplated by clause (a)(1)(x) of this Section 314 exist. By its acceptance of any Security bearing the legend set forth in Section 205, each Holder of such a Security acknowledges the restrictions on transfer of such Security set forth in this Indenture and in such legend and agrees that it shall transfer such Security only as provided in this Indenture.
Private Placement Legend
          The Security Registrar shall retain copies of all letters, notices and other written communications received pursuant to Section 313 or this Section 314 for a period of two years, after which time such letters, notices and other written communications shall at the written request of the Company be delivered to the Company. The Company shall have the right to inspect and make copies of all such letters, notices or other written communications at any reasonable time upon the giving of reasonable prior written notice to the Security Registrar.
          (f) . The restrictions imposed by this Section 314 upon the transferability of any particular Restricted Security shall cease and terminate (i) on the later of the date occurring one year after the Securities Issue Date with respect to such Restricted Security (or any Predecessor Security of such Restricted Security) and the date on which such
Termination of Restrictions
 
Security is (a) freely transferable in accordance with Rule 144 by a person that is not an "affiliate" (as defined in Rule 144) of the Company where no conditions under Rule 144 are then applicable (other than the holding period requirement of paragraph (d) of Rule 144 so long as such holding period requirement is satisfied at such time of determination), (b) does not bear any restrictive legends relating to the Securities Act and (c) does not bear a restrictive CUSIP number or (ii) (if earlier) if and when such Restricted Security has been sold pursuant to an effective registration statement under the Securities Act. Any Restricted Security as to which such restrictions on transfer shall have expired in accordance with their terms or shall have terminated may, upon surrender of such Restricted Security for exchange to the Trustee or any transfer agent in accordance with the provisions of Section 305, be exchanged for a new Initial Security or any Additional Security, as the case may be, of like tenor and aggregate principal amount, which shall not bear the restrictive legend required by Section 205. The Company shall inform the Trustee in writing of (i) the effective date of any registration statement registering the Initial Securities or any Additional Security, as the case may be, under the Securities Act and (ii) the date which is one year after the last date on which the Company or any Affiliate of the Company was the owner of a Restricted Security in the event that an Exchange Offer has not been consummated.
          .
Section 401. Satisfaction and Discharge of Indenture
          This Indenture shall, upon Company Request, cease to be of further effect (except as to surviving rights of registration of transfer or exchange of Securities herein expressly provided for) and the Trustee, on demand of and at the expense of the Company, shall execute proper instruments acknowledging satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture, when
     (i) all Securities theretofore authenticated and delivered (other than (A) Securities which have been destroyed, lost or stolen and which have been replaced or paid as provided in Section 306 and (B) Securities for whose payment money has theretofore been deposited in trust or segregated and held in trust by the Company and thereafter repaid to the Company or discharged from such trust, as provided in Section 1003) have been delivered to the Trustee for cancellation; or
     (ii) all such Securities not theretofore delivered to the Trustee for cancellation
          (A) have become due and payable, or
          (B) shall become due and payable within one year,
and the Company, in the case of subclauses (A) or (B) above, has irrevocably deposited or caused to be deposited with the Trustee as trust funds in trust for the
 
purpose an amount sufficient to pay and discharge the entire indebtedness on such Securities not theretofore delivered to the Trustee for cancellation, for principal and interest to the date of such deposit (in the case of Securities which have become due and payable) or to the Stated Maturity;
     (b) the Company has paid or caused to be paid all other sums payable hereunder by the Company; and
     (c) the Company has delivered to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel each stating that all conditions precedent herein provided for relating to the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture have been complied with.
Notwithstanding the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture, the obligations of the Company to the Trustee under Section 606 and, if money shall have been deposited with the Trustee pursuant to subclause (ii) of Subsection (a) of this Section 401, the obligations of the Trustee under Section 402 and the last paragraph of Section 1003 shall survive such satisfaction and discharge.
          .
Section 402. Application of Trust Money
          Subject to the provisions of the last paragraph of Section 1003, all money deposited with the Trustee pursuant to Section 401 shall be held in trust and applied by it, in accordance with the provisions of the Securities and this Indenture, to the payment, either directly or through any Paying Agent (including the Company acting as Paying Agent) as the Trustee may determine, to the Persons entitled thereto, of the principal and interest for whose payment such money has been deposited with the Trustee.
          .
Section 501. Events of Default
          An "Event of Default" occurs if:
     (a) the Company defaults in the payment of interest on any Security when the same becomes due and payable and such default continues for a period of 30 days;
     (b) the Company defaults in the payment of the principal of any Security when the same becomes due and payable at maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise;
     (c) the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary fails to comply with any of its other agreements or covenants in, or provisions of, the Securities or this Indenture, and the Default continues for the period and after the notice, if any, specified below;
     (d) a default occurs under any mortgage, indenture or instrument under which there may be issued or by which there may be secured or evidenced any Indebtedness for money borrowed by the Company or one of its Restricted Subsidiaries (or the payment of
 
which is Guaranteed by the Company or one of its Restricted Subsidiaries), whether such Indebtedness or guarantee now exists or shall be created hereafter (but excluding any Indebtedness for the deferred purchase price of property or services owed to the Person providing such property or services as to which the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary is contesting its obligation to pay the same in good faith and by proper proceedings and for which the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary has established appropriate reserves), and (i) either (A) such event of default results from the failure to pay any such Indebtedness at final maturity or (B) as a result of such event of default the maturity of such Indebtedness has been accelerated prior to its expressed maturity and (ii) the principal amount of such Indebtedness equals $25.0 million or more or, together with the principal amount of any such Indebtedness in default for failure to pay principal at maturity or the maturity of which has been so accelerated, aggregates $25.0 million or more;
     (e) a final judgment or final judgments for the payment of money are entered by a court or courts of competent jurisdiction against the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary and either (i) an enforcement proceeding shall have been commenced by any creditor upon such judgment or (ii) such judgment remains undischarged and unbonded for a period (during which execution shall not be effectively stayed) of 60 days, that the aggregate of all such judgments exceeds $25.0 million;
provided
     (f) except as permitted by this Indenture, the Note Guarantee of any Subsidiary that is not an Insignificant Subsidiary shall be held in any judicial proceeding to be unenforceable or invalid or shall cease for any reason to be in full force and effect or any such Guarantor, or any Person acting on behalf of any such Guarantor, shall deny or disaffirm in writing its obligations under its Note Guarantee;
     (g) the Company, any Guarantor that is not an Insignificant Subsidiary or any Significant Subsidiary (or any Restricted Subsidiaries that together would constitute a Significant Subsidiary) pursuant to or within the meaning of any Bankruptcy Law:
     (i) commences a voluntary case or proceeding;
     (ii) consents to the entry of an order for relief against it in an involuntary case or proceeding;
     (iii) consents to the appointment of a Custodian of it or for all or substantially all of its property;
     (iv) makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors; or
     (v) admits in writing that it generally is unable to pay its debts as the same become due; or
     (h) a court of competent jurisdiction enters an order or decree under any Bankruptcy Law that:
 
     (i) is for relief against the Company, any Guarantor that is not an Insignificant Subsidiary or any Significant Subsidiary (or any Restricted Subsidiaries that together would constitute a Significant Subsidiary), in an involuntary case or proceeding;
     (ii) appoints a Custodian of the Company, any Guarantor that is not an Insignificant Subsidiary or any Significant Subsidiary (or any Restricted Subsidiaries that together would constitute a Significant Subsidiary) or for all or substantially all of the property of the Company, any Guarantor that is not an Insignificant Subsidiary or any Significant Subsidiary (or any Restricted Subsidiaries that together would constitute a Significant Subsidiary); or
     (iii) orders the liquidation of the Company, any Guarantor that is not an Insignificant Subsidiary or any Significant Subsidiary (or any Restricted Subsidiaries that together would constitute a Significant Subsidiary);
     and in each case the order or decree remains unstayed and in effect for 60 days.
          The term "Bankruptcy Law" means Title 11, U.S. Code or any similar Federal or state law for the relief of debtors. The term "Custodian" means any receiver, trustee, assignee, liquidator, sequestrator or similar official under any Bankruptcy Law.
          A Default under Section 501(c) is not an Event of Default until the Trustee notifies the Company in writing, or the Holders of at least 25% in principal amount of the Securities then Outstanding notify the Company and the Trustee in writing, of the Default, and the Company does not cure the Default within 60 days (30 days in the case of a Default under Section 801, 1003, 1014 or 1015) after receipt of the notice. The notice must specify the Default, demand that it be remedied and state that the notice is a "Notice of Default." Such notice to the Company shall be given by the Trustee if so requested in writing by the Holders of 25% of the principal amount of the Securities then Outstanding.
          .
Section 502. Acceleration of Maturity; Rescission
          If an Event of Default (other than an Event of Default specified in Section 501(g) or (h)) occurs and is continuing, the Trustee or the Holders of at least 25% of the principal amount of the Securities then Outstanding, voting together as a single class, by written notice to the Company and the agents, if any, under the Credit Agreement (and to the Trustee if such notice is given by the Holders), may, and the Trustee at the request of such Holders shall, declare all unpaid principal of and accrued interest on all the Securities to be due and payable, as specified below. Upon a declaration of acceleration, such principal and accrued interest shall be due and payable 10 days after receipt by the Company of such written notice given hereunder. If an Event of Default specified in Section 501(g) or (h) with respect to the Company occurs, the amounts described above shall become and be immediately due and payable without any declaration or other act on the part of the Trustee or any Holder. Upon payment of such principal and interest, all of the Company's obligations under the Securities and this Indenture, other than obligations under Section 606, shall terminate.
ipso facto
 
          The Holders of at least a majority in principal amount of the Securities then Outstanding, voting together as a single class, by written notice to the Trustee, may rescind an acceleration and its consequences if (i) all existing Events of Default, other than the non-payment of principal of or interest on the Securities which have become due solely because of the acceleration, have been cured or waived and (ii) the rescission would not conflict with any judgment or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction.
          Notwithstanding the preceding paragraph, in the event of a declaration of acceleration in respect of the Securities because an Event of Default specified in Section 501(d) shall have occurred and be continuing, such declaration of acceleration shall be automatically annulled if the Indebtedness that is the subject of such Event of Default has been discharged or the holders thereof have rescinded their declaration of acceleration in respect of such Indebtedness, and written notice of such discharge or rescission, as the case may be, shall have been given to the Trustee by the Company and countersigned by the holders of such Indebtedness or a trustee, fiduciary or agent for such holders, within 30 days after such declaration of acceleration in respect of the Securities, and no other Event of Default has occurred during such 30-day period which has not been cured or waived during such period.
          Notices by the Trustee to the agents under the Credit Agreement provided for herein shall be delivered or mailed to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Loan and Agency Services Group 1111 Fannin, 10 Floor, Houston, Texas 77002, Attention: Yi-Chun Kuo, Facsimile No.: (713) 750-2878 and e-mail Address: yi-chun.kuo@jpmorgan.com, with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., 383 Madison Avenue, New York, New York 10179, Attention: John Kowalczuk, Facsimile No.: (212) 270-5127 and E-mail Address: john.kowalczuk@jpmorgan.com; and to any other person who hereafter becomes an agent under the Credit Agreement, provided the Trustee has been notified by the Company or the agents under the Credit Agreement of the names and mailing addresses of such persons.
th
          .
Section 503. Collection of Indebtedness and Suits for Enforcement by Trustee
          The Company covenants that if
          (a) default is made in the payment of any interest on any Security when such interest becomes due and payable and such default continues for a period of 30 days, or
     (b) default is made in the payment of the principal of any Security at the Maturity thereof,
the Company shall, upon demand of the Trustee, pay to it, for the benefit of the Holders of such Securities, the whole amount then due and payable on such Securities for principal and interest, with interest upon the overdue principal and, to the extent that payment of such interest shall be legally enforceable, upon overdue installments of interest, at the rate borne by the Securities; and, in addition thereto, such further amount as shall be sufficient to cover the costs and expenses of collection, including the compensation, reasonable expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel.
 
          If the Company fails to pay such amounts forthwith upon such demand, the Trustee, in its own name and as trustee of an express trust, may institute a judicial proceeding for the collection of the sums so due and unpaid and may prosecute such proceeding to judgment or final decree, and may enforce the same against the Company or any other obligor upon the Securities and collect the moneys adjudged or decreed to be payable in the manner provided by law out of the property of the Company or any other obligor upon the Securities, wherever situated.
          If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Trustee may proceed to protect and enforce its rights and the rights of the Holders under this Indenture by such appropriate private or judicial proceedings necessary to protect and enforce such rights.
          .
Section 504. Trustee May File Proofs of Claim
          In case of the pendency of any receivership, insolvency, liquidation, bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, adjustment, composition or other judicial proceeding relative to the Company or any other obligor upon the Securities or the property of the Company or of such other obligor or their creditors, the Trustee (irrespective of whether the principal of the Securities shall then be due and payable as therein expressed or by declaration or otherwise and irrespective of whether the Trustee shall have made any demand on the Company for the payment of overdue principal or interest) shall be entitled and empowered, by intervention in such proceeding or otherwise,
     (a) to file and prove a claim for the whole amount of principal and interest owing and unpaid in respect of the Securities and to file such other papers or documents as may be necessary or advisable in order to have the claims of the Trustee (including any claim for the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel) and of the Holders allowed in such judicial proceeding, and
     (b) to collect and receive any moneys or other property payable or deliverable on any such claims and to distribute the same; and any custodian, receiver, assignee, trustee, liquidator, sequestrator or similar official in any such judicial proceeding is hereby authorized by each Holder to make such payments to the Trustee and, in the event that the Trustee shall consent to the making of such payments directly to the Holders, to pay the Trustee any amount due it for the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel, and any other amounts due the Trustee under this Indenture.
          Nothing herein contained shall be deemed to authorize the Trustee to authorize or consent to or accept or adopt on behalf of any Holder any proposal, plan of reorganization, arrangement, adjustment or composition or other similar arrangement affecting the Securities or the rights of any Holder thereof, or to authorize the Trustee to vote in respect of the claim of any Holder in any such proceeding.
 
          .
Section 505. Trustee May Enforce Claims Without Possession of Securities
          All rights of action and claims under this Indenture or the Securities may be prosecuted and enforced by the Trustee without the possession of any of the Securities or the production thereof in any proceeding relating thereto, and any such proceeding instituted by the Trustee shall be brought in its own name and as trustee of an express trust, and any recovery of judgment shall, after provision for the payment of the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel, be for the ratable benefit of the Holders of the Securities in respect of which such judgment has been recovered.
          .
Section 506. Application of Money Collected
          Any money collected by the Trustee pursuant to this Article shall be applied in the following order, at the date or dates fixed by the Trustee and, in case of the distribution of such money on account of principal or interest, upon presentation of the Securities and the notation thereon of the payment if only partially paid and upon surrender thereof if fully paid:
     FIRST: To the payment of all amounts due the Trustee under this Indenture;
     SECOND: To the payment of the amounts then due and unpaid upon the Securities for principal and interest, in respect of which or for the benefit of which such money has been collected, ratably, without preference or priority of any kind, according to the amounts due and payable on such Securities for principal and interest; and
     THIRD: The balance, if any, to the Company.
          .
Section 507. Limitation on Suits
          No Holder of any Securities shall have any right to institute any proceeding, judicial or otherwise, with respect to this Indenture or the Securities, or for the appointment of a receiver or trustee, or for any other remedy hereunder, unless
     (a) such Holder has previously given written notice to the Trustee of a continuing Event of Default;
     (b) the Holders of not less than 25% in principal amount of the Securities then Outstanding, voting together as a single class, shall have made written request to the Trustee to institute proceedings in respect of such Event of Default in its own name as Trustee hereunder;
     (c) such Holder or Holders have offered to the Trustee indemnity reasonably satisfactory to it against the costs, expenses and liabilities to be incurred in compliance with such request;
     (d) the Trustee for 60 days after its receipt of such notice, request and offer of indemnity has failed to institute any such proceeding; and
 
     (e) no direction inconsistent with such written request has been given to the Trustee during such 60-day period by the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities;
it being understood and intended that no one or more Holders shall have any right in any manner whatever by virtue of, or by availing of, any provision of this Indenture to affect, disturb or prejudice the rights of any other Holders, or to obtain or to seek to obtain priority or preference over any other Holders or to enforce any right under this Indenture except in the manner provided in this Indenture and for the equal and ratable benefit of all the Holders (it being understood that the Trustee does not have an affirmative duty to ascertain whether or not such actions or forbearances are unduly prejudicial to such Holders).
          .
Section 508. Unconditional Right of Holders to Receive Principal and Interest
          Notwithstanding any other provision in this Indenture, the Holder of any Security shall have the right, which is absolute and unconditional, to receive payment of the principal of and (subject to Section 307) interest on such Security on the respective due dates expressed in such Security and to institute suit for the enforcement of any such payment, and such rights shall not be impaired without the consent of such Holder.
          .
Section 509. Restoration of Rights and Remedies
          If the Trustee or any Holder has instituted any proceeding to enforce any right or remedy under this Indenture and such proceeding has been discontinued or abandoned for any reason, or has been determined adversely to the Trustee or to such Holder, then and in every such case the Company, the Trustee and the Holders shall, subject to any determination in such proceeding, be restored severally and respectively to their former positions hereunder, and thereafter all rights and remedies of the Trustee and the Holders shall continue as though no such proceeding had been instituted.
          .
Section 510. Rights and Remedies Cumulative
          Except as provided in Section 306, no right or remedy herein conferred upon or reserved to the Trustee or to the Holders is intended to be exclusive of any other right or remedy, and every right and remedy shall, to the extent permitted by law, be cumulative and in addition to every other right and remedy given hereunder or now or hereafter existing at law or in equity or otherwise. The assertion or employment of any right or remedy hereunder, or otherwise, shall not prevent the concurrent assertion or employment of any other appropriate right or remedy.
          .
Section 511. Delay or Omission Not Waiver
          No delay or omission of the Trustee or of any Holder of any Security to exercise any right or remedy accruing upon any Event of Default shall impair any such right or remedy or constitute a waiver of any such Event of Default or an acquiescence therein. Every right and remedy given by this Article or by law to the Trustee or to the Holders may be exercised from time to time, and as often as may be deemed expedient, by the Trustee or by the Holders, as the case may be.
 
          .
Section 512. Control by Holders
          The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities then Outstanding, voting together as a single class, shall have the right to direct the time, method and place of conducting any proceeding for any remedy available to the Trustee, or exercising any trust or power conferred on the Trustee, that
provided
     (a) such direction shall not be in conflict with any rule of law or with this Indenture or expose the Trustee to personal liability, and
     (b) subject to the provisions of Trust Indenture Act Section 315, the Trustee may take any other action deemed proper by the Trustee that is not inconsistent with such direction.
          .
Section 513. Waiver of Past Defaults
          The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities then Outstanding, voting together as a single class, may on behalf of the Holders of all the Securities waive any past Default or Event of Default hereunder and its consequences, except a Default or Event of Default
     (a) in the payment of the principal of or interest on any Security, or
     (b) in respect of a covenant or provision hereof which under Article Nine cannot be modified or amended without the consent of the Holder of each Outstanding Security affected.
          Upon any such waiver, such default shall cease to exist, and any Event of Default arising therefrom shall be deemed to have been cured, for every purpose of this Indenture; but no such waiver shall extend to any subsequent or other default or impair any right consequent thereon.
          .
Section 514. Undertaking for Costs
          All parties to this Indenture agree, and each Holder of any Security by his acceptance thereof shall be deemed to have agreed, that any court may in its discretion require, in any suit for the enforcement of any right or remedy under this Indenture, or in any suit against the Trustee for any action taken, suffered or omitted by it as Trustee, the filing by any party litigant in such suit of an undertaking to pay the costs of such suit, and that such court may in its discretion assess reasonable costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses, against any party litigant in such suit, having due regard to the merits and good faith of the claims or defenses made by such party litigant; but the provisions of this Section 514 shall not apply to any suit instituted by the Trustee, to any suit instituted by any Holder, or group of Holders, holding in the aggregate more than 10% in principal amount of the Securities then Outstanding, voting together as a single class, or to any suit instituted by any Holder for the enforcement of the payment of the principal of or interest on any Security on or after the respective Stated Maturities expressed in such Security; that neither this Section 514 nor the Trust Indenture Act
provided
 
shall be deemed to authorize any court to require such an undertaking or to make such an assessment in any suit instituted by the Company.
          
Section 515. Waiver of Stay, Extension or Usury Laws.
          The Company covenants (to the extent that it may lawfully do so) that it shall not at any time insist upon, or plead, or in any manner whatsoever claim or take the benefit or advantage of, any stay, extension or usury law wherever enacted, now or at any time hereafter in force, which may affect the covenants or the performance of this Indenture; and the Company (to the extent that it may lawfully do so) hereby expressly waives all benefit or advantage of any such law, and covenants that it shall not hinder, delay or impede the execution of any power herein granted to the Trustee, but shall suffer and permit the execution of every such power as though no such law had been enacted.
          .
Section 601. Certain Duties and Responsibilities
          (a) Except during the continuance of an Event of Default,
     (i) the Trustee undertakes to perform such duties and only such duties as are specifically set forth in this Indenture, and no implied covenants or obligations shall be read into this Indenture against the Trustee; and
     (ii) in the absence of willful misconduct or gross negligence on its part, the Trustee may conclusively rely, as to the truth of the statements and the correctness of the opinions expressed therein, upon certificates or opinions furnished to the Trustee and conforming to the requirements of this Indenture; but in the case of any such certificates or opinions which by any provision hereof are specifically required to be furnished to the Trustee, the Trustee shall be under a duty to examine the same to determine whether or not they conform to the requirements of this Indenture (but need not confirm or investigate the accuracy of mathematical calculations or other facts stated therein).
          (b) In case an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Trustee shall exercise such of the rights and powers vested in it by this Indenture, and use the same degree of care and skill in their exercise, as a prudent person would exercise or use under the circumstances in the conduct of his or her own affairs.
          (c) No provision of this Indenture shall be construed to relieve the Trustee from liability for its own negligent action, its own negligent failure to act, or its own willful misconduct, except that
     (i) this Subsection shall not be construed to limit the effect of clause (a) of this Section 601;
 
     (ii) the Trustee shall not be liable for any error of judgment made in good faith by a Responsible Officer, unless it shall be proved that the Trustee was negligent in ascertaining the pertinent facts;
     (iii) the Trustee shall not be liable with respect to any action taken or omitted to be taken by it in good faith in accordance with the direction of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities relating to the time, method and place of conducting any proceeding for any remedy available to the Trustee, or exercising any trust or power conferred upon the Trustee, under this Indenture with respect to the Securities; and
     (iv) no provision of this Indenture shall require the Trustee to expend or risk its own funds or otherwise incur any financial liability in the performance of any of its duties hereunder, or in the exercise of any of its rights or powers, if it shall have reasonable grounds for believing that repayment of such funds or adequate indemnity against such risk or liability is not reasonably assured to it.
          (d) Whether or not therein expressly so provided, every provision of this Indenture relating to the conduct or affecting the liability of or affording protection to the Trustee shall be subject to the provisions of this Section.
          .
Section 602. Certain Rights of Trustee
          Subject to the provisions of Trust Indenture Act Sections 315(a) through 315(d):
     (a) the Trustee may conclusively rely and shall be fully protected in acting or refraining from acting upon any resolution, certificate, statement, instrument, opinion, report, notice, request, direction, consent, order, bond, debenture, note, other evidence of indebtedness or other paper or document (whether in its original or facsimile form) believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or presented by the proper party or parties;
     (b) any request or direction of the Company mentioned herein shall be sufficiently evidenced by a Company Request or Company Order and any resolution of the board of directors of the Company may be sufficiently evidenced by a Board Resolution;
     (c) whenever in the administration of this Indenture the Trustee shall deem it desirable that a matter be proved or established prior to taking, suffering or omitting any action hereunder, the Trustee (unless other evidence be herein specifically prescribed) may, in the absence of bad faith on its part, rely upon an Officers' Certificate;
     (d) the Trustee may consult with counsel of its selection and the advice of such counsel or any Opinion of Counsel shall be full and complete authorization and protection in respect of any action taken, suffered or omitted by it hereunder in good faith and in reliance thereon;
 
     (e) the Trustee shall be under no obligation to exercise any of the rights or powers vested in it by this Indenture at the request or direction of any of the Holders pursuant to this Indenture, unless such Holders shall have offered to the Trustee security or indemnity reasonably satisfactory to it against the costs, expenses and liabilities which might be incurred by it in compliance with such request or direction;
     (f) the Trustee shall not be bound to make any investigation into the facts or matters stated in any resolution, certificate, statement, instrument, opinion, report, notice, request, direction, consent, order, bond, debenture, note, other evidence of indebtedness or other paper or document, but the Trustee, in its discretion, may make such further inquiry or investigation into such facts or matters as it may see fit, and, if the Trustee shall determine to make such further inquiry or investigation, it shall be entitled to examine the books, records and premises of the Company, personally or by agent or attorney at the expense of the Company and shall incur no liability or additional liability of any kind by reason of such inquiry or investigation;
     (g) the Trustee may execute any of the trusts or powers hereunder or perform any duties hereunder either directly or by or through agents or attorneys and the Trustee shall not be responsible for any misconduct or negligence on the part of any agent or attorney appointed with due care by it hereunder;
     (h) the Trustee shall not be liable for any action taken, suffered, or omitted to be taken by it in good faith and reasonably believed by it to be authorized or within the discretion or rights or powers conferred upon it by this Indenture;
     (i) in no event shall the Trustee be responsible or liable for special, indirect, punitive or consequential loss or damage of any kind whatsoever (including, but not limited to, loss of profit) irrespective of whether the Trustee has been advised of the likelihood of such loss or damage and regardless of the form of action;
     (j) the Trustee shall not be deemed to have notice of any Default or Event of Default unless a Responsible Officer of the Trustee has actual knowledge thereof or unless written notice of any event which is in fact such a default is received by the Trustee at the Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee, and such notice references the Securities and this Indenture;
     (k) the rights, privileges, protections, immunities and benefits given to the Trustee, including, without limitation, its right to be indemnified, are extended to, and shall be enforceable by, the Trustee in each of its capacities hereunder, and each agent, custodian and other Person employed to act hereunder;
     (l) the Trustee shall not be required to give any bond or surety in respect of the performance of its powers and duties hereunder; and
     (m) the Trustee may request that the Company deliver a certificate setting forth the names of individuals and/or titles of officers authorized at such time to take specified actions pursuant to this Indenture.
 
          The undersigned, ____________, being the ____________ of ____________ (the "Company") does hereby certify that the individuals listed below are qualified and acting officers of the Company as set forth in the right column opposite their respective names and the signatures appearing in the extreme right column opposite the name of each such officer is a true specimen of the genuine signature of such officer and such individuals have the authority to execute documents to be delivered to, or upon the request of, _______________________, as Trustee (the "Trustee") under the Indenture dated as of _________ __, 20__, by and between the Company and the Trustee.
          IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has duly executed and delivered this Certificate as of the ____ day of ________, 20_.
          .
Section 603. Not Responsible for Recitals or Issuance of Securities
          The recitals contained herein and in the Securities, except the Trustee's certificates of authentication, shall be taken as the statements of the Company, and the Trustee assumes no responsibility for their correctness. The Trustee makes no representations as to the validity or sufficiency of this Indenture or of the Securities. The Trustee shall not be accountable for the use or application by the Company of Securities or the proceeds thereof, except that the Trustee represents that it is duly authorized to execute and deliver this Indenture, authenticate the Securities and perform its obligations hereunder and that the statements to be made by it in a Statement of Eligibility on Form T-1 supplied to the Company are true and accurate, subject to the qualifications set forth therein.
          .
Section 604. May Hold Securities
          The Trustee, any Paying Agent, Security Registrar or any other agent of the Company, in its individual or any other capacity, may become the owner or pledgee of Securities and, subject to Trust Indenture Act Sections 310(b) and 311, may otherwise deal with the Company with the same rights it would have if it were not Trustee, Paying Agent, Security Registrar or such other agent.
 
          .
Section 605. Money Held in Trust
          Money held by the Trustee in trust hereunder need not be segregated from other funds except to the extent required by law. The Trustee shall be under no liability for interest on any money received by it hereunder except as otherwise agreed in writing with the Company.
          .
Section 606. Compensation and Reimbursement
          The Company agrees:
     (a) to pay to the Trustee from time to time such compensation as shall be agreed to in writing between the Company and the Trustee for all services rendered by it hereunder (which compensation shall not be limited by any provision of law in regard to the compensation of a trustee of an express trust);
     (b) except as otherwise expressly provided herein, to reimburse the Trustee upon its request for all reasonable expenses, disbursements and advances incurred or made by the Trustee in accordance with any provision of this Indenture (including the reasonable compensation and the expenses and disbursements of its agents and counsel), except any such expense, disbursement or advance as shall have been caused by its negligence or willful misconduct; and
     (c) to indemnify each of the Trustee or any predecessor Trustee for, and to hold it harmless against, any and all loss, damage, claim, liability or expense including taxes (other than taxes based on the income of the Trustee) incurred without gross negligence or willful misconduct on its part, arising out of or in connection with the acceptance or administration of this trust, including the costs and expenses of defending itself against any claim or (whether asserted by the Company, a Guarantor, a Holder or any other Person) liability in connection with the exercise or performance of any of its powers or duties hereunder.
          As security for the performance of the obligations of the Company under this Section 606, the Trustee shall have a Lien prior to the Securities upon all property and funds held or collected by the Trustee as such, except funds held in trust for the benefit of Holders of particular Securities.
          When the Trustee incurs expenses or renders services in connection with an Event of Default specified in Section 501(f) or 501(g), the expenses (including the reasonable charges and expenses of its counsel) and the compensation for the services shall be intended to constitute expenses of administration under any Bankruptcy Law.
          The provisions of this Section 606 shall survive the termination of this Indenture.
          .
Section 607. Conflicting Interests
          The Trustee shall comply with the provisions of Section 310(b) of the Trust Indenture Act.
 
          .
Section 608. Corporate Trustee Required; Eligibility
          There shall at all times be a Trustee hereunder qualified or to be qualified under Trust Indenture Act Section 310(a)(1) and which shall have a combined capital and surplus of at least $50,000,000 to the extent there is such an institution eligible and willing to serve. If the Trustee publishes reports of condition at least annually, pursuant to law or to the requirements of Federal, State, Territorial or District of Columbia supervising or examining authority, then for the purposes of this Section 608, the combined capital and surplus of the Trustee shall be deemed to be its combined capital and surplus as set forth in its most recent report of condition so published. If at any time the Trustee shall cease to be eligible in accordance with the provisions of this Section 608, it shall resign immediately in the manner and with the effect hereinafter specified in this Article.
          .
Section 609. Resignation and Removal; Appointment of Successor
          (a) No resignation or removal of the Trustee and no appointment of a successor Trustee pursuant to this Article shall become effective until the acceptance of appointment by the successor Trustee under Section 610.
          (b) The Trustee may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Company. If an instrument of acceptance by a successor Trustee shall not have been delivered to the Trustee within 30 days after the giving of such notice of resignation, the resigning Trustee may petition at the expense of the Company any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor Trustee.
          (c) The Trustee may be removed at any time by an Act of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities, delivered to the Trustee and the Company. If an instrument of acceptance by a successor Trustee shall not have been delivered to the Trustee within 30 days after the giving of such notice of removal, the removed Trustee may petition at the expense of the Company any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor Trustee.
          (d) If at any time:
     (i) the Trustee shall fail to comply with the provisions of Trust Indenture Act Section 310(b) after written request therefor by the Company or by any Holder who has been a bona fide Holder of a Security for at least six months, or
     (ii) the Trustee shall cease to be eligible under Section 608 and shall fail to resign after written request therefor by the Company or by any Holder who has been a bona fide Holder of a Security for at least six months, or
     (iii) the Trustee shall become incapable of acting or shall be adjudged a bankrupt or insolvent, or a receiver of the Trustee or of its property shall be appointed or any public officer shall take charge or control of the Trustee or of its property or affairs for the purpose of rehabilitation, conservation or liquidation,
 
then, in any case, (A) the Company by a Board Resolution may remove the Trustee, or (B) subject to Section 514, the Holder of any Security who has been a bona fide Holder of a Security for at least six months may, on behalf of himself and all others similarly situated, petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the removal of the Trustee and the appointment of a successor Trustee.
          (e) If the Trustee shall resign, be removed or become incapable of acting, or if a vacancy shall occur in the office of Trustee for any cause, the Company, by a Board Resolution, shall promptly appoint a successor Trustee. If, within one year after such resignation, removal or incapability, or the occurrence of such vacancy, a successor Trustee shall be appointed by Act of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities delivered to the Company and the retiring Trustee, the successor Trustee so appointed shall, forthwith upon its acceptance of such appointment in accordance with Section 610, become the successor Trustee and supersede the successor Trustee appointed by the Company. If no successor Trustee shall have been so appointed by the Company or the Holders of the Securities and so accepted appointment, the Holder of any Security who has been a bona fide Holder for at least six months may, on behalf of himself and all others similarly situated, petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor Trustee.
          (f) The Company shall give notice of each resignation and each removal of the Trustee and each appointment of a successor Trustee by mailing written notice of such event by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the Holders of Securities as their names and addresses appear in the Security Register. Each notice shall include the name of the successor Trustee and the address of its Corporate Trust Office.
          .
Section 610. Acceptance of Appointment by Successor
          Every successor Trustee appointed hereunder shall execute, acknowledge and deliver to the Company and to the retiring Trustee an instrument accepting such appointment, and thereupon the resignation or removal of the retiring Trustee shall become effective and such successor Trustee, without any further act, deed or conveyance, shall become vested with all the rights, powers, trusts and duties of the retiring Trustee, , , that the retiring Trustee shall continue to be entitled to the benefit of Section 606(c); but, on request of the Company or the successor Trustee, such retiring Trustee shall, upon payment of its charges, execute and deliver an instrument transferring to such successor Trustee all the rights, powers and trusts of the retiring Trustee, and shall duly assign, transfer and deliver to such successor Trustee all property and money held by such retiring Trustee hereunder. Upon request of any such successor Trustee, the Company shall execute any and all instruments for more fully and certainly vesting in and confirming to such successor Trustee all such rights, powers and trusts.
provided
however
          No successor Trustee shall accept its appointment unless at the time of such acceptance such successor Trustee shall be qualified and eligible under this Article.
          .
Section 611. Merger, Conversion, Consolidation or Succession to Business
          Any corporation into which the Trustee may be merged or converted or with which it may be consolidated, or any corporation resulting from any merger, conversion or
 
consolidation to which the Trustee shall be a party, or any corporation succeeding to all or substantially all of the corporate trust business of the Trustee, shall be the successor of the Trustee hereunder, provided such corporation shall be otherwise qualified and eligible under this Article, without the execution or filing of any paper or any further act on the part of any of the parties hereto. In case any Securities shall have been authenticated, but not delivered, by the Trustee then in office, any successor by merger, conversion or consolidation to such authenticating Trustee may adopt such authentication and deliver the Securities so authenticated with the same effect as if such successor Trustee had itself authenticated such Securities.
          .
Section 612. Preferential Collection of Claims Against Company
          If and when the Trustee shall be or become a creditor of the Company (or any other obligor under the Securities), the Trustee shall be subject to the provisions of the Trust Indenture Act regarding the collection of claims against the Company (or any such other obligor).
          .
Section 613. Trustee's Application for Instructions from the Company
          Any application by the Trustee for written instructions from the Company may, at the option of the Trustee, set forth in writing any action proposed to be taken or omitted by the Trustee under this Indenture and the date on and/or after which such action shall be taken or such omission shall be effective. The Trustee shall not be liable for any action taken by, or omission of, the Trustee in accordance with a proposal included in such application on or after the date specified in such application (which date shall not be less than three Business Days after the date any officer of the Company actually received such application) unless, with respect to any such action (or the effective date in the case of an omission), the Trustee shall have received written instructions in response to such application specifying the action to be taken or omitted.
          .
Section 614. Notice of Defaults
          Within 90 days after the occurrence of any Default, the Trustee shall transmit by mail to all Holders, as their names and addresses appear in the Security Register, notice of such Default hereunder actually known to a Responsible Officer of the Trustee, unless such default shall have been cured or waived; , , that, except in the case of a default in the payment of the principal of or interest on any Security, the Trustee shall be protected in withholding such notice if and so long as a trust committee of directors and/or Responsible Officers of the Trustee in good faith determines that the withholding of such notice is in the interest of the Holders; and that, in the case of any default or breach of the character specified in Section 501(d), no such notice to Holders shall be given until at least 30 days after the occurrence thereof.
provided
however
provided further
 
          .
Section 701. Disclosure of Names and Addresses of Holders
          The rights of Holders to communicate with other Holders with respect to their rights under this Indenture or under the Securities, and the corresponding rights and privileges of the Trustee, shall be as provided by the Trust Indenture Act.
          Every Holder, by receiving and holding the same, agrees with the Company and the Trustee that neither the Company nor the Trustee or any agent of either of them shall be held accountable by reason of the disclosure of any information as to the names and addresses of the Holders in accordance with Trust Indenture Act Section 312, regardless of the source from which such information was derived, and that the Trustee shall not be held accountable by reason of mailing any material pursuant to a request made under Trust Indenture Act Section 312.
          .
Section 702. Reports by Trustee
          Within 60 days after May 15 of each year commencing with May 15, 2012, the Trustee shall transmit by mail to all Holders, as their names and addresses appear in the Security Register, as provided in Trust Indenture Act Section 313(c), a brief report dated as of such May 15 if required by Trust Indenture Act Section 313(a).
          .
Section 703. Reports by Company
          The Company shall supply without cost to each Holder, and file with the Trustee (if not otherwise filed with the Trustee pursuant to this Indenture) within 30 days after the Company is required to file the same with the Commission, copies of the annual reports and quarterly reports and of the information, documents and other reports which the Company may be required to file with the Commission pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c) or 15(d) of the Exchange Act. If the Company is not required to file with the Commission such reports and other information referred to in the immediately preceding sentence, the Company shall furnish without cost to each Holder and file with the Trustee (i) within 140 days after the end of each fiscal year, annual reports containing the information required to be contained in Items 1, 2, 3, 6, 7, 8 and 9 of Form 10-K promulgated under the Exchange Act, or substantially the same information required to be contained in comparable items of any successor form, and (ii) within 75 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year, quarterly reports containing the information required to be contained in Form 10-Q promulgated under the Exchange Act, or substantially the same information required to be contained in any successor form. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company shall be deemed to have furnished such reports referred to above to the Holders and the Trustee if the Company has filed such reports with the Commission via the EDGAR filing system and such reports are publicly available; , , that the trustee shall have no responsibilities whatsoever to determine whether such filing has occurred.
provided
however
          At any time when the Company is not subject to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act, upon the request of a Holder of a restricted note, the Company shall promptly
 
furnish or cause to be furnished such information as is specified pursuant to Rule 144A(d)(4) under the Securities Act (or any successor provision thereto) to such Holder or to a prospective purchaser of such restricted note designated by such Holder, as the case may be, in order to permit compliance by such Holder with Rule 144A under the Securities Act.
          Delivery of such reports, information and documents under this Section 703, as well as any such reports, information and documents pursuant to this Indenture, to the Trustee is for informational purposes only and the Trustee's receipt of such shall not constitute constructive notice of any information contained therein or determinable from information contained therein, including the Company's compliance with any of its covenants hereunder (as to which the Trustee is entitled to rely exclusively on Officers' Certificates). The Trustee shall have no responsibility or liability for the filing, timeliness or content of any report required under this Section 703 or any other reports, information and documents required under this Indenture (aside from any report that is expressly the responsibility of the Trustee subject to the terms hereof).
          The Company shall be entitled to require certification as to a person's bona fide status as a beneficial owner or prospective investor, as applicable, prior to distributing to such person the information to be provided by the Company.
          .
Section 801. Company May Consolidate, Etc., Only on Certain Terms
          The Company shall not consolidate or merge with or into, or sell, assign, transfer, lease, convey, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its assets to, any Person, unless:
     (a) the Person formed by or surviving any such consolidation or merger (if other than the Company), or to which such sale, assignment, transfer, lease, conveyance or disposition shall have been made, is a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the United States, any state thereof or the District of Columbia and shall assume by supplemental indenture hereto all the obligations of the Company under the Securities, this Indenture and the Registration Rights Agreement;
     (b) immediately before and immediately after such transaction, and after giving effect thereto, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing;
     (c) each Guarantor, unless such Guarantor is the Person with which the Company has entered into a transaction under this Section 801, shall have by amendment to its applicable Note Guarantee confirmed that such Note Guarantee shall apply to the obligations of the Company or the surviving Person in accordance with the Securities and this Indenture;
     (d) immediately after such transaction, and after giving effect thereto, the Person formed by or surviving any such consolidation or merger, or to which such sale, assignment, transfer, lease or conveyance or disposition shall have been made (the
 
"successor") would be able to incur at least $1.00 of additional Indebtedness pursuant to the Cash Flow Ratio test set forth in Section 1007(a); and
     (e) the Company has delivered to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel, each stating that such consolidation, merger or transfer and such supplemental indenture, if one is required by this Section 801, comply with this Section 801 and that all conditions precedent herein provided for relating to such transaction have been complied with.
          Cash Flow Ratio for purposes of this Section 801 shall be computed as if any such successor were the Company.
          .
Section 802. Successor Substituted
          Upon any consolidation or merger, or any sale, assignment, transfer, Lease or conveyance or other disposition of all or substantially all of the assets, of the Company in accordance with Section 801, the successor Person formed by such consolidation or into which the Company is merged or to which such sale, assignment, transfer, Lease, conveyance or other disposition is made shall succeed to, and be substituted for, and may exercise every right and power of, the Company under this Indenture with the same effect as if such successor Person had been named as the Company herein. When a successor assumes all the obligations of its predecessor under this Indenture, the Registration Rights Agreement and the Securities, the predecessor shall be released from those obligations, that in the case of a transfer by Lease, the predecessor corporation shall not be released from the payment of principal and interest on the Securities.
provided
          .
Section 901. Supplemental Indentures Without Consent of Holders
          Without the consent of any Holders, the Company, when authorized by a Board Resolution, and the Trustee, at any time and from time to time, may enter into one or more indentures supplemental hereto in form satisfactory to the Trustee, for any of the following purposes:
     (a) to evidence the succession of another Person to the Company and the assumption by any such successor of the covenants of the Company herein and in the Securities;
     (b) to add to the covenants of the Company for the benefit of the Holders, or to surrender any right or power herein or in the Securities conferred upon the Company;
     (c) to cure any ambiguity, to correct or supplement any provision herein which may be defective or inconsistent with any other provision herein, or to make any other provisions with respect to matters or questions arising under this Indenture;
 
that, in each case, such provisions shall not adversely affect the interests of the Holders in any material respect;
provided
     (d) to secure the Securities, if the Company so elects;
     (e) to make any changes necessary to qualify this Indenture under the Trust Indenture Act in connection with the Exchange Offer or the Shelf Registration Statement; or
     (f) to make any other change that does not adversely affect the rights of any Holder.
          .
Section 902. Supplemental Indentures with Consent of Holders
          With the consent of the Holders of not less than a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities then Outstanding, voting together as a single class, by Act of such Holders delivered to the Company and the Trustee, the Company, when authorized by a Board Resolution, and the Trustee may enter into one or more indentures supplemental hereto for the purpose of adding any provisions to or changing in any manner or eliminating any of the provisions of this Indenture or of waiving or modifying in any manner the rights of the Holders under this Indenture; , , that no such supplemental indenture, amendment or waiver shall, without the consent of the Holder of each Outstanding Security affected thereby:
provided
however
     (a) change the Stated Maturity of, the principal of, or any installment of interest on, any Security, or reduce the principal amount thereof or the rate of interest thereon, or change the coin or currency in which the principal of any Security or the interest thereon is payable, or impair the right to institute suit for the enforcement of any such payment after the Stated Maturity thereof; or
     (b) release any Guarantor from any of its obligations under its Note Guarantee or this Indenture, except in accordance with the terms of this Indenture; or
     (c) amend, change or modify the obligation of the Company to make and consummate a Change of Control Offer in the event of a Change of Control in accordance with Section 1015 after such Change of Control has occurred, including amending, changing or modifying any definition relating thereto; or
     (d) reduce the percentage in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities the consent of whose Holders is required for any such supplemental indenture, or the consent of whose Holders is required for any waiver (of compliance with certain provisions of this Indenture or certain defaults hereunder and their consequences) provided for in this Indenture; or
     (e) modify any of the provisions of this Section 902 or Section 513, except to increase the percentage in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities the consent of whose Holders is required for the relevant action or to provide that certain other provisions of this Indenture cannot be modified or waived without the consent of the Holder of each Outstanding Security affected thereby.
 
          It shall not be necessary for any Act of Holders under this Section 902 to approve the particular form of any proposed supplemental indenture, but it shall be sufficient if such Act shall approve the substance thereof.
          .
Section 903. Execution of Supplemental Indentures
          In executing, or accepting the additional trusts created by, any supplemental indenture permitted by this Article or the modifications thereby of the trusts created by this Indenture, the Trustee shall be provided with, and (subject to Trust Indenture Act Section 315(a) through 315(d) and Section 602 hereof) shall be fully protected in relying upon, an Opinion of Counsel and Officers' Certificate, each stating that the execution of such supplemental indenture is authorized or permitted by this Indenture. The Trustee may, but shall not be obligated to, enter into any such supplemental indenture which affects the Trustee's own rights, duties or immunities under this Indenture or otherwise.
          .
Section 904. Effect of Supplemental Indentures
          Upon the execution of any supplemental indenture under this Article, this Indenture shall be modified in accordance therewith, and such supplemental indenture shall form a part of this Indenture for all purposes; and every Holder theretofore or thereafter authenticated and delivered hereunder shall be bound thereby.
          .
Section 905. Conformity with Trust Indenture Act
          Every supplemental indenture executed pursuant to this Article shall conform to the requirements of the Trust Indenture Act as then in effect.
          Whenever this Indenture refers to a provision of the Trust Indenture Act, the provision is incorporated by reference in and made a part of this Indenture.
          The following Trust Indenture Act terms used in this Indenture have the following meanings:
          "indenture trustee" or "institutional trustee" means the Trustee; and
          "obligor" on the Securities and the Note Guarantees means the Company and the Guarantors, respectively, and any successor obligor upon the Securities and the Note Guarantees, respectively.
          All other terms used in this Indenture that are defined by the Trust Indenture Act, defined by Trust Indenture Act reference to another statute or defined by Commission rule under the Trust Indenture Act have the meanings so assigned to them.
          .
Section 906. Reference in Securities to Supplemental Indentures
          Securities authenticated and delivered after the execution of any supplemental indenture pursuant to this Article may, and shall if required by the Trustee, bear a notation in form approved by the Trustee as to any matter provided for in such supplemental indenture. If
 
the Company shall so determine, new Securities so modified as to conform, in the opinion of the Trustee and the Company, to any such supplemental indenture may be prepared and executed by the Company and authenticated and delivered by the Trustee in exchange for Outstanding Securities.
          .
Section 1001. Payment of Principal and Interest
          The Company shall duly and punctually pay the principal of and interest on the Securities in accordance with the terms of the Securities and this Indenture.
          .
Section 1002. Maintenance of Office or Agency
          The Company shall maintain, in The City of New York, an office or agency where Securities may be presented or surrendered for payment, where Securities may be surrendered for registration of transfer or exchange and where notices and demands to or upon the Company in respect of the Securities and this Indenture may be served. If the Corporate Trust Office is located in New York City, then it shall be such office or agency of the Company, unless the Company shall designate and maintain some other office or agency for one or more of such purposes. The Company shall give prompt written notice to the Trustee of any change in the location of any such office or agency. If at any time the Company shall fail to maintain any such required office or agency or shall fail to furnish the Trustee with the address thereof, such presentations, surrenders, notices and demands may be made or served at the Corporate Trust Office, and the Company hereby appoints the Trustee as its agent to receive all such presentations, surrenders, notices and demands.
          The Company may from time to time designate one or more other offices or agencies (in or outside of The City of New York) where the Securities may be presented or surrendered for any or all such purposes, and may from time to time rescind such designation; , , that no such designation or rescission shall in any manner relieve the Company of its obligation to maintain an office or agency in The City of New York for such purposes. The Company shall give prompt written notice to the Trustee of any such designation or rescission and any change in the location of any such office or agency.
provided
however
          .
Section 1003. Money for Security Payments to Be Held in Trust
          If the Company shall at any time act as its own Paying Agent, it shall, on or before each due date of the principal of or interest on any of the Securities, segregate and hold in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled thereto a sum sufficient to pay the principal or interest so becoming due until such sums shall be paid to such Persons or otherwise disposed of as herein provided, and shall promptly notify the Trustee of its action or failure so to act.
          Whenever the Company shall have one or more Paying Agents for the Securities, it shall, on or before each due date of the principal of or interest on any Securities, deposit with a Paying Agent a sum in same day funds (or New York Clearing House funds if such deposit is
 
made prior to the date on which such deposit is required to be made) sufficient to pay the principal or interest so becoming due, such sum to be held in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled to such principal or interest and (unless such Paying Agent is the Trustee) the Company shall promptly notify the Trustee of such action or any failure so to act.
          The Company shall cause each Paying Agent other than the Trustee to execute and deliver to the Trustee an instrument in which such Paying Agent shall agree with the Trustee, subject to the provisions of this Section 1003, that such Paying Agent shall:
     (a) hold all sums held by it for the payment of the principal of or interest on Securities in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled thereto until such sums shall be paid to such Persons or otherwise disposed of as herein provided;
     (b) give the Trustee notice of any default by the Company (or any other obligor upon the Securities) in the making of any payment of principal or interest; and
     (c) at any time during the continuance of any such default, upon the written request of the Trustee, forthwith pay to the Trustee all sums so held in trust by such Paying Agent.
          The Company may at any time, for the purpose of obtaining the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture or for any other purpose, pay, or by Company Order direct any Paying Agent to pay, to the Trustee all sums held in trust by the Company or such Paying Agent, such sums to be held by the Trustee upon the same trusts as those upon which such sums were held by the Company or such Paying Agent; and, upon such payment by any Paying Agent to the Trustee, such Paying Agent shall be released from all further liability with respect to such money.
          Any money deposited with the Trustee or any Paying Agent, or then held by the Company, in trust for the payment of the principal of or interest on any Security and remaining unclaimed for two years after such principal or interest has become due and payable shall be paid to the Company on Company Request or (if then held by the Company) shall be discharged from such trust; and the Holder of such Security shall thereafter, as an unsecured general creditor, look only to the Company for payment thereof, and all liability of the Trustee or such Paying Agent with respect to such trust money, and all liability of the Company as trustee thereof, shall thereupon cease.
          .
Section 1004. Corporate Existence
          Subject to Article Eight, the Company shall do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve and keep in full force and effect its corporate existence and that of each Restricted Subsidiary and the corporate rights (charter and statutory), corporate licenses and corporate franchises of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries, except where a failure to do so, singly or in the aggregate, is not likely to have a materially adverse effect upon the business, assets, financial condition or results of operations of the Company and the Restricted Subsidiaries taken as a whole determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP; that the Company shall not be required to preserve any such existence (except of the Company), right, license or franchise if the Company or the Restricted Subsidiary concerned
provided
 
shall determine that the preservation thereof is no longer desirable in the conduct of the business of the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary and that the loss thereof is not disadvantageous in any material respect to the Holders.
          .
Section 1005. Payment of Taxes and Other Claims
          The Company shall pay or discharge or cause to be paid or discharged, before the same shall become delinquent, (a) all material taxes, assessments and governmental charges levied or imposed upon it or any Subsidiary or upon the income, profits or property of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries and (b) all material lawful claims for labor, materials and supplies, which, if unpaid, might by law become a Lien upon the property of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary; , , that the Company shall not be required to pay or discharge or cause to be paid or discharged any such tax, assessment, charge or claim whose amount, applicability or validity is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings.
provided
however
          .
Section 1006. Maintenance of Properties
          The Company shall cause all material properties owned by or leased to it or any Restricted Subsidiary and necessary in the conduct of its business or the business of such Restricted Subsidiary to be maintained and kept in normal condition, repair and working order, ordinary wear and tear excepted; that nothing in this Section 1006 shall prevent the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary from discontinuing the use, operation or maintenance of any of such properties, or disposing of any of them, if such discontinuance or disposal is, in the judgment of the Company or the Restricted Subsidiary concerned, or of any officer (or other agent employed by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary) of the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary having managerial responsibility for any such property, desirable in the conduct of the business of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary and if such discontinuance or disposal is not adverse in any material respect to the Holders.
provided
          The Company shall provide or cause to be provided, for itself and any Restricted Subsidiaries, insurance (including appropriate self-insurance) against loss or damage of the kinds customarily insured against by corporations similarly situated and owning like properties in the same general areas in which the Company or such Restricted Subsidiaries operate.
          .
Section 1007. Limitation on Indebtedness
          (a) The Company shall not, and shall not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, incur any Indebtedness (other than Indebtedness between or among any of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries) unless, after giving effect thereto, the Cash Flow Ratio shall be less than or equal to 7.0 to 1.
          (b) So long as no Default would be caused thereby, this Section 1007 shall not prohibit the incurrence of any of the following (collectively, "Permitted Debt"):
 
(a) if the Company or any Guarantor is the obligor on such Indebtedness and such Indebtedness is held by a Person that is not the Company or a Guarantor, such Indebtedness must be unsecured and expressly subordinated to the prior payment in full in cash of all obligations with respect to the Securities, in the case of the Company, or the Note Guarantee, in the case of a Guarantor;
(b) Indebtedness owed to the Company or any Guarantor must be evidenced by an unsubordinated promissory note, unless the obligor under such Indebtedness is the Company or a Guarantor; and
 
(c) (i) any subsequent issuance or transfer of Equity Interests that results in any such Indebtedness being owed to a Person other than the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary and (ii) any sale or other transfer of any such Indebtedness to a Person that is not either the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary, shall be deemed, in each case, to constitute an incurrence of such Indebtedness by the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be, that was not permitted by this clause (6);
(a) the Company would be permitted to incur at least $1.00 of additional Indebtedness pursuant to the Cash Flow Ratio test set forth in Section 1007(a), or
(b) the Cash Flow Ratio of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries would be no higher as a result of such transaction;
 
          For purposes of determining compliance with this Section 1007, in the event that any proposed Indebtedness meets the criteria of more than one of the categories of Permitted Debt described in clauses (1) through (18) above, or is entitled to be incurred pursuant to Section 1007(a), the Company shall be permitted to classify at the time of its incurrence such item of Indebtedness in any manner that complies with this Section 1007. Indebtedness under the Credit Agreement outstanding on the date on which Securities are first issued under this Indenture shall be deemed to have been incurred on such date in reliance on the exception provided by clause (1) of Section 1007(b). In addition, (A) any Indebtedness originally classified as incurred pursuant to clauses (1) through (18) above may later be reclassified by the Company such that it shall be deemed as having been incurred pursuant to another of such clauses to the extent that such reclassified Indebtedness could be incurred pursuant to such new clause at the time of such reclassification and (B) any Indebtedness originally classified as
 
incurred pursuant to Section 1007(a), or pursuant to Section 1007(b) (2) through (18) may later be reclassified by the Company such that it shall be deemed as having been incurred pursuant to Section 1007(a) or pursuant to another of such clauses to the extent that such reclassified Indebtedness could be incurred pursuant to Section 1007(a) or such new clause at the time of such reclassification.
          Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section 1007:
          The Company shall not incur any Indebtedness that is subordinate or junior in right of payment to any other Indebtedness of the Company unless it is subordinate in right of payment to the Securities to the same extent. No Guarantor shall incur any Indebtedness that is subordinate or junior in right of payment to any other Indebtedness of such Guarantor unless it is subordinate in right of payment to such Guarantor's Note Guarantee to the same extent. For purposes of the foregoing, no Indebtedness shall be deemed to be subordinated in right of payment to any other Indebtedness of the Company or any Guarantor, as applicable, solely by virtue of being unsecured or by virtue of the fact that the holders of any secured Indebtedness have entered into intercreditor agreements giving one or more of such holders priority over the other holders in the collateral held by them.
          .
Section 1008. Limitation on Liens
          The Company shall not, and shall not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, create, incur, assume or suffer to exist any Lien of any kind, except for Permitted Liens, on or with respect to any of its property or assets, whether owned at the date of this
 
Indenture or thereafter acquired, unless (x) in the case of any Lien securing Indebtedness that is subordinated in right of payment to the Securities, the Securities are secured by a Lien on such property, assets or proceeds that is senior in priority to such Lien and (y) in the case of any other Lien, the Securities are equally and ratably secured.
          .
Section 1009. Limitation on Restricted Payments
          (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 1009, the Company shall not, and shall not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, make any Restricted Payment if (1) at the time of such proposed Restricted Payment, a Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or shall occur as a consequence of such Restricted Payment, (2) the Company would, at the time of such Restricted Payment and after giving pro forma effect thereto, have been prohibited from incurring at least $1.00 of additional Indebtedness pursuant to the Cash Flow Ratio test in Section 1007(a) or (3) immediately after giving effect to such Restricted Payment, the aggregate of all Restricted Payments that shall have been made since the date of this Indenture would exceed the sum of $100.0 million plus an amount equal to the difference between (i) the Cumulative Cash Flow Credit and (ii) 1.4 multiplied by Cumulative Interest Expense.
          For purposes of this Section 1009, the amount of any Restricted Payment, if other than cash, shall be based upon Fair Market Value.
          (b) The foregoing provisions of this Section 1009 shall not prevent:
 
          For purposes of determining the aggregate permissible amount of Restricted Payments in accordance with clause (3) of Section 1009(a), all amounts expended pursuant to Section 1009(b)(1) shall be included and all amounts expended or received pursuant to Sections 1009(b)(2) through (9) shall be excluded; , , that amounts paid pursuant to Section 1009(b)(1) shall be included only to the extent that such amounts were not previously included in calculating Restricted Payments.
provided
however
          If the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary makes a Restricted Payment that at the time of the making of such Restricted Payment, would be in the Company's good faith determination permitted under the requirements of this Section 1009, such Restricted Payment shall be deemed to have been made in compliance with this Section 1009 notwithstanding any subsequent adjustments made in good faith to the Company's financial statements affecting the calculations set forth above for any period.
          For the purposes of this Section 1009, the net proceeds from the issuance of shares of the Company's Capital Stock upon conversion of Indebtedness shall be deemed to be an amount equal to the accreted value of such Indebtedness on the date of such conversion and the additional consideration, if any, the Company receives upon such conversion, minus any cash payment on account of fractional shares (such consideration, if in property other than cash, to be determined by the Company's board of directors, whose good faith determination shall be conclusive).
 
          .
Section 1010. Dividend and Other Payment Restrictions Affecting Restricted Subsidiaries
          (a) The Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly, create or permit to exist or become effective any consensual encumbrance or restriction on the ability of any Restricted Subsidiary to:
 
          .
Section 1011. Transactions with Affiliates
          The Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, effect any transaction with any Affiliate of the Company that is not a Restricted Subsidiary, having a value, or for consideration having a value, in excess of $20.0 million unless the Company's or such Restricted Subsidiary's board of directors (or the person duly authorized to perform similar functions) shall make a good faith determination that the terms of such transaction are, taken as a whole, no less favorable to the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be than would at the time be obtainable for a comparable transaction in arms-length dealing with an unrelated third party; , , that this provision shall not apply to:
provided
however
 
 
          .
Section 1012. Designation of Restricted and Unrestricted Subsidiaries
          (a) Unless designated as an Unrestricted Subsidiary, each newly acquired or created Subsidiary or a Restricted Subsidiary shall be a Restricted Subsidiary. Any Restricted Subsidiary may be designated by the Company as an Unrestricted Subsidiary; that:
provided
 
          (b) Any designation of a Restricted Subsidiary as an Unrestricted Subsidiary shall be evidenced to the Trustee by filing with the Trustee an Officers' Certificate certifying that such designation complied with the preceding conditions and was permitted by this Indenture. If, at any time, any Unrestricted Subsidiary would fail to meet any of the preceding requirements described in Section 1012(a)(4) above and such failure continues for a period of 90 days, it shall thereafter cease to be an Unrestricted Subsidiary for purposes of this Indenture and any Indebtedness, Investments, or Liens on the property, of such Subsidiary shall be deemed to be incurred or made by a Restricted Subsidiary as of such date and, if such Indebtedness, Investments or Liens are not permitted to be incurred or made as of such date under this Indenture, the Company shall be in violation of this Section 1012.
          (c) The Company may at any time designate any Unrestricted Subsidiary to be a Restricted Subsidiary; that:
provided
 
          .
Section 1013. Guarantees
          (a) The Company shall not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries (other than any Insignificant Subsidiary), directly or indirectly, to Guarantee or pledge any assets to secure the payment of any other Indebtedness of the Company or any of the Company's other Restricted Subsidiaries unless such Restricted Subsidiary (x) is a Guarantor under this Indenture or (y) becomes a Guarantor under this Indenture and simultaneously executes and delivers a supplemental indenture providing for the Guarantee of the payment of the Securities by such Restricted Subsidiary, that such Guarantee shall be senior to or with such Subsidiary's Guarantee of such other Indebtedness. In addition, in the event that any Restricted Subsidiary that is an Insignificant Subsidiary ceases to be an Insignificant Subsidiary, then such Restricted Subsidiary must become a Guarantor and execute a supplemental indenture and, if requested, deliver an opinion of counsel to the Trustee.
provided
pari passu
          (b) A Guarantor may sell or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its assets to, or consolidate with or merge with or into (whether or not such Guarantor is the surviving Person), another Person, other than the Company or another Guarantor, that immediately after giving effect to that transaction, no Default or Event of Default exists.
provided
          (c) The Note Guarantee of a Guarantor shall be released:
 
          .
Section 1014. Asset Sales
          (a) The Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, consummate an Asset Sale unless:
          (b) The Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries may use the Net Proceeds of any Asset Sale in any manner that is not prohibited by this Indenture.
          .
Section 1015. Offer to Repurchase upon a Change of Control
          (a) Upon the occurrence of a Change of Control, each Holder shall have the right to require the Company to repurchase all or any part (equal to $1,000 or an integral multiple thereof) of that Holder's Securities pursuant to the offer described below (the "Change of Control Offer") at a repurchase price in cash (the "Change of Control Payment") equal to 101%
 
of the aggregate principal amount of Securities repurchased, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon to the Change of Control Payment Date (as defined below).
          (b) Within 60 days following any Change of Control, the Company shall mail a notice to each Holder describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control and offering to repurchase Securities outstanding on a date (the "Change of Control Payment Date") specified in such notice, which date shall be no earlier than 30 days and no later than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed.
          (c) On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company shall, to the extent lawful:
          (d) The Paying Agent shall promptly mail or wire transfer to each Holder of Securities so tendered the Change of Control Payment for such Securities, and the Trustee shall promptly authenticate and mail (or cause to be transferred by book entry) to each Holder a new Security equal in principal amount to any unpurchased portion of the Securities surrendered, if any; that each such new Security shall be in a principal amount of $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof.
provided
          (e) This Section 1015 shall be applicable regardless of whether any other provisions of this Indenture are applicable, so long as any Securities are outstanding. Except as described above with respect to a Change of Control, this Indenture does not contain provisions that permit the Holders of the Securities to require that the Company repurchase or redeem the Securities in the event of a takeover, recapitalization or similar transaction.
          (f) The Company shall comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent such laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Securities as a result of a Change of Control. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with this Section 1015, the Company shall comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and shall not be deemed to have breached their obligations under the Change of Control provisions of this Indenture by virtue of such compliance.
          (g) The Company shall not be required to make a Change of Control Offer upon a Change of Control if a third party makes the Change of Control Offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements set forth in this Section 1015 applicable to a Change of Control Offer made by the Company and purchases all Securities validly tendered and not withdrawn under such Change of Control Offer.
 
          .
Section 1016. Suspension of Covenants Upon Investment Grade Ratings
          (a) During any period of time that the Securities maintain an Investment Grade Rating from both Rating Agencies and no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing (the foregoing conditions being referred to collectively as the "Suspension Condition"), the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries shall not be subject to Sections 801(b), 801(d), 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1017 and 1108 (collectively, the "Suspended Covenants").
          (b) If the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries are not subject to the Suspended Covenants with respect to the Securities for any period of time as a result of the foregoing and, subsequently, one or both Rating Agencies withdraw their Investment Grade Rating or downgrade the Investment Grade Rating assigned to the Securities such that the Securities no longer have an Investment Grade Rating from both Rating Agencies, then the Company and each of its Restricted Subsidiaries shall thereafter again be subject to the Suspended Covenants. Compliance with the Suspended Covenants with respect to Restricted Payments made after the time of such withdrawal or downgrade shall be calculated in accordance with Section 1009 as if such covenant had been in effect during the entire period of time from the date of this Indenture.
          .
Section 1017. Limitation on Issuances and Sales of Equity Interests in Restricted Subsidiaries
          The Company shall not transfer, convey, sell, lease or otherwise dispose of, and shall not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to issue, transfer, convey, sell, lease or otherwise dispose of, any Equity Interests in any Restricted Subsidiary to any Person (other than the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary or shares of its Capital Stock constituting directors' qualifying shares or issuances of shares of Capital Stock of foreign Restricted Subsidiaries to foreign nationals, to the extent required by applicable law), except:
          (a) if, immediately after giving effect to such issuance, transfer, conveyance, sale, lease or other disposition, such Restricted Subsidiary would no longer constitute a Restricted Subsidiary and any Investment in such Person remaining after giving effect to such issuance or sale would have been permitted to be made under Section 1009 if made on the date of such issuance or sale; or
          (b) sales of Equity Interests of a Restricted Subsidiary by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary.
          .
Section 1018. [RESERVED]
          .
Section 1019. Statement as to Compliance
          The Company shall deliver to the Trustee, within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year ending after December 31, 2011, a brief certificate of its principal executive officer, principal financial officer or principal accounting officer stating whether, to such officer's knowledge, the Company is in compliance with all covenants and conditions under this Indenture. For purposes of this Section 1019, such compliance shall be determined without regard to any period of grace or requirement of notice under this Indenture.
 
          .
Section 1020. Waiver of Certain Covenants
          The Company may omit in any particular instance to comply with any covenant or condition set forth in Sections 1007 through 1017 if, before or after the time for such compliance, the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Outstanding Securities, by Act of such Holders, waive such compliance in such instance or generally waive compliance with such covenant or condition, but no such waiver shall extend to or affect such covenant or condition except to the extent so expressly waived, and, until such waiver shall become effective, the obligations of the Company and the duties of the Trustee in respect of any such covenant or condition shall remain in full force and effect.
          .
Section 1021. Statement by Officers as to Default
          The Company shall deliver to the Trustee, as soon as possible and in any event within five days after the Company becomes aware of the occurrence of any Event of Default or an event which, with notice or the lapse of time or both, would constitute an Event of Default, an Officers' Certificate setting forth the details of such Event of Default or default and the action which the Company proposes to take with respect thereto.
          .
Section 1101. Notices to Trustee
          If the Company elects to redeem Securities pursuant to the optional redemption provisions of Section 1107 hereof, it shall furnish to the Trustee, at least 30 days but not more than 60 days before a Redemption Date, an Officers' Certificate setting forth (i) the Section of this Indenture pursuant to which the redemption shall occur, (ii) the Redemption Date, (iii) the principal amount of Securities to be redeemed and (iv) the Redemption Price.
          .
Section 1102. Selection of Securities to Be Redeemed
          (a) If less than all of the Securities are to be redeemed at any time, the Trustee shall select the Securities to be redeemed among the Holders of the Securities in compliance with the requirements of the principal national securities exchange, if any, on which the Securities are listed or, if the Securities are not so listed, on a basis, by lot or in accordance with any other method the Trustee considers fair and appropriate. In the event of partial redemption by lot, the particular Securities to be redeemed shall be selected, unless otherwise provided herein, not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior to the Redemption Date by the Trustee from the outstanding Securities not previously called for redemption.
pro rata
          (b) The Trustee shall promptly notify the Company in writing of the Securities selected for redemption and, in the case of any Security selected for partial redemption, the principal amount at maturity thereof to be redeemed. No Securities in amounts of $2,000 or less shall be redeemed in part. Securities and portions of Securities selected for redemption shall be in amounts of $1,000 or integral multiples thereof; provided that the unredeemed portion of Securities held by a Holder after giving effect to the redemption shall not
 
be in an amount of less than $2,000; and that if all of the Securities of a Holder are to be redeemed, the entire outstanding amount of Securities held by such Holder, even if not $2,000 or a multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof, shall be redeemed. Except as provided in the preceding sentence, provisions of this Indenture that apply to Securities called for redemption also apply to portions of Securities called for redemption.
provided further
          .
Section 1103. Notice of Redemption
          (a) At least 30 days but not more than 60 days before a Redemption Date, the Company shall mail or cause to be mailed, by first class mail, a notice of redemption to each Holder whose Securities are to be redeemed at its registered address.
          The notice shall identify the Securities (including the CUSIP or ISIN numbers) to be redeemed and shall state:
     (i) the Redemption Date;
     (ii) if any Security is being redeemed in part, the portion of the principal amount at maturity of such Security to be redeemed and that, after the Redemption Date upon surrender of such Security, a new Security or Securities in principal amount equal to the unredeemed portion of the original Security shall be issued in the name of the Holder thereof upon cancellation of the original Security;
     (iii) the name and address of the Paying Agent;
     (iv) that Securities called for redemption must be surrendered to the Paying Agent to collect the Redemption Price and become due on the date fixed for redemption;
     (v) that, unless the Company defaults in making such redemption payment, interest, if any, on Securities called for redemption ceases to accrue on and after the Redemption Date; and
     (vi) that no representation is made as to the correctness or accuracy of the ISIN or CUSIP number, if any, listed in such notice or printed on the Securities.
          (b) At the Company's request, the Trustee shall give the notice of redemption in the Company's name and at its expense; , , that the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee, at least 35 days prior to the Redemption Date, an Officers' Certificate requesting that the Trustee give such notice and setting forth the information to be stated in such notice as provided in the preceding paragraph. The notice, if mailed in the manner provided herein shall be presumed to have been given, whether or not the Holder receives such notice.
provided
however
          .
Section 1104. Effect of Notice of Redemption
          A notice of redemption may be conditional. Once notice of redemption is mailed in accordance with Section 1103 hereof, provided that any conditions to such redemption are satisfied, Securities called for redemption shall become irrevocably due and payable on the Redemption Date at the Redemption Price.
 
          .
Section 1105. Deposit of Redemption Price
          (a) Not later than 11:00 am on the Redemption Date, the Company shall deposit with the Trustee or with the Paying Agent money sufficient to pay the Redemption Price of and accrued interest and Liquidated Damages, if any, on all Securities to be redeemed on that date. The Trustee or the Paying Agent shall promptly return to the Company any money deposited with the Trustee or the Paying Agent by the Company in excess of the amounts necessary to pay the Redemption Price of, and accrued interest and Liquidated Damages, if any, on, all Securities to be redeemed.
          (b) If the Company complies with the provisions of the preceding paragraph, on and after the Redemption Date, interest shall cease to accrue on the Securities or the portions of Securities called for redemption. If a Security is redeemed on or after a Regular Record Date but on or prior to the related interest payment date, then any accrued and unpaid interest shall be paid to the Person in whose name such Security was registered at the close of business on such Regular Record Date. If any Security called for redemption shall not be so paid upon surrender for redemption because of the failure of the Company to comply with the preceding paragraph, interest shall be paid on the unpaid principal, from the Redemption Date until such principal is paid, and to the extent lawful on any interest not paid on such unpaid principal, in each case at the rate provided in the Securities and in Section 1001 hereof.
          .
Section 1106. Securities Redeemed in Part
          Upon surrender of a Security that is redeemed in part, the Company shall issue and the Trustee shall authenticate for the Holder at the expense of the Company a new Security equal in principal amount to the unredeemed portion of the Security surrendered. No Securities in denominations of $2,000 or less shall be redeemed in part.
          .
Section 1107. Optional Redemption
          (a) On or after July 15, 2016, the Company may redeem Securities, at its option in whole or in part at any time and from time to time, at the redemption prices (expressed as percentages of principal amount) set forth below, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, to the applicable Redemption Date, if redeemed during the twelve month period beginning on July 15 of the years indicated below:
 
 
          .
Section 1108. Repurchase at the Option of Holders
          In the event that, pursuant to Section 1015, the Company shall be required to commence an offer to all Holders to purchase all or a portion of their respective Securities (a "Repurchase Offer"), they shall follow the procedures specified in such Sections and, to the extent not inconsistent therewith, the procedures specified below.
          The Repurchase Offer shall remain open for a period of no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days following its commencement, except to the extent that a longer period is required by applicable law (the "Offer Period"). No later than three Business Days after the termination of the Offer Period (the "Purchase Date"), the Company shall purchase the principal amount of Securities required to be purchased pursuant to 1015 hereof (the "Offer Amount") or, if less than the Offer Amount has been tendered, all Securities tendered in response to the Repurchase Offer. Payment for any Securities so purchased shall be made in the same manner as interest payments are made.
          If the Purchase Date is on or after an interest record date and on or before the related interest payment date, any accrued and unpaid interest shall be paid to the Person in whose name a Security is registered at the close of business on such record date, and no additional interest shall be payable to Holders who tender Securities pursuant to the Repurchase Offer.
          Upon the commencement of a Repurchase Offer, the Company shall send, by first class mail, a notice to each of the Holders, with a copy to the Trustee. The notice shall contain all instructions and materials necessary to enable such Holders to tender Securities pursuant to the Repurchase Offer. The Repurchase Offer shall be made to all Holders. The notice, which shall govern the terms of the Repurchase Offer, shall state:
     (i) that the Repurchase Offer is being made pursuant to this Section 1108 and Section 1015 hereof, and the length of time the Repurchase Offer shall remain open;
     (ii) the Offer Amount, the purchase price and the Purchase Date;
     (iii) that any Security not tendered or accepted for payment shall continue to accrue interest;
     (iv) that, unless the Company defaults in making such payment, any Security (or portion thereof) accepted for payment pursuant to the Repurchase Offer shall cease to accrue interest after the Purchase Date;
     (v) that Holders electing to have a Security purchased pursuant to a Repurchase Offer may elect to have Securities purchased in integral multiples of $2,000 only and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof;
     (vi) that Holders electing to have a Security purchased pursuant to any Repurchase Offer shall be required to surrender the Security, with the form entitled "Option of Holder to Elect Purchase" on the reverse of the Security completed, or transfer by book-entry transfer, to the Company, a depositary, if appointed by the
 
Company, or a Paying Agent at the address specified in the notice at least three days before the Purchase Date;
     (vii) that Holders shall be entitled to withdraw their election if the Company, a depositary, if appointed by the Company, or the Paying Agent, as the case may be, receives, not later than the expiration of the Offer Period, a facsimile transmission or letter setting forth the name of the Holder, the principal amount of the Security the Holder delivered for purchase and a statement that such Holder is withdrawing his election to have such Security purchased;
     (viii) that, if the aggregate amount of Securities surrendered by Holders exceeds the Offer Amount, the Trustee shall select the Securities to be purchased on a pro rata basis (with such adjustments as may be deemed appropriate by the Trustee so that only Securities in denominations of $2,000, or integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof, shall be purchased); and
     (ix) that Holders whose Securities were purchased only in part shall be issued new Securities equal in principal amount to the unpurchased portion of the Securities surrendered (or transferred by book-entry transfer).
          On the Purchase Date, the Company shall, to the extent lawful accept for payment on a pro rata basis to the extent necessary, the Offer Amount of Securities (or portions thereof) tendered pursuant to the Repurchase Offer, or if less than the Offer Amount has been tendered, all Securities tendered, and shall deliver to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate stating that such Securities (or portions thereof) were accepted for payment by the Company in accordance with the terms of this Section 1108. The Company, a depositary, if appointed by the Company, or the Paying Agent, as the case may be, shall promptly (but in any case not later than three days after the Purchase Date) mail or deliver to each tendering Holder an amount equal to the purchase price of Securities tendered by such Holder, as the case may be, and accepted by the Company for purchase, and the Company shall promptly issue a new Security. The Trustee, upon written request from the Company shall authenticate and mail or deliver such new Security to such Holder, in a principal amount at maturity equal to any unpurchased portion of the Security surrendered. Any Security not so accepted shall be promptly mailed or delivered by the Company to the respective Holder thereof. The Company shall publicly announce the results of the Repurchase Offer on the Purchase Date.
          The Company shall comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent such laws or regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Securities pursuant to a Repurchase Offer. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with 1015 or 1108, the Company shall comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and shall not be deemed to have breached its obligations under 1015 or 1108 by virtue of such compliance.
 
          .
Section 1201. Note Guarantee
          (a) Subject to this Article Twelve, each of the Guarantors hereby, jointly and severally, and fully and unconditionally, guarantees to each Holder and to the Trustee and its successors and assigns, irrespective of the validity and enforceability of, this Indenture, the Securities or the obligations of the Company hereunder or thereunder, that: (i) the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Securities shall be promptly paid in full when due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, redemption or otherwise, and interest on the overdue principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Securities, if lawful (subject in all cases to any applicable grace period provided herein), and all other obligations of the Company to the Holders or the Trustee hereunder or thereunder shall be promptly paid in full, all in accordance with the terms hereof and thereof; and (ii) in case of any extension of time of payment or renewal of any Securities or any of such other obligations, the same shall be promptly paid in full when due in accordance with the terms of the extension or renewal, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise. Failing payment when due of any amount so guaranteed for whatever reason, the Guarantors shall be jointly and severally obligated to pay the same immediately. Each Guarantor agrees that this is a guarantee of payment and not a guarantee of collection.
          (b) The Guarantors hereby agree that, to the maximum extent permitted under applicable law, their obligations hereunder shall be unconditional, irrespective of the validity, regularity or enforceability of the Securities or this Indenture, the absence of any action to enforce the same, any waiver or consent by any Holder with respect to any provisions hereof or thereof, the recovery of any judgment against the Company, any action to enforce the same or any other circumstance which might otherwise constitute a legal or equitable discharge or defense of a Guarantor. Subject to Section 507, each Guarantor hereby waives diligence, presentment, demand of payment, filing of claims with a court in the event of insolvency or bankruptcy of the Company, any right to require a proceeding first against the Company, protest, notice and all demands whatsoever and covenants that this Note Guarantee shall not be discharged except by complete performance of the obligations contained in the Securities and this Indenture.
          (c) If any Holder or the Trustee is required by any court or otherwise to return to the Company, the Guarantors or any custodian, trustee, liquidator or other similar official acting in relation to the Company or the Guarantors, any amount paid by any of them to the Trustee or such Holder, this Note Guarantee, to the extent theretofore discharged, shall be reinstated in full force and effect.
          (d) Each Guarantor agrees that it shall not be entitled to any right of subrogation in relation to the Holders in respect of any obligations guaranteed hereby until payment in full of all obligations guaranteed hereby. Each Guarantor further agrees that, as between the Guarantors, on the one hand, and the Holders and the Trustee, on the other hand, (i) the maturity of the obligations guaranteed hereby may be accelerated as provided in Article Five for the purposes of this Note Guarantee, notwithstanding any stay, injunction or other
 
prohibition preventing such acceleration in respect of the obligations guaranteed hereby, and (ii) in the event of any declaration of acceleration of such obligations as provided in Article Five hereof, such obligations (whether or not due and payable) shall forthwith become due and payable by the Guarantors for the purpose of this Note Guarantee. The Guarantors shall have the right to seek contribution from any non-paying Guarantor so long as the exercise of such right does not impair the rights of the Holders under the Note Guarantee.
          .
Section 1202. Limitation on Guarantor Liability
          Each Guarantor, and by its acceptance of Securities, each Holder, hereby confirms that it is the intention of all such parties that the Note Guarantee of such Guarantor not constitute (i) a fraudulent transfer or conveyance for purposes of Bankruptcy Law, the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act or any similar federal, state or foreign law to the extent applicable to its Note Guarantee or (ii) an unlawful distribution under any applicable state law prohibiting shareholder distributions by an insolvent subsidiary to the extent applicable to its Note Guarantee. To effectuate the foregoing intention, the Trustee, the Holders and the Guarantors hereby irrevocably agree that the obligations of such Guarantor shall be limited to the maximum amount as shall, after giving effect to all other contingent and fixed liabilities of such Guarantor that are relevant under such laws, and after giving effect to any collections from, rights to receive contribution from or payments made by or on behalf of any other Guarantor in respect of the obligations of such other Guarantor under its Note Guarantee or this Article Twelve, result in the obligations of such Guarantor under its Note Guarantee not constituting a fraudulent transfer or conveyance or such an unlawful shareholder distribution.
          .
Section 1203. Execution and Delivery of Note Guarantee
          (a) To evidence its Note Guarantee set forth in Section 1201, each Guarantor hereby agrees that a notation of such Note Guarantee substantially in the form included in shall be endorsed by an Officer or member of such Guarantor by manual or facsimile signature on each Security authenticated and delivered by the Trustee.
Exhibit B
          (b) Each Guarantor hereby agrees that its Note Guarantee set forth in Section 1201 shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding any failure to endorse on each Security a notation of such Note Guarantee.
          (c) If an Officer or member of a Guarantor whose signature is on a Note Guarantee no longer holds that office at the time the Trustee authenticates the Security on which a Note Guarantee is endorsed, such Note Guarantee shall be valid nevertheless.
          (d) The delivery of any Security by the Trustee, after the authentication thereof hereunder, shall constitute due delivery of the Note Guarantee set forth in this Indenture on behalf of the Guarantors.
          (e) If required by Section 1013, the Company shall cause such Subsidiaries to execute supplemental indentures to this Indenture and notations of Note Guarantee in accordance with Section 1013 and this Article Twelve, to the extent applicable.
 
          This Indenture may be signed in any number of counterparts with the same effect as if the signatures to each counterpart were upon a single instrument, and all such counterparts together shall be deemed an original of this Indenture.
 
          IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Indenture to be duly executed as of the day and year first above written.
AMC Networks Inc.  Indenture
 
 
 
 
 
          For value received, each Guarantor (which term includes any successor Person under the Indenture) has, jointly and severally, unconditionally guaranteed, to the extent set forth in and subject to the provisions in the Indenture dated, as of June 30, 2011 (the "") among AMC Networks Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the Guarantors and U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee (the ""), (a) the due and punctual payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Securities (as defined in the Indenture), whether at maturity, by acceleration, redemption or otherwise, and the due and punctual payment of interest on overdue principal, premium, if any, and interest on the Securities, if lawful (subject in all cases to any applicable grace periods provided in the Indenture and the Securities), and the due and punctual performance of all other obligations of the Company to the Holders or the Trustee all in accordance with the terms of the Indenture and the Securities and (b) in case of any extension of time of payment or renewal of any Securities or any of such other obligations, the same shall be promptly paid in full when due or performed in accordance with the terms of the extension or renewal, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise. Each Holder, by accepting the same, (a) agrees to and shall be bound by such provisions and (b) appoints the Trustee attorney-in-fact of such Holder for such purpose.
Indenture
Company
Trustee
          Each Guarantor, and by its acceptance of Securities, each Holder, hereby confirms that it is the intention of all such parties that the Note Guarantee of such Guarantor not constitute (i) a fraudulent transfer or conveyance for purposes of Bankruptcy Law, the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act or any similar federal, state or foreign law to the extent applicable to its Note Guarantee or (ii) an unlawful distribution under any applicable state law prohibiting shareholder distributions by an insolvent subsidiary to the extent applicable to its Note Guarantee.
 
          IN WITNESS HEREOF, each Guarantor has caused this Notation of Guarantee to be signed manually or by facsimile by its duly authorized officers.

Exhibit 99.2
 
          REGISTRATION RIGHTS AGREEMENT, dated June 30, 2011 (this "Agreement"), among AMC Networks Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), the guarantors listed on Part A of Schedule III of the Purchase Agreement (collectively, the "Guarantors") and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, as representatives of the several initial purchasers (the "Initial Purchasers") of the Securities (as defined below) referred to in the Purchase Agreement, dated June 22, 2011, among the Company, the Guarantors, the selling noteholders named therein and the Initial Purchasers in connection with the issuance of $700,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 7.75% Senior Notes due 2021 (the "Notes") pursuant to the Indenture, dated as of June 30, 2011 (the "Indenture"), among the Company, the Guarantors and U.S. Bank, National Association, trustee. The payment of principal, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes will be fully and unconditionally guaranteed on a senior basis, jointly and severally, by the Guarantors, pursuant to their guarantees (the "Guarantees"). The Notes and the Guarantees are herein collectively referred to as the "Securities."
          In consideration of the foregoing, the parties hereto agree as follows:
          1. .
Certain Definitions
          As used in this Agreement, the following defined terms shall have the following meanings:
     shall mean any day except (i) a Saturday, Sunday or other day in The City of New York on which banks are required or authorized to close or (ii) any other day on which the SEC is closed.
"Business Day"
     "" shall mean the Closing Date as defined in the Purchase Agreement.
Closing Date
     shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble.
"Company"
     shall mean the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time.
"Exchange Act"
     shall mean the exchange offer by the Company of Exchange Securities for Registrable Securities pursuant to Section 2(a) hereof.
"Exchange Offer"
     shall mean a registration under the Securities Act effected pursuant to Section 2(a) hereof.
"Exchange Offer Registration"
     shall mean an exchange offer registration statement of the Company and the Guarantors pursuant to the provisions of Section 2(a) hereof on Form S-4 (or, if applicable, on another appropriate form), and all amendments and supplements to such registration statement, in each case including the
"Exchange Offer Registration Statement"
 
Prospectus contained therein, all exhibits thereto and all material incorporated by reference therein.
     shall mean the 7.75% Senior Notes due 2021 issued by the Company under the Indenture as Exchange Securities (as defined therein), to be offered to Holders pursuant to the Exchange Offer.
"Exchange Securities"
     shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble.
"Guarantee"
     shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble.
"Guarantors"
     shall mean, individually, each of the Initial Purchasers, for so long as they own any Registrable Securities, and any of the Initial Purchasers' successors, assigns and direct and indirect transferees who become registered owners of Registrable Securities.
"Holder"
     shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble.
"Indenture"
     shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble.
"Initial Purchasers"
     shall mean the Holders of a majority of the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Registrable Securities.
"Majority Holders"
     shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble.
"Notes"
     shall mean an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, trust or unincorporated organization, or a government or agency or political subdivision thereof.
"Person"
     shall mean the prospectus included in a Registration Statement, including any preliminary prospectus, and any such prospectus as amended or supplemented by any prospectus supplement, including a prospectus supplement with respect to the terms of the offering of any portion of the Registrable Securities covered by a Shelf Registration Statement, and by all other amendments and supplements to a prospectus, including post-effective amendments, and in each case including all material incorporated by reference therein.
"Prospectus"
     " shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble.
"Purchase Agreement
     shall mean the Securities; that any such Securities shall cease to be Registrable Securities upon the earliest to occur of the date on which (i) the Exchange Offer has been consummated, (ii) a Registration Statement with respect to such Securities shall have been declared effective under the Securities Act and such Securities shall have been disposed of pursuant to such Registration Statement, that Securities not disposed of pursuant to an effective Shelf Registration Statement shall cease to be Registrable Securities one year from the date such Shelf Registration Statement is declared effective by the SEC, or such longer period as the Company's and the Guarantors' obligation to keep such Shelf Registration
"Registrable Securities"
provided, however,
provided,
 
Statement effective is extended in accordance with Section 5 hereof, (iii) such Securities (a) are freely transferable in accordance with Rule 144 by a person that is not an "affiliate" (as defined in Rule 144) of the Company where no conditions under Rule 144 are then applicable (other than the holding period requirement of paragraph (d) of Rule 144 so long as such holding period requirement is satisfied at such time of determination), (b) do not bear any restrictive legends relating to the Securities Act and (c) do not bear a restrictive CUSIP number, or (iv) such Registrable Securities shall have ceased to be outstanding.
     shall mean any and all expenses incident to the performance of or compliance by the Company and the Guarantors with this Agreement, including without limitation: (i) all SEC or Financial Industry Regulatory Authority registration and filing fees, (ii) all fees and expenses incurred in connection with compliance with state securities or blue sky laws, (iii) all expenses of any Persons acting on behalf of the Company or the Guarantors in preparing or assisting in preparing, word processing, printing and distributing any Registration Statement, any Prospectus, any amendments or supplements thereto and other documents reasonably relating to the performance of and compliance with this Agreement by the Company and the Guarantors, (iv) all rating agency fees, (v) the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Company and the Guarantors and, in connection with a Shelf Registration Statement, the fees and disbursements of one counsel for the Holders (which counsel shall be selected by the Majority Holders and shall be reasonably acceptable to the Company), and (vi) any fees and expenses of the independent registered public accounting firm of the Company, including the expenses of any special audits or "cold comfort" letters (in connection with a Shelf Registration) required by or necessary to such performance and compliance, but excluding underwriting discounts and commissions, fees and expenses and transfer taxes, if any, relating to the sale or disposition of Registrable Securities by a Holder.
"Registration Expenses"
     shall mean any Exchange Offer Registration Statement or Shelf Registration Statement.
"Registration Statement"
     "" means Rule 144 under the Securities Act.
Rule 144
     shall mean the Securities and Exchange Commission.
"SEC"
     shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble.
"Securities"
     shall mean the Securities Act of 1933, as amended from time to time.
"Securities Act"
     shall mean a registration effected pursuant to Section 2(b) hereof.
"Shelf Registration"
     shall mean a "shelf" registration statement of the Company and the Guarantors pursuant to the provisions of Section 2(b) hereof which covers all of the Registrable Securities on an appropriate form under Rule 4l5 under the Securities Act, or any similar rule that may be adopted by the SEC and all amendments
"Shelf Registration Statement"
 
and supplements to such registration statement, including post-effective amendments, in each case including the Prospectus contained therein, all exhibits thereto and all material incorporated by reference therein.
     shall mean the trustee with respect to the Securities and the Exchange Securities under the Indenture.
"Trustee"
     2. .
Registration Under the Securities Act
          (a) . The Company and the Guarantors shall, for the benefit of the Holders of the Securities, file an Exchange Offer Registration Statement with respect to Exchange Securities and use their commercially reasonable best efforts to cause such Exchange Offer Registration Statement to be declared effective under the Securities Act within 367 days after the Closing Date. Upon such Exchange Offer Registration Statement becoming effective under the Securities Act, the Company shall offer the Exchange Securities in return for surrender of the Securities.
Exchange Offer Registration
          The Exchange Offer shall remain open for not less than 20 Business Days (or longer if required by applicable law) after the date notice of the Exchange Offer is mailed to Holders of the Securities. For the Securities surrendered to the Company and the Guarantors under the Exchange Offer, the Holder will receive Exchange Securities having an aggregate principal amount equal to that of the surrendered Securities. Interest on the Exchange Securities shall accrue from the last maturity date of any interest installment on which interest was paid on the Security so surrendered (or the Exchange Securities, as the case may be or, if no interest has been paid on the Securities, from June 30, 2011). The Company shall commence the Exchange Offer by mailing the related Exchange Offer Prospectus and accompanying documents to each Holder stating, in addition to such other disclosures as are required by applicable law:
     (i) that the Exchange Offer is being made pursuant to this Registration Rights Agreement and that all Registrable Securities validly tendered will be accepted for exchange;
     (ii) the date of acceptance for exchange (which shall be a Business Day) (the "Exchange Date");
     (iii) that any Registrable Security not tendered will remain outstanding and shall accrue interest at the initial rate borne by the Securities and, other than Registrable Securities referred to in Section 2(b)(iii) below, will not retain any rights under this Registration Rights Agreement;
     (iv) that Holders electing to have a Registrable Security exchanged pursuant to the Exchange Offer will be required to surrender such Registrable Security, together with letters of transmittal, to the institution and at the address (located in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York) specified in the notice prior to the close of business on the Business Day immediately preceding the Exchange Date; and
     (v) that Holders will be entitled to withdraw the election, not later than the close of business on the Business Day immediately preceding the Exchange Date, by
 
sending to the institution and at the address (located in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York) specified in the notice, a telegram, telex, facsimile transmission or letter setting forth the name of such Holder, the number of shares of Registrable Securities delivered for exchange, and a statement that such Holder is withdrawing its election to have such Registrable Securities exchanged.
     On the Exchange Date, the Company shall:
     (i) accept for exchange Registrable Securities tendered and not validly withdrawn pursuant to the Exchange Offer; and
     (ii) deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Trustee for cancellation all Registrable Securities so accepted for exchange by the Company, and issue and mail to each Holder or such Holder's nominee, for the Registrable Securities so surrendered, new Exchange Securities having an aggregate principal amount equal to that of the Registrable Securities surrendered by such Holder.
The Company shall use its commercially reasonable best efforts to complete the Exchange Offer as provided above, and in accordance with the applicable requirements of the Securities Act, the Exchange Act and other applicable laws in connection with the Exchange Offer. Consummation of the Exchange Offer shall not be subject to any conditions, other than that the Exchange Offer does not, and consummation of the Exchange Offer will not, violate applicable law or any applicable interpretation of the staff of the SEC. The Initial Purchasers shall have the right to contact the Holders to whom the Exchange Offer is made and otherwise facilitate the tender of Registrable Securities in the Exchange Offer.
          (b) . In the event that (A) the Company determines that the Exchange Offer Registration provided in Section 2(a) above is not available or may not be consummated because it would violate applicable law or the applicable interpretations of the SEC staff, (B) the Exchange Offer is not for any other reason consummated within 400 days after the Closing Date or (C) following the consummation of the Exchange Offer a Registration Statement must be filed and a Prospectus must be delivered by the Initial Purchasers in connection with any offering or sale of Registrable Securities because such Registrable Securities represent an unsold allotment of the Registrable Securities purchased by the Initial Purchasers from the Company, unless the Company and the Guarantors have previously done so, the Company and the Guarantors will (a) file as soon as practicable after such determination or date, as the case may be, a Shelf Registration Statement providing for the sale by the Holders of all of the Registrable Securities, (b) use their commercially reasonable best efforts to have such Shelf Registration Statement declared effective by the SEC and (c) keep the Shelf Registration Statement continuously effective until such time as the Securities covered by such Shelf Registration Statement are freely transferrable or such shorter period which will terminate when all of the Registrable Securities covered by the Shelf Registration Statement have been sold pursuant to the Shelf Registration Statement. In the event the Company and the Guarantors are required to file a Shelf Registration Statement solely as a result of the matters referred to in clause (C) of the preceding sentence, the Company and the Guarantors shall file and have declared effective by the SEC both an Exchange Offer Registration Statement pursuant to Section 2(a) with respect to all Registrable Securities and a Shelf Registration Statement (which
Shelf Registration
 
may be a combined Registration Statement with the Exchange Offer Registration Statement) with respect to offers and sales of Registrable Securities held by the Initial Purchasers after completion of the Exchange Offer. The Company and the Guarantors further agree, if necessary, to supplement or amend the Shelf Registration Statement, if required by the rules, regulations or instructions applicable to the registration form used by the Company and the Guarantors for such Shelf Registration Statement or by the Securities Act or by any other rules and regulations thereunder for shelf registration, and the Company and the Guarantors agree to furnish to the Holders of Registrable Securities copies of any such supplement or amendment promptly after its being used or filed with the SEC.
     (c) . The Company shall pay all Registration Expenses in connection with any registration pursuant to Section 2(a) or 2(b) hereof.
Expenses
     (d) . An Exchange Offer Registration Statement pursuant to Section 2(a) hereof or a Shelf Registration Statement pursuant to Section 2(b) hereof will not be deemed to have become effective unless it has been declared effective by the SEC; that if, after it has been declared effective, the offering of Registrable Securities pursuant to a Shelf Registration Statement is interfered with by any stop order, injunction or other order or requirement of the SEC or any other governmental agency or court, such Registration Statement will be deemed not to have been effective during the period of such interference, until the offering of Registrable Securities pursuant to such Registration Statement may legally resume.
Effective Registration Statement
provided, however,
     3. .
Participation of Broker-Dealers in Exchange Offer
     (a) The SEC staff has taken the position that any broker-dealer that receives Exchange Securities for its own account in the Exchange Offer in exchange for Securities that were acquired by such broker-dealer as a result of market-making or other trading activities (a "Participating Broker-Dealer") may be deemed to be an "underwriter" within the meaning of the Securities Act and must deliver a prospectus meeting the requirements of the Securities Act in connection with any resale of such Exchange Securities.
     The Company and the Guarantors understand that it is the SEC staff's position that if the Prospectus contained in the Exchange Offer Registration Statement includes a plan of distribution containing a statement to the above effect and the means by which Participating Broker-Dealers may resell the Exchange Securities, without naming the Participating Broker-Dealers or specifying the amount of Exchange Securities owned by them, such Prospectus may be delivered by Participating Broker-Dealers and other Persons, if any, subject to similar prospectus delivery requirements to satisfy their prospectus delivery obligation under the Securities Act in connection with resales of Exchange Securities for their own accounts, so long as the Prospectus otherwise meets the requirements of the Securities Act.
     (b) In light of the above, notwithstanding the other provisions of this Agreement, the Company and the Guarantors agree that the provisions of this Agreement as they relate to a Shelf Registration shall also apply to an Exchange Offer Registration to the extent, and with such reasonable modifications thereto as may be, reasonably requested by the Initial Purchasers or by one or more Participating Broker-Dealers, in each case as provided in clause (ii)
 
below, in order to expedite or facilitate the disposition of any Exchange Securities by Participating Broker-Dealers consistent with the positions of the SEC staff recited in Section 3(a) above; that:
provided
     (i) the Company and the Guarantors shall not be required to amend or supplement the Prospectus contained in the Exchange Offer Registration Statement, as would otherwise be contemplated by Section 5(i), for a period exceeding 90 days after the last Exchange Date (as such period may be extended pursuant to the penultimate paragraph of Section 5 of this Agreement) and Participating Broker-Dealers shall not be authorized by the Company and the Guarantors to deliver and shall not deliver such Prospectus after such period in connection with the resales contemplated by this Section 3; and
     (ii) the application of the Shelf Registration procedures set forth in Section 5 of this Agreement to an Exchange Offer Registration, to the extent not required by the positions of the SEC staff or the Securities Act and the rules and regulations thereunder, will be in conformity with the reasonable request to the Company by the Initial Purchasers or with the reasonable request in writing to the Company by one or more broker-dealers who certify to the Initial Purchasers and the Company in writing that they anticipate that they will be Participating Broker-Dealers; and that, in connection with such application of the Shelf Registration procedures set forth in Section 5 to an Exchange Offer Registration, the Company and the Guarantors shall be obligated (x) to deal only with one entity representing the Participating Broker-Dealers, which shall be one of the Initial Purchasers unless they collectively elect not to act as such representative, (y) to pay the fees and expenses of only one counsel representing the Participating Broker-Dealers, which shall be counsel to the Initial Purchasers unless such counsel elects not to so act and (z) to cause to be delivered only one, if any, "cold comfort" letter with respect to the Prospectus in the form existing on the last Exchange Date and with respect to each subsequent amendment or supplement, if any, effected during the period specified in clause (i) above; , that the provisions of clauses (y) and (z) of this Section 3(b)(ii) shall apply only if one or more Participating Broker-Dealers holding at least $25,000,000 principal amount of Registrable Securities shall request that the provisions of this Agreement as they relate to a Shelf Registration also apply to an Exchange Offer Registration Statement for the disposition of Exchange Securities by Participating Broker-Dealers.
provided further
provided
     4. .
Liquidated Damages
     In the event that, for any reason, the Exchange Offer is not consummated or a Shelf Registration Statement is not declared effective on or prior to the 400 calendar day following the Closing Date, the interest rate borne by the Securities shall be increased by one-quarter of one percent per annum for the first 90 days following such 400-day period. Such interest rate will increase by an additional one-quarter of one percent per annum thereafter up to a maximum aggregate increase of one half of one percent per annum. Upon the consummation of the Exchange Offer or the effectiveness of a Shelf Registration Statement, as the case may be, the interest rate borne by the Securities will be reduced to the original interest rate.
th
 
          5. .
Registration Procedures
          In connection with the obligations of the Company and the Guarantors with respect to the Registration Statement, if required, pursuant to Sections 2(a) and 2(b) hereof, the Company and the Guarantors shall:
     (a) prepare and file with the SEC a Registration Statement on the appropriate form under the Securities Act, which form (i) shall be selected by the Company and the Guarantors and (ii) shall, in the case of a Shelf Registration, be available for the sale of the Registrable Securities in accordance with the intended method or methods of distribution as the Company and the Guarantors are so advised of by the selling Holders thereof and (iii) shall comply as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the applicable form and include (including through incorporation by reference, if available to the Company and the Guarantors) all financial statements required by the SEC to be filed therewith, and the Company and the Guarantors shall use their commercially reasonable best efforts to cause such Registration Statement to become effective and remain effective in accordance with Section 2 hereof;
     (b) prepare and file with the SEC such amendments and post-effective amendments to such Registration Statement as may be necessary to keep such Registration Statement in compliance with the Securities Act; and cause the Prospectus to be supplemented by any required prospectus supplement, and as so supplemented to be filed pursuant to Rule 424 under the Securities Act;
     (c) in the case of a Shelf Registration, furnish to each Holder of Registrable Securities, without charge, as many copies of the Prospectus, including each preliminary prospectus, and any amendment or supplement thereto and such other documents as such Holder may reasonably request, in order to facilitate the public sale or other disposition of the Registrable Securities;
     (d) in the case of a Shelf Registration, use their commercially reasonable best efforts to register or qualify the Registrable Securities under all applicable state securities or "blue sky" laws of such jurisdictions as any Holder of Registrable Securities covered by such Shelf Registration Statement shall reasonably request in writing by the time the applicable Shelf Registration Statement is declared effective by the SEC, and do any and all other acts and things which may be reasonably necessary or advisable to enable such Holder to consummate the disposition in each such designated jurisdiction, that none of the Company nor any Guarantor shall be required to (i) qualify generally to do business as a foreign corporation or as a broker-dealer in any jurisdiction where it would not otherwise be required to qualify but for this Section 5(d), (ii) consent to general service of process in any such jurisdiction or (iii) subject itself to taxation in any such jurisdiction;
provided, however,
     (e) in the case of a Shelf Registration, promptly notify each Holder of Registrable Securities and, if requested by such Holder, confirm such advice in writing (i) when such Shelf Registration Statement has become effective and when any post-effective amendments and supplements thereto become effective, (ii) of the issuance by
 
the SEC or any state securities authority of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of such Shelf Registration Statement or the initiation of any proceedings for that purpose, (iii) if, between the effective date of such Shelf Registration Statement and the closing of any sale of Registrable Securities covered thereby, the Company and the Guarantors receive any notification with respect to the suspension of the qualification of the Registrable Securities for sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation of any proceeding for such purpose, and (iv) of the happening of any event during the period such Shelf Registration Statement is effective which makes any statement made in such Shelf Registration Statement or the related Prospectus untrue in any material respect or which requires the making of any changes in such Shelf Registration Statement or Prospectus in order to make the statements therein not misleading;
     (f) make every reasonable effort to obtain the withdrawal of any order suspending the effectiveness of a Registration Statement promptly and shall provide notice to each Holder of Registrable Securities of the withdrawal of any such order as promptly as practicable;
     (g) in the case of a Shelf Registration, furnish to each Holder of Registrable Securities, without charge, at least one conformed copy of such Shelf Registration Statement and any post-effective amendment thereto (without documents incorporated therein by reference or exhibits thereto, unless requested);
     (h) in the case of a Shelf Registration, cooperate with the selling Holders of Registrable Securities to facilitate the timely preparation and delivery of certificates representing Registrable Securities to be sold and not bearing any restrictive legends; and enable such Registrable Securities to be in such denominations and registered in such names as the selling Holders may reasonably request at least two business days prior to the closing of any sale of Registrable Securities;
     (i) in the case of a Shelf Registration, upon the occurrence of any event contemplated by Section 5(e)(iv) hereof, use their commercially reasonable best efforts to prepare a supplement or post-effective amendment to such Shelf Registration Statement or the related Prospectus or any document incorporated therein by reference or file any other required document so that, as thereafter delivered to the purchasers of the Registrable Securities, such Prospectus will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;
     (j) in the case of a Shelf Registration Statement, enter into and deliver all such customary agreements, documents and take such other actions (including causing the delivery of opinions of counsel and "comfort" letters of independent registered public accounting firms) as are reasonably required to expedite or facilitate the disposition of Registrable Securities;
     (k) in the case of a Shelf Registration, upon reasonable notice make available for inspection by a representative of the Holders of the Registrable Securities and any attorney or accountant designated by the Selling Holders, at reasonable times and in a
 
reasonable manner, all financial and other records, pertinent documents and properties of the Company and the Guarantors, and cause the respective officers, directors and employees of the Company to supply all information reasonably requested by any such representative, attorney or accountant in connection with a Shelf Registration Statement; that such representatives, attorneys or accountants shall be acceptable to the Company in its judgment reasonably exercised and shall agree to enter into a written confidentiality agreement mutually acceptable to the Company regarding any records, information or documents that are designated by the Company as confidential unless such records, information or documents are available to the public or disclosure of such records, information or documents is required by court or administrative order after the exhaustion of appeals therefrom and to use such information obtained pursuant to this provision only in connection with the transaction for which such information was obtained, and not for any other purpose;
provided, however,
     (1) in the case of a Shelf Registration, provide copies of any Prospectus, any amendment to any applicable Shelf Registration Statement or amendment or supplement to any Prospectus or any document which is to be incorporated by reference into such Shelf Registration Statement or any Prospectus after the initial filing of such Shelf Registration Statement, a reasonable time prior to the filing of any such Prospectus, amendment, supplement or document, to the Initial Purchasers on behalf of the Holders , and except with respect to a Shelf Registration filed pursuant to Section 2(b)(iii) not file any such document in a form to which the Initial Purchasers on behalf of the Holders shall reasonably object; and make the representatives of the Company as shall be reasonably requested by the Holders or the Initial Purchasers on behalf of such Holders available for discussion of such document; that the requirements of this paragraph shall not apply to the Company's annual report on Form 10-K, its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, its current reports on Form 8-K or any other documents filed pursuant to Sections 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act (the "Exchange Act Documents"); and that the Company shall promptly notify Holders of Registrable Securities of the filing of any Exchange Act Documents except for such Exchange Act Documents specifically related to the offering of other securities and not to the Registrable Securities;
provided
further provided
     (m) obtain a CUSIP number for all Exchange Securities or Registrable Securities, as the case may be, not later than the effective date of any Registration Statement; and
     (n) cause the Indenture to be qualified under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended (the "TIA"), in connection with the registration of the Exchange Securities, cooperate with the Trustee and the Holders to effect such changes to the Indenture as may be required for the Indenture to be so qualified in accordance with the terms of the TIA and execute, and use their commercially reasonable best efforts to cause the Trustee to execute, all documents as may be required to effect such changes, and all other forms and documents required to be filed with the SEC to enable the Indenture to be so qualified in a timely manner.
 
     In the case of a Shelf Registration Statement, the Company may (as a condition to such Holder's participation in a Shelf Registration) require each Holder to furnish to the Company information regarding the Holder and the proposed distribution by such Holder of any Registrable Securities as the Company may from time to time reasonably request in writing.
     In the case of a Shelf Registration Statement, each Holder of Registrable Securities agrees that, upon receipt of any (i) notice from the Company of the happening of any event of the kind described in Section 5(e)(ii) or (iv) hereof, (ii) notice from the Company that it is in possession of material information that has not been disclosed to the public and the Company reasonably deems it to be advisable not to disclose such information in a registration statement or (iii) notice from the Company that it is in the process of a registered offering of securities and the Company reasonably deems it to be advisable to temporarily discontinue disposition of Registrable Securities pursuant to the Shelf Registration Statement (in each case, such notice being hereinafter referred to as a "Suspension Notice"), such Holder will forthwith discontinue disposition of Registrable Securities pursuant to any Shelf Registration Statement and shall not be entitled to the benefits provided under Section 6 hereof with respect to any sales made by it in contravention of this paragraph, until such Holder's receipt of the copies of the supplemented or amended Prospectus contemplated by Section 5(i) or a notice in accordance with Section 5(f) hereof that any order suspending the effectiveness of the Shelf Registration Statement has been withdrawn, or, in the case of (ii) or (iii) above, until further notice from the Company that disposition of Registrable Securities may resume, provided that (except with respect to a Shelf Registration filed pursuant to Section 2(b)(iii)) such further notice will be given within 90 days of the Suspension Notice in the case of (ii) above and within 120 days of the Suspension Notice in the case of (iii) above, and provided further that in the case of (ii) and (iii) above that any Suspension Notice must be based upon a good faith determination of the Board of Directors of the Company or the Executive Committee thereof that such Notice is necessary; and, if so directed by the Company, such Holder will deliver to the Company (at the expense of the Company) all copies in its possession, other than permanent file copies then in such Holder's possession, of the Prospectus covering such Registrable Securities current at the time of receipt of such notice. If the Company shall give any such notice to suspend the disposition of Registrable Securities pursuant to any Shelf Registration Statement, if necessary to facilitate the disposition of Registrable Securities pursuant to such Shelf Registration Statement, the Company and the Guarantors shall extend the period during which such Shelf Registration Statement shall be maintained effective pursuant to this Agreement by the number of days during the period from and including the date of the giving of such notice to and including the date when the Holders shall have received copies of the supplemented or amended Prospectus necessary to resume such dispositions or received notice that any order suspending dispositions of the Securities has been withdrawn.
     Each Holder of Registrable Securities will furnish to the Company such information regarding such Holder and the distribution of such Registrable Securities as the Company may from time to time reasonably request in writing, but only to the extent that such information is required in order to comply with the Securities Act or any relevant state securities or Blue Sky law or obligation. Each Holder of Registrable Securities as to which any registration is being effected agrees to notify the Company as promptly as practicable of any inaccuracy or change in information previously furnished by such Holder to the Company or of the happening of any event, in either case as a result of which any Prospectus relating to such
 
registration contains an untrue statement of a material fact regarding such Holder or the distribution of such Registrable Securities or omits to state any material fact regarding such Holder or the distribution of such Registrable Securities required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, and to furnish to the Company promptly any additional information required to correct and update any previously furnished information or required such that such prospectus shall not contain, with respect to such holder or the distribution of such Registrable Securities, an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
          6. .
Indemnification; Contribution
          (a) Each of the Company and the Guarantors agrees, jointly and severally, to indemnify and hold harmless each Holder and each Person, if any, who controls any Holder within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act as follows:
     (i) against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any Shelf Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto) pursuant to which Registrable Securities were registered under the Securities Act, including all documents incorporated therein by reference, or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading or arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any preliminary prospectus or any Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;
     (ii) against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, to the extent of the aggregate amount paid in settlement of any litigation, or investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or of any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission, if such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company; and
     (iii) against any and all expense whatsoever, as incurred (including fees and disbursements of counsel chosen by any Holder), reasonably incurred in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission, to the extent that any such expense is not paid under subparagraph (i) or (ii) above;
that this indemnity does not apply to any loss, claim, damage, liability or expense to the extent it arises out of an untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue statement or omission made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the
provided, however,
 
Company by any Holder expressly for use in a Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto) or any Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto).
     The foregoing indemnity with respect to any untrue statement contained in or any omission from a preliminary prospectus shall not inure to the benefit of any Holder (or any Person controlling such Holder) from whom the Person asserting any such loss, liability, claim, damage or expense purchased any of the Securities that are the subject thereof if the Company shall sustain the burden of proving that such Person was not conveyed a copy of any amendment or supplement thereto at or prior to the time of sale of such Securities to such Person and the untrue statement contained in or the omission from such preliminary prospectus was corrected in such amendment or supplement thereto.
     (b) Each Holder severally agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Company and the Guarantors, their respective directors, officers and each Person, if any, who controls the Company or any Guarantor within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act, against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense described in the indemnity contained in Section 6(a) hereof, as incurred, but only with respect to untrue statements or omissions, or alleged untrue statements or omissions, made in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto) or any Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Holder expressly for use in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto) or such Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto).
     (c) Each indemnified party shall give prompt notice to each indemnifying party of any action commenced against it in respect of which indemnity may be sought hereunder, but failure to so notify an indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have otherwise than under this indemnity agreement. An indemnifying party may participate at its own expense in the defense of such action; , , that counsel to the indemnifying party shall not (except with the consent of the indemnified party) also be counsel to the indemnified party. In no event shall the indemnifying party or parties be liable for the fees and expenses of more than one counsel for all indemnified parties in connection with any one action or separate but similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction, arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances.
provided
however
     (d) In order to provide for just and equitable contribution in circumstances in which the indemnity agreement provided for in this Section 6 is for any reason held to be unenforceable by the indemnified parties although applicable in accordance with its terms, the Company and the Guarantors, on the one hand, and the Holders, on the other hand, shall contribute to the aggregate losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses of the nature contemplated by such indemnity agreement incurred by the Company and the Guarantors, on the one hand, and one or more of the Holders, on the other hand; that no Person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any Person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. As between the Company and the Guarantors, on the one hand, and the Holders, on the other hand, such parties shall contribute to the aggregate losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses of the nature contemplated by such indemnity agreement in such proportion as shall be appropriate to reflect (i) the relative benefits received by the Company and
provided, however,
 
the Guarantors on the one hand and the Holders on the other hand, from the offering of the Exchange Securities or Registrable Securities included in such offering, and (ii) the relative fault of the Company and the Guarantors, on the one hand, and the Holders, on the other hand, with respect to the statements or omissions which resulted in such loss, liability, claim, damage or expense, or action in respect thereof, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The Company, the Guarantors and the Holders of the Registrable Securities agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 6 were to be determined by allocation or by any other method of allocation which does not take into account the relevant equitable considerations. For purposes of this Section 6, each Person, if any, who controls a Holder within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act shall have the same rights to contribution as such Holder, and each director of the Company or any Guarantor, each officer of the Company or any Guarantor who signed the Registration Statement, and each Person, if any, who controls the Company or any Guarantor within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act shall have the same rights to contribution as the Company and the Guarantors.
pro
rata
     7. .
Miscellaneous
     (a) . Neither the Company nor the Guarantors have entered into nor will the Company or the Guarantors on or after the date of this Agreement enter into any agreement which is inconsistent with the rights granted to the Holders in this Agreement or otherwise conflicts with the provisions hereof. The rights granted to the Holders hereunder do not in any way conflict with and are not inconsistent with the rights granted to the holders of the Company's or the Guarantors' other issued and outstanding securities under any such agreements.
No Inconsistent Agreements
     (b) . The provisions of this Agreement, including the provisions of this sentence, may not be amended, modified or supplemented, and waivers or consents to departures from the provisions hereof may not be given unless the Company has obtained the written consent of Holders of at least a majority of the issued and outstanding Registrable Securities affected by such amendment, modification, supplement, waiver or departure; no amendment, modification or supplement, waiver or consent with respect to the provisions of Section 6 hereof shall be effective as against any Holder of Registrable Securities unless consented to in writing by such Holder.
Amendments and Waivers
provided, however,
     (c) . All notices and other communications provided for or permitted hereunder shall be made in writing by hand delivery, registered first-class mail, telex, telecopier, or any courier guaranteeing overnight delivery (i) if to a Holder, at the most current address given by such Holder to the Company and the Guarantors by means of a notice given in accordance with the provisions of this Section 8(c); (ii) if to the Company or the Guarantors, initially AMC Networks Inc., 11 Penn Plaza, New York, New York 10001, attention of James G. Gallagher, Esq. (fax: (646) 273-7392), with a copy to Sullivan & Cromwell LLP, 125 Broad Street, New York, New York 10004, attention of John P. Mead, Esq. (fax: (212) 558-3588), and thereafter at such other address, notice of which is given in accordance with the provisions of this Section 8(c).
Notices
 
     All such notices and communications shall be deemed to have been duly given: at the time delivered by hand, if personally delivered; five business days after being deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, if mailed; when answered back, if telexed; when receipt is acknowledged, if telecopied; and on the next business day if timely delivered to any courier guaranteeing overnight delivery.
     Copies of all such notices, demands, or other communications shall be concurrently delivered by the Person giving the same to the Trustee at U.S. Bank, National Association, 100 Wall Street, 16 Floor, New York, New York 10005, Attention: Corporate Trust Department.
th
     (d) . This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the successors, assigns and transferees of each of the parties, including, without limitation and without the need for an express assignment, subsequent Holders; nothing herein shall be deemed to permit any assignment, transfer or other disposition of Registrable Securities in violation of the terms of the Purchase Agreement. If any transferee of any Holder shall acquire Registrable Securities, in any manner, whether by operation of law or otherwise, such Registrable Securities shall be held subject to all of the terms of this Agreement, and by taking and holding such Registrable Securities such Person shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed to be bound by and to perform all of the terms and provisions of this Agreement and such Person shall be entitled to receive the benefits hereof.
Successors and Assigns
provided that
     (e) . The Initial Purchasers shall have the right to directly enforce the agreements made hereunder between the Company and the Guarantors, on the one hand, and the Holders, on the other hand, to the extent they deem such enforcement necessary or advisable to protect their rights or the rights of Holders hereunder, provided, however, that such right of direct enforcement shall terminate upon consummation of an Exchange Offer.
Enforcement by Initial Purchasers
     (f) . This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts and by the parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
     (g) . The headings in this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and shall not limit or otherwise affect the meaning hereof.
Headings
     (h) . This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
Governing Law
     (i) . In the event that any one or more of the provisions contained herein, or the application thereof in any circumstance, is held invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of any such provision in every other respect and of the remaining provisions contained herein shall not be affected or impaired thereby.
Severability
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement as of the date first written above.
 
 
CONFIRMED AND ACCEPTED, as of the date first above written:
MERRILL LYNCH, PIERCE, FENNER & SMITH
     INCORPORATED
J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES LLC
By: MERRILL LYNCH, PIERCE, FENNER & SMITH
     INCORPORATED
For itself and as a Representative of the other Initial Purchasers named in Schedule I to the Purchase Agreement
By: J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES LLC
For itself and as a Representative of the other Initial Purchasers named in Schedule I to the Purchase Agreement

Exhibit 99.3
EXECUTION VERSION
 
 
 
 
 
 
     This CREDIT AGREEMENT is entered into as of June 30, 2011 (this ""), among AMC NETWORKS INC., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the Restricted Subsidiaries identified herein, the lenders which are parties hereto, together with their respective successors and assigns, and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as Administrative Agent, Collateral Agent and L/C Issuer.
Credit Agreement
Borrower
     WHEREAS, the Borrower has requested that the Lenders provide revolving credit and term loans in connection with the Distribution Transaction (such term and each other capitalized term used but not defined in these recitals having the meaning ascribed thereto in Article I of this Credit Agreement) and for the purposes set forth in , including the repayment of amounts outstanding under the Existing RNS Credit Agreement and the Existing RNS Notes;
Section 7.10
     WHEREAS, the Revolving Credit Facility and the Term A Facility are to be made available by the Lenders in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Credit Agreement by the funding of the loans thereunder as set forth herein;
     WHEREAS, CSC Holdings, LLC, acting in its capacity as Initial Term B Lender, is to initially make the loans under the Term B Facility in connection with its contribution to the Borrower of the Programming Network Business pursuant to the Distribution Agreement;
     WHEREAS, each of the Guarantors expects to derive benefit, directly or indirectly, from the making of the loans under the Facilities and the contribution of the Initial Term B Lender; and
     WHEREAS, the Lenders are willing to make available the loans under the Facilities on the terms and conditions set forth herein.
     NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements herein contained, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto covenant and agree as follows:
     Section 1.01 . As used herein, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
Certain Defined Terms
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Activities
Section 9.02(b)
          "" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder and its successors in such capacity.
Administrative Agent
          "" means the Administrative Agent's address and, as appropriate, account as set forth in or such other address or account as the Administrative Agent may from time to time notify to the Borrower and the Lenders.
Administrative Agent's Office
Section 10.02
 
          "" means an administrative questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
          "" means, as to any Person, any other Person which directly or indirectly controls, or is under common control with, or is controlled by, such Person. As used in this definition, "" (including, with its correlative meanings, "" and "") means possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of management or policies of a Person (whether through ownership of securities or partnership or other ownership interests, by contract or otherwise); that, in any event, any Person which owns directly or indirectly 10% or more of the securities having ordinary voting power for the election of directors or other governing body of a corporation or 10% or more of the partnership or other ownership interests of any other Person (other than as a limited partner of such other Person) will be deemed to control such corporation or other Person; and that no individual shall be an Affiliate of a Person solely by reason of his or her being an officer, director, manager, member or partner of such Person, except in the case of a partner or member if his or her interests in such partnership or limited liability company, as applicable, shall qualify him or her as an Affiliate.
Affiliate
control
controlled by
under common control with
provided
provided
further
          "" means any agreement between the Borrower or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries and a distributor pursuant to which such distributor agrees, among other things, to distribute and exhibit to its subscribers programming of the Borrower or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be.
Affiliation Agreement
          "" has the meaning given to such term in Section 9.02(b).
Agent's Group
          "" means the Commitments of all the Lenders.
Aggregate Commitments
          "" means American Movie Classics Company LLC, a New York limited liability company.
AMC
          "" means, as of any date,. Operating Cash Flow for the period of four consecutive Quarters covered by the then most recent Compliance Certificate delivered to the Lenders pursuant to ; that, (a) for purposes of determining an amount of Annual Operating Cash Flow for the period ending September 30, 2011, such amount shall equal Operating Cash Flow for the Quarter covered by the Compliance Certificate delivered to the Lenders pursuant to for the period ending September 30, 2011 by four; (b) for purposes of determining an amount of Annual Operating Cash Flow for the period ending December 31, 2011, such amount shall equal Operating Cash Flow for the period of two consecutive Quarters covered by the Compliance Certificate delivered to the Lenders pursuant to for the period ending December 31, 2011 by two; and (c) for purposes of determining an amount of Annual Operating Cash Flow for the period ending March 31, 2012, such amount shall equal Operating Cash Flow for the period of three consecutive Quarters covered by the Compliance Certificate delivered to the Lenders pursuant to for the period ending March 31, 2012 by 4/3.
Annual Operating Cash Flow
Section 7.01(d)
provided
Section 7.01(d)
multiplied
Section 7.01(d)
multiplied
Section 7.01(d)
multiplied
          "" means, as of any date, Total Interest Expense for the period of four consecutive Quarters covered by the then most recent Compliance Certificate delivered to the Lenders pursuant to ; that, (a) for purposes of determining an amount of Annual Total Interest Expense for the period ending September 30, 2011, such amount shall equal Total Interest Expense for the Quarter covered by the Compliance Certificate delivered to the Lenders pursuant to for the period ending September
Annual Total Interest Expense
Section 7.01(d)
provided
Section 7.01(d)
 
30, 2011 by four; (b) for purposes of determining an amount of Annual Total Interest Expense for the period ending December 31, 2011, such amount shall equal Total Interest Expense for the period of two consecutive Quarters covered by the Compliance Certificate delivered to the Lenders pursuant to for the period ending December 31, 2011 by two; and (c) for purposes of determining an amount of Annual Total Interest Expense for the period ending March 31, 2012, such amount shall equal Total Interest Expense for the period of three consecutive Quarters covered by the Compliance Certificate delivered to the Lenders pursuant to for the period ending March 31, 2012 by 4/3.
multiplied
Section 7.01(d)
multiplied
Section 7.01(d)
multiplied
          "" means (a) in respect of the Term A Facility, with respect to any Term A Lender at any time, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) of the Term A Facility represented by (i) on or prior to the Closing Date, such Term A Lender's Term A Commitment at such time and (ii) thereafter, the principal amount of such Term A Lender's Term A Loans at such time, (b) in respect of the Term B Facility, with respect to any Term B Lender at any time, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) of the Term B Facility represented by (i) on or prior to the Closing Date, such Term B Lender's Term B Commitment at such time and (ii) thereafter, the principal amount of such Term B Lender's Term B Loans at such time, (c) in respect of any Incremental Term Facility, with respect to any Incremental Term Lender at any time, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) of such Incremental Term Facility represented by the principal amount of such Incremental Term Lender's Incremental Term Loans at such time, and (d) in respect of the Revolving Credit Facility, with respect to any Revolving Credit Lender at any time, the percentage (carried out to the ninth decimal place) of the Revolving Credit Facility represented by such Revolving Credit Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment at such time. If the commitment of each Revolving Credit Lender to make Revolving Credit Loans and the obligation of the L/C Issuer to make L/C Credit Extensions have been terminated pursuant to , or if the Revolving Credit Commitments have expired, then the Applicable Percentage of each Revolving Credit Lender in respect of the Revolving Credit Facility shall be determined based on the Applicable Percentage of such Revolving Credit Lender in respect of the Revolving Credit Facility most recently in effect, giving effect to any subsequent assignments. The initial Applicable Percentage of each Lender in respect of each Facility is set forth opposite the name of such Lender on (or, in the case of any Incremental Term Lender, on Schedule I to an Incremental Term Supplement, if any) or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender becomes a party hereto, as applicable.
Applicable Percentage
Section 8.02
Schedule 2.01
          "" means, (a) with respect to the Term A Facility and the Revolving Credit Facility, the applicable percentage per annum set forth below determined by reference to the Cash Flow Ratio as set forth in the most recent Compliance Certificate received by the Administrative Agent pursuant to ; , until the delivery of the Compliance Certificate with respect to the Quarter ending September 30, 2011, the Applicable Rate in respect of the Term A Facility and the Revolving Credit Facility shall be 1.00% per annum for Base Rate Loans and 2.00% per annum for Eurodollar Rate Loans:
Applicable Rate
Section 7.01(d)
provided
 
; (b) with respect to the Term B Facility, from time to time, (i) 2.00% per annum for Base Rate Loans and (ii) 3.00% per annum for Eurodollar Rate Loans; and (c) with respect to an Incremental Term Facility, the rate specified as such in the applicable Incremental Term Supplement.
     Any increase or decrease in the Applicable Rate with respect to the Term A Facility and Revolving Credit Facility resulting from a change in the Cash Flow Ratio shall become effective as of the first Business Day immediately following the date a Compliance Certificate is delivered pursuant to ; , , that if a Compliance Certificate is not delivered when due in accordance with such Section, then Pricing Level 4 shall apply in respect of the Term A Facility and the Revolving Credit Facility as of the first Business Day after the date on which such Compliance Certificate was required to have been delivered.
Section 7.01(d)
provided
however
          "" means with respect to any Revolving Credit Lender at any time, such Revolving Credit Lender's Applicable Percentage in respect of the Revolving Credit Facility at such time.
Applicable Revolving Credit Percentage
          "" means, at any time, (a) with respect to any of the Term A Facility, Term B Facility, Revolving Credit Facility, or Incremental Term Facility, if any, a Lender that has a Commitment with respect to such Facility or holds a Term A Loan, Term B Loan, Revolving Credit Loan or Incremental Term Loan, if any, respectively, at such time, (b) with respect to the Swingline Sublimit, the Swingline Lender, and (c) with respect to the Letter of Credit Sublimit, (i) the L/C Issuer and (ii) if any Letters of Credit have been issued pursuant to , the Revolving Credit Lenders.
Appropriate Lender
Section 2.03(a)
          "" means, for purposes of identifying all Communications which may be made on the Approved Electronic Platform, each Communication that any Loan Party is obligated to, or otherwise chooses to, provide to the Administrative Agent pursuant to any Loan Document or the transactions contemplated therein, including any financial statement, financial or other report, notice, request, certificate or other information material; , , that, solely with respect to delivery of any such Communication by any Loan Party to the Administrative Agent and without limiting or otherwise affecting either the Administrative Agent's right to effect delivery of such Communication by posting such Communication to the Approved Electronic Platform or the protections afforded hereby to the Administrative Agent in connection with any such posting, "Approved Electronic Communication" shall exclude (i) any notice of borrowing, letter of credit request, swingline loan request, notice of conversion or continuation, and any other notice, demand, communication, information, document or other material relating to a request for a new, or a conversion of an
Approved Electronic Communications
provided
however
 
existing, Borrowing, (ii) any notice pursuant to and and any other notice relating to the payment of any principal or other amount due under any Loan Document prior to the scheduled date therefor, (iii) all notices of any Default or Event of Default and (iv) any notice, demand, communication, information, document or other material required to be delivered to satisfy any of the conditions set forth in or any other condition to any Borrowing or other extension of credit hereunder or any condition precedent to the effectiveness of this Credit Agreement ( that, for avoidance of doubt any such excluded Communication listed in clause (i) through clause (iv) may be made by electronic mail as provided in ).
Section 2.04(a)
Section 2.04(b)
Article V
provided
Section 10.02(b)(iv)
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Approved Electronic Platform
Section 10.02(d)
          "" means any Fund that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
          "" means two or more Eligible Assignees that are Affiliates of one another or two or more Approved Funds managed by the same investment advisor.
Assignee Group
          "" means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an Eligible Assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by ), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in substantially the form of or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
Section 10.06(b)(iii)
Exhibit H
          "" means in respect of the Revolving Credit Facility, the period from and including the Closing Date to the earliest of (i) the Maturity Date for the Revolving Credit Facility, (ii) the date of termination of the Revolving Credit Commitments pursuant to , and (iii) the date of termination of the commitment of each Revolving Credit Lender to make Revolving Credit Loans and of the obligation of the L/C Issuer to make L/C Credit Extensions pursuant to .
Availability Period
Section 2.05
Section 8.02
          "" means Title 11 of the United States Code entitled "Bankruptcy," as now and hereafter in effect, or any successor statute.
Bankruptcy Code
          "" means for any day a fluctuating rate per annum equal to the highest of (a) the Federal Funds Rate 1/2 of 1%, (b) the rate of interest in effect for such day as publicly announced from time to time by JPMCB as its "prime rate" and (c) the Eurodollar Rate that would be payable on such day for a Eurodollar Rate Loan with a one month interest period 1%. The "prime rate" is a rate set by JPMCB based upon various factors including JPMCB's costs and desired return, general economic conditions and other factors, and is used as a reference point for pricing some loans, which may be priced at, above, or below such announced rate. Any change in such rate announced by JPMCB shall take effect at the opening of business on the day specified in the public announcement of such change.
Base Rate
plus
plus
          "" means a Revolving Credit Loan, Term A Loan, Term B Loan, Swingline Loan or Incremental Term Loan, if any, that bears interest based on the Base Rate.
Base Rate Loan
          "" has the meaning given to such term in the preamble to this Credit Agreement.
Borrower
 
          "" means a Revolving Credit Borrowing, Term A Borrowing, Term B Borrowing, Swingline Borrowing or Incremental Term Borrowing, if any, as the context may require.
Borrowing
          "" means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks are authorized to close under the Laws of, or are in fact closed in, the State of New York and, if such day relates to any Eurodollar Rate Loan, means any such day on which dealings in Dollar deposits are conducted by and between banks in the London interbank eurodollar market.
Business Day
          "" means Cablevision Systems Corporation, a Delaware corporation.
Cablevision
          "" means, as to any Person, the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under a Lease of (or other agreement conveying the right to use) real and/or personal property, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as a capital lease on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP and, for purposes of this Credit Agreement, the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof, determined in accordance with GAAP.
Capital Lease Obligations
          "" has the meaning specified in the definition of "Operating Cash Flow".
Carriage Suspension Adjustment
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Cash Collateral
Section 2.03(g)
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Cash Collateralize
Section 2.03(g)
          "" means any of the following types of Investments, to the extent owned by the Borrower or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries free and clear of all Liens (other than Liens created under the Collateral Documents and other Liens permitted hereunder):
Cash Equivalents
     (a) marketable, direct obligations of the United States of America maturing within 397 days of the date of purchase;
     (b) commercial paper outstanding at any time issued by any Person organized under the laws of any state of the United States of America, which Person shall have a consolidated net worth of at least $250,000,000 and shall conduct a substantial part of its business in the United States of America, maturing within 180 days from the date of the original issue thereof, and rated "P-1" or better by Moody's or "A-1" or better by S&P;
     (c) fully collateralized repurchase agreements in such amounts and with such financial institutions having a rating of "Baa" or better from Moody's, or a rating of "A-" or better from S&P, as the Borrower may select from time to time;
     (d) certificates of deposit, banker's acceptances and time deposits maturing within 397 days after the date of purchase, which are issued by any Lender or by a United States national or state bank or foreign bank having capital, surplus and undivided profits totaling more than $100,000,000, and having a rating of "Baa" or better from Moody's or a rating of "A-" or better from S&P;
 
     (e) money market funds that (i) comply with the criteria set forth in SEC Rule 2a-7 under the Investment Company Act of 1940, (ii) are rated AAA by S&P and Aaa by Moody's and (iii) have portfolio assets of at least $3,000,000,000;
     (f) repurchase obligations of any Lender or of any commercial bank satisfying the requirements of clause (d) of this definition, having a term of not more than thirty days, with respect to securities issued or fully guaranteed or insured by the United States government;
     (g) obligations of any State, commonwealth or territory of the United States or any political subdivision thereof for the payment of the principal and redemption price of and interest on which there shall have been irrevocably deposited the government obligations described in clause (a) of this definition maturing as to principal and interest at times and in amounts sufficient to provide such payment;
     (h) auction preferred stock rated in the highest short-term credit rating category by S&P or Moody's;
     (i) securities with maturities of six months or less from the date of acquisition backed by standby letters of credit issued by any Lender or any commercial bank satisfying the requirements of clause (b) of this definition); or
     (j) money market mutual or similar funds that invest exclusively in assets satisfying the requirements of clauses (a) through (i) of this definition
.
          "" means, as of any date, the ratio of (i) the sum of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of all Net Debt outstanding on such date (determined on a consolidated basis) (but without duplication of Indebtedness supported by Letters of Credit) the aggregate undrawn face amount of all L/C Obligations outstanding on such date to (ii) Annual Operating Cash Flow (and any change in such ratio as a result of a change in the amount of Indebtedness or Letters of Credit shall be effective as of the date such change shall occur and any change in such ratio as a result of a change in the amount of Annual Operating Cash Flow shall be effective as of the date of receipt by the Administrative Agent of the Compliance Certificate delivered pursuant to , reflecting such change). Notwithstanding the foregoing, for purposes of calculating the Cash Flow Ratio, there shall be excluded from Net Debt, to the extent otherwise included as Net Debt, (A) any deferred or contingent obligation of the Company to pay the consideration for an Investment not prohibited by to the extent such obligation can be satisfied with the delivery of Equity Interests of the Borrower and the Borrower covenants and agrees in a notice to the Administrative Agent that such obligation shall be satisfied solely by the delivery of such Equity Interests; (B) any deferred purchase price in connection with any acquisition not prohibited by to the extent that the Borrower's obligations in respect of such deferred purchase price consist solely of an agreement to deliver Equity Interests of the Borrower and the Borrower covenants and agrees in a notice to the Administrative Agent that such obligation shall be satisfied solely by the delivery of such Equity Interests; (C) all obligations under any interest rate Swap Contract or Monetization Indebtedness; and (D)(x) all obligations under any Guarantee permitted under subparagraph (x) of and (y) all obligations under any Guarantee not prohibited by so long as the obligations under such Guarantees referred to in this clause (y) are payable, solely at the option of the Borrower, in Equity Interests of the Borrower and the Borrower covenants and agrees in a notice to the Administrative Agent that such obligation shall be satisfied solely by the delivery of such Equity Interests.
Cash Flow Ratio
plus
Section 7.01(d)
Section 7.18
Section 7.18
Section 7.16
Section 7.16
 
          "" means any agreement to provide cash management services, including treasury, depository, overdraft, credit or debit card, electronic funds transfer and other cash management arrangements.
Cash Management Agreement
          "" means any Person that, at the time it enters into a Cash Management Agreement, is a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender, in its capacity as a party to such Cash Management Agreement.
Cash Management Bank
          "" means a Person that is a controlled foreign corporation under Section 957 of the Code.
CFC
          "" means the occurrence, after the date of this Credit Agreement, of any of the following: (a) the adoption or taking effect of any law, rule, regulation or treaty, (b) any change in any law, rule, regulation or treaty or in the administration, interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority or (c) the making or issuance of any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) by any Governmental Authority; , notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, (x) the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines or directives thereunder or issued in connection therewith and (y) all requests, rules, guidelines or directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or the United States or foreign regulatory authorities, in each case pursuant to Basel III, shall in each case be deemed to be a "Change in Law", regardless of the date enacted, adopted or issued.
Change in Law
provided
          "" means the first date all the conditions precedent in are satisfied or waived in accordance with .
Closing Date
Section 5.01
Section 10.01
          "" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
Code
          "" means all of the "" referred to in the Collateral Documents and all of the other property that is or is intended under the terms of the Collateral Documents to be subject to Liens in favor of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties.
Collateral
Collateral
          "" means JPMCB in its capacity as collateral agent for the Lenders under the Collateral Documents and its successors in such capacity.
Collateral Agent
          "" means, collectively, the Security Agreement, the Pledge Agreement, the Intellectual Property Security Agreement(s), the Mortgages and each of the other agreements, instruments or documents that creates or purports to create a Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties.
Collateral Documents
          "" means a notice of (a) a Term A Borrowing, (b) a Term B Borrowing, (c) a Revolving Credit Borrowing, (d) a Swingline Borrowing, (e) a conversion of Loans from one Type to the other, or (f) a continuation of Eurodollar Rate Loans, pursuant to , which, if in writing, shall be substantially in the form of .
Committed Loan Notice
Section 2.02(a)
Exhibit A
          "" means a Term A Commitment, Term B Commitment, Revolving Credit Commitment or Incremental Term Commitment, if any, as the context may require.
Commitment
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Commitment Fee
Section 2.08(a)
 
          "" means each notice, demand, communication, information, document and other material provided for hereunder or under any other Loan Document or otherwise transmitted between the parties hereto relating to this Credit Agreement, the other Loan Documents, any Loan Party or its Affiliates, or the transactions contemplated by this Credit Agreement or the other Loan Documents including, without limitation, all Approved Electronic Communications.
Communications
          "" means a certificate of a senior financial executive of the Borrower in substantially the form of .
Compliance Certificate
Exhibit C
          "" means, as to any Person, any provision of any security issued by such Person or of any agreement, instrument or other undertaking to which such Person is a party or by which it or any of its property is legally bound.
Contractual Obligation
          "" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise. "" and "" have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
          "" means any agreement, whether written or oral, providing for the grant by or to a Person of any right under any Copyright.
Copyright Licenses
          "" means all copyrights in all works, now existing or hereafter created or acquired, all registrations and recordings thereof, and all applications in connection therewith, whether in the United States Copyright Office or in any similar office or agency of the United States, any state thereof or any other country or any political subdivision thereof, or otherwise.
Copyrights
          "" has the meaning given to such term in the preamble hereto.
Credit Agreement
          "" means each of the following: (a) a Borrowing and (b) an L/C Credit Extension.
Credit Extension
          "" means an amount, determined on the date of any proposed Restricted Payment, as applicable, equal to Operating Cash Flow for the period from July 1, 2011 through the end of the most recently ended Quarter as to which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to .
Cumulative Operating Cash Flow
Section 7.01
          "" means for the period from July 1, 2011 through the end of the most recently ended Quarter as to which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to , the aggregate of the interest expense of the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Cumulative Total Interest Expense
Section 7.01
          "" means, collectively, the respective notes and debentures evidencing, and indentures and other agreements governing, any Indebtedness.
Debt Instruments
          "" means the Bankruptcy Code, and all other liquidation, conservatorship, bankruptcy, assignment for the benefit of creditors, moratorium, rearrangement, receivership, insolvency, reorganization, or similar debtor relief Laws of the United States or other applicable jurisdictions from time to time in effect and affecting the rights of creditors generally.
Debtor Relief Laws
 
          "" means any event or condition that constitutes an Event of Default or that, with the giving of any notice, the passage of time, or both, would be an Event of Default.
Default
          "" means (a) when used with respect to Obligations other than Letter of Credit Fees, an interest rate equal to (i) the Base Rate (ii) the Applicable Rate, if any, applicable to Base Rate Loans (iii) 2% per annum; , , that with respect to a Eurodollar Rate Loan, the Default Rate shall be an interest rate equal to the interest rate (including any Applicable Rate) otherwise applicable to such Loan 2% per annum and (b) when used with respect to Letter of Credit Fees, a rate equal to the Applicable Rate 2% per annum.
Default Rate
plus
plus
provided
however
plus
plus
          "" means, at any time, a Lender as to which the Administrative Agent has notified the Borrower that (i) such Lender has failed for three Business Days or more to comply with its obligations under this Credit Agreement to make a Loan or make a payment to the L/C Issuer in respect of an L/C Obligation or make a payment to the Swingline Lender in respect of a Swingline Loan (each a "") unless such Lender notifies the Administrative Agent and the Borrower in writing that such failure is the result of such Lender's good faith determination that one or more conditions precedent to funding (each of which conditions precedent, together with any applicable default, shall be specifically identified in such writing) has not been satisfied, or (ii) such Lender has notified the Administrative Agent in writing, or has stated publicly, that it will not comply with any such funding obligation, or (iii) a Lender Insolvency Event has occurred and is continuing with respect to such Lender ( that neither the reallocation of funding obligations provided for in as a result of a Lender being a Defaulting Lender nor the performance by Non-Defaulting Lenders of such reallocated funding obligations shall by themselves cause the relevant Defaulting Lender to become a Non-Defaulting Lender). Any determination that a Lender is a Defaulting Lender under clauses (i) through (iii) above shall be made by the Administrative Agent in its reasonable discretion acting in good faith. The Administrative Agent will promptly send to all parties hereto a copy of any notice to the Borrower referred to above.
Defaulting Lender
funding obligation
provided
Section 2.16(b)
          "" means the amount identified in the Borrower's Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows on the line identified as "Amortization of Deferred Carriage Fees" and determined in accordance with GAAP.
Deferred Carriage Fee Amortization
          "" or "" means the sale, transfer, license, lease or other disposition (including any sale and leaseback transaction) of any property by any Person (or the granting of any option or other right to do any of the foregoing), including any sale, assignment, transfer or other disposal, with or without recourse, of any notes or accounts receivable or any rights and claims associated therewith; that the term Disposition specifically excludes (i) sale, transfer, license, lease or other disposition of obsolete or worn out property, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, in the ordinary course of business, (ii) sale, transfer, license, lease or other disposition of receivables, inventory and other current assets in the ordinary course of business; (iii) sale, transfer, license, lease or other disposition of property by any Restricted Subsidiary to the Borrower or to another Restricted Subsidiary; that if the transferor of such property is a Guarantor, the transferee thereof must either be the Borrower or a Guarantor; (iv) sale, transfer, license, lease or other disposition of property permitted by through and through sale, transfer, license, lease or other disposition of property involving property or assets having a fair market value of less than $1,000,000.
Disposition
Dispose
provided
provided
Section 7.24(i)
(vii)
(x)
(xvi); and (v)
 
          "" means the Distribution Agreement dated as of June 6, 2011, between the Borrower and CSC Holdings, LLC, relating to, , the contribution of the Programming Network Business to the Borrower.
Distribution Agreement
inter alia
          "" means (i) the contribution to the Borrower of the Programming Network Business from CSC Holdings, LLC in exchange for the issuance or transfer to CSC Holdings, LLC of common stock of the Borrower, Senior Notes and Term B Notes, (ii) the distribution by CSC Holdings, LLC of the Borrower's common stock to Cablevision, and (iii) the distribution by Cablevision of the Borrower's common stock to the common shareholders of Cablevision, in each case pursuant to the Distribution Agreement.
Distribution Transaction
          "" means the agreements listed on .
Distribution Transaction Agreements
Schedule 1.01(iv)
          "" means Charles F. Dolan.
Dolan
          "" means (i) any Dolan Family Member, (ii) any trusts for the benefit of any Dolan Family Members, (iii) any estate or testamentary trust of any Dolan Family Member for the benefit of any Dolan Family Members, (iv) any executor, administrator, conservator or legal or personal representative of any Person or Persons specified in clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) above to the extent acting in such capacity on behalf of any Dolan Family Member or Members and not individually, and (v) any corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other similar entity, in each case 80% of which is owned and controlled by any of the foregoing or combination of the foregoing.
Dolan Family Interests
          "" means Dolan, his spouse, his descendants and any spouse of any of such descendants.
Dolan Family Members
          "" and ""means lawful money of the United States of America.
Dollars
$
          "" shall mean any Subsidiary that is organized and existing under the laws of the United States or any state or commonwealth thereof or under the laws of the District of Columbia.
Domestic Subsidiary
          "" means (a) with respect to any assignment of any Revolving Credit Commitment or Revolving Credit Loan, (i) a Revolving Credit Lender, (ii) an Affiliate of a Revolving Credit Lender, and (iii) any other Person (other than a natural person) approved by (A) the Administrative Agent, (B) in the case of any assignment of a Revolving Credit Commitment, the Swingline Lender and the L/C Issuer, and (C) unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Borrower (each such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed), and (b) with respect to any assignment of any Term Commitment or Term Loan, (i) a Lender, (ii) an Affiliate of a Lender, (iii) an Approved Fund, (iv) any other Person (other than a natural person) approved by (A) the Administrative Agent, and (B) unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Borrower (each such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed); , the Borrower shall be deemed to have approved of such Person unless it shall object thereto by written notice to the Administrative Agent within seven (7) Business Days after having received written notice thereof, and (v) with respect to any Term Loan, the Borrower or any of the Borrower's Affiliates or Subsidiaries; that, (1) none of the Borrower or any of the Borrower's Affiliates or Subsidiaries holding Term Loans shall have any right to (A) attend (including by telephone) any meeting or discussions (or portion thereof) among the Administrative Agent or any Lender to which representatives of the Borrower are not then present
Eligible Assignee
provided
provided
 
or (B) receive any information or material prepared by the Administrative Agent or any Lender or any communication by or among Administrative Agent and one or more Lenders, except to the extent such information or materials have been made available to the Borrower or its representatives, (2) any purchase of Term Loans by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries by assignment pursuant to Section 10.6 shall (x) be effected by an offer to purchase such Term Loans pro rata from each Term Lender of the applicable Term Facility in a manner reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent, (y) result in such Term Loans being retired upon such assignment and (z) not be funded with a borrowing of Revolving Credit Loans, and (3) the aggregate principal amount of Term Loans purchased by assignment pursuant to Section 10.06 and held at any one time by any of the Borrower's Affiliates (which are not required to be retired pursuant to clause (2) above) may not exceed 10% of the outstanding principal amount of all Term Loans under any Term Facility.
          "" means any and all Federal, state, local, and foreign statutes, laws, regulations, ordinances, rules, judgments, orders, decrees, permits, concessions, grants, franchises, licenses, agreements or governmental restrictions relating to pollution and the protection of the environment or the release of any materials into the environment, including those related to hazardous substances or wastes, air emissions and discharges to waste or public systems.
Environmental Laws
          "" means any liability (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any of their respective Subsidiaries resulting from or based upon (a) violation of any Environmental Law, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the environment or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
          "" means, with respect to any Person, any of the shares of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person, any of the warrants, options or other rights for the purchase or acquisition from such Person of shares of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person, any of the securities convertible into or exchangeable for shares of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person or warrants, rights or options for the purchase or acquisition from such Person of such shares (or such other interests), and any of the other ownership or profit interests in such Person (including partnership, member or trust interests therein), whether voting or nonvoting, and whether or not such shares, warrants, options, rights or other interests are outstanding on any date of determination.
Equity Interests
          "" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended.
ERISA
          "" means, when used with respect to a Plan, ERISA, the PBGC or a provision of the Code pertaining to employee benefit plans, any Person that is a member of any group of organizations within the meaning of Sections 414(b), (c), (m) or (o) of the Code of which the Borrower is a member.
ERISA Affiliate
          "" means, for such Interest Period, the rate per annum equal to the British Bankers Association LIBOR Rate (""), as published by Reuters (or other commercially available source providing quotations of BBA LIBOR as designated by the
Eurodollar Base Rate
BBA LIBOR
 
Administrative Agent from time to time) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, for Dollar deposits (for delivery on the first day of such Interest Period) with a term equivalent to such Interest Period. If such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the "Eurodollar Base Rate" for such Interest Period shall be the rate per annum determined by the Administrative Agent to be the rate at which deposits in Dollars for delivery on the first day of such Interest Period in same day funds in the approximate amount of the Eurodollar Rate Loan being made, continued or converted by JPMCB and with a term equivalent to such Interest Period would be offered by JPMCB's London Branch to major banks in the London interbank eurodollar market at their request at approximately 11:00 a.m. (London time) two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
          "" means for any Interest Period with respect to a Eurodollar Rate Loan, a rate per annum determined by the Administrative Agent pursuant to the following formula:
Eurodollar Rate
           that, solely with respect to Term B Loans, the Eurodollar Rate shall be no lower than 1.00% .
provided
per annum
          "" means a Revolving Credit Loan, Term A Loan, Term B Loan or Incremental Term Loan, if any, that bears interest at a rate based on the Eurodollar Rate.
Eurodollar Rate Loan
          "" means, for any day during any Interest Period, the reserve percentage (expressed as a decimal, carried out to five decimal places) in effect on such day, whether or not applicable to any Lender, under regulations issued from time to time by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System for determining the maximum reserve requirement (including any emergency, supplemental or other marginal reserve requirement) with respect to Eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as "Eurocurrency liabilities"). The Eurodollar Rate for each outstanding Eurodollar Rate Loan shall be adjusted automatically as of the effective date of any change in the Eurodollar Reserve Percentage.
Eurodollar Reserve Percentage
          "" means any of the events described in .
Event of Default
Article VIII
          "" means, with respect to any property, (i) the actual or constructive total loss of such property or the use thereof, resulting from destruction, damage beyond repair, or the rendition of such property permanently unfit for normal use from any casualty or similar occurrence whatsoever, (ii) the destruction or damage of a material portion of such property from any casualty or similar occurrence whatsoever under circumstances in which such damage cannot reasonably be expected to be repaired, or such property cannot reasonably be expected to be restored to its condition immediately prior to such destruction or damage, within 180 days after the occurrence of such destruction or damage, (iii) the condemnation, confiscation or seizure of, or requisition of title to or use of, any property, or (iv) in the case of any property located upon a leasehold, the termination or expiration of such leasehold.
Event of Loss
          "" shall mean a Disposition constituting any exchange of assets or properties for consideration consisting solely of other assets or properties, subject to the last sentence of this definition, and of comparable value and use to those assets or properties being exchanged, and having a value equal to the fair market value of those assets or properties being exchanged, including exchanges involving the transfer or acquisition (or both transfer and
Exchange
 
acquisition) of Equity Interests of a Person so long as substantially all of the Equity Interests of such Person are transferred or acquired, as the case may be (and such Person becomes a Restricted Subsidiary and a Guarantor hereunder). It is understood that exchanges of the kind described above as to which a portion of the consideration paid or received is in the form of cash or Cash Equivalents shall nevertheless constitute "Exchanges" for the purposes of this Credit Agreement so long as the aggregate consideration received by the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries in connection with such exchange represents fair market value for the assets or properties and cash or Cash Equivalents being transferred by the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries.
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Excluded Indebtedness
Section 8.01(e)
          "" means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the L/C Issuer or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder, (a) taxes imposed on or measured by its overall net income (however denominated), and franchise taxes imposed on it (in lieu of net income taxes), as a result of a present or former connection between such Administrative Agent, Lender or L/C Issuer, as the case may be, and the jurisdiction of the Governmental Authority imposing such tax or any taxing authority thereof or therein (other than any such connection arising solely from the Administrative Agent, such Lender or such L/C Issuer having executed, delivered or performed its obligations or received a payment under, or enforced, any Loan Document), (b) any branch profits taxes imposed by the United States or any similar tax imposed by any other jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located, (c) any Tax imposed pursuant to FATCA, and (d) in the case of a Foreign Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by the Borrower under ), any withholding tax that is imposed on amounts payable to such Foreign Lender at the time such Foreign Lender becomes a party hereto (or designates a new Lending Office) or is attributable to such Foreign Lender's failure or inability (other than as a result of a Change in Law) to comply with , except to the extent that such Foreign Lender (or its assignor, if any) was entitled, at the time of designation of a new Lending Office (or assignment), to receive additional amounts from the Borrower with respect to such withholding tax pursuant to .
Excluded Taxes
Section 10.12
Section 3.01(e)
Section 3.01(a)
          "" means that certain Credit Agreement, dated as of July 5, 2006, as amended, among the Rainbow National Services, LLC, the Guarantors named therein, Bank of America, N.A., as syndication agent, Credit Suisse (formerly Credit Suisse First Boston), Citicorp North America, Inc. and Wachovia Bank, National Association, as co-documentation agents, JPMCB, as administrative agent, and the other Loan Parties (as defined therein) party thereto.
Existing RNS Credit Agreement
          "" means that certain Indenture, dated as of August 20, 2004, among The Bank of New York, Rainbow National Services, LLC, RNS Co-Issuer Corporation and the "Guarantors" (as defined therein) with respect to the Existing RNS Notes.
Existing RNS Indenture
          "" shall mean the 10-3/8% Senior Subordinated Notes Due 2014 issued pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Existing RNS Indenture in the aggregate original principal amount of $325,000,000.
Existing RNS Notes
          "" means the Term A Facility, the Term B Facility, the Revolving Credit Facility or an Incremental Term Facility, if any, as the context may require.
Facility
 
          "" means any fee letter entered into between the Borrower and the Joint Lead Arrangers on or prior to the Closing Date.
Facility Fee Letter
          "" means Sections 1471 through 1474 of the Code, as of the date of this Credit Agreement, including any regulations or official interpretations thereof, whether issued before or after the date of this Credit Agreement.
FATCA
          "" means the Federal Communications Commission, or any Governmental Authority succeeding to any of its principal functions.
FCC
          "" means, for any day, the rate per annum equal to the weighted average of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers on such day, as published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York on the Business Day next succeeding such day; that (a) if such day is not a Business Day, the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be such rate on such transactions on the next preceding Business Day as so published on the next succeeding Business Day, and (b) if no such rate is so published on such next succeeding Business Day, the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be the average rate (rounded upward, if necessary, to a whole multiple of 1/100 of 1%) charged to JPMCB on such day on such transactions as determined by the Administrative Agent.
Federal Funds Rate
provided
          "" means the Facility Fee Letter and the JPMCB Fee Letter.
Fee Letters
          "" means the financial covenants applicable to the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries from time to time as set forth in and .
Financial Covenants
Section 7.25
7.26
          "" means any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is resident for tax purposes. For purposes of this definition, the United States, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed to constitute a single jurisdiction.
Foreign Lender
          "" means any Person (other than a natural person) that is (or will be) engaged in making, purchasing, holding or otherwise investing in commercial loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business.
Fund
          "" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board and the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or such other principles as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession in the United States, that are applicable to the circumstances as of the date of determination, consistently applied; , that, at any time after the Closing Date, the Borrower may elect to apply IFRS accounting principles in lieu of GAAP and, upon any such election, except as otherwise provided in , references herein to GAAP shall thereafter be construed to mean IFRS (and equivalent pronouncements) as in effect at the date of such election, except as otherwise provided in this Credit Agreement; , that any calculation or determination in this Credit Agreement that requires the application of GAAP for periods that include Quarters ended prior to the adoption of IFRS shall remain as previously calculated or determined.
GAAP
provided
Section 1.03(b)
provided
further
          "" means the government of the United States or any other nation, or of any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency,
Governmental Authority
 
authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government (including any supra-national bodies such as the European Union or the European Central Bank).
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Granting Lender
Section 10.06(h)
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Guarantees
Section 7.16
          "" means the Persons set forth on and each New Restricted Subsidiary required to become a Guarantor pursuant to .
Guarantors
Schedule 1.01(iii)
Section 7.08
          "" means the Guaranty made by the Guarantors under in favor of the Secured Parties.
Guaranty
Article IV
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Guaranty Supplement
Section 4.11
          "" means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos-containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
          "" means any Person that, at the time it enters into a Secured Hedge Agreement, is a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender, in its capacity as a party to such Secured Hedge Agreement.
Hedge Bank
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Honor Date
Section 2.03(c)(i)
          "" means the International Financial Reporting Standards as adopted by the International Accounting Standards Board.
IFRS
          "" means The Independent Film Channel LLC, a Delaware limited liability company.
IFC
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Increase Effective Date
Section 2.13(d)
          "" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Incremental Term Loans of the same Type and, in the case of Eurodollar Rate Loans, having the same Interest Period made by each of the Incremental Term Lenders pursuant to .
Incremental Term Borrowing
Section 2.14
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Incremental Term Commitments
Section 2.14(a)
          "" means, any additional tranche of Incremental Term Commitments and Incremental Term Loans established pursuant to an Incremental Term Supplement.
Incremental Term Facility
          "" means a Lender with an Incremental Term Commitment or an outstanding Incremental Term Loan.
Incremental Term Lender
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Incremental Term Loan
Section 2.14(a)
 
          "" means a promissory note made by the Borrower in favor of an Incremental Term Lender, evidencing Incremental Term Loans made by such Incremental Term Lender, substantially in the form attached to the Incremental Term Supplement.
Incremental Term Note
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Incremental Term Supplement
Section 2.14(c)
          "" means, as to any Person, Capital Lease Obligations of such Person and other indebtedness of such Person for borrowed money (whether by loan or the issuance and sale of debt securities) or for the deferred purchase or acquisition price of property or services other than accounts payable and accrued expenses (other than for borrowed money) incurred in the ordinary course of business of such Person. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, such term shall include (a) when applied to the Borrower and/or any Restricted Subsidiary, all obligations of the Borrower and/or any Restricted Subsidiary under Swap Contracts and (b) when applied to the Borrower or any other Person, all Indebtedness of others Guaranteed by such Person.
Indebtedness
          "" means Taxes other than Excluded Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Indemnitee
Section 10.04(b)
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Information
Section 10.02(f)
          "" means CSC Holdings, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company.
Initial Term B Lender
          "" means the Copyrights, Copyright Licenses, Patents, Patent Licenses, Software, Trade Secrets, Trade Secret Licenses, Trademarks and Trademark Licenses of the Loan Parties.
Intellectual Property
          "" means an Intellectual Property Security Agreement, between each Loan Party owning any Intellectual Property or applications for Intellectual Property and the Collateral Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, and any similar security agreement or any security agreement supplement delivered pursuant to .
Intellectual Property Security Agreement
Section 7.08
          "" means, (a) as to any Eurodollar Rate Loan, the last day of each Interest Period applicable to such Loan and the Maturity Date of the Facility under which such Loan was made; , , that if any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Rate Loan exceeds three months, the respective dates that fall every three months after the beginning of such Interest Period shall also be Interest Payment Dates; and (b) as to any Base Rate Loan, the last Business Day of each March, June, September and December and the Maturity Date of the Facility under which such Loan was made.
Interest Payment Date
provided
however
          "" means, as to each Eurodollar Rate Loan, the period commencing on the date such Eurodollar Rate Loan is disbursed or converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Rate Loan and ending on the date one, two, three or six months thereafter, or if made available by the Lenders nine or twelve months thereafter, as selected by the Borrower in its Committed Loan Notice; that:
Interest Period
provided
 
     (a) any Interest Period that would otherwise end on a day that is not a Business Day shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such Business Day falls in another calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day;
     (b) any Interest Period that begins on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period; and
     (c) no Interest Period shall extend beyond the Maturity Date of the Facility under which such Loan was made.
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Investments
Section 7.18
          "" means the International Standby Practices (ISP98) International Chamber of Commerce Publication No. 590, as the same may be amended and as in effect from time to time.
ISP
          "" means with respect to any Letter of Credit, the Letter of Credit Application, and any other document, agreement and instrument entered into by the L/C Issuer and the Borrower or any Subsidiary or in favor the L/C Issuer and relating to any such Letter of Credit.
Issuer Documents
          "" means J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated.
Joint Lead Arrangers
          "" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, and its successors.
JPMCB
          "" means the letter agreement, dated June 30, 2011, among the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer.
JPMCB Fee Letter
          "" means, collectively, all international, foreign, Federal, state and local statutes, treaties, rules, guidelines, regulations, ordinances, codes and administrative or judicial precedents or authorities, including the interpretation or administration thereof by any Governmental Authority charged with the enforcement, interpretation or administration thereof, and all applicable administrative orders, directives, requests, licenses, authorizations and permits of, and agreements with, any Governmental Authority, in each case whether or not having the force of law.
Laws
          "" means, with respect to each Revolving Credit Lender, such Lender's funding of its participation in any L/C Borrowing in accordance with its Applicable Revolving Credit Percentage.
L/C Advance
          "" means an extension of credit resulting from a drawing under any Letter of Credit which has not been reimbursed on the date when made or refinanced as a Revolving Credit Borrowing.
L/C Borrowing
          "" means, with respect to any Letter of Credit, the issuance thereof or extension of the expiry date thereof, or the increase of the amount thereof.
L/C Credit Extension
 
          "" means JPMCB in its capacity as issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder or any successor issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder and any other Lender reasonably acceptable to the Borrower and Administrative Agent that has agreed to act as an L/C Issuer hereunder.
L/C Issuer
          "" means, as of any date of determination, the aggregate amount available to be drawn under all outstanding Letters of Credit the aggregate of all Unreimbursed Amounts, including all L/C Borrowings. For purposes of computing the amount available to be drawn under any Letter of Credit, the amount of such Letter of Credit shall be determined in accordance with . For all purposes of this Credit Agreement, if on any date of determination a Letter of Credit has expired by its terms but any amount may still be drawn thereunder by reason of the operation of Rule 3.14 of the ISP, such Letter of Credit shall be deemed to be "outstanding" in the amount so remaining available to be drawn.
L/C Obligations
plus
Section 1.06
          "" means leases and subleases (excluding Capital Lease Obligations), licenses to use property, and easements.
Leases
          "" means the banks or other financial institutions which are parties hereto, including the Initial Term B Lender, the Swingline Lender and any Incremental Term Lender, together with their respective successors and assigns.
Lender
          "" means that (i) a Lender or its Lender Parent is insolvent or (ii) an event of the kind referred to in ), or of occurs, excluding any Undisclosed Administration, with respect to such Lender or its Lender Parent (as if the references in such provisions to the Borrower or Significant Restricted Subsidiaries referred to such Lender or Lender Parent); that, for the avoidance of doubt, a Lender shall not be a Defaulting Lender solely by virtue of the ownership or acquisition of any Equity Interest in that Lender or any direct or indirect parent company thereof by a Governmental Authority so long as such ownership interest does not result in or provide such Lender with immunity from the jurisdiction of courts within the United States or from the enforcement of judgments or writs of attachment on its assets or permit such Lender (or such Governmental Authority) to reject, repudiate, disavow or disaffirm any contracts or agreements made with such Lender.
Lender Insolvency Event
clause (g)(ii
(g)(v)
(h)
Section 8.01
provided
          "" means, with respect to a Lender, the bank holding company (as defined in Federal Reserve Board Regulation Y), if any, of such Lender, or any Person owning, beneficially or of record, directly or indirectly, a majority of the shares of such Lender.
Lender Parent
          "" means any Lender, the L/C Issuer or the Swingline Lender.
Lender Party
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Lender Party Appointment Period
Section 9.06(a)
          "" means, as to any Lender, the office or offices of such Lender described as such in such Lender's Administrative Questionnaire, or such other office or offices as a Lender may from time to time notify the Borrower and the Administrative Agent.
Lending Office
          "" means any letter of credit issued hereunder. A Letter of Credit may be a commercial letter of credit or a standby letter of credit.
Letter of Credit
 
          "" means an application and agreement for the issuance or amendment of a Letter of Credit in the form from time to time in use by the L/C Issuer.
Letter of Credit Application
          "" means the day that is seven days prior to the Maturity Date then in effect for the Revolving Credit Facility (or, if such day is not a Business Day, the next preceding Business Day).
Letter of Credit Expiration Date
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Letter of Credit Fee
Section 2.03(i)
          "" means an amount equal to $50,000,000. The Letter of Credit Sublimit is part of, and not in addition to, the Revolving Credit Facility.
Letter of Credit Sublimit
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Liens
Section 7.17
          "" means an extension of credit by a Lender to the Borrower under in the form of a Term Loan, Swingline Loan or Revolving Credit Loan.
Loan
Article II
          "" means, collectively, (a) this Credit Agreement, (b) the Notes, (c) the Collateral Documents, (d) the Fee Letters, (e) each Issuer Document, (f) each Secured Hedge Agreement, (g) each Secured Cash Management Agreement, and (h) each Incremental Term Supplement, if any; that for purposes of the definition of "Materially Adverse Effect" and through and , "Loan Documents" shall not include Secured Hedge Agreements or Secured Cash Management Agreements.
Loan Documents
provided
Articles V
IX
Section 10.01
          "" means, collectively, the Borrower and each Guarantor.
Loan Parties
          "" has the meaning given to such term in Section 2.15(b).
Mandatory Borrowing
          "" means "margin stock" as defined in Regulation U.
Margin Stock
          "" means a materially adverse effect upon (i) the business, assets, financial condition or results of operations of the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries taken as a whole on a combined basis in accordance with GAAP, (ii) the ability of the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries taken as a whole to perform the Obligations hereunder or (iii) the legality, validity, binding nature or enforceability of this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document or the validity, perfection, priority or enforceability of the security interest created, or purported to be created, by any of the Collateral Documents.
Materially Adverse Effect
          "" means (a) with respect to the Revolving Credit Facility, June 30, 2016, (b) with respect to the Term A Facility, June 30, 2017, (c) with respect to the Term B Facility, December 31, 2018, and (d) with respect to each Incremental Term Facility, if any, the date specified as such in the respective Incremental Term Supplement.
Maturity Date
          "" has the meaning given to such term in the Security Agreement.
Material Real Property
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Maximum Rate
Section 10.08
          "" means any Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary thereof issued in connection with a Monetization Transaction;
Monetization Indebtedness
provided
 
that, (i) on the date of its incurrence, the purchase price or principal amount of such Monetization Indebtedness does not exceed the fair market value of the securities that are the subject of such Monetization Transaction on such date and (ii) the obligations of the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries with respect to the purchase price or principal amount of such Monetization Indebtedness (x) may be satisfied in full by delivery of the securities that are the subject of such Monetization Transaction and any related options on such securities or any proceeds received by the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary thereof on account of such options; , that if the Borrower or such Restricted Subsidiary no longer owns sufficient securities that were the subject of such Monetization Transaction and/or related options on such securities to satisfy in full the obligations of the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries under such Monetization Indebtedness, such Indebtedness shall no longer be deemed to be Monetization Indebtedness, and (y) are not secured by any Liens on any of the Borrower's or its Restricted Subsidiaries' assets other than the securities that are the subject of such Monetization Transaction and the related options on such securities.
provided
further
          "" means a transaction pursuant to which (i) securities received pursuant to a Disposition or Exchange are sold, transferred or otherwise conveyed (including by way of a forward purchase agreement, prepaid forward sale agreement, secured borrowing or similar agreement) within 180 days of such Disposition or Exchange and (ii) the Borrower or its Restricted Subsidiaries receive (including by way of borrowing under Monetization Indebtedness) not less than 75% of the fair market value of such securities in the form of cash.
Monetization Transaction
          "" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc. and any successor thereto.
Moody's
          "" means the deeds of trust, trust deeds, deeds to secure debt and mortgages, substantially in the form of (with such changes as may be satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel to account for local law matters) and otherwise in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (and each other Mortgage delivered pursuant to from time to time), in each case as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time.
Mortgages
Exhibit L
Section 7.11
          "" means a Plan that is a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
          "" means proceeds received by the Borrower or any of the Restricted Subsidiaries in cash from (x) any Disposition or the incurrence, issuance or sale of Indebtedness or capital stock of the Borrower or any of the Restricted Subsidiaries, in each case after deduction of the underwriting discounts and commissions in, the costs of, and any income, franchise, transfer or other tax liability arising from, such sale, Disposition, incurrence or issuance, (y) a capital contribution in respect of the common stock of any class of the Borrower to the Borrower by the holder thereof, or (z) any insurance, condemnation awards or other payment with respect to an Event of Loss, after deduction of the costs of, and any income, franchise, transfer or other tax liability arising therefrom. If any amount payable to the Borrower or any such Restricted Subsidiary in respect of any such incurrence or issuance shall be or become evidenced by any promissory note or other negotiable or non-negotiable instrument, the cash proceeds received on any such note or instrument shall constitute Net Cash Proceeds.
Net Cash Proceeds
          "" means, as to the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries as at any date of determination, the aggregate amount of all Indebtedness of the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries, less the aggregate amount of Qualified Cash of the Borrower and the
Net Debt
 
Restricted Subsidiaries as of such date in an aggregate amount not to exceed 33% of Operating Cash Flow for the period of four consecutive Quarters covered by the then most recent Compliance Certificate delivered to the Lenders pursuant to .
Section 7.01(d)
          "" means any New Subsidiary designated as a Restricted Subsidiary pursuant to and any Unrestricted Subsidiary redesignated as a Restricted Subsidiary pursuant to .
New Restricted Subsidiary
Section 7.08(b)
Section 7.08(c)
          "" means any Person that becomes a Subsidiary of the Borrower after the Closing Date.
New Subsidiary
          "" means any New Subsidiary deemed an Unrestricted Subsidiary pursuant to .
New Unrestricted Subsidiary
Section 7.08(a)
          "" means, at any time, a Lender that is not a Defaulting Lender.
Non-Defaulting Lender
          "" means a Term A Note, Term B Note, Revolving Credit Note, Swingline Note or Incremental Term Note, if any, as the context may require.
Note
          "" means all advances to, and debts, liabilities, obligations, covenants and duties of, any Loan Party arising under any Loan Document or otherwise with respect to any Loan or Letter of Credit, whether direct or indirect (including those acquired by assumption), absolute or contingent, due or to become due, now existing or hereafter arising and including interest and fees that accrue after the commencement by or against any Loan Party or any Affiliate thereof of any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Laws naming such Person as the debtor in such proceeding, regardless of whether such interest and fees are allowed claims in such proceeding.
Obligations
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
OID
Section 2.10(a)
          "" means, for any period, the following for the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP: (i) aggregate operating revenues, (ii) aggregate operating expenses (including technical, programming, sales, selling, general administrative expenses and salaries and other compensation, in each case net of amounts allocated to Affiliates, but excluding depreciation and amortization (but, for the avoidance of doubt, depreciation and amortization will not include the amortization of programming expenses (films, series, shows and other content), which is treated as an operating expense), charges and credits relating to employee stock plans, and restructuring charges and credits, and, to the extent otherwise included in operating expenses, any losses resulting from a write-off or write-down of Investments by the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary in Affiliates), (iii), without duplication, Deferred Carriage Fee Amortization; , , that for purposes of determining Operating Cash Flow for any period (A) there shall be excluded all management fees paid to the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary during such period by any Unrestricted Subsidiary other than any such amounts settled in cash to the extent not in excess of 5% of Operating Cash Flow for the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries as determined without including any such fees, (B) there shall be excluded operating expenses in connection with the Distribution Transaction in an amount not to exceed $5,000,000 in the aggregate, (C) the amount of Operating Cash Flow attributable to any non-wholly owned Restricted Subsidiary shall be included only to the extent of the Borrower's direct or indirect economic interest in the Equity Interests of such non-wholly owned Restricted Subsidiary;
Operating Cash Flow
minus
plus
provided
however
 
, that the amount of Operating Cash Flow attributable to all non-wholly owned Restricted Subsidiaries shall in no event exceed 10% of the total Operating Cash Flow for such period, and (D) Operating Cash Flow for such period shall be increased or reduced, as the case may be, by the Operating Cash Flow of assets or businesses acquired or disposed of (provided that in each case it has an impact on Annual Operating Cash Flow of at least $1,000,000) (including by means of any redesignation of any Subsidiary pursuant to ) by the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary on or after the first day of such period, determined on a pro forma basis reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (it being agreed that it shall be satisfactory to the Administrative Agent that such pro forma calculations may be based upon GAAP as applied in the preparation of the financial statements for the Borrower, delivered in accordance with rather than as applied in the financial statements of the Person whose assets were acquired and may include, in the Borrower's discretion, a reasonable estimate of savings resulting from any such acquisition or disposition (a) that have been realized, (b) for which the steps necessary for realization have been taken, or (c) for which the steps necessary for realization are reasonably expected to be taken within 12 months of the date of such acquisition or disposition), as though the Borrower or such Restricted Subsidiary acquired or disposed of such assets on the first day of such period. For purposes of this definition, operating revenues and operating expenses shall exclude any non-recurring, non-cash items in excess of $2,500,000. Operating Cash Flow may also be adjusted to normalize an acceleration of programming expenses (films, series, shows and other content) required to be recognized in accordance with GAAP when the program's useful life is shortened or otherwise changed from the originally projected useful life. Furthermore, to the extent the programs are abandoned and, to the extent that the amortization of such programming expenses are, in accordance with GAAP, required to be accelerated into the year of such impairment, the Borrower may treat such costs as being amortized over a period equal to the original projected useful life. In the event of any suspension of carriage by any party to an Affiliation Agreement during renewal negotiations of such Affiliation Agreement or upon the expiration or termination of, or during disputes under, such Affiliation Agreement, the Operating Cash Flow calculation, for purposes of complying with the Financial Covenants (but not for any other purpose), may be adjusted (the "") to include the Operating Cash Flow attributable to the affected Affiliation Agreement from the corresponding period one year prior to each period during which such suspension of carriage continues, but in any event not to exceed three months, provided that the Carriage Suspension Adjustment shall be limited only to the Operating Cash Flow attributable to one Affiliation Agreement during any three-month period being tested.
provided
Section 7.08(c)
Section 7.01
Carriage Suspension Adjustment
          "" means (i) each of AMC, IFC, WE and Sundance, and (ii) each other Restricted Subsidiary that directly or indirectly owns a material programming network that had $100 million or more in gross operating revenues for the period of four consecutive Quarters covered by the then most recent Compliance Certificate delivered to the Lenders pursuant to .
Operating Company
Section 7.01(d)
          "" means all present or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise, property, mortgage recording or other similar taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made hereunder or under any other Loan Document or from the execution, delivery or enforcement of, or otherwise with respect to, this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document.
Other Taxes
          "" means (a) with respect to Loans on any date, the aggregate outstanding principal amount thereof after giving effect to any borrowings and prepayments or repayments thereof occurring on such date and (b) with respect to any L/C Obligations on any date, the amount of such L/C Obligations on such date after giving effect to
Outstanding Amount
 
any L/C Credit Extension occurring on such date and any other changes in the aggregate amount of the L/C Obligations as of such date, including as a result of any reimbursements by the Borrower of Unreimbursed Amounts.
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Participant
Section 10.06(d)
          "" means all agreements, whether written or oral, providing for the grant by or to a Person of any right to manufacture, use or sell any invention covered by a Patent.
Patent Licenses
          "" means (a) all letters patent of the United States or any other country, now existing or hereafter arising, and all improvement patents, reissues, reexaminations, patents of additions, renewals and extensions thereof, and (b) all applications for letters patent of the United States or any other country, now existing or hereafter arising, and all provisions, division, continuations and continuations-in-part and substitutes thereof.
Patents
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
PATRIOT Act
Section 10.16
          "" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation or any entity succeeding to any or all of its functions under ERISA.
PBGC
          "" means any acquisition (including by merger, amalgamation, consolidation or other form of combination) of all or substantially all of the assets of, or all or substantially all of the Equity Interests (other than directors' qualifying shares) in, a Person or division, line of business or other business unit of a Person who will become, or which assets will become property of, a Restricted Subsidiary so long as (a) there is no Default or Event of Default both before and after giving pro forma effect to such acquisition and any incurrence of Indebtedness in connection therewith, (b) the Borrower would be in compliance, on a pro forma basis after giving effect to the consummation of such acquisition and any incurrence of Indebtedness in connection therewith (such pro forma basis to include, in the Borrower's discretion, a reasonable estimate of savings resulting from any such acquisition (i) that have been realized, (ii) for which the steps necessary for realization have been taken, or (iii) for which the steps necessary for realization are reasonably expected to be taken within 12 months of the date of such acquisition, in each case, certified by the Borrower), with the Financial Covenants recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended Quarter for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to and calculated as if such acquisition was consummated and such Indebtedness was incurred on the first day of the 12-month period then ended; , the Financial Covenants for purposes of determining such pro forma compliance, shall be determined in a manner to be more restrictive than the level otherwise applicable for the relevant test period by 0.25:1.00, (c) the acquired company or assets are in the same business as the Borrower and its subsidiaries or are in a line of business that is generally related to the lines of business conducted by the Borrower and its subsidiaries, (d) any acquired company and its subsidiaries (other than any subsidiary that shall be a Foreign Subsidiary) shall become Guarantors and pledge their assets to the Collateral Agent and (e) the Borrower shall have notified the Administrative Agent at least ten Business Days prior to the consummation of such proposed acquisition, and shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent documents related to the proposed acquisition reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent.
Permitted Acquisition
Section 7.01
provided
          "" means (a) payments under equity and other compensation incentive programs to employees and directors of the Borrower or any of its current or former Affiliates in the ordinary course of business; provided that, in the case of employees or
Permitted Affiliate Payments
 
directors of former Affiliates, such payments relate to awards granted prior to the consummation of the Distribution Transaction, and (b) payments due and payable under the Distribution Transaction Agreements.
          "" means any Indebtedness incurred, issued or sold by the Borrower after the Closing Date, and any Guarantees thereof issued by the Guarantors permitted pursuant to Section 7.16(viii), provided that:
Permitted Debt
     (i) such Indebtedness (A) shall be unsecured, (B) shall have a commercially reasonable interest rate (which rate shall be deemed commercially reasonable if such Indebtedness is sold by a member of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority in an underwritten offering, in a private placement pursuant to Rule 144A under the Securities Act of 1933, or on a "best efforts" basis), (C) shall be neither (1) redeemable, payable or required to be purchased or otherwise retired or extinguished in whole or in part at a fixed or determinable date (whether by operation of a sinking fund or otherwise), at the option of any Person other than the Borrower or upon the occurrence of a condition other than a change of control (as defined in the Debt Instruments governing such Indebtedness) not solely within the control of the Borrower (such as a redemption required to be made out of future earnings) nor (2) convertible into any other Indebtedness or capital stock of the Borrower that may be so retired, extinguished or converted, in the case of clause (1) or (2) above, at any time before the date that is six months after the last Maturity Date applicable to the Facilities as in effect at the time of the incurrence, issuance or sale of such Indebtedness, (D) shall have a weighted average life to maturity equal to or greater than the weighted average life to maturity of the Facilities (assuming each of the Facilities had been entered into with a six month additional weighted life), (E) shall be issued subject to the demonstration of pro forma compliance after giving effect to such Indebtedness with the Financial Covenants recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended Quarter for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to and calculated as if incurred on the first day of the 12-month period then ended, and (F) shall have terms and conditions no more restrictive or burdensome, taken as a whole, than the terms and conditions of the Senior Notes (whether or not the Senior Notes are outstanding at the date of such determination); and
Section 7.01
     (ii) at the time of and immediately after giving effect to the incurrence, issuance or sale of such Indebtedness, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing, and the Borrower shall have so certified to the Administrative Agent;
and provided further, that the Borrower shall (a) prior to the issuance of any such Indebtedness, provide notice to the Administrative Agent of the proposed issuance thereof and of the use of the proceeds thereof and (b) as soon as available, provide to the Administrative Agent copies of the Debt Instruments governing such Indebtedness.
          "" means, with respect to any Person:
Permitted Liens
     (i) (a) pledges or deposits by such Person under workers' compensation laws, unemployment insurance laws or other social security legislation, and deposits securing liability to insurance carriers under related insurance or self-insurance arrangements, (b) Liens incurred in the ordinary course of business securing insurance premiums or reimbursement obligations under insurance policies related to the items specified in the foregoing clause (a), or (c) obligations in respect of letters of credit or bank guarantees that have been posted by such Person to support the payment of the items set forth in clauses (a) and (b) of this clause (i);
 
     (ii) (a) deposits to secure the performance of bids, tenders, contracts (other than for borrowed money) or Leases to which such Person is a party, (b) deposits to secure public or statutory obligations of such Person, surety and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, (c) deposits as security for contested taxes or import duties or for the payment of rent, and (d) obligations in respect of letters of credit or bank guarantees that have been posted by such Person to support the payment of items set forth in clauses (a) and (b) of this clause (ii);
     (iii) Liens consisting of pledges or deposits of cash or securities made by such Person as a condition to obtaining or maintaining any licenses issued to it by, or to satisfy other similar requirements of, any applicable Governmental Authority;
     (iv) Liens imposed by law, such as (a) carriers', warehousemen's and mechanics' materialmen's, landlords', or repairmen's Liens, or (b) other like Liens arising in the ordinary course of business securing obligations which are not overdue by more than 30 days or which if more than 30 days overdue, (1) the period of grace, if any, related thereto has not expired or which are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings; provided that a reserve or other appropriate provision shall have been made therefor as appropriate in accordance with GAAP, or (2) the aggregate principal outstanding amount of the obligations secured thereby does not exceed $1,000,000;
     (v) Liens arising out of judgments or awards not constituting an Event of Default;
     (vi) survey exceptions, encumbrances, easements or reservations of, or rights of others for rights of way, sewers, electric lines, telegraph and telephone lines and other similar purposes, or other restrictions or encumbrances as to the use of real properties or Liens incidental to the conduct of the business of such Person or to the ownership of its properties which do not in the aggregate materially impair their use in the ordinary operation of the business of such Person;
     (vii) any zoning, building or similar laws or rights reserved to or vested in any Governmental Authority;
     (viii) Liens created in the ordinary course of business and customary in the relevant industry with respect to the creation of content, and the components thereof, securing the obligations of any of the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries owing in respect of compensation or other payments owed for services rendered by creative or other personnel that do not constitute Indebtedness; provided that any such Lien shall attach solely to the content, or applicable component thereof, that are the subject to the arrangements giving rise to the underlying obligation;
     (ix) Liens for (a) taxes (other than property taxes), assessments, charges or other governmental levies not overdue by more than 30 days or which if more than 30 days overdue, (1) the period of grace, if any, related thereto has not expired or which are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings; provided that a reserve or other appropriate provision shall have been made therefor as appropriate in accordance with GAAP and (2) the aggregate principal outstanding amount of the obligations secured thereby does not exceed $2,000,000, and (b) property taxes not yet due and payable or which are being contested in good faith and by appropriate proceedings (and as to which all foreclosures and other enforcement proceedings shall have been fully bonded or otherwise effectively stayed);
 
     (x) Liens arising in the ordinary course of business by virtue of any contractual, statutory or common law provision relating to banker's Liens, rights of set-off or similar rights and remedies covering deposit or securities accounts (including funds or other assets credited thereto and pooling and netting arrangements) or other funds maintained with a depository institution or securities intermediary;
     (xi) restrictions on transfers of securities imposed by applicable securities laws;
     (xii) (a) any interest or title of a lessor, licensor or sublessor under any Lease, license or sublease entered into by such Person in the ordinary course of its business and covering only the assets so leased, licensed or subleased and (b) the rights reserved or vested in any other Person by the terms of any Lease, license, franchise, grant or permit held by such Person or by a statutory provision to terminate any such Lease, license, franchise, grant or permit or to require periodic payments as a condition to the continuance thereof;
     (xiii) assignments of insurance or condemnation proceeds provided to landlords (or their mortgagees) pursuant to the terms of any Lease and Liens or rights reserved in any Lease for rent or for compliance with the terms of such Lease;
     (xiv) Liens arising from precautionary UCC financing statement filings (or similar filings under applicable law) regarding Leases entered into by such Person in the ordinary course of business;
     (xv) Liens arising out of conditional sale, title retention, consignment or similar arrangements for sale of goods entered into by such Person in the ordinary course of business not prohibited by this Credit Agreement;
     (xvi) Liens in favor of customs and revenue authorities arising as a matter of law to secure payment of customs duties in connection with the importation of goods in the ordinary course of business; and
     (xvii) additional Liens so long as the aggregate principal outstanding amount of the obligations secured thereby does not exceed $10,000,000 at any time.
          "" means any Indebtedness issued in exchange for, or the net proceeds of which are used to extend, refinance, renew, replace, defease or refund (collectively, to ""), the Indebtedness being Refinanced (or previous refinancings thereof constituting Permitted Refinancing Indebtedness); , that (a) the principal amount (or accreted value, if applicable) of such Permitted Refinancing Indebtedness does not exceed the principal amount (or accreted value, if applicable) of the Indebtedness so Refinanced (plus unpaid accrued interest and premium thereon and underwriting discounts, fees, commissions and expenses), (b) the weighted average life to maturity of such Permitted Refinancing Indebtedness is greater than or equal to the weighted average life to maturity of the Indebtedness being Refinanced, (c) the final maturity of such Permitted Refinancing shall be no earlier than the Maturity Date of the Term B Facility, (d) if the Indebtedness being Refinanced is subordinated in right of payment to the Obligations under this Credit Agreement, such Permitted Refinancing Indebtedness shall be subordinated in right of payment to such Obligations on terms at least as favorable to the Lenders as those contained in the documentation governing the Indebtedness being Refinanced, (e) no Permitted Refinancing Indebtedness shall have different obligors than the Indebtedness being Refinanced and (f) if the Indebtedness being Refinanced is secured by any collateral (whether equally and ratably with, or junior to, the Secured Parties or otherwise), such
Permitted Refinancing Indebtedness
Refinance
provided
 
Permitted Refinancing Indebtedness may be secured by such collateral on terms no less favorable to the Secured Parties than those contained in the documentation governing the Indebtedness being Refinanced.
          "" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
          "" means, at any time, an employee pension benefit plan which is covered by Title IV of ERISA or subject to the minimum funding standards under Section 412 of the Code and is either (i) maintained by the Borrower or an ERISA Affiliate or (ii) a Multiemployer Plan to which the Borrower or an ERISA Affiliate is then making or accruing an obligation to make contributions or has within the preceding six plan years made contributions.
Plan
          "" means that certain Pledge Agreement, dated as of June 30, 2011, among certain Loan Parties and the Collateral Agent.
Pledge Agreement
          "" has the meaning given to such term in the Pledge Agreement.
Pledged Equity Interests
          "" has the meaning given to such term in the Pledge Agreement.
Pledgor
          "" means, at any time, a Lender (i) as to which the Administrative Agent has notified the Borrower that an event of the kind referred to in the definition of "Lender Insolvency Event" has occurred and is continuing in respect of any financial institution affiliate of such Lender, or (ii) as to which the Administrative Agent has in good faith determined and notified the Borrower that such Lender or its Lender Parent or a Subsidiary thereof has defaulted on its funding obligations under any other loan agreement or credit agreement. Any determination that a Lender is a Potential Defaulting Lender under any of clauses (i) through (ii) above shall be made by the Administrative Agent in its reasonable discretion acting in good faith. The Administrative Agent will promptly send to all parties hereto a copy of any notice to the Borrower referred to above.
Potential Defaulting Lender
          "" means (i) the programming businesses conducted by the Restricted Subsidiaries identified on as of the date hereof and which collectively consist of the programming networks currently known as AMC, IFC, Sundance and WE and (ii) the other programming and related assets contributed to the Borrower pursuant to the Distribution Agreement.
Programming Network Business
Schedule 1.01(i)
          "" means a transaction that is prohibited under Section 4975 of the Code or Section 406 of ERISA and not exempt under Section 4975 of the Code or Section 408 of ERISA.
Prohibited Transaction
          "" means a fiscal quarterly period of the Borrower.
Quarter
          "" means, of any Person, all cash and Cash Equivalents of such Person in deposit or securities accounts in which the Collateral Agent has "control" pursuant to and within the meaning of Section 9-104 and/or 9-106 of the UCC pursuant to the terms and conditions set forth in the Security Agreement or any other Collateral Document.
Qualified Cash
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Reduction Amount
Section 2.04(b)(vi)
 
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Register
Section 10.06(c)
          "" has the meaning given to such term by the Securities Laws and shall be independent of the Borrower as prescribed by the Securities Laws.
Registered Public Accounting Firm
          "" means Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System as the same may be amended or supplemented from time to time.
Regulation U
          "" means, with respect to any Person, such Person's Affiliates and the partners, directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and of such Person's Affiliates.
Related Parties
          "" means (i) any of the events set forth in Section 4043(c) (other than a Reportable Event as to which the provision of 30 days' notice to the PBGC is waived under applicable regulations), 4062(e) or 4063(a) of ERISA or the regulations thereunder, (ii) a determination that any Plan is an "at risk" status within the meaning of Section 303 of ERISA and the failure of such Plan to make the required funding to the Plan as provided by Section 303(i) of ERISA and (iii) any failure to make payments required by Section 430(j) of the Code if such failure continues for 30 days following the due date for any required installment.
Reportable Event
          "" means (a) with respect to a Borrowing, conversion or continuation of Term Loans or Revolving Credit Loans, a Committed Loan Notice, and (b) with respect to an L/C Credit Extension, a Letter of Credit Application.
Request for Credit Extension
          "" means, as of any date of determination and as to any Incremental Term Facility, Incremental Term Lenders holding more than 50% of such Incremental Term Facility on such date; that the portion of such Incremental Term Facility held by any Defaulting Lender shall be excluded for purposes of making a determination of Required Incremental Term Lenders.
Required Incremental Term Lenders
provided
          "" means, as of any date of determination, Lenders holding more than 50% of the sum of the (a) Total Outstandings (with the aggregate amount of each Revolving Credit Lender's risk participation and funded participation in L/C Obligations being deemed "held" by such Revolving Credit Lender for purposes of this definition) and (b) aggregate unused Revolving Credit Commitments; that (i) the unused Revolving Credit Commitment of, and the portion of the Total Outstandings held or deemed held by, any Defaulting Lender, and (ii) the Loans held by the Borrower or any of its Affiliates or Subsidiaries, shall in each case be excluded for purposes of making a determination of Required Lenders.
Required Lenders
provided
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Required Prepayment Date
Section 2.04(b)(vii)
          "" means, as of any date of determination, Revolving Credit Lenders holding more than 50% of the sum of the (a) Total Revolving Credit Outstandings (with the aggregate amount of each Revolving Credit Lender's risk participation and funded participation in L/C Obligations being deemed "held" by such Revolving Credit Lender for purposes of this definition) and (b) aggregate unused Revolving Credit Commitments; that the unused Revolving Credit Commitment of, and the portion of the Total Revolving Credit Outstandings held or deemed held by, any Defaulting Lender shall be excluded for purposes of making a determination of Required Revolving Lenders.
Required Revolving Lenders
provided
 
          "" means, as of any date of determination, Lenders (other than Term B Lenders and Incremental Term Lenders, if any) holding more than 50% of the sum of the (a) the Total Outstandings (with the aggregate amount of each Revolving Credit Lender's risk participation and funded participation in L/C Obligations being deemed "held" by such Revolving Credit Lender for purposes of this definition) the Outstanding Amount of the Term B Loans and Incremental Term Loans, if any, and (b) aggregate unused Revolving Credit Commitments; , that (i) the unused Revolving Credit Commitment of, and the portion of the Total Outstandings held or deemed held by, any Defaulting Lender (other than any Term B Lender or Incremental Term Lender, if any), and (ii) the Loans held by the Borrower or any of its Affiliates or Subsidiaries, shall in each case be excluded for purposes of making a determination of Required Revolving/Term A Lenders.
Required Revolving/Term A Lenders
less
provided
          "" means, as of any date of determination, Term A Lenders holding more than 50% of the Term A Facility on such date; that (i) the portion of the Term A Facility held by any Defaulting Lender, and (ii) the Loans held by the Borrower or any of its Affiliates or Subsidiaries, shall in each case be excluded for purposes of making a determination of Required Term A Lenders.
Required Term A Lenders
provided
          "" means, as of any date of determination, Term B Lenders holding more than 50% of the Term B Facility on such date; that (i) the portion of the Term B Facility held by any Defaulting Lender, and (ii) the Loans held by the Borrower or any of its Affiliates or Subsidiaries, shall in each case be excluded for purposes of making a determination of Required Term B Lenders.
Required Term B Lenders
provided
          "" means the chief executive officer, president, chief financial officer, senior vice president-finance, chief accounting officer, controller, treasurer or assistant treasurer of a Loan Party. Any document delivered hereunder that is signed by a Responsible Officer of a Loan Party shall be conclusively presumed to have been authorized by all necessary corporate, partnership and/or other action on the part of such Loan Party and such Responsible Officer shall be conclusively presumed to have acted on behalf of such Loan Party.
Responsible Officer
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Restricting Information
Section 10.02(g)
          "" means any Quarter or fiscal year of the Borrower if, as of the end of such period, either (i) the combined revenues of the Unrestricted Subsidiaries exceed 3% of the combined revenues of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries for the four Quarter period then ended, or (ii) the aggregate amount of the assets of the Unrestricted Subsidiaries as recorded on the balance sheet of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries exceeds 3% of the aggregate amount of the assets of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries on such balance sheet.
Restricted Group Reporting Period
          "" means (i) direct or indirect distributions, dividends or other payments by the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary on account of (including, without limitation, sinking fund or other payments on account of the redemption, retirement, purchase or acquisition of) any general or limited partnership or joint venture interest in, or any capital stock of, the Borrower or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be (whether made in cash, property or other obligations), other than any such distributions, dividends and other payments made by (a) a Restricted Subsidiary to the Borrower or another Loan Party on account of any such Equity Interests of the former held by the latter and (b) a Restricted Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party to another Restricted Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party on account of any such
Restricted Payments
 
Equity Interests of the former held by the latter, and (ii) any prepayment of principal or interest on account of any Permitted Debt or any Indebtedness of the Borrower issued under the Senior Notes Indenture (other than (a) so long as no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, any prepayment of interest on account of any Permitted Debt or the Senior Notes, (b) any prepayment of principal or interest on account of any Indebtedness under the Existing RNS Credit Agreement and Existing RNS Notes, and (c) any prepayment of principal on any Indebtedness being Refinanced with Permitted Refinancing Indebtedness).
          "" means the Persons set forth on and any New Restricted Subsidiary, that any Restricted Subsidiary redesignated as an Unrestricted Subsidiary pursuant to and in compliance with shall cease to be a Restricted Subsidiary.
Restricted Subsidiaries
Schedule 1.01(i)
provided
Section 7.08(c)
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Restricting Information
Section 10.02(g)
          "" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Revolving Credit Loans of the same Type and, in the case of Eurodollar Rate Loans, having the same Interest Period made by each of the Revolving Credit Lenders pursuant to .
Revolving Credit Borrowing
Section 2.01(c)
          "" means, as to each Revolving Credit Lender, its obligation to (a) make Revolving Credit Loans to the Borrower pursuant to , and (b) purchase participations in L/C Obligations, in an aggregate principal amount at any one time outstanding not to exceed the amount set forth opposite such Lender's name on under the caption "Revolving Credit Commitment" or opposite such caption in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender becomes a party hereto, as applicable, as such amount may be adjusted from time to time in accordance with this Credit Agreement.
Revolving Credit Commitment
Section 2.01(c)
Schedule 2.01
          "" means, at any time, the aggregate amount of the Revolving Credit Lenders' Revolving Credit Commitments at such time.
Revolving Credit Facility
          "" means, at any time, any Lender that has a Revolving Credit Commitment or Revolving Credit Loan at such time.
Revolving Credit Lender
          "" has the meaning given to such term in ; , that a Swingline Loan shall not constitute a Revolving Credit Loan.
Revolving Credit Loan
Section 2.01(c)
provided
          "" means a promissory note made by the Borrower in favor of a Revolving Credit Lender evidencing Revolving Credit Loans made by such Revolving Credit Lender, substantially in the form of .
Revolving Credit Note
Exhibit B-3
          "" means any Event of Default contained in clause (c) of , but only with respect to and .
Revolving/Term A Event of Default
Section 8.01
Sections 7.25
7.26
          "" means Standard & Poor's Financial Services LLC, a subsidiary of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc., and any successor thereto.
S&P
          "" means the Securities and Exchange Commission, or any Governmental Authority succeeding to any of its principal functions.
SEC
 
          "" means any Cash Management Agreement that is entered into by and between one or more Loan Parties and any Cash Management Bank.
Secured Cash Management Agreement
          "" means any interest rate Swap Contract permitted under that is entered into by and between the Borrower and any Hedge Bank.
Secured Hedge Agreement
Article VII
          "" means, collectively, the Administrative Agent, the Lenders, the L/C Issuer, the Hedge Banks, the Cash Management Banks, each co-agent or sub-agent appointed by the Administrative Agent from time to time pursuant to , and the other Persons the Obligations owing to which are or are stated to be secured by the Collateral under the terms of the Collateral Documents.
Secured Parties
Section 9.05
          "" means the Securities Act of 1933, the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, and the applicable accounting and auditing principles, rules, standards and practices promulgated, approved or incorporated by the SEC or the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board.
Securities Laws
          "" means that certain Security Agreement, dated as of June 30, 2011, among certain Loan Parties and the Collateral Agent.
Security Agreement
          "" means the 7.75% Senior Notes due 2021, issued pursuant to the Senior Notes Indenture in the aggregate original principal amount of $700,000,000.
Senior Notes
          "" means that certain Indenture, dated as of June 30, 2011, by and among the Borrower, the guarantors party thereto and U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee, with respect to the Senior Notes.
Senior Notes Indenture
          "" means, as of any date, the ratio of (i) the Total Outstandings on such date to (ii) Annual Operating Cash Flow determined as of the last day of the month covered by the then most recent Compliance Certificate delivered to the Lenders pursuant to Section 7.01(d), a copy of which has been delivered to the Administrative Agent (and any change in such ratio as a result of a change in the amount of Total Outstandings shall be effective as of the date such change shall occur and any change in such ratio as a result of a change in the amount of Annual Operating Cash Flow shall be effective as of the date of receipt by the Administrative Agent of the Compliance Certificate delivered pursuant to Section 7.01(d) reflecting such change).
Senior Secured Leverage Ratio
          "" means a Restricted Subsidiary having (x) revenues in excess of $10,000,000 for the four Quarter period then ended or (y) assets in excess of $25,000,000 recorded on its most recent audited balance sheet.
Significant Restricted Subsidiary
          "" means the intellectual property rights embodied in computer programs, computer applications, source code, object code and related documentation.
Software
          "" and "" mean, with respect to any Person on any date of determination, that on such date (a) the fair value of the property of such Person is greater than the total amount of liabilities, including contingent liabilities, of such Person, (b) the present fair salable value of the assets of such Person is not less than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of such Person on its debts as they become absolute and matured, (c) such Person does not intend to, and does not believe that it will, incur debts or liabilities beyond such
Solvent
Solvency
 
Person's ability to pay such debts and liabilities as they mature and (d) such Person is not engaged in business or a transaction, and is not about to engage in business or a transaction, for which such Person's property would constitute an unreasonably small capital. The amount of contingent liabilities at any time shall be computed as the amount that, in the light of all the facts and circumstances existing at such time, represents the amount that can reasonably be expected to become an actual or matured liability.
          "" means a certificate of a senior financial executive of the Borrower in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Solvency Certificate
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
SPC
Section 10.06(h)
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Spot Rate
Section 1.07
          "" means any Indebtedness of any Loan Party that is subordinated to the Obligations of such Loan Party under the Loan Documents.
Subordinated Debt
          "" means all agreements, indentures and instruments pursuant to which any Subordinated Debt is issued, in each case as amended to the extent permitted under the Loan Documents.
Subordinated Debt Documents
          "" of a Person means a corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company or other business entity of which a majority of the shares or securities or other interests having ordinary voting power for the election of directors or other governing body (other than securities or interests having such power only by reason of the happening of a contingency) are at the time beneficially owned, or the management of which is otherwise controlled, directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, or both, by such Person. Unless otherwise specified, all references herein to a "" or to "" shall refer to a Subsidiary or Subsidiaries of the Borrower.
Subsidiary
Subsidiary
Subsidiaries
          "" means Sundance Channel L.L.C., a Delaware limited liability company.
Sundance
          "" means (a) any and all rate swap transactions, basis swaps, credit derivative transactions, forward rate transactions, commodity swaps, commodity options, forward commodity contracts, equity or equity index swaps or options, bond or bond price or bond index swaps or options or forward bond or forward bond price or forward bond index transactions, interest rate options, forward foreign exchange transactions, cap transactions, floor transactions, collar transactions, currency swap transactions, cross-currency rate swap transactions, currency options, spot contracts, or any other similar transactions or any combination of any of the foregoing (including any options to enter into any of the foregoing), whether or not any such transaction is governed by or subject to any master agreement, and (b) any and all transactions of any kind, and the related confirmations, which are subject to the terms and conditions of, or governed by, any form of master agreement published by the International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc., any International Foreign Exchange Master Agreement, or any other master agreement (any such master agreement, together with any related schedules, a ""), including any such obligations or liabilities under any Master Agreement.
Swap Contract
Master Agreement
          "" means a borrowing of Swingline Loans made by the Swingline Lender pursuant to
Swingline Borrowing
Section 2.15(a)
 
          "" means any Lender or the Administrative Agent as agreed to at any time by the Borrower and such Lender or the Administrative Agent, in either case as designated in accordance with this Credit Agreement. The initial Swingline Lender shall be JPMCB.
Swingline Lender
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Swingline Loans
Section 2.01(d)
          "" means a promissory note made by the Borrower in favor of the Swingline Lender evidencing Swingline Loans made by the Swingline Lender, substantially in the form of .
Swingline Note
Exhibit B-4
          "" means $20,000,000. The Swingline Sublimit is part of, and not in addition to, the Revolving Credit Facility.
Swingline Sublimit
          "" means all present or future taxes, assessments or other charges (including withholdings) imposed by any Governmental Authority with authority to impose the same, including any interest, additions to tax or penalties applicable thereto.
Taxes
          "" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Term A Loans of the same Type and, in the case of Eurodollar Rate Loans, having the same Interest Period made by each of the Term A Lenders pursuant to .
Term A Borrowing
Section 2.01(a)
          "" means, as to each Term A Lender, its obligation to make Term A Loans to the Borrower pursuant to in an aggregate principal amount at any one time outstanding not to exceed the amount set forth opposite such Term A Lender's name on under the caption "Term A Commitment" or opposite such caption in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Term A Lender becomes a party hereto, as applicable, as such amount may be adjusted from time to time in accordance with this Credit Agreement.
Term A Commitment
Section 2.01(a)
Schedule 2.01
          "" means at any time (a) on or prior to the Closing Date, the aggregate amount of the Term A Commitments at such time and (b) thereafter, the aggregate principal amount of the Term A Loans of all Term A Lenders outstanding at such time.
Term A Facility
          "" means (a) at any time on or prior to the Closing Date, any Lender that has a Term A Commitment at such time and (b) at any time after the Closing Date, any Lender that holds Term A Loans at such time.
Term A Lender
          "" means an advance made by any Term A Lender under the Term A Facility.
Term A Loan
          "" means a promissory note made by the Borrower in favor of a Term A Lender evidencing Term A Loans made by such Term A Lender, substantially in the form of .
Term A Note
Exhibit B-1
          "" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Term B Loans of the same Type and, in the case of Eurodollar Rate Loans, having the same Interest Period made by each of the Term B Lenders pursuant to .
Term B Borrowing
Section 2.01(b)
          "" means, as to each Term B Lender, its obligation to make Term B Loans to the Borrower pursuant to in an aggregate principal amount at
Term B Commitment
Section 2.01(b)
 
any one time outstanding not to exceed the amount set forth opposite such Lender's name on under the caption "Term B Commitment" or opposite such caption in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Term B Lender becomes a party hereto, as applicable, as such amount may be adjusted from time to time in accordance with this Credit Agreement.
Schedule 2.01
          "" means at any time (a) on or prior to the Closing Date, the aggregate amount of the Term B Commitments at such time and (b) thereafter, the aggregate principal amount of the Term B Loans of all Term B Lenders outstanding at such time.
Term B Facility
          "" means (a) at any time on or prior to the Closing Date, any Lender that has a Term B Commitment at such time and (b) at any time after the Closing Date, any Lender that holds Term B Loans at such time.
Term B Lender
          "" means an advance made by any Term B Lender under the Term B Facility.
Term B Loan
          "" means a promissory note made by the Borrower in favor of a Term B Lender, evidencing Term B Loans made by such Term B Lender, substantially in the form of .
Term B Note
Exhibit B-2
          "" means a Term A Borrowing, Term B Borrowing or Incremental Term Borrowing, if any, as the context may require.
Term Borrowing
          "" means a Term A Commitment, Term B Commitment or Incremental Term Commitment, if any, as the context may require.
Term Commitment
          "" means, at any time, the Term A Facility, Term B Facility or Incremental Term Facility, if any, as the context may require.
Term Facility
          "" means, at any time, a Term B Lender, Term B Lender or Incremental Term Lender, if any, as the context may require.
Term Lender
          "" means a Term A Loan, Term B Loan or Incremental Term Loan, if any, as the context may require.
Term Loan
          "" means (i) a Reportable Event, (ii) the termination of a Plan, or the filing of a notice of intent to terminate a Plan, or the treatment of a Plan amendment as a termination under Section 4041(e) of ERISA, (iii) the institution of proceedings to terminate a Plan under Section 4042 of ERISA or (iv) the appointment of a trustee to administer any Plan under Section 4042 of ERISA.
Termination Event
          "" means, for any period, the sum of (i) the aggregate amount of interest accrued during such period in respect of Indebtedness (including the interest component of rentals in respect of Capital Lease Obligations) of the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries (determined on a consolidated basis), other than obligations under any Guarantee permitted under subparagraph (x) of , (ii) the aggregate amount of fees accrued in respect of the Letters of Credit hereunder during such period and (iii) the aggregate amount of Commitment Fees accrued hereunder during such period. For purposes of this definition, the amount of interest accrued in respect of Indebtedness for any period (A) shall be increased (to the extent not already treated as interest expense or income, as the case may be) by the excess, if any,
Total Interest Expense
Section 7.16
 
of amounts payable by the Borrower and/or any Restricted Subsidiary arising under any interest rate Swap Contract during such period over amounts receivable by the Borrower and/or any Restricted Subsidiary thereunder (or reduced by the excess, if any, of such amounts receivable over such amounts payable) and interest on a Capital Lease Obligation shall be deemed to accrue at an interest rate reasonably determined by the Borrower to be the rate of interest implicit in such Capital Lease Obligation in accordance with GAAP and (B) shall be increased or reduced, as the case may be, by the amount of interest accrued during such period in respect of Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary in respect of assets acquired or disposed of (including by means of any redesignation of any Subsidiary pursuant to ) by the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary on or after the first day of such period, determined on a pro forma basis reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (it being agreed that it shall be satisfactory to the Administrative Agent that such pro forma calculations may be based upon GAAP as applied in the preparation of the financial statements for the Borrower, delivered in accordance with rather than as applied in the financial statements of the Person whose assets were acquired and may include, in the Borrower's discretion, a reasonable estimate of savings resulting from any such acquisitions or dispositions, as though the Borrower or such Restricted Subsidiary acquired or disposed of such assets on the first day of such period.
Section 7.08(c)
Section 7.01
          "" means the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all Loans and all L/C Obligations.
Total Outstandings
          "" means the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all Revolving Credit Loans, Swingline Loans and L/C Obligations.
Total Revolving Credit Outstandings
          "" means all confidential and proprietary information, including, without limitation, know-how, trade secrets, inventions, research and development information, databases and data, pricing and cost information, business and marketing plans and customer and supplier lists and information.
Trade Secrets
          "" means any agreement, whether written or oral, providing for the grant by or to a Person of any right under a Trade Secret.
Trade Secret Licenses
          "" means any agreement, whether written or oral, providing for the grant by or to a Person of any right to use any Trademark.
Trademark Licenses
          "" means all trademarks, trade names, corporate names, company names, business names, fictitious business names, service marks, elements of package or trade dress of goods or services, logos and other source or business identifiers, together with the goodwill associated therewith, now existing or hereafter adopted or acquired, all registrations and recordings thereof, and all application in connection therewith, whether in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or in any similar office or agency of the United States, any State thereof or any other country or any political subdivision thereof and all renewals thereof.
Trademarks
          "" means, collectively, (a) the entering into by the Loan Parties and their applicable Subsidiaries of the Loan Documents to which they are or are intended to be a party, (b) the payment of all fees and expenses incurred in connection with the Loan Documents, and (c) the Distribution Transaction.
Transaction
          "" means, with respect to a Loan, its character as a Base Rate Loan or a Eurodollar Rate Loan.
Type
 
          "" has the meaning given to such term in the Security Agreement.
UCC
          "" means the Uniform Customs and Practice for Documentary Credits, 2007 revision, International Chamber of Commerce Publication No. 600, as the same may be amended and in effect from time to time.
UCP
          "" means in relation to a Lender the appointment of an administrator, provisional liquidator, conservator, receiver, trustee, custodian or other similar official by a supervisory authority or regulator under or based on the law in the country where such Lender is subject to home jurisdiction supervision if applicable law requires that such appointment is not to be publicly disclosed.
Undisclosed Administration
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Unreimbursed Amount
Section 2.03(c)(i)
          "" means the Persons set forth on and any New Unrestricted Subsidiaries; that any Unrestricted Subsidiary redesignated by the Borrower as a Restricted Subsidiary pursuant to and in compliance with shall cease to be an Unrestricted Subsidiary.
Unrestricted Subsidiaries
Schedule 1.01(ii)
provided
Section 7.08(c)
          "" has the meaning given to such term in .
Waivable Prepayment
Section 2.04(b)(vii)
          "" means WE: Women's Entertainment LLC, a Delaware limited liability company.
WE
     Section 1.02 . With reference to this Credit Agreement and each other Loan Document, unless otherwise specified herein or in such other Loan Document:
Other Interpretive Provisions
     (a) The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words "," "" and "" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation." The word "" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "." Unless the context requires otherwise, (i) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document (including any organization document) shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein or in any other Loan Document), (ii) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and assigns, (iii) the words "," "" and "," and words of similar import when used in any Loan Document, shall be construed to refer to such Loan Document in its entirety and not to any particular provision thereof, (iv) all references in a Loan Document to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, the Loan Document in which such references appear, (v) any reference to any law shall include all statutory and regulatory provisions consolidating, amending, replacing or interpreting such law and any reference to any law or regulation shall, unless otherwise specified, refer to such law or regulation as amended, modified or supplemented from time to time, and (vi) the words "" and "" (except when used as accounting terms, in
include
includes
including
will
shall
herein
hereof
hereunder
asset
property
 
which case GAAP shall apply) shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
     (b) In the computation of periods of time from a specified date to a later specified date, the word "" means ";" the words "" and "" each mean ";" and the word "" means "."
from
from and including
to
until
to but excluding
through
to and including
     (c) Section headings herein and in the other Loan Documents are included for convenience of reference only and shall not affect the interpretation of this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document.
     Section 1.03 . (a) . All accounting terms not specifically or completely defined herein shall be construed in conformity with, and all financial data (including financial ratios and other financial calculations) required to be submitted pursuant to this Credit Agreement shall be prepared in conformity with, GAAP applied on a consistent basis, as in effect from time to time, applied in a manner consistent with that used in preparing the audited financial statements, as otherwise specifically prescribed herein.
Accounting Terms
Generally
except
          (b) . (i) If at any time any change in GAAP would affect the computation of any financial ratio or requirement set forth in any Loan Document, and either the Borrower or (x) in the case of any financial ratio applicable only to a Financial Covenant, the Applicable Rate or Section 2.08(a), the Required Revolving/Term A Lenders and (y) in the case of any other financial ratio, the Required Lenders, shall so request, the Administrative Agent, the applicable Lenders and the Borrower shall negotiate in good faith to amend such ratio or requirement to preserve the original intent thereof in light of such change in GAAP (subject to the approval of the Required Lenders or Required Revolving/Term A Lenders, as applicable); that, until so amended, (i) such ratio or requirement shall continue to be computed in accordance with GAAP prior to such change therein and (ii) the Borrower shall provide to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders financial statements and other documents required under this Credit Agreement or as reasonably requested hereunder setting forth a reconciliation between calculations of such ratio or requirement made before and after giving effect to such change in GAAP.
Changes in GAAP
provided
               (ii) The Borrower may at any time elect to apply IFRS accounting principles in lieu of GAAP, but prior to any such change shall notify the Administrative Agent of any intended change to the manner in which any financial statements shall be prepared. Following such notification, if requested by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent, the Borrower and the Administrative Agent shall negotiate in good faith to amend any computation of any financial ratio or requirement set forth in any Loan Document to preserve the original intent thereof in light of such change from GAAP to IFRS. Unless the Required Lenders shall have objected to such required amendments within 10 Business Days after the Lenders shall have been notified thereof by the Administrative Agent (it being agreed that the Administrative Agent shall give such notice promptly via the Approved Electronic Platform after reaching agreement with the Borrower with respect to such required amendments), such amendments shall become effective and shall be binding on all parties hereto; that, until so amended, (i) each such ratio or requirement shall continue to be computed in accordance with GAAP and (ii) the Borrower shall provide to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders financial statements and other documents required under this Credit Agreement or as reasonably requested hereunder setting forth a reconciliation between calculations of such ratio or requirement made before and after giving effect to such change to IFRS.
provided
 
     Section 1.04 . Any financial ratios required to be maintained by the Borrower pursuant to this Credit Agreement shall be calculated by dividing the appropriate component by the other component, carrying the result to one place more than the number of places by which such ratio is expressed herein and rounding the result up or down to the nearest number (with a rounding-up if there is no nearest number).
Rounding
     Section 1.05 . Unless otherwise specified, all references herein to times of day shall be references to Eastern time (daylight or standard, as applicable).
Times of Day
     Section 1.06 . Unless otherwise specified herein, the amount of a Letter of Credit at any time shall be deemed to be the stated amount of such Letter of Credit in effect at such time; , , that with respect to any Letter of Credit that, by its terms or the terms of any Issuer Document related thereto, provides for one or more automatic increases in the stated amount thereof, the amount of such Letter of Credit shall be deemed to be the maximum stated amount of such Letter of Credit after giving effect to all such increases, whether or not such maximum stated amount is in effect at such time.
Letter of Credit Amounts
provided
however
     Section 1.07 . Any amount specified in this Credit Agreement (other than in , and ) or any of the other Loan Documents to be in Dollars shall also include the equivalent of such amount in any currency other than Dollars, such equivalent amount thereof in the applicable currency to be determined by the Administrative Agent at such time on the basis of the Spot Rate (as defined below) for the purchase of such currency with Dollars. For purposes of this , the "" for a currency means the rate determined by the Administrative Agent to be the rate quoted by the Person acting in such capacity as the spot rate for the purchase by such Person of such currency with another currency through its principal foreign exchange trading office at approximately 11:00 a.m. on the date two Business Days prior to the date of such determination; that the Administrative Agent may obtain such spot rate from another financial institution designated by the Administrative Agent if the Person acting in such capacity does not have as of the date of determination a spot buying rate for any such currency.
Currency Equivalents Generally
Articles II
IV
IX
Section 1.07
Spot Rate
provided
     Section 2.01 . (a) . Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Term A Lender severally agrees to make a single loan to the Borrower on the Closing Date in an amount not to exceed such Term A Lender's Term A Commitment. The Term A Borrowing shall consist of Term A Loans made simultaneously by the Term A Lenders in accordance with their respective Applicable Percentage of the Term A Facility. Amounts borrowed under this and repaid or prepaid may not be reborrowed. Term A Loans may be Base Rate Loans or Eurodollar Rate Loans, as further provided herein.
The Loans
The Term A Borrowing
Section 2.01(a)
          (b) . Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Initial Term B Lender agrees to make a single loan to the Borrower on the Closing Date in an amount not to exceed such Initial Term B Lender's Term B Commitment; , that the Initial Term B Lender's obligation to make such Term B Loan to the Borrower shall be satisfied by the Initial Term B Lender's transfer of the Programming Network Business to the Borrower as contemplated by the Distribution Agreement. The Term B Borrowing shall consist of Term B Loans made by the Term B Lenders, including the Initial Term B Lender, in
The Term B Borrowing
provided
 
accordance with their respective Term B Commitments. Amounts borrowed under this and repaid or prepaid may not be reborrowed. Term B Loans may be Base Rate Loans or Eurodollar Rate Loans, as further provided herein.
Section 2.01(b)
          (c) . Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Revolving Credit Lender severally agrees to make loans (each such loan, a "") to the Borrower from time to time, on any Business Day during the Availability Period, in an aggregate amount not to exceed at any time outstanding the amount of such Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment; , , that after giving effect to any Revolving Credit Borrowing, (i) the Total Revolving Credit Outstandings shall not exceed the Revolving Credit Facility, and (ii) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of the Revolving Credit Loans of any Lender, plus such Revolving Credit Lender's Applicable Revolving Credit Percentage of the Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations shall not exceed such Revolving Credit Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment. Within the limits of each Revolving Credit Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment, and subject to the other terms and conditions hereof, the Borrower may borrow under this , prepay under , and reborrow under this . Revolving Credit Loans may be Base Rate Loans or Eurodollar Rate Loans, as further provided herein.
The Revolving Credit Borrowings
Revolving Credit Loan
provided
however
Section 2.01(c)
Section 2.04
Section 2.01(c)
          (d) . Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, including the Swingline Lender, in its individual capacity, may in its sole discretion make revolving loans (each a "" and, collectively, the "") to the Borrower from time to time, on any Business Day during the Availability Period, in an aggregate amount not to exceed at any time outstanding the Swingline Sublimit; , , that after giving effect to any Swingline Borrowing, the Total Revolving Credit Outstandings shall not exceed the Revolving Credit Facility. Amounts borrowed under this and repaid or prepaid may be reborrowed in accordance with the provisions of this Credit Agreement.
The Swingline Borrowings
Section 2.15,
Swingline Loan
Swingline Loans
provided
however
Section 2.01(d)
     Section 2.02 . (a) Each Term Borrowing, each Revolving Credit Borrowing, each conversion of Term Loans or Revolving Credit Loans from one Type to the other, and each continuation of Eurodollar Rate Loans shall be made upon the Borrower's irrevocable notice to the Administrative Agent, which may be given by telephone. Each such notice must be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 1:00 p.m. (i) three Business Days prior to the requested date of any Borrowing of, conversion to or continuation of Eurodollar Rate Loans or of any conversion of Eurodollar Rate Loans to Base Rate Loans, and (ii) on the requested date of any Borrowing of Base Rate Loans; , r, that notice of (x) the initial Borrowing of Base Rate Loans may be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 3:00 p.m. on the Closing Date and (y) any conversion of such initial Borrowing to Eurodollar Rate Loans may be received by the Administrative Agent no later than 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day prior to the requested date of conversion. Each telephonic notice by the Borrower pursuant to this must be confirmed promptly by delivery to the Administrative Agent of a written Committed Loan Notice, appropriately completed and signed by a Responsible Officer of the Borrower. In the case of any discrepancies between telephonic and written notices received by the Administrative Agent, the telephonic notice shall be effective as understood in good faith by the Administrative Agent. Each Borrowing of, conversion to or continuation of Eurodollar Rate Loans shall be in a principal amount of $1,000,000 or a whole multiple of $500,000 in excess thereof. Except as provided in , each Borrowing of or conversion to Base Rate Loans shall be in a principal amount of $500,000 or a whole multiple of $100,000 in excess thereof. Each Committed Loan Notice (whether telephonic or written) shall specify (i) whether the Borrower is requesting a
Borrowings, Conversions and Continuations of Loans
provided
howeve
Section 2.02(a)
Section 2.03(c)
 
Term A Borrowing, a Term B Borrowing, a Revolving Credit Borrowing or an Incremental Term Borrowing, if available, a conversion of Term Loans or Revolving Credit Loans from one Type to the other, or a continuation of Eurodollar Rate Loans, (ii) the requested date of the Borrowing, conversion or continuation, as the case may be (which shall be a Business Day), (iii) the principal amount of Loans to be borrowed, converted or continued, (iv) the Type of Loans to be borrowed or to which existing Term Loans or Revolving Credit Loans are to be converted, and (v) if applicable, the duration of the Interest Period with respect thereto. If the Borrower fails to specify a Type of Loan in a Committed Loan Notice or if the Borrower fails to give a timely notice requesting a conversion or continuation, then the applicable Term Loans or Revolving Credit Loans shall be made as, or converted to, Base Rate Loans. Any such automatic conversion to Base Rate Loans shall be effective as of the last day of the Interest Period then in effect with respect to the applicable Eurodollar Rate Loans. If the Borrower requests a Borrowing of, conversion to, or continuation of Eurodollar Rate Loans in any such Committed Loan Notice, but fails to specify an Interest Period, it will be deemed to have specified an Interest Period of one month.
          (b) Following receipt of a Committed Loan Notice or a request or a deemed request by the Swingline Lender for repayment of any outstanding Swingline Loans under , the Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of the amount of its Applicable Percentage under the applicable Facility of the applicable Term A Loans, Term B Loans, Revolving Credit Loans or Incremental Term Loans, if any, and if no timely notice of a conversion or continuation is provided by the Borrower, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the details of any automatic conversion to Base Rate Loans described in . In the case of a Term Borrowing or a Revolving Credit Borrowing, each Appropriate Lender shall make the amount of its Loan available to the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds at the Administrative Agent's Office not later than (i) one hour after receipt of notice from the Administrative Agent on the Closing Date in the case of the initial Borrowing of Base Rate Loans (as long as such notice is received prior to 3:00 p.m. on such day) or (ii) 3:00 p.m. on the Business Day specified in the applicable Committed Loan Notice. Upon satisfaction of the applicable conditions set forth in (and, (x) if such Borrowing is the initial Credit Extension, and (y) if such Borrowing is the Incremental Term Borrowing, the applicable conditions set forth in the Incremental Term Supplement), the Administrative Agent shall make all funds so received available to the Borrower in like funds as received by the Administrative Agent either by (i) crediting the account of the Borrower on the books of JPMCB with the amount of such funds or (ii) wire transfer of such funds, in each case in accordance with instructions provided to (and reasonably acceptable to) the Administrative Agent by the Borrower; , , that if, on the date a Committed Loan Notice with respect to a Revolving Credit Borrowing is given by the Borrower, there are L/C Borrowings outstanding, then the proceeds of such Revolving Credit Borrowing, first, shall be applied to the payment in full of any such L/C Borrowings, and second, shall be made available to the Borrower as provided above.
Section 2.15(b)
Section 2.02(a)
Section 5.02
Section 5.01
provided
however
          (c) Except as otherwise provided herein, a Eurodollar Rate Loan may be continued or converted only on the last day of an Interest Period for such Eurodollar Rate Loan. During the existence of a Default, the Administrative Agent may notify the Borrower that Loans may only be converted into or continued as Loans of certain specified Types and, thereafter, until no Default shall continue to exist, Loans may not be converted into or continued as Loans of any Type other than one or more of such specified Types.
          (d) The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the interest rate applicable to any Interest Period for Eurodollar Rate Loans upon
 
determination of such interest rate. At any time that Base Rate Loans are outstanding, the Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower and the Lenders of any change in JPMCB's prime rate used in determining the Base Rate promptly following the public announcement of such change.
          (e) After giving effect to all Term A Borrowings, all conversions of Term A Loans from one Type to the other, and all continuations of Term A Loans as the same Type, there shall not be more than 12 Interest Periods in effect in respect of the Term A Facility. After giving effect to all Term B Borrowings, all conversions of Term B Loans from one Type to the other, and all continuations of Term B Loans as the same Type, there shall not be more than 12 Interest Periods in effect in respect of the Term B Facility. After giving effect to all Revolving Credit Borrowings, all conversions of Revolving Credit Loans from one Type to the other, and all continuations of Revolving Credit Loans as the same Type, there shall not be more than 12 Interest Periods in effect in respect of the Revolving Credit Facility.
     Section 2.03 . (a) . (i) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, (A) the L/C Issuer agrees, in reliance upon the agreements of the Revolving Credit Lenders set forth in this , (1) from time to time on any Business Day during the period from the Closing Date until the Letter of Credit Expiration Date, to issue Letters of Credit for the account of the Borrower or its Subsidiaries, and to amend Letters of Credit previously issued by it, in accordance with , and (2) to honor drawings under the Letters of Credit; and (B) the Revolving Credit Lenders severally agree to participate in Letters of Credit issued for the account of the Borrower or its Subsidiaries and any drawings thereunder; that after giving effect to any L/C Credit Extension with respect to any Letter of Credit, (x) the Total Revolving Credit Outstandings shall not exceed the Revolving Credit Facility, (y) the aggregate Outstanding Amount of the Revolving Credit Loans of any Revolving Credit Lender, plus such Lender's Applicable Revolving Credit Percentage of the Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations shall not exceed such Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment, and (z) the Outstanding Amount of the L/C Obligations shall not exceed the Letter of Credit Sublimit. Each request by the Borrower for the issuance or amendment of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to be a representation by the Borrower that the L/C Credit Extension so requested complies with the conditions set forth in the proviso to the preceding sentence. Within the foregoing limits, and subject to the terms and conditions hereof, the Borrower's ability to obtain Letters of Credit shall be fully revolving, and accordingly the Borrower may, during the foregoing period, obtain Letters of Credit to replace Letters of Credit that have expired or that have been drawn upon and reimbursed.
Letters of Credit
The Letter of Credit Commitment
Section 2.03
Section 2.03(b)
provided
          (ii) The L/C Issuer shall not issue any Letter of Credit if:
          (A) the expiry date of such requested Letter of Credit would occur more than twelve months after the date of issuance, unless the Required Revolving Lenders have approved such expiry date;
          (B) the expiry date of such requested Letter of Credit would occur after the Letter of Credit Expiration Date, unless all the Revolving Credit Lenders have approved such expiry date; or
          (C) such Letter of Credit is to be denominated in a currency other than Dollars.
 
          (iii) The L/C Issuer shall not be under any obligation to issue any Letter of Credit if:
          (A) any order, judgment or decree of any Governmental Authority or arbitrator shall by its terms purport to enjoin or restrain the L/C Issuer from issuing such Letter of Credit, or any Law applicable to the L/C Issuer or any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law) from any Governmental Authority with jurisdiction over the L/C Issuer shall prohibit, or request that the L/C Issuer refrain from, the issuance of letters of credit generally or such Letter of Credit in particular or shall impose upon the L/C Issuer with respect to such Letter of Credit any restriction, reserve or capital requirement (for which the L/C Issuer is not otherwise compensated hereunder) not in effect on the Closing Date, or shall impose upon the L/C Issuer any unreimbursed loss, cost or expense which was not applicable on the Closing Date and which the L/C Issuer in good faith deems material to it;
          (B) the issuance of such Letter of Credit would violate one or more policies of the L/C Issuer generally applicable to the issuance of letters of credit;
          (C) except as otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer, such Letter of Credit is in an initial stated amount less than $100,000;
          (D) such Letter of Credit contains any provisions for automatic reinstatement of the stated amount after any drawing thereunder; or
          (E) a default of any Lender's obligations to fund under exists or any Lender is at such time a Defaulting Lender hereunder, unless the L/C Issuer has entered into satisfactory arrangements with the Borrower or such Lender to eliminate the L/C Issuer's risk with respect to such Lender.
Section 2.03(c)
          (iv) The L/C Issuer shall not amend any Letter of Credit if the L/C Issuer would not be permitted at such time to issue such Letter of Credit in its amended form under the terms hereof.
          (v) The L/C Issuer shall be under no obligation to amend any Letter of Credit if (A) the L/C Issuer would have no obligation at such time to issue such Letter of Credit in its amended form under the terms hereof, or (B) the beneficiary of such Letter of Credit does not accept the proposed amendment to such Letter of Credit.
          (vi) The L/C Issuer shall act on behalf of the Revolving Credit Lenders with respect to any Letters of Credit issued by it and the documents associated therewith, and the L/C Issuer shall have all of the benefits and immunities (A) provided to the Administrative Agent in with respect to any acts taken or omissions suffered by the L/C Issuer in connection with Letters of Credit issued by it or proposed to be issued by it and Issuer Documents pertaining to such Letters of Credit as fully as if the term "Administrative Agent" as used in included the L/C Issuer with respect to such acts or omissions, and (B) as additionally provided herein with respect to the L/C Issuer.
Article IX
Article IX
 
          (b) . (i) Each Letter of Credit shall be issued or amended, as the case may be, upon the request of the Borrower delivered to the L/C Issuer (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) in the form of a Letter of Credit Application, appropriately completed and signed by a Responsible Officer of the Borrower. Such Letter of Credit Application must be received by the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. at least two Business Days (or such later date and time as the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer may agree in a particular instance in their sole discretion) prior to the proposed issuance date or date of amendment, as the case may be. In the case of a request for an initial issuance of a Letter of Credit, such Letter of Credit Application shall specify in form and detail satisfactory to the L/C Issuer: (A) the proposed issuance date of the requested Letter of Credit (which shall be a Business Day); (B) the amount thereof; (C) the expiry date thereof; (D) the name and address of the beneficiary thereof; (E) the documents to be presented by such beneficiary in case of any drawing thereunder; (F) the full text of any certificate to be presented by such beneficiary in case of any drawing thereunder; and (G) such other matters as the L/C Issuer may require. In the case of a request for an amendment of any outstanding Letter of Credit, such Letter of Credit Application shall specify in form and detail satisfactory to the L/C Issuer (1) the Letter of Credit to be amended; (2) the proposed date of amendment thereof (which shall be a Business Day); (3) the nature of the proposed amendment; and (4) such other matters as the L/C Issuer may require. Additionally, the Borrower shall furnish to the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent such other documents and information pertaining to such requested Letter of Credit issuance or amendment, including any Issuer Documents, as the L/C Issuer or the Administrative Agent may require.
Procedures for Issuance and Amendment of Letters of Credit
          (ii) Promptly after receipt of any Letter of Credit Application, the L/C Issuer will confirm with the Administrative Agent (by telephone or in writing) that the Administrative Agent has received a copy of such Letter of Credit Application from the Borrower and, if not, the L/C Issuer will provide the Administrative Agent with a copy thereof. Unless the L/C Issuer has received written notice from any Revolving Credit Lender, the Administrative Agent or any Loan Party, at least one Business Day prior to the requested date of issuance or amendment of the applicable Letter of Credit, that one or more applicable conditions contained in shall not then be satisfied, then, subject to the terms and conditions hereof, the L/C Issuer shall, on the requested date, issue a Letter of Credit for the account of the Borrower (or the applicable Subsidiary) or enter into the applicable amendment, as the case may be, in each case in accordance with the L/C Issuer's usual and customary business practices. Immediately upon the issuance of each Letter of Credit, each Revolving Credit Lender shall be deemed to, and hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees to, purchase from the L/C Issuer a risk participation in such Letter of Credit in an amount equal to the product of such Revolving Credit Lender's Applicable Revolving Credit Percentage times the amount of such Letter of Credit.
Article V
          (iii) Promptly after its delivery of any Letter of Credit or any amendment to a Letter of Credit to an advising bank with respect thereto or to the beneficiary thereof, the L/C Issuer will also deliver to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent a true and complete copy of such Letter of Credit or amendment.
          (c) . (i) Upon receipt from the beneficiary of any Letter of Credit of any notice of a drawing under such Letter of Credit, the L/C Issuer shall notify the Borrower and the Administrative Agent thereof. Not later than 11:00 a.m. on the date of any payment by the L/C Issuer under a Letter of Credit (each such date, an ""), the Borrower shall reimburse the L/C Issuer through the
Drawings and Reimbursements; Funding of Participations
Honor Date
 
Administrative Agent in an amount equal to the amount of such drawing. If the Borrower fails to so reimburse the L/C Issuer by such time, the Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each Revolving Credit Lender of the Honor Date, the amount of the unreimbursed drawing (the ""), and the amount of such Revolving Credit Lender's Applicable Revolving Credit Percentage thereof. In such event, the Borrower shall be deemed to have requested a Revolving Credit Borrowing of Base Rate Loans to be disbursed on the Honor Date in an amount equal to the Unreimbursed Amount, without regard to the minimum and multiples specified in for the principal amount of Base Rate Loans, but subject to the amount of the unutilized portion of the Revolving Credit Commitments and the conditions set forth in (other than the delivery of a Committed Loan Notice). Any notice given by the L/C Issuer or the Administrative Agent pursuant to this may be given by telephone if immediately confirmed in writing; that the lack of such an immediate confirmation shall not affect the conclusiveness or binding effect of such notice.
Unreimbursed Amount
Section 2.02
Section 5.02
Section 2.03(c)(i)
provided
          (ii) Each Revolving Credit Lender shall upon any notice pursuant to make funds available to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer at the Administrative Agent's Office in an amount equal to its Applicable Revolving Credit Percentage of the Unreimbursed Amount not later than 1:00 p.m. on the Business Day specified in such notice by the Administrative Agent, whereupon, subject to the provisions of , each Revolving Credit Lender that so makes funds available shall be deemed to have made a Base Rate Loan to the Borrower in such amount. The Administrative Agent shall remit the funds so received to the L/C Issuer.
Section 2.03(c)(i)
Section 2.03(c)(iii)
          (iii) With respect to any Unreimbursed Amount that is not fully refinanced by a Revolving Credit Borrowing of Base Rate Loans because the conditions set forth in cannot be satisfied or for any other reason, the Borrower shall be deemed to have incurred from the L/C Issuer an L/C Borrowing in the amount of the Unreimbursed Amount that is not so refinanced, which L/C Borrowing shall be due and payable on demand (together with interest) and shall bear interest at the Default Rate. In such event, each Revolving Credit Lender's payment to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer pursuant to shall be deemed payment in respect of its participation in such L/C Borrowing and shall constitute an L/C Advance from such Lender in satisfaction of its participation obligation under this .
Section 5.02
Section 2.03(c)(ii)
Section 2.03
          (iv) Until each Revolving Credit Lender funds its Revolving Credit Loan or L/C Advance pursuant to this to reimburse the L/C Issuer for any amount drawn under any Letter of Credit, interest in respect of such Lender's Applicable Revolving Credit Percentage of such amount shall be solely for the account of the L/C Issuer.
Section 2.03(c)
          (v) Each Revolving Credit Lender's obligation to make Revolving Credit Loans to the Borrower or L/C Advances to reimburse the L/C Issuer for amounts drawn under Letters of Credit, as contemplated by this , shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance, including (A) any setoff, counterclaim, recoupment, defense or other right which such Lender may have against the L/C Issuer, the Borrower or any other Person for any reason whatsoever; (B) the occurrence or continuance of a Default, or (C) any other occurrence, event or condition, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing; , , that each Revolving Credit Lender's obligation to make Revolving Credit Loans pursuant to this is subject to the conditions set forth in (other than delivery by the Borrower of a Committed Loan Notice ). No such making of an L/C Advance
Section 2.03(c)
provided
however
Section 2.03(c)
Section 5.02
 
shall relieve or otherwise impair the obligation of the Borrower to reimburse the L/C Issuer for the amount of any payment made by the L/C Issuer under any Letter of Credit, together with interest as provided herein.
          (vi) If any Revolving Credit Lender fails to make available to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer any amount required to be paid by such Lender pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this by the time specified in , the L/C Issuer shall be entitled to recover from such Lender (acting through the Administrative Agent), on demand, such amount with interest thereon for the period from the date such payment is required to the date on which such payment is immediately available to the L/C Issuer at a rate per annum equal to the greater of the Federal Funds Rate and a rate determined by the L/C Issuer in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation. A certificate of the L/C Issuer submitted to any Revolving Credit Lender (through the Administrative Agent) with respect to any amounts owing under this shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Section 2.03(c)
Section 2.03(c)(ii)
Section 2.03(c)(vi)
          (d) . (i) At any time after the L/C Issuer has made a payment under any Letter of Credit and has received from any Revolving Credit Lender such Lender's L/C Advance in respect of such payment in accordance with , if the Administrative Agent receives for the account of the L/C Issuer any payment in respect of the related Unreimbursed Amount or interest thereon (whether directly from the Borrower or otherwise, including proceeds of Cash Collateral applied thereto by the Administrative Agent), the Administrative Agent will distribute to such Lender its Applicable Revolving Credit Percentage thereof (appropriately adjusted, in the case of interest payments, to reflect the period of time during which such Lender's L/C Advance was outstanding) in the same funds as those received by the Administrative Agent.
Repayment of Participations
Section 2.03(c)
          (ii) If any payment received by the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer pursuant to is required to be returned under any of the circumstances described in (including pursuant to any settlement entered into by the L/C Issuer in its discretion), each Revolving Credit Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer its Applicable Revolving Credit Percentage thereof on demand of the Administrative Agent, plus interest thereon from the date of such demand to the date such amount is returned by such Lender, at a rate per annum equal to the Federal Funds Rate from time to time in effect. The obligations of the Lenders under this clause shall survive the payment in full of the Obligations and the termination of this Credit Agreement.
Section 2.03(c)(i)
Section 10.05
          (e) . The obligation of the Borrower to reimburse the L/C Issuer for each drawing under each Letter of Credit and to repay each L/C Borrowing shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be paid strictly in accordance with the terms of this Credit Agreement under all circumstances, including the following:
Obligations Absolute
          (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of such Letter of Credit, this Credit Agreement, or any other Loan Document;
          (ii) the existence of any claim, counterclaim, setoff, defense or other right that the Borrower or any Subsidiary may have at any time against any beneficiary or any transferee of such Letter of Credit (or any Person for whom any such beneficiary or any such transferee may be acting), the L/C Issuer or any other Person, whether in
 
connection with this Credit Agreement, the transactions contemplated hereby or by such Letter of Credit or any agreement or instrument relating thereto, or any unrelated transaction;
          (iii) any draft, demand, certificate or other document presented under such Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent, invalid or insufficient in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect; or any loss or delay in the transmission or otherwise of any document required in order to make a drawing under such Letter of Credit;
          (iv) any payment by the L/C Issuer under such Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or certificate that does not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit; or any payment made by the L/C Issuer under such Letter of Credit to any Person purporting to be a trustee in bankruptcy, debtor-in-possession, assignee for the benefit of creditors, liquidator, receiver or other representative of or successor to any beneficiary or any transferee of such Letter of Credit, including any arising in connection with any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Law; or
          (v) any other circumstance or happening whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, including any other circumstance that might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries.
     The Borrower shall promptly examine a copy of each Letter of Credit and each amendment thereto that is delivered to it and, in the event of any claim of noncompliance with the Borrower's instructions or other irregularity, the Borrower will immediately notify the L/C Issuer. The Borrower shall be conclusively deemed to have waived any such claim against the L/C Issuer and its correspondents unless such notice is given as aforesaid.
          (f) . Each Lender and the Borrower agree that, in paying any drawing under a Letter of Credit, the L/C Issuer shall not have any responsibility to obtain any document (other than any sight draft, certificates and documents expressly required by the Letter of Credit) or to ascertain or inquire as to the validity or accuracy of any such document or the authority of the Person executing or delivering any such document. None of the L/C Issuer, the Administrative Agent, any of their respective Related Parties nor any correspondent, participant or assignee of the L/C Issuer shall be liable to any Lender for (i) any action taken or omitted in connection herewith at the request or with the approval of the Revolving Credit Lenders or the Required Revolving Lenders, as applicable; (ii) any action taken or omitted in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct; or (iii) the due execution, effectiveness, validity or enforceability of any document or instrument related to any Letter of Credit or Issuer Document. The Borrower hereby assumes all risks of the acts or omissions of any beneficiary or transferee with respect to its use of any Letter of Credit; , , that this assumption is not intended to, and shall not, preclude the Borrower's pursuing such rights and remedies as it may have against the beneficiary or transferee at law or under any other agreement. None of the L/C Issuer, the Administrative Agent, any of their respective Related Parties nor any correspondent, participant or assignee of the L/C Issuer shall be liable or responsible for any of the matters described in clauses (i) through (v) of ; , , that anything in such clauses to the contrary notwithstanding, the Borrower may have a claim against the L/C Issuer, and the L/C Issuer may be liable to the Borrower, to the extent, but only to the extent, of any direct, as opposed to consequential or exemplary, damages suffered by the Borrower which the Borrower proves were caused by the L/C Issuer's willful misconduct or gross negligence or the
Role of L/C Issuer
provided
however
Section 2.03(e)
provided
however
 
L/C Issuer's willful failure to pay under any Letter of Credit after the presentation to it by the beneficiary of a sight draft and certificate(s) strictly complying with the terms and conditions of a Letter of Credit. In furtherance and not in limitation of the foregoing, the L/C Issuer may accept documents that appear on their face to be in order, without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, and the L/C Issuer shall not be responsible for the validity or sufficiency of any instrument transferring or assigning or purporting to transfer or assign a Letter of Credit or the rights or benefits thereunder or proceeds thereof, in whole or in part, which may prove to be invalid or ineffective for any reason.
          (g) . Upon the request of the Administrative Agent, (i) if the L/C Issuer has honored any full or partial drawing request under any Letter of Credit and such drawing has resulted in an L/C Borrowing, or (ii) if, as of the Letter of Credit Expiration Date, any L/C Obligation for any reason remains outstanding, the Borrower shall, in each case, immediately Cash Collateralize the then Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations. , and set forth certain additional requirements to deliver Cash Collateral hereunder. For purposes of this , , , and , "Cash Collateralize" means, in respect of an obligation, to provide and pledge (as a first priority perfected security interest) cash collateral ("") in Dollars, at a location and pursuant to documentation in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and, in the case of any L/C Obligations to be Cash Collateralized, the L/C Issuer. Derivatives of such term have corresponding meanings. The Borrower hereby grants to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the L/C Issuer and the Lenders, a security interest in all such cash, deposit accounts and all balances therein and all proceeds of the foregoing. Cash Collateral shall be maintained in blocked, non-interest bearing deposit accounts at JPMCB. If at any time the Administrative Agent determines that any funds held as Cash Collateral are subject to any right or claim of any Person other than the Administrative Agent or that the total amount of such funds is less than the aggregate Outstanding Amount of all L/C Obligations, the Borrower will, forthwith upon demand by the Administrative Agent, pay to the Administrative Agent, as additional funds to be deposited as Cash Collateral, an amount equal to the excess of (x) such aggregate Outstanding Amount over (y) the total amount of funds, if any, then held as Cash Collateral that the Administrative Agent determines to be free and clear of any such right and claim. Upon the drawing of any Letter of Credit for which funds are on deposit as Cash Collateral, such funds shall be applied, to the extent permitted under applicable Laws, to reimburse the L/C Issuer.
Cash Collateral
Section 2.04
Section 2.16
Section 8.02
Section 2.03
Section 2.04
Section 2.16
Section 8.02
Section 8.03
Cash Collateral
          (h) . Unless otherwise expressly agreed by the L/C Issuer and the Borrower when a Letter of Credit is issued, (i) the rules of the ISP shall apply to each standby Letter of Credit, and (ii) the rules of the UCP, as most recently published by the International Chamber of Commerce at the time of issuance shall apply to each commercial Letter of Credit.
Applicability of ISP and UCP
          (i) . The Borrower shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Revolving Credit Lender in accordance with its Applicable Revolving Credit Percentage a Letter of Credit Fee (the "") for each Letter of Credit equal to the Applicable Rate times the daily amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit. For purposes of computing the daily amount available to be drawn under any Letter of Credit, the amount of such Letter of Credit shall be determined in accordance with . Letter of Credit Fees shall be (A) computed on a quarterly basis in arrears and (B) due and payable on the last Business Day of each March, June, September and December, commencing with the first such date to occur after the issuance of such Letter of Credit, on the Letter of Credit Expiration Date and thereafter on demand. If there is any change in the Applicable Rate during
Letter of Credit Fees
Letter of Credit Fee
Section 1.06
 
any Quarter, the daily amount available to be drawn under each Letter of Credit shall be computed and multiplied by the Applicable Rate separately for each period during such Quarter that such Applicable Rate was in effect. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, upon the request of the Required Revolving Lenders, while any Event of Default exists, all Letter of Credit Fees shall accrue at the Default Rate.
          (j) . The Borrower shall pay directly to the L/C Issuer for its own account a fronting fee with respect to each Letter of Credit, at a rate per annum of 0.125%, computed on the daily amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit on a quarterly basis in arrears. Such fronting fee shall be due and payable on the tenth Business Day after the end of each March, June, September and December in respect of the most recently-ended quarterly period (or portion thereof, in the case of the first payment), commencing with the first such date to occur after the issuance of such Letter of Credit, on the Letter of Credit Expiration Date and thereafter on demand. For purposes of computing the daily amount available to be drawn under any Letter of Credit, the amount of such Letter of Credit shall be determined in accordance with . In addition, the Borrower shall pay directly to the L/C Issuer for its own account the customary issuance, presentation, amendment and other processing fees, and other standard costs and charges, of the L/C Issuer relating to letters of credit as from time to time in effect. Such customary fees and standard costs and charges are due and payable on demand and are nonrefundable.
Fronting Fee and Documentary and Processing Charges Payable to L/C Issuer
Section 1.06
          (k) . In the event of any conflict between the terms hereof and the terms of any Issuer Document, the terms hereof shall control.
Conflict with Issuer Documents
          (l) . Notwithstanding that a Letter of Credit issued or outstanding hereunder is in support of any obligations of, or is for the account of, a Subsidiary, the Borrower shall be obligated to reimburse the L/C Issuer hereunder for any and all drawings under such Letter of Credit. The Borrower hereby acknowledges that the issuance of Letters of Credit for the account of Subsidiaries inures to the benefit of the Borrower, and that the Borrower's business derives substantial benefits from the businesses of such Subsidiaries.
Letters of Credit Issued for Subsidiaries
     Section 2.04
Prepayments
          (a) . The Borrower may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent, at any time or from time to time voluntarily prepay (i) the Term A Loans and Revolving Credit Loans in whole or in part without premium or penalty and (ii) the Term B Loans in whole or in part without premium or penalty with the proceeds of Permitted Refinancing Indebtedness; that (A) such notice must be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. (I) three Business Days prior to any date of prepayment of Eurodollar Rate Loans and (II) on the date of prepayment of Base Rate Loans; (B) any prepayment of Eurodollar Rate Loans shall be in a principal amount of $1,000,000 or a whole multiple of $500,000 in excess thereof; and (C) any prepayment of Base Rate Loans shall be in a principal amount of $500,000 or a whole multiple of $100,000 in excess thereof or, in each case, if less, the entire principal amount thereof then outstanding. Each such notice shall specify the date and amount of such prepayment, the Type(s) of Loans to be prepaid. The Administrative Agent will promptly notify each Lender of its receipt of each such notice, and of the amount of such Lender's ratable portion of such prepayment (based on such Lender's Applicable Percentage in respect of the relevant Facility). If such notice is given by the Borrower, the Borrower shall make such prepayment and the payment amount specified in such notice shall be due and payable on the date specified therein. Any prepayment of a Eurodollar Rate Loan shall be accompanied by all accrued interest on the
Optional
provided
 
amount prepaid, together with any additional amounts required pursuant to . Each prepayment of the outstanding Loans pursuant to this shall be applied to the principal repayment installments thereof as directed by the Borrower (and if not so directed, on a pro-rata basis), and each such prepayment shall be paid to the Lenders in accordance with their respective Applicable Percentages in respect of the applicable Facility.
Section 3.05
Section 2.04(a)
          (b) . (i) If the Borrower or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries (A) Disposes of any property (other than any deemed Disposition referred to in ) or (B) suffers an Event of Loss, in each case, which results in the realization by such Person of Net Cash Proceeds, the Borrower shall prepay (or, in the case of the Term B Loan or Incremental Term Facility, if any, offer to purchase at par), immediately upon receipt thereof by such Person, an aggregate principal amount of Loans equal to 100% of such Net Cash Proceeds which, in the aggregate with any other Net Cash Proceeds described in this that have not been used to prepay the Loans pursuant to this or reinvested pursuant to the proviso set forth below, exceeds $50,000,000; , that, the foregoing requirement to offer to purchase Term B Loans or Incremental Term Loans, if any, shall only apply in the case of a Disposition of any Operating Company or substantially all the assets of any Operating Company; , , that, with respect to any Net Cash Proceeds described in this , at the election of the Borrower (as notified by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the receipt of such Net Cash Proceeds), and so long as no Default shall have occurred and be continuing, the Borrower or such Restricted Subsidiary may reinvest all or any portion of such Net Cash Proceeds in operating assets so long as within 365 days after the receipt of such Net Cash Proceeds, such reinvestment shall have been consummated (as certified by the Borrower in writing to the Administrative Agent); and , , that any Net Cash Proceeds not so reinvested shall be immediately applied to the prepayment of the Loans as set forth in this
Mandatory
Section 7.08(c)
Section 2.04(b)(i)
Section 2.04(b)(i)
provided
provided
further
Section 2.04(b)(i)
provided
however
Section 2.04(b)(i).
          (ii) Upon the incurrence or issuance by the Borrower or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries of any Indebtedness (other than any Indebtedness expressly permitted to be incurred or issued pursuant to ), the Borrower shall prepay an aggregate principal amount of Term A Loans and Revolving Credit Loans equal to 100% of all Net Cash Proceeds received therefrom immediately upon receipt thereof by the Borrower or such Restricted Subsidiary.
Section 7.15
          (iii) Each prepayment of Loans pursuant to shall be applied, , ratably to the Term A Facility and, to the extent such prepayment is to be made from the Net Cash Proceeds of a Disposition of an Operating Company, but subject to Section 2.04(b)(vii), the Term B Facility and Incremental Term Facility, if any, and to the principal repayment of installments thereof on a pro-rata basis and, , to the Revolving Credit Facility in the manner set forth in clause of this .
Section 2.04(b)(i)
first
second
(vi)
Section 2.04(b)
          (iv) Each prepayment of Loans pursuant to shall be applied, , to the Term A Facility and to the principal repayment of installments thereof on a pro-rata basis and, , to the Revolving Credit Facility in the manner set forth in clause of this .
Section 2.04(b)(ii)
first
second
(vi)
Section 2.04(b)
          (v) If for any reason the Total Revolving Credit Outstandings at any time exceed the Revolving Credit Facility at such time, the Borrower shall immediately prepay Revolving Credit Loans, Swingline Loans or L/C Borrowings or Cash Collateralize the L/C Obligations (other than the L/C Borrowings) in an aggregate amount equal to such excess.
 
          (vi) Prepayments of the Revolving Credit Facility made pursuant to this , , shall be applied ratably to the L/C Borrowings and the Swingline Loans, , shall be applied ratably to the outstanding Revolving Credit Loans, and, , shall be used to Cash Collateralize the remaining L/C Obligations; and, in the case of prepayments of the Revolving Credit Facility required pursuant to clause or of this , the amount remaining, if any, after the prepayment in full of all L/C Borrowings, Swingline Loans and Revolving Credit Loans outstanding at such time and the Cash Collateralization of the remaining L/C Obligations in full (the sum of such prepayment amounts, cash collateralization amounts and remaining amount being, collectively, the "") may be retained by the Borrower for use in the ordinary course of its business. Upon the drawing of any Letter of Credit that has been Cash Collateralized, the funds held as Cash Collateral shall be applied (without any further action by or notice to or from the Borrower or any other Loan Party) to reimburse the L/C Issuer or the Revolving Credit Lenders, as applicable.
Section 2.04(b)
first
second
third
(i)
(ii)
Section 2.04(b)
Reduction Amount
          (vii) Anything contained herein to the contrary notwithstanding, in the event the Borrower is required to make, in accordance with Section 2.04(b)(i), an offer to purchase at par the outstanding Term B Loans or Incremental Term Loans, if any (a ""), not less than three Business Days prior to the date (the "") on which the Borrower is required to make such Waivable Prepayment, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of the amount of such prepayment, and the Administrative Agent will promptly thereafter notify each Lender holding outstanding Term B Loans of the amount of such Term B Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Waivable Prepayment and such Term B Lender's option to refuse such amount. Each such Term B Lender may exercise such option to refuse such amount by giving written notice to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent of its election to do so on or before 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the first Business Day prior to the Required Prepayment Date (it being understood that any Term B Lender which does not notify the Borrower and the Administrative Agent of its election to exercise such option on or before 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the first Business Day prior to the Required Prepayment Date shall be deemed to have elected, as of such date, not to exercise such option). On the Required Prepayment Date, the Borrower shall pay to the Administrative Agent the amount of the Waivable Prepayment, which amount shall be applied (i) in an amount equal to that portion of the Waivable Prepayment payable to those Lenders that have elected not to exercise such option, to prepay the Term B Loans held by such Lenders (which prepayment shall be applied to the scheduled Installments of principal of the Term B Loans in accordance with Section 2.06(b)), and (ii) in an amount equal to that portion of the Waivable Prepayment that otherwise would have been payable to those Term B Lenders that have elected to exercise such option, to prepay the Term A Loans and Revolving Credit Loans, which prepayment shall be further applied to the scheduled installments of principal of the Term A Loans and Revolving Credit Loans in accordance with Section 2.04(b)(iv).
Waivable Prepayment
Required Prepayment Date
          Section 2.05 . (a) . The Borrower may, upon notice to the Administrative Agent at any time, terminate the Revolving Credit Facility, the Swingline Sublimit or the Letter of Credit Sublimit, or from time to time permanently reduce the Revolving Credit Facility, the Swingline Sublimit or the Letter of Credit Sublimit, in each case without premium or penalty; that (i) any such notice shall be received by the Administrative Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. five Business Days prior to the date of termination or reduction, (ii) any such partial reduction shall be in an aggregate amount of $5,000,000 or any whole multiple of $1,000,000 in excess thereof and (iii) the Borrower shall not
Termination or Reduction of Commitments
Optional
provided
 
terminate or reduce (A) the Revolving Credit Facility if, after giving effect thereto and to any concurrent prepayments hereunder, the Total Revolving Credit Outstandings would exceed the Revolving Credit Facility, (B) the Swingline Sublimit if, after giving effect thereto, the Outstanding Amount of the Swingline Loans would exceed the Swingline Sublimit or (C) the Letter of Credit Sublimit if, after giving effect thereto, the Outstanding Amount of L/C Obligations not fully Cash Collateralized hereunder would exceed the Letter of Credit Sublimit.
          (b) . (i) The aggregate Term A Commitments and Term B Commitments shall be automatically and permanently reduced to zero on the date of the Term A Borrowing and Term B Borrowing, respectively.
Mandatory
          (ii) If after giving effect to any reduction or termination of Revolving Credit Commitments under this , the Letter of Credit Sublimit or the Swingline Sublimit exceeds the Revolving Credit Facility at such time, the Letter of Credit Sublimit or the Swingline Sublimit, as the case may be, shall be automatically reduced by the amount of such excess.
Section 2.05
          (iii) The Revolving Credit Facility shall be automatically and permanently reduced on each date on which the prepayment of Revolving Credit Loans outstanding thereunder is required to be made pursuant to or by an amount equal to the applicable Reduction Amount.
Section 2.04(b)(i)
(ii)
          (c) . The Administrative Agent will promptly notify the Lenders of any termination or reduction of the Letter of Credit Sublimit, Swingline Sublimit or the Revolving Credit Commitment under this . Upon any reduction of the Revolving Credit Commitments, unless otherwise permitted under this , the Revolving Credit Commitment of each Revolving Credit Lender shall be reduced by such Lender's Applicable Revolving Credit Percentage of such reduction amount. All fees in respect of the Revolving Credit Facility accrued until the effective date of any termination of the Revolving Credit Facility shall be paid on the effective date of such termination.
Application of Commitment Reductions; Payment of Fees
Section 2.05
Section 2.05
          (d) . The Borrower may terminate the unused amount of the Commitment of any Lender that is a Defaulting Lender upon not less than five Business Days' prior notice to the Administrative Agent (which shall promptly notify the Lenders thereof), and in such event the provisions of will apply to all amounts thereafter paid by the Borrower for the account of such Defaulting Lender under this Credit Agreement (whether on account of principal, interest, fees, indemnity or other amounts), that (i) no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing and (ii) such termination shall not be deemed to be a waiver or release of any claim the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, the Swingline Lender or any Lender may have against such Defaulting Lender.
Termination of Defaulting Lender
Section 2.16(c)
provided
     Section 2.06 . (a) . The Borrower shall repay to the Term A Lenders the aggregate principal amount of all Term A Loans outstanding on the following dates in the respective amounts set forth opposite such dates (which amounts shall be reduced as a result of the application of prepayments in accordance with the order of priority set forth in ):
Repayment of Loans
Term A Loans
Section 2.04
 
, however, that the final principal repayment installment of the Term A Loans shall be repaid on the Maturity Date for the Term A Facility and in any event shall be in an amount equal to the aggregate principal amount of all Term A Loans outstanding on such date; and , that with the prior written consent of the Term A Lenders holding at least 10% of the outstanding Term A Loans, such consenting Term A Lenders can extend the amortization schedule and the maturity of their Term A Loans as agreed upon among such consenting Term A Lenders and the Borrower (with the new amortization schedule and Maturity Date thereafter applying to such Term A Loans), and the Borrower may pay additional interest or an extension fee to, and as agreed with, such consenting Term A Lenders with respect to such extension, without having any obligation to make any additional payments with respect to such extension to non-consenting Term A Lenders (and the pro rata payment provisions of shall automatically be deemed adjusted to reflect the provisions of this Section).
provided
provided
further
Section 2.12
     (b) . The Borrower shall repay to the Term B Lenders the aggregate principal amount of all Term B Loans outstanding on the following dates in the respective amounts set forth opposite such dates (which amounts shall be reduced as a result of the application of prepayments in accordance with the order of priority set forth in ):
Term B Loans
Section 2.04
 
, however, that the final principal repayment installment of the Term B Loans shall be repaid on the Maturity Date for the Term B Facility and in any event shall be in an amount equal to the aggregate principal amount of all Term B Loans outstanding on such date; and , that with the prior written consent of the Term B Lenders holding at least 10% of the outstanding Term B Loans, such consenting Term B Lenders can extend the amortization schedule and the maturity of their Term B Loans as agreed upon among such consenting Term B Lenders and the Borrower (with the new amortization schedule and Maturity Date thereafter applying to such Term B Loans), and the Borrower may pay additional interest or an extension fee to, and as agreed with, such consenting Term B Lenders with respect to such extension, without having any obligation to make any additional payments with respect to such extension to non-consenting Term B Lenders (and the pro rata payment provisions of shall automatically be deemed adjusted to reflect the provisions of this Section).
provided
provided
further
Section 2.12
     (c) . The Borrower shall repay to the Revolving Credit Lenders on the Maturity Date for the Revolving Credit Facility the aggregate principal amount of all Revolving Credit Loans outstanding on such date. All L/C Borrowings and Swingline Loans then outstanding shall be due and payable on the Maturity Date for the Revolving Credit Facility;
Revolving Credit Loans
 
, that with the prior written consent of the Revolving Credit Lenders holding at least 10% of the sum of (i) the Total Revolving Credit Outstandings (with the aggregate amount of each Revolving Credit Lender's risk participation and funded participation in L/C Obligations being deemed "held" by such Revolving Credit Lender for purposes of this definition) and (ii) the aggregate unused Revolving Credit Commitments, such consenting Revolving Credit Lenders may extend the maturity of their Revolving Credit Commitments and Revolving Credit Loans as agreed upon among such consenting Revolving Credit Lenders and the Borrower (with such new Maturity Date thereafter applying to such Revolving Credit Commitments and Revolving Credit Loans), and the Borrower may pay an extension fee to, and as agreed with, such Revolving Credit Lenders with respect to such extension without having any obligation to make any additional payments with respect to such extension to non-consenting Revolving Credit Lenders, (and the pro rata payment provisions of shall automatically be deemed adjusted to reflect the provisions of this Section).
provided
Section 2.12
          (d) . Any unpaid principal and interest of the Incremental Term Loans and any other outstanding Obligations under any of the Incremental Term Commitments shall be due and payable in full on the Maturity Date applicable thereto.
Incremental Term Loans
     Section 2.07 . (a) Subject to the provisions of , (i) each Eurodollar Rate Loan under a Facility shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof for each Interest Period at a rate per annum equal to the Eurodollar Rate for such Interest Period plus the Applicable Rate for such Facility; and (ii) each Base Rate Loan under a Facility shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof from the applicable borrowing date at a rate per annum equal to the Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate for such Facility.
Interest
Section 2.07(b)
          (b) (i) If any amount of principal of any Loan is not paid when due (without regard to any applicable grace periods), whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, such amount shall thereafter bear interest at a fluctuating interest rate per annum at all times equal to the Default Rate to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Laws.
          (ii) If any amount (other than principal of any Loan) payable by the Borrower under any Loan Document is not paid when due (without regard to any applicable grace periods), whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, then upon the request of (x) in the case of any amount payable only to the Revolving Credit Lenders and/or the Term A Lenders, the Required Revolver/Term A Lenders and (y) in the case of any other amount, the Required Lenders, such amount shall thereafter bear interest at a fluctuating interest rate per annum at all times equal to the Default Rate to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Laws.
          (iii) Accrued and unpaid interest on past due amounts (including interest on past due interest) shall be due and payable upon demand.
          (c) Interest on each Loan shall be due and payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date applicable thereto and at such other times as may be specified herein. Interest hereunder shall be due and payable in accordance with the terms hereof before and after judgment, and before and after the commencement of any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Law.
     Section 2.08 . In addition to certain fees described in and :
Fees
Section 2.03(i)
(j)
 
          (a) . The Borrower shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Revolving Credit Lender in accordance with its Applicable Revolving Credit Percentage, a commitment fee (the "") on the actual daily amount by which the Revolving Credit Facility exceeds the Total Revolving Credit Outstandings, at the applicable percentage per annum set forth below determined by reference to the Cash Flow Ratio as set forth in the most recent Compliance Certificate delivered to the Lenders pursuant to ; that, until the delivery of the Compliance Certificate with respect to the Quarter ending September 30, 2011, the Commitment Fee shall be 0.375%:
Commitment Fee
Commitment Fee
Section 7.01(d)
provided
The commitment fee shall accrue at all times during the Availability Period, including at any time during which one or more of the conditions in is not met, and shall be due and payable quarterly in arrears on the last Business Day of each March, June, September and December, commencing with the first such date to occur after the Closing Date, and on the last day of the Availability Period for the Revolving Credit Facility. The commitment fee shall be calculated quarterly in arrears.
Article V
          (b) . (i) The Borrower shall pay fees in the amounts and at the times specified in the Facility Fee Letter. Such fees shall not be refundable for any reason whatsoever.
Other Fees
          (ii) The Borrower shall pay to the Administrative Agent and the applicable L/C Issuer for their own respective accounts fees in the amounts and at the times specified in the JPMCB Fee Letter and/or as mutually agreed in writing. Such fees shall not be refundable for any reason whatsoever.
          (iii) The Borrower shall pay to the Lenders (or the Administrative Agent on behalf of the Lenders) such fees as shall have been separately agreed upon in writing, to the Lenders and in the amounts and at the times so specified. Such fees shall not be refundable for any reason whatsoever.
          (c) Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, during such period as a Lender is a Defaulting Lender, such Defaulting Lender shall not be entitled to any fees accruing during such period pursuant to and this (without prejudice to the rights of the Non-Defaulting Lenders in respect of such fees), provided that (a) to the extent that a portion of the L/C Obligations or the Outstanding Amount of Swingline Loans of such Defaulting Lender is reallocated to the Non-Defaulting Lenders pursuant to , such fees that would have accrued for the benefit of such Defaulting Lender shall instead accrue for the benefit of and be payable to such Non-Defaulting Lenders, pro rata in accordance with their respective Commitments, and (b) to the extent of any portion of such L/C Obligations or Outstanding Amount of Swingline Loans that cannot be so reallocated such fees shall instead accrue for the benefit of and be payable to the L/C Issuer and the Swingline Lender as their interests appear (and the pro rata payment provisions of shall automatically be deemed adjusted to reflect the provisions of this Section); provided that if the Borrower Cash Collateralizes any
Section 2.03(i)
Section 2.08
Section 2.16(b)
Section 2.12
 
portion of such Defaulting Lender's L/C Obligations pursuant to , the Borrower shall not be required to pay any Commitment Fee or Letter of Credit Fees with respect to such Defaulting Lender's L/C Obligations during the period such Defaulting Lender's L/C Obligations are Cash Collateralized.
Section 2.16(b)
          Section 2.09 . All computations of interest for Base Rate Loans when the Base Rate is determined by JPMCB's "prime rate" shall be made on the basis of a year of 365 or 366 days, as the case may be, and actual days elapsed. All other computations of fees and interest shall be made on the basis of a 360-day year and actual days elapsed (which results in more fees or interest, as applicable, being paid than if computed on the basis of a 365-day year). Interest shall accrue on each Loan for the day on which the Loan is made, and shall not accrue on a Loan, or any portion thereof, for the day on which the Loan or such portion is paid, that any Loan that is repaid on the same day on which it is made shall, subject to , bear interest for one day. Each determination by the Administrative Agent of an interest rate or fee hereunder shall be conclusive and binding for all purposes, absent manifest error.
Computation of Interest and Fees
provided
Section 2.11(a)
          Section 2.10 . (a) The Credit Extensions made by each Lender shall be evidenced by one or more accounts or records maintained by such Lender and by the Administrative Agent in the ordinary course of business. The accounts or records maintained by the Administrative Agent and each Lender shall be conclusive absent manifest error of the amount of the Credit Extensions made by the Lenders to the Borrower and the interest and payments thereon. Any failure to so record or any error in doing so shall not, however, limit or otherwise affect the obligation of the Borrower hereunder to pay any amount owing with respect to the Obligations. In the event of any conflict between the accounts and records maintained by any Lender and the accounts and records of the Administrative Agent in respect of such matters, the accounts and records of the Administrative Agent shall control in the absence of manifest error. Upon the request of any Lender made through the Administrative Agent, the Borrower shall execute and deliver to such Lender (through the Administrative Agent) a Note, which shall evidence such Lender's Loans in addition to such accounts or records. In the event such Note is issued with more than a de minimis amount of original issue discount ("") as defined in the Code, the Borrower shall legend the Note by stating on its face that it was issued with OID in accordance with Treasury Regulations Section 1.1275-3(b). Each Lender may attach schedules to its Note and endorse thereon the date, Type (if applicable), amount and maturity of its Loans and payments with respect thereto.
Evidence of Debt
OID
          (b) In addition to the accounts and records referred to in , each Lender and the Administrative Agent shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice accounts or records evidencing the purchases and sales by such Lender of participations in Letters of Credit. In the event of any conflict between the accounts and records maintained by the Administrative Agent and the accounts and records of any Lender in respect of such matters, the accounts and records of the Administrative Agent shall control in the absence of manifest error.
Section 2.10(a)
          Section 2.11 . (a) . All payments to be made by the Borrower shall be made without condition or deduction for any counterclaim, defense, recoupment or setoff. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all payments by the Borrower hereunder shall be made to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the respective Lenders to which such payment is owed, at the Administrative Agent's Office in Dollars and in immediately available funds not later than 2:00 p.m. on the date specified herein. The Administrative Agent will promptly distribute to each Lender its Applicable Percentage in respect of the relevant Facility (or other applicable share as provided herein) of such payment in
Payments Generally; Administrative Agent's Clawback
General
 
like funds as received by wire transfer to such Lender's Lending Office. All payments received by the Administrative Agent after 2:00 p.m. shall be deemed received on the next succeeding Business Day and any applicable interest or fee shall continue to accrue. If any payment to be made by the Borrower shall come due on a day other than a Business Day, payment shall be made on the next following Business Day, and such extension of time shall be reflected on computing interest or fees, as the case may be.
          (b) (i) . Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing of Eurodollar Rate Loans (or, in the case of any Borrowing of Base Rate Loans, prior to the time funds are due in accordance with Section 2.02(b)) that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with (or, in the case of a Borrowing of Base Rate Loans, that such Lender has made such share available in accordance with and at the time required by ) and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower a corresponding amount. In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount in immediately available funds with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (A) in the case of a payment to be made by such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation, and (B) in the case of a payment to be made by the Borrower, the interest rate applicable to Base Rate Loans. If the Borrower and such Lender shall pay such interest to the Administrative Agent for the same or an overlapping period, the Administrative Agent shall promptly remit to the Borrower the amount of such interest paid by the Borrower for such period. If such Lender pays its share of the applicable Borrowing to the Administrative Agent, then the amount so paid shall constitute such Lender's Loan included in such Borrowing. Any payment by the Borrower shall be without prejudice to any claim the Borrower may have against a Lender that shall have failed to make such payment to the Administrative Agent.
Funding by Lenders; Presumption by Administrative Agent
Section 2.02
Section 2.02
          (ii) . Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the time at which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or the L/C Issuer hereunder that the Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Appropriate Lenders or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, the amount due. In such event, if the Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the Appropriate Lenders or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or the L/C Issuer, in immediately available funds with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
Payments by Borrower; Presumptions by Administrative Agent
     A notice of the Administrative Agent to any Lender or the Borrower with respect to any amount owing under this subsection (b) shall be conclusive, absent manifest error.
 
          (c) . If any Lender makes available to the Administrative Agent funds for any Loan to be made by such Lender as provided in the foregoing provisions of this , and such funds are not made available to the Borrower by the Administrative Agent because the conditions to the applicable Credit Extension set forth in are not satisfied or waived in accordance with the terms hereof, the Administrative Agent shall return such funds (in like funds as received from such Lender) to such Lender, without interest.
Failure to Satisfy Conditions Precedent
Article II
Article V
          (d) . The obligations of the Lenders hereunder to make Term Loans and Revolving Credit Loans, to fund participations in Letters of Credit and to make payments pursuant to are several and not joint. The failure of any Lender to make any Loan, to fund any such participation or to make any payment under on any date required hereunder shall not relieve any other Lender of its corresponding obligation to do so on such date, and no Lender shall be responsible for the failure of any other Lender to so make its Loan, to purchase its participation or to make its payment under .
Obligations of Lenders Several
Section 10.04(c)
Section 10.04(c)
Section 10.04(c)
          (e) . Nothing herein shall be deemed to obligate any Lender to obtain the funds for any Loan in any particular place or manner or to constitute a representation by any Lender that it has obtained or will obtain the funds for any Loan in any particular place or manner.
Funding Source
          (f) . If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal, L/C Borrowings, interest and fees then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) , toward payment of interest and fees then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest and fees then due to such parties, and (ii) , toward payment of principal and L/C Borrowings then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of principal and L/C Borrowings then due to such parties.
Insufficient Funds
first
second
          Section 2.12 . If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of setoff or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of (a) Obligations in respect of any of the Facilities due and payable to such Lender hereunder and under the other Loan Documents at such time in excess of its ratable share (according to the proportion of (i) the amount of such Obligations due and payable to such Lender at such time to (ii) the aggregate amount of the Obligations in respect of such Facilities due and payable to all Lenders hereunder and under the other Loan Documents at such time) of payments on account of the Obligations in respect of such Facilities due and payable to all Lenders hereunder and under the other Loan Documents at such time obtained by all the Lenders at such time or (b) Obligations in respect of any of such Facilities owing (but not due and payable) to such Lender hereunder and under the other Loan Documents at such time in excess of its ratable share (according to the proportion of (i) the amount of such Obligations owing (but not due and payable) to such Lender at such time to (ii) the aggregate amount of the Obligations in respect of such Facilities owing (but not due and payable) to all Lenders hereunder and under the other Loan Parties at such time) of payments on account of the Obligations in respect of the Facilities owing (but not due and payable) to all Lenders hereunder and under the other Loan Documents at such time obtained by all of the Lenders at such time then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall (a) notify the Administrative Agent of such fact, and (b) purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Loans and subparticipations in L/C Obligations of the other Lenders, or make such other adjustments as shall be equitable, so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of Obligations in respect of the
Sharing of Payments by Lenders
 
Facilities then due and payable to the Lenders or owing (but not due and payable) to the Lenders, as the case may be, that:
provided
          (i) if any such participations or subparticipations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations or subparticipations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest; and
          (ii) the provisions of this Section shall not be construed to apply to (A) any payment made by the Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Credit Agreement or (B) any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or subparticipations in L/C Obligations to any assignee or participant.
     Each Loan Party consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against such Loan Party rights of setoff and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of such Loan Party in the amount of such participation.
          Section 2.13 . (a) . Provided that no Default shall have occurred and be continuing at such time or would result therefrom, upon notice to the Administrative Agent (which shall promptly notify the Revolving Credit Lenders and the Term A Lenders, as applicable), the Borrower may request, from time to time, without the consent of any Lender, an increase in the Revolving Credit Facility or Term A Loans or both by an aggregate amount not exceeding, when taken together with all previous increases in the Revolving Credit Facility and Term A Loans pursuant to this Section 2.13 and all Incremental Term Facilities pursuant to , the greater of (i) $400,000,000 and (ii) an amount which, after giving effect to such increase (and assuming such increased Revolving Credit Facility is fully drawn on the date of, and after giving effect to, such increase), would not cause the Senior Secured Leverage Ratio to exceed 4.75 to 1.00 as of the date of the incurrence of the increase; , any such request for an increase shall be in a minimum amount of $50,000,000. At the time of sending such notice, the Borrower (in consultation with the Administrative Agent) shall specify the time period within which each Revolving Credit Lender or Term A Lender, as applicable, is requested to respond (which shall in no event be less than 10 Business Days from the date of delivery of such notice to such Lenders by the Administrative Agent).
Increase in Commitments
Request for Increase
Section 2.14
provided
          (b) . Each Revolving Credit Lender and Term A Lender, as applicable, shall notify the Administrative Agent within such time period whether or not it agrees to increase its Revolving Credit Commitment or Term A Commitment, respectively, and, if so, whether by an amount equal to, greater than, or less than its ratable portion (based on such Lender's Applicable Percentage in respect of the Revolving Credit Facility or Term A Facility, respectively) of such requested increase. Any Revolving Credit Lender or Term A Lender not responding within such time period shall be deemed to have declined to increase its Revolving Credit Commitments or Term A Loans, respectively.
Lender Elections to Increase
          (c) . The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower and each Revolving Credit Lender and Term A Lender, as applicable, of the Revolving Credit Lenders' and Term A Lenders' responses, as the case may be, to each request made hereunder. If the aggregate increase participated in by the
Notification by Administrative Agent; Additional Lenders
 
existing Lenders is less than the requested increase, then to achieve the full amount of the requested increase, and subject to the approval of the Administrative Agent, the Borrower may also invite additional Eligible Assignees to become Revolving Credit Lenders or Term A Lenders, as applicable, pursuant to a joinder agreement in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
          (d) . If the Revolving Credit Facility or Term A Loans or both are increased in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent and the Borrower shall determine the effective date (the "") and the final allocation of such increase. The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify the Borrower and the Revolving Credit Lenders and the Term A Lenders, including the proposed new lenders, as applicable, of the final allocation of such increase and the Increase Effective Date. Such amendment may be signed by the Administrative Agent on behalf of the Lenders.
Effective Date and Allocations
Increase Effective Date
          (e) . As a condition precedent to such increase, (1) the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a certificate of each Loan Party dated as of the Increase Effective Date (in sufficient copies for each Lender) signed by a Responsible Officer of such Loan Party (i) certifying and attaching the resolutions adopted by such Loan Party approving or consenting to such increase, and (ii) in the case of the Borrower, certifying that, before and after giving effect to such increase, (A) the representations and warranties contained in and the other Loan Documents are true and correct on and as of the Increase Effective Date, except to the extent that such representations and warranties specifically refer to an earlier date, in which case they are true and correct as of such earlier date, and except that for purposes of this , the representations and warranties contained in subsections (a) and (b) of shall be deemed to refer to the most recent statements furnished pursuant to clauses (b) and (a), respectively, of , and (B) no Default exists or would result from such increase; (2) all fees and expenses of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders in connection with such increase shall have been paid on or prior to the Increase Effective Date; and (3) on such Increase Effective Date, on a pro forma basis after giving effect to any such increase in Loans, including any acquisitions consummated or payments of Indebtedness made with the proceeds thereof, and any acquisitions or dispositions after the first day of the most recently ended Quarter for which financial statements were delivered pursuant to (such pro forma basis to include, in the Borrower's discretion, a reasonable estimate of savings resulting from any such acquisition or disposition (A) that have been realized, (B) for which the steps necessary for realization have been taken, or (C) for which the steps necessary for realization are reasonably expected to be taken within 12 months of the date of such acquisition or disposition, in each case, certified by the Borrower) but prior to or simultaneous with the borrowing of any such increased Loans, the Borrower would be in compliance with the Financial Covenants, recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended Quarter for which financial statements were delivered pursuant to and calculated as if such transaction occurred on the first day of the 12-month period then ended.
Conditions to Effectiveness of Increase
Article VI
Section 2.13
Section 6.04
Section 7.01
Section 7.01
Section 7.01
          (f) In the event of an increase in the Revolving Credit Commitment in accordance with this Section, on the Increase Effective Date, the Borrower shall borrow Revolving Credit Loans and prepay any outstanding Revolving Credit Loans from each Revolving Credit Lender (and pay any additional amounts required pursuant to ) to the extent necessary to keep the outstanding Revolving Credit Loans ratable among the Revolving Credit Lenders in accordance with their respective revised Applicable Revolving Credit Percentages arising from any nonratable increase in the Revolving Credit Commitments under this Section. Any additional Term A Loans shall be made by the Term A Lenders participating therein pursuant to the procedures set forth in .
Section 3.05
Section 2.02
 
          (g) . This Section shall supersede any provisions in to the contrary.
Conflicting Provisions
Section 2.12
          Section 2.14 . (a) . Provided that no Default shall have occurred and be continuing at such time or would result therefrom, upon notice to the Administrative Agent, the Borrower may request, on one or more occasions, without the consent of any Lender, a separate tranche of commitments ("") and loans ("") to be established under this Credit Agreement in an amount not exceeding, when taken together with the amount of any increase in the Revolving Credit Facilities (as if fully drawn on the date of determination of compliance hereunder) and Term A Loans incurred pursuant to , the greater of (i) $400,000,000 and (ii) an amount which, after giving effect to such increase, would not cause the Senior Secured Leverage Ratio to exceed 4.75 to 1.00 as of the date of the incurrence of the increase; that any such request for an Incremental Term Facility shall be in a minimum amount of $50,000,000.
Incremental Term Facility
Request for Incremental Term Facility
Incremental Term Commitments
Incremental Term Loans
Section 2.13
provided
          (b) . The Borrower shall be entitled to elect, in its own discretion, Incremental Term Lenders from among the existing Lenders and any additional banks, financial institutions and other institutional lenders or investors, subject to the consent of (i) such proposed Incremental Term Lender and (ii) the Administrative Agent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld), if such consent would be required under , for an assignment of loans or commitments, as applicable, to such Incremental Term Lender.
Incremental Term Lenders
Section 10.06(b)(iii)
          (c) . As a condition precedent to the effectiveness of each Incremental Term Facility, (1) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the Incremental Term Lenders party thereto shall enter into a supplement to this Credit Agreement in substantially the form of (an "") duly completed such that such Incremental Term Supplement shall set forth the terms and conditions relating to such Incremental Term Facility, which, to the extent that they differ from those applicable to the Term B Facility shall be reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent (except to the extent that they are consistent with the provisos to this ); that, in any event, such Incremental Term Facility shall (i) not have a final maturity date earlier than the Maturity Date applicable to the Term B Facility or a weighted average life to maturity shorter than the weighted average life to maturity of the Term B Facility, (ii) be guaranteed only by the Guarantors hereunder, (iii) rank or junior in right of payment and of security with the Term B Facility and (iv) except as to pricing and amortization, shall have terms and documentation no more restrictive than the terms of the Term B Loans unless such terms are reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent; , , that in the event that the initial all-in yield for the Incremental Term Loans under such Incremental Term Facility exceeds the all-in yield for the Term B Loans by more than 50 basis points, then the Applicable Rate for the Term B Loans shall be adjusted so that the all-in yield for the Incremental Term Loans under such Incremental Term Facility does not exceed the all-in yield applicable to the Term B Loans by more than 50 basis points; , that the determination of the all-in yield for the Term B Loans and Incremental Term Loans under an Incremental Term Facility shall include the following items: (x) interest rate margins, (y) Eurodollar Rate and Base Rate floors and (z) OID or upfront fees (which shall be deemed to constitute like amounts of OID) payable to the Lenders in the primary syndication thereof (with OID being equated to interest based on an assumed four-year life to maturity) and shall exclude customary arrangement or commitment fees payable to the arrangers (or their Affiliates) of such loans, (2) the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a certificate of each Loan Party dated as of the effective date of an
Conditions to Effectiveness of Incremental Term Facility
Exhibit I
Incremental Term Supplement
clause (c)
provided
pari passu
provided
further
provided
 
Incremental Term Facility (in sufficient copies for each Lender) signed by a Responsible Officer of such Loan Party (i) certifying and attaching the resolutions adopted by such Loan Party approving or consenting to such Incremental Term Facility, and (ii) in the case of the Borrower, certifying that, before and after giving effect to such Incremental Term Facility, (A) the representations and warranties contained in and the other Loan Documents are true and correct on and as of such effective date, except to the extent that such representations and warranties specifically refer to an earlier date, in which case they are true and correct as of such earlier date, and except that for purposes of this , the representations and warranties contained in subsections (a) and (b) of shall be deemed to refer to the most recent statements furnished pursuant to clauses (b) and (a), respectively, of , and (B) no Default exists, and (3) all fees and expenses of the Administrative Agent and the Incremental Term Lenders in connection with such Incremental Term Facility shall have been paid on or prior to the effectiveness of such Incremental Term Facility. Upon the effective date of an Incremental Term Supplement, each lender thereunder shall become an Incremental Term Lender hereunder and such Incremental Term Supplement shall be deemed part of this Credit Agreement for all purposes thereafter.
Article VI
Section 2.14
Section 6.04
Section 7.01
          (d) Any Incremental Term Loans shall be made available to the Borrower as set forth in the applicable Incremental Term Supplement; that, on such date, on a pro forma basis after giving effect to such increase in Loans, including any acquisitions consummated or payments of Indebtedness made with the proceeds thereof, and any acquisitions or dispositions after the first day of the most recently ended Quarter for which financial statements were delivered pursuant to (such pro forma basis to include, in the Borrower's discretion, a reasonable estimate of savings resulting from any such acquisition or disposition (A) that have been realized, (B) for which the steps necessary for realization have been taken, or (C) for which the steps necessary for realization are reasonably expected to be taken within 12 months of the date of such acquisition or disposition, in each case, certified by the Borrower) but prior to or simultaneous with the borrowing of any Incremental Term Loans, the Borrower would be in compliance with the Financial Covenants, recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended Quarter for which financial statements were delivered pursuant to and calculated as if such transaction occurred on the first day of the 12-month period then ended.
provided
Section 7.01
Section 7.01
          Section 2.15 .
Swingline Loans
          (a) .
Swingline Borrowings
          (i) . Whenever the Borrower desires a Swingline Borrowing hereunder it shall give irrevocable notice to the Swingline Lender not later than 1:00 p.m. on the date of the requested Swingline Borrowing in the form of a Committed Loan Notice. Subject to satisfaction of the conditions set forth herein, the Swingline Lender shall initiate the transfer of funds representing such Borrowing to the Borrower by 3:00 p.m. on the Business Day specified by the Borrower in the applicable Committed Loan Notice.
Notices; Disbursement
          (ii) . Each Swingline Borrowing shall be in a minimum principal amount of $500,000 and integral multiples of $250,000, in excess thereof.
Minimum Amounts
          (b) . Each Swingline Borrowing shall be due and payable on the earliest of (i) 10 days from the date of such Borrowing, (ii) the date of the next succeeding Revolving Credit Borrowing, or (iii) the Maturity Date for the Revolving Credit
Repayment of Swingline Loans
 
Facility; , , the Borrower may prepay any Swingline Borrowing prior to the date it is due upon notice to the Swingline Lender not later than 1:00 p.m. on the date of prepayment of such Borrowing. If such notice is given by the Borrower, the Borrower shall make such prepayment and the payment amount specified in such notice shall be due and payable on the date specified therein, together with accrued interest to such date on the amount prepaid. If, and to the extent, any Swingline Loans shall be outstanding on the date of any Revolving Credit Borrowing, such Swingline Loans shall be repaid from the proceeds of such Revolving Credit Borrowing prior to any distribution of such proceeds to the Borrower. If, and to the extent, a Revolving Credit Borrowing is not requested prior to earlier of (A) the Maturity Date for the Revolving Credit Facility or (B) the last day of any such 10 day period from the date of any Swingline Borrowing, the Borrower shall be deemed to have requested a Base Rate Loan on the Business Day immediately preceding the Maturity Date for the Revolving Credit Facility or the last day of such 10 day period, as applicable, in the amount of the Swingline Loans then outstanding, the proceeds of which shall be used to repay the Swingline Lender for such Swingline Loans. In addition, the Swingline Lender may, at any time, in its sole discretion by written notice to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent, require repayment of its Swingline Loans by way of a Revolving Credit Loan, in which case the Borrower shall be deemed to have requested a Base Rate Advance of the Revolving Credit Loans in the amount of such Swingline Loans; , , that any such demand shall be deemed to have been given one Business Day prior to the Maturity Date for the Revolving Credit Facility and upon the occurrence of any Event of Default described in or and also upon acceleration of the Obligations, whether on account of an Event of Default described in or or any other Event of Default, in accordance with the provisions of following an Event of Default (each such Revolving Credit Loan made on account of any such deemed request therefor as provided herein being hereinafter referred to as a ""). Each Lender hereby irrevocably agrees to make its Applicable Percentage of such Revolving Credit Loans promptly upon any such request or deemed request on account of each Mandatory Borrowing in the amount and in the manner specified in the preceding sentence and on the same such date, notwithstanding (I) the amount of Mandatory Borrowing may not comply with the minimum amount for advances of Revolving Credit Loans otherwise required hereunder, (II) whether any conditions specified in are then satisfied, (III) whether a Default then exists, (IV) failure for any such request or deemed request for Revolving Credit Loans to be made by the time otherwise required in , (V) the date of such Mandatory Borrowing, or (VI) any reduction in the Revolving Credit Commitment or termination of the Revolving Credit Commitment relating thereto immediately prior to such Mandatory Borrowing or contemporaneously therewith; , , that no Lender shall be required to make such Revolving Credit Loans if, at the time that the Swingline Lender agreed to fund any requested Swingline Borrowing, the Swingline Lender had knowledge of the existence of a Default or such Mandatory Borrowing would cause a Lender to exceed its Revolving Credit Commitment. In the event that any Mandatory Borrowing cannot for any reason be made on the date otherwise required above (including, without limitation, as a result of the commencement of any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Laws with respect to the Borrower or any other obligor hereunder), then each Revolving Credit Lender hereby agrees that it shall forthwith purchase (as of the date the Mandatory Borrowing would otherwise have occurred, but adjusted for any payments received from the Borrower on or after such date and prior to such purchase) from the Swingline Lender such participations in the outstanding Swingline Loans as shall be necessary to cause each such Revolving Credit Lender to share in such Swingline Loans ratably based upon its respective Applicable Percentage in respect of the Revolving Credit Facility (determined before giving effect to any termination of the Revolving Credit Commitment pursuant to , provided that (A) all interest payable on the Swingline Loans shall be for the account of the Swingline Lender until the date as of which the respective participation is purchased, and (B) at the time any purchase of participations
provided
however
provided
however
Section 8.01(g)
8.01(h)
Section 8.01(g)
8.01(h)
Section 8.02
Mandatory Borrowing
Article V
Section 2.02
provided
however
Section 8.02)
 
pursuant to this sentence is actually made, the purchasing Lender shall be required to pay (to the extent not paid by the Borrower) to the Swingline Lender interest on the principal amount of participation purchased for each day from and including the day upon which the Mandatory Borrowing would otherwise have occurred but excluding the date of payment for such participation, at the rate equal to, if paid within two Business Days of the date of the Mandatory Borrowing, the Federal Funds Rate, and thereafter at a rate equal to the Base Rate.
          (c) . Swingline Loans shall bear interest at the simple per annum interest rate equal to the sum of (x) the Base Rate and (y) the Applicable Rate then in effect with respect to Base Rate Loans under the Revolving Credit Facility, computed on the basis of a year of 365/366 days for the actual number of days elapsed; , , that (i) from and after any failure to make any payment of principal or interest in respect of any of the Loans hereunder when due (after giving effect to any applicable grace period), whether at scheduled or accelerated maturity or on account of any mandatory prepayment or (ii) while any Swingline Loans in which the Lenders have acquired participations pursuant to remain outstanding, the principal of and, to the extent permitted by law, interest on, Swingline Loans shall bear interest, payable on demand, at the Default Rate. Interest on each Swingline Loan shall be payable in arrears on the date payment of such Swingline Loan is due pursuant to .
Interest on Swingline Loans
provided
however
Section 2.15(b)
Section 2.15(b)
          (d) . Unless the Swingline Lender is the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender shall provide to the Administrative Agent, on Friday of each week and on each date the Administrative Agent notifies the Swingline Lender that the Borrower has delivered a Committed Loan Notice or the Administrative Agent otherwise requests the same, an accounting for the outstanding Swingline Loans in form reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Reporting
          (e) . Unless a Default then exists, the Swingline Lender shall give the Borrower and the Administrative Agent at least seven days' prior written notice before exercising its discretion herein not to make Swingline Loans. The Borrower must give ten days' prior written notice to the Administrative Agent of any change in designation of the Swingline Lender. The replaced Swingline Lender shall continue to be a "" for purposes of repayment of any Swingline Loans made prior to such replacement and outstanding after such replacement.
Termination of Swingline Loans; Designation of Swingline Lender
Swingline Lender
          Section 2.16 . (a) If any Lender becomes, and during the period it remains, a Defaulting Lender or a Potential Defaulting Lender, if any Letter of Credit or Swingline Loan is at the time outstanding, the L/C Issuer and the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, may (except, in the case of a Defaulting Lender, to the extent the Commitments have been reallocated pursuant to ), by notice to the Borrower and such Defaulting Lender or Potential Defaulting Lender through the Administrative Agent, require the Borrower to Cash Collateralize the obligations of the Borrower to the L/C Issuer and the Swingline Lender in respect of such Letter of Credit or Swingline Loan, as the case may be, in amount at least equal to the aggregate amount of the unallocated obligations (contingent or otherwise) of such Defaulting Lender or such Potential Defaulting Lender in respect thereof, or to make other arrangements satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, and to the L/C Issuer and the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, in their reasonable discretion to protect them against the risk of non-payment by such Defaulting Lender or Potential Defaulting Lender.
Cash Collateral; Defaulting Lenders
Section 2.16(b)
          (b) In addition to the other conditions precedent herein set forth, if any Lender becomes, and during the period it remains, a Defaulting Lender or a Potential Defaulting Lender, the L/C Issuer will not be required to issue any Letter of Credit or to amend any
 
outstanding Letter of Credit, and the Swingline Lender will not be required to make any Swingline Loan, unless:
          (i) in the case of a Defaulting Lender, the L/C Obligations and the Outstanding Amount of Swingline Loans of such Defaulting Lender is reallocated, as to outstanding and future Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans, to the Non-Defaulting Lenders as provided in clause (i) of , and
Section 2.16(c)
          (ii) to the extent full reallocation does not occur as provided in clause (i) above, the Borrower Cash Collateralizes the obligations of the Borrower in respect of such Letter of Credit or Swingline Loan in an amount at least equal to the aggregate amount of the unallocated obligations (contingent or otherwise) of such Defaulting Lender or such Potential Defaulting Lender in respect of such Letter of Credit or Swingline Loan, or makes other arrangements satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Swingline Lender in their reasonable discretion to protect them against the risk of non-payment by such Defaulting Lender or Potential Defaulting Lender, or
          (iii) to the extent that neither reallocation nor Cash Collateralization occurs pursuant to clauses (i) or (ii), then in the case of a proposed issuance of a Letter of Credit or making of a Swingline Loan, by an instrument or instruments in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, and to the L/C Issuer and the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, (i) the Borrower agrees that the face amount of such requested Letter of Credit or the principal amount of such requested Swingline Loan will be reduced by an amount equal to the unallocated, non Cash-Collateralized portion thereof as to which such Defaulting Lender or Potential Defaulting Lender would otherwise be liable, and (ii) the Non-Defaulting Lenders confirm, in their discretion, that their obligations in respect of such Letter of Credit or Swingline Loan shall be reduced on a basis in accordance with the Commitments of the Non-Defaulting Lenders, and that the payment provisions of will be deemed adjusted to reflect this provision ( that nothing in this clause (iii) will be deemed to increase the Commitment of any Lender, nor to constitute a waiver or release of any claim the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, the Swingline Lender or any other Lender may have against such Defaulting Lender, nor to cause such Defaulting Lender to be a Non-Defaulting Lender).
pro
rata
pro
rata
Section 2.12
provided
          (c) If a Lender becomes, and during the period it remains, a Defaulting Lender, the following provisions shall apply with respect to any outstanding L/C Obligations and any Outstanding Amount of Swingline Loans of such Defaulting Lender:
          (i) the L/C Obligations and the Outstanding Amount of Swingline Loans of such Defaulting Lender will, upon notice by the Administrative Agent, and subject in any event to the limitation in the proviso below, automatically be reallocated (effective on the day such Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender) among the Non-Defaulting Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitments; that (a) the conditions set forth in and are satisfied at the time of such reallocation (with such reallocation being deemed a Credit Extension for purposes of such conditions), (b) the sum of the total outstanding Revolving Credit Loans and Swingline Loans owed to each Non-Defaulting Lender and its total L/C Obligations may not in any event exceed the Commitment of such Non-Defaulting Lender as in effect at the time of such reallocation, (c) such reallocation will not constitute a waiver or release
pro
rata
provided
Sections 5.02(a)
(b)
 
of any claim the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, the Swingline Lender or any other Lender may have against such Defaulting Lender, and (d) neither such reallocation nor any payment by a Non-Defaulting Bank as a result thereof will cause such Defaulting Lender to be a Non-Defaulting Lender;
          (ii) to the extent that any portion (the "") of the Defaulting Lender's L/C Obligations and Outstanding Amounts of Swingline Loans cannot be so reallocated, whether by reason of the proviso in clause (i) above or otherwise, the Borrower will, not later than three Business Days after demand by the Administrative Agent, (a) Cash Collateralize the obligations of the Borrower to the L/C Issuer and the Swingline Lender in respect of such L/C Obligations or Outstanding Amounts of Swingline Loans, as the case may be, in an amount at least equal to the aggregate amount of the unreallocated portion of such L/C Obligations or Outstanding Amounts of Swingline Loans, (b) in the case of such Outstanding Amount of Swingline Loans prepay in full the unreallocated portion thereof, or (c) make other arrangements satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, and to the L/C Issuer and the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, in their reasonable discretion to protect them against the risk of non-payment by such Defaulting Lender; and
unreallocated portion
          (iii) any amount paid by the Borrower for the account of a Defaulting Lender under this Credit Agreement (whether on account of principal, interest, fees, indemnity payments or other amounts) will not be paid or distributed to such Defaulting Lender, but shall instead be retained by the Administrative Agent in a segregated escrow account until (subject to ) the termination of the Commitments and payment in full of all obligations of the Borrower hereunder and will be applied by the Administrative Agent, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to the making of payments from time to time in the following order of priority:
Section 2.16(e)
      to the payment of any amounts owing by such Defaulting Lender to the Administrative Agent under this Credit Agreement,
first
      to the payment of any amounts owing by such Defaulting Lender to the L/C Issuer or the Swingline Lender ( as to the respective amounts owing to each of them) under this Credit Agreement,
second
pro
rata
      to the payment of post-default interest and then current interest due and payable to the Non-Defaulting Lenders hereunder, ratably among them in accordance with the amounts of such interest then due and payable to them,
third
      to the payment of fees then due and payable to the Non-Defaulting Lenders hereunder, ratably among them in accordance with the amounts of such fees then due and payable to them,
fourth
      to pay principal and unreimbursed L/C Borrowings then due and payable to the Non-Defaulting Lenders hereunder ratably in accordance with the amounts thereof then due and payable to them,
fifth
      to the ratable payment of other amounts then due and payable to the Non-Defaulting Lenders, and
sixth
 
      after the termination of the Commitments and payment in full of all obligations of the Borrower hereunder, to pay amounts owing under this Credit Agreement to such Defaulting Lender or as a court of competent jurisdiction may otherwise direct.
seventh
          (d) In furtherance of the foregoing, if any Lender becomes, and during the period it remains, a Defaulting Lender or a Potential Defaulting Lender, each of the L/C Issuer and the Swingline Lender is hereby authorized by the Borrower (which authorization is irrevocable and coupled with an interest) to give, through the Administrative Agent, Committed Loan Notices pursuant to in such amounts and in such times as may be required to (i) reimburse an outstanding L/C Borrowing, (ii) repay an outstanding Swingline Loans, or (iii) Cash Collateralize the obligations of the Borrower in respect of outstanding Letters of Credit or Swingline Loans in an amount at least equal to the aggregate amount of the unallocated obligations (contingent or otherwise) of such Defaulting Lender or Potential Defaulting Lender in respect of such Letter of Credit or Swingline Loan.
Section 2.03(c)(v)
          (e) If the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Swingline Lender agree in writing that a Lender that is a Defaulting Lender should no longer be deemed to be a Defaulting Lender, the Administrative Agent will so notify the parties hereto, whereupon as of the effective date specified in such notice and subject to any conditions set forth therein (which may include arrangements with respect to any amounts then held in the segregated escrow account referred to in ), such Lender shall purchase such portions of the outstanding Loans of the other Lenders, and/or make such other adjustments, as the Administrative Agent may determine to be necessary to cause the Lenders to hold Loans on a basis in accordance with their respective Commitments, whereupon such Lender shall cease to be a Defaulting Lender and will be a Non-Defaulting Lender (and the L/C Obligations and Outstanding Amount of Swingline Loans of each Lender shall automatically be adjusted on a prospective basis to reflect the foregoing); that no adjustments shall be made retroactively with respect to fees accrued or payments made by or on behalf of the Borrower and applied as set forth in while such Lender was a Defaulting Lender; and , , that except to the extent otherwise expressly agreed by the affected parties, no change hereunder from Defaulting Lender to Non-Defaulting Lender shall constitute a waiver or release of any claim of any party hereunder arising from such Lender's having been a Defaulting Lender.
Section 2.16(c)
pro
rata
provided
Section 2.16(c)(iii)
provided
further
          (f) If any Lender is a Defaulting Lender, the Borrower may, upon at least five Business Days' written notice to the Administrative Agent (which shall then give prompt notice thereof to the relevant Lender), replace such Lender with an Eligible Assignee selected by the Borrower in accordance with ; , , that no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing at the time of such request and at the time of such assignment; , , that the assigning Lender's rights under , and , and its obligations under , shall survive such assignment as to matters occurring prior to the date of assignment.
Section 10.12
provided
however
provided
further
Sections 3.01
3.04
10.04
Section 10.04
     Section 3.01 . (a) . Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall be made free and clear of and without reduction or withholding for any Indemnified Taxes or Other
Taxes
Payments Free of Taxes
 
Taxes, that if the Borrower shall be required by applicable law to deduct any Indemnified Taxes (including any Other Taxes) from such payments, then (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) the Borrower shall make such deductions and (iii) the Borrower shall timely pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
provided
          (b) . Without limiting the provisions of subsection (a) above, the Borrower shall timely pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Payment of Other Taxes by the Borrower
          (c) . The Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Lender and the L/C Issuer, within 10 days after demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes (including Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) paid by the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, and any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority; that the Borrower shall not indemnify the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer for any penalties or interest that are imposed solely as a result of gross negligence or willful misconduct of the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to the Borrower by a Lender or the L/C Issuer (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender or the L/C Issuer, shall be conclusive absent manifest error. If, in the reasonable discretion of the Borrower, any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes are incorrectly or not legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority, the Administrative Agent, each Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, shall, at the expense of the Borrower, use commercially reasonable efforts to cooperate with the Borrower to recover and promptly remit such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes to the Borrower in accordance with subsection (f) of this Section. Nothing contained herein shall derogate from the right of any Lender, the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer to arrange its tax affairs in whatever manner it sees fit nor shall require any Lender, the Administrative Agent or the L/C Issuer to disclose any information relating to its tax affairs that it deems confidential other than as required under .
Indemnification by the Borrower
provided
Section 3.01(e)
          (d) . As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes by the Borrower to a Governmental Authority, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Evidence of Payments
          (e) . Any Foreign Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding tax under the law of the jurisdiction in which the Borrower is resident for tax purposes, or any treaty to which such jurisdiction is a party, with respect to payments hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), at the time or times prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent, such properly completed and executed documentation prescribed by applicable law as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate of withholding. In addition, any Lender, if requested by
Status of Lenders
 
the Borrower or the Administrative Agent, shall deliver such other documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent as will enable the Borrower or the Administrative Agent to determine whether or not such Lender is subject to backup withholding or information reporting requirements.
     Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, if the Borrower is resident for tax purposes in the United States, any Foreign Lender shall deliver to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent (in such number of copies as shall be reasonably requested by the recipient) on or prior to the date on which such Foreign Lender becomes a Lender under this Credit Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the reasonable request of the Borrower or the Administrative Agent, but only if such Foreign Lender is legally entitled to do so), whichever of the following is applicable:
          (i) duly completed copies of Internal Revenue Service Form W-8BEN claiming eligibility for benefits of an income tax treaty to which the United States is a party,
          (ii) duly completed copies of Internal Revenue Service Form W-8ECI,
          (iii) in the case of a Foreign Lender claiming the benefits of the exemption for portfolio interest under section 881(c) of the Code, (A) a certificate to the effect that such Foreign Lender is not (1) a "bank" within the meaning of section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, (2) a "10 percent shareholder" of the Borrower within the meaning of section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code, or (3) a "controlled foreign corporation" described in section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code and (B) duly completed copies of Internal Revenue Service Form W-8BEN, or
          (iv) any other form prescribed by applicable law as a basis for claiming exemption from or a reduction in United States Federal withholding tax duly completed together with such supplementary documentation as may be prescribed by applicable law to permit the Borrower to determine the withholding or deduction required to be made (including, for the avoidance of doubt, documentation necessary for the Borrower or the Administrative Agent to comply with its obligations under FATCA, to determine whether any recipient of amounts arising under this Agreement has or has not complied with such recipient's obligations under FATCA, or to determine the amount to deduct and/or withhold from such amounts under FATCA).
          (f) . If the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer determines, in good faith, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Borrower or with respect to which the Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to this Section, it shall pay to the Borrower an amount equal to such refund (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Borrower under this Section with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund), that the Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer, agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Borrower (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer if the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the L/C Issuer is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. This subsection shall not be construed to require the Administrative
Treatment of Certain Refunds
provided
 
Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its taxes that it deems confidential) to the Borrower or any other Person.
     Section 3.02 . If any Lender determines that any Law has made it unlawful, or that any Governmental Authority has asserted that it is unlawful, for any Lender or its applicable Lending Office to make, maintain or fund Eurodollar Rate Loans, or to determine or charge interest rates based upon the Eurodollar Rate, or any Governmental Authority has imposed material restrictions on the authority of such Lender to purchase or sell, or to take deposits of, Dollars in the London interbank market, then, on notice thereof by such Lender to the Borrower through the Administrative Agent, any obligation of such Lender to make or continue Eurodollar Rate Loans or to convert Base Rate Loans to Eurodollar Rate Loans shall be suspended until such Lender notifies the Administrative Agent and the Borrower that the circumstances giving rise to such determination no longer exist. Upon receipt of such notice, the Borrower shall, upon demand from such Lender (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), prepay or, if applicable, convert all Eurodollar Rate Loans of such Lender to Base Rate Loans, either on the last day of the Interest Period therefor, if such Lender may lawfully continue to maintain such Eurodollar Rate Loans to such day, or immediately, if such Lender may not lawfully continue to maintain such Eurodollar Rate Loans. Upon any such prepayment or conversion, the Borrower shall also pay accrued interest on the amount so prepaid or converted.
Illegality
     Section 3.03 . If the Required Lenders determine that for any reason in connection with any request for a Eurodollar Rate Loan or a conversion to or continuation thereof that (a) Dollar deposits are not being offered to banks in the London interbank eurodollar market for the applicable amount and Interest Period of such Eurodollar Rate Loan, (b) adequate and reasonable means do not exist for determining the Eurodollar Base Rate for any requested Interest Period with respect to a proposed Eurodollar Rate Loan, or (c) the Eurodollar Base Rate for any requested Interest Period with respect to a proposed Eurodollar Rate Loan does not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders of funding such Loan, the Administrative Agent will promptly so notify the Borrower and each Lender. Thereafter, the obligation of the Lenders to make or maintain Eurodollar Rate Loans shall be suspended until the Administrative Agent (upon the instruction of the Required Lenders) revokes such notice. Upon receipt of such notice, the Borrower may revoke any pending request for a Borrowing of, conversion to or continuation of Eurodollar Rate Loans or, failing that, will be deemed to have converted such request into a request for a Committed Borrowing of Base Rate Loans in the amount specified therein.
Inability to Determine Rates
     Section 3.04 . (a) . If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs; Reserves on Eurodollar Rate Loans
Increased Costs Generally
          (i) impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit, compulsory loan, insurance charge or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended or participated in by, any Lender (except any reserve requirement reflected in the Eurodollar Rate contemplated by ) or the L/C Issuer;
Section 3.04(e)
          (ii) subject any Lender or the L/C Issuer to any tax of any kind whatsoever with respect to this Credit Agreement, any Letter of Credit, any participation in a Letter of Credit or any Eurodollar Rate Loan made by it, or change the basis of taxation of payments to such Lender or the L/C Issuer in respect thereof (except for Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes covered by and the imposition of, or any change in the rate of, any Excluded Tax payable by such Lender or the L/C Issuer); or
Section 3.01
 
          (iii) impose on any Lender or the L/C Issuer or the London interbank market any other condition, cost or expense affecting this Credit Agreement or Eurodollar Rate Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
     and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender of making or maintaining any Eurodollar Rate Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan), or to increase the cost to such Lender or the L/C Issuer of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit (or of maintaining its obligation to participate in or to issue any Letter of Credit), or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or the L/C Issuer hereunder (whether of principal, interest or any other amount) then, upon request of such Lender or the L/C Issuer, the Borrower will pay to such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
          (b) . If any Lender or the L/C Issuer determines that any Change in Law affecting such Lender or the L/C Issuer or any Lending Office of such Lender or such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company, if any, regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's capital or on the capital of such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Credit Agreement, the Commitments of such Lender or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by the L/C Issuer, to a level below that which such Lender or the L/C Issuer or such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's policies and the policies of such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Borrower will pay to such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the L/C Issuer or such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
Capital Requirements
          (c) . A certificate of a Lender or the L/C Issuer setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or the L/C Issuer or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in subsection (a) or (b) of this Section and delivered to the Borrower shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrower shall pay such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
Certificates for Reimbursement
          (d) . Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or the L/C Issuer to demand compensation pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's right to demand such compensation, that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Lender or the L/C Issuer pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this Section for any increased costs incurred or reductions suffered more than nine months prior to the date that such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as the case may be, notifies the Borrower of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's intention to claim compensation therefor (except that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the nine-month period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof).
Delay in Requests
provided
          (e) . The Borrower shall pay to each Lender, as long as such Lender shall be required to maintain reserves with respect to liabilities or
Reserves on Eurodollar Rate Loans
 
assets consisting of or including Eurocurrency funds or deposits (currently known as "Eurocurrency liabilities"), additional interest on the unpaid principal amount of each Eurodollar Rate Loan equal to the actual costs of such reserves allocated to such Loan by such Lender (as determined by such Lender in good faith, which determination shall be conclusive), which shall be due and payable on each date on which interest is payable on such Loan, provided the Borrower shall have received at least 10 days' prior notice (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) of such additional interest from such Lender. If a Lender fails to give notice 10 days prior to the relevant Interest Payment Date, such additional interest shall be due and payable 10 days from receipt of such notice.
     Section 3.05 . Upon demand of any Lender (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) from time to time, the Borrower shall promptly compensate such Lender for and hold such Lender harmless from any loss, cost or expense incurred by it as a result of:
Compensation for Losses
          (a) any continuation, conversion, payment or prepayment of any Loan other than a Base Rate Loan on a day other than the last day of the Interest Period for such Loan (whether voluntary, mandatory, automatic, by reason of acceleration, or otherwise);
          (b) any failure by the Borrower (for a reason other than the failure of such Lender to make a Loan) to prepay, borrow, continue or convert any Loan other than a Base Rate Loan on the date or in the amount notified by the Borrower; or
          (c) any assignment of a Eurodollar Rate Loan on a day other than the last day of the Interest Period therefor as a result of a request by the Borrower pursuant to ;
Section 10.12
     including any loss of anticipated profits and any loss or expense arising from the liquidation or reemployment of funds obtained by it to maintain such Loan or from fees payable to terminate the deposits from which such funds were obtained. The Borrower shall also pay any customary administrative fees charged by such Lender in connection with the foregoing.
     For purposes of calculating amounts payable by the Borrower to the Lenders under this , each Lender shall be deemed to have funded each Eurodollar Rate Loan made by it at the Eurodollar Base Rate used in determining the Eurodollar Rate for such Loan by a matching deposit or other borrowing in the London interbank eurodollar market for a comparable amount and for a comparable period, whether or not such Eurodollar Rate Loan was in fact so funded.
Section 3.05
     Section 3.06 . (a) . If any Lender requests compensation under , or the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to , or if any Lender gives a notice pursuant to , then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different Lending Office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to or , as the case may be, in the future, or eliminate the need for the notice pursuant to , as applicable, and (ii) in each case, would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender. The Borrower hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders
Designation of a Different Lending Office
Section 3.04
Section 3.01
Section 3.02
Section 3.01
Section 3.04
Section 3.02
 
          (b) . If any Lender requests compensation under , or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to , or if any Lender gives a notice pursuant to , the Borrower may replace such Lender in accordance with .
Replacement of Lenders
Section 3.04
Section 3.01
Section 3.02
Section 10.12
     Section 3.07 . All of the Borrower's obligations under this shall survive termination of the Aggregate Commitments and repayment of all other Obligations hereunder.
Survival
Article III
     Section 4.01 . Each of the Guarantors hereby, jointly and severally, absolutely and unconditionally guarantees, as a guaranty of payment and performance and not merely as a guaranty of collection, prompt payment when due, whether at stated maturity, by required prepayment, upon acceleration, demand or otherwise, and at all times thereafter, of any and all of the Obligations, whether for principal, interest, premiums, fees, indemnities, damages, costs, expenses or otherwise, of the Borrower to the Secured Parties, arising hereunder and under the other Loan Documents (including all renewals, extensions, amendments, refinancings and other modifications thereof and all costs, attorneys' fees and expenses incurred by the Secured Parties in connection with the collection or enforcement thereof). The Administrative Agent's books and records showing the amount of the Obligations shall be admissible in evidence in any action or proceeding, and shall be binding upon each Guarantor, and conclusive for the purpose of establishing the amount of the Obligations, absent manifest error. This Guaranty shall not be affected by the genuineness, validity, regularity or enforceability of the Obligations or any instrument or agreement evidencing any Obligations, or by the existence, validity, enforceability, perfection, non-perfection or extent of any collateral therefor, or by any fact or circumstance relating to the Obligations which might otherwise constitute a defense to the obligations of any Guarantor under this Guaranty, and each Guarantor hereby irrevocably waives any defenses it may now have or hereafter acquire in any way relating to any or all of the foregoing.
Guaranty
     Section 4.02 . Each Guarantor consents and agrees that the Secured Parties may, at any time and from time to time, without notice or demand, and without affecting the enforceability or continuing effectiveness hereof: (a) amend, extend, renew, compromise, discharge, accelerate or otherwise change the time for payment or the terms of the Obligations or any part thereof; (b) take, hold, exchange, enforce, waive, release, fail to perfect, sell, or otherwise dispose of any security for the payment of this Guaranty or any Obligations; (c) apply such security and direct the order or manner of sale thereof as the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Secured Parties in their sole discretion may determine; and (d) release or substitute one or more of any endorsers or other guarantors of any of the Obligations. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, each Guarantor consents to the taking of, or failure to take, any action which might in any manner or to any extent vary the risks of such Guarantor under this Guaranty or which, but for this provision, might operate as a discharge of such Guarantor.
Rights of Lenders
     Section 4.03 . Each Guarantor waives (a) any defense arising by reason of any disability, change in corporate existence or structure or other defense of the Borrower or any other Guarantor, or the cessation from any cause whatsoever (including any act or omission of any Secured Party) of the liability of the Borrower or any other Guarantor; (b) any defense based on any claim that such Guarantor's obligations exceed or are more burdensome
Certain Waivers
 
than those of the Borrower or any other Guarantor; (c) the benefit of any statute of limitations affecting such Guarantor's liability hereunder; (d) any right to proceed against the Borrower, proceed against or exhaust any security for the Obligations, or pursue any other remedy in the power of any Secured Party whatsoever; (e) any benefit of and any right to participate in any security now or hereafter held by any Secured Party; and (f) to the fullest extent permitted by law, any and all other defenses or benefits that may be derived from or afforded by applicable law limiting the liability of or exonerating guarantors or sureties. Each Guarantor expressly waives all setoffs and counterclaims and all presentments, demands for payment or performance, notices of nonpayment or nonperformance, protests, notices of protest, notices of dishonor and all other notices or demands of any kind or nature whatsoever with respect to the Obligations, and all notices of acceptance of this Guaranty or of the existence, creation or incurrence of new or additional Obligations.
     Section 4.04 . The obligations of each Guarantor hereunder are those of primary obligor, and not merely as surety, and are independent of the Obligations and the obligations of any other Guarantor, and a separate action may be brought against such Guarantor to enforce this Guaranty whether or not the Borrower or any other Person is joined as a party.
Obligations Independent
     Section 4.05 . Each Guarantor shall not exercise any right of subrogation, contribution, indemnity, reimbursement or similar rights with respect to any payments it makes under this Guaranty until all of the Obligations and any amounts payable under this Guaranty have been indefeasibly paid and performed in full and the Commitments and the Facilities are terminated. If any amounts are paid to any Guarantor in violation of the foregoing limitation, then such amounts shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Secured Parties and shall forthwith be paid to the Secured Parties to reduce the amount of the Obligations, whether matured or unmatured.
Subrogation
     Section 4.06 . This Guaranty is a continuing and irrevocable guaranty of all Obligations now or hereafter existing and shall remain in full force and effect until all Obligations and any other amounts payable under this Guaranty are indefeasibly paid in full in cash and the Commitments and the Facilities with respect to the Obligations are terminated. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this Guaranty shall continue in full force and effect or be revived, as the case may be, if any payment by or on behalf of the Borrower or any Guarantor is made, or any of the Secured Parties exercises its right of setoff, in respect of the Obligations and such payment or the proceeds of such setoff or any part thereof is subsequently invalidated, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside or required (including pursuant to any settlement entered into by any of the Secured Parties in their discretion) to be repaid to a trustee, receiver or any other party, in connection with any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Laws or otherwise, all as if such payment had not been made or such setoff had not occurred and whether or not the Secured Parties are in possession of or have released this Guaranty and regardless of any prior revocation, rescission, termination or reduction. The obligations of each Guarantor under this paragraph shall survive termination of this Guaranty.
Termination; Reinstatement
     Section 4.07 . Each Guarantor hereby subordinates the payment of all obligations and indebtedness of the Borrower owing to such Guarantor, whether now existing or hereafter arising, including but not limited to any obligation of the Borrower to such Guarantor as subrogee of the Secured Parties or resulting from such Guarantor's performance under this Guaranty, to the indefeasible payment in full in cash of all Obligations. If the Secured Parties so request, any such obligation or indebtedness of the Borrower to any Guarantor shall be enforced and performance received by such Guarantor as trustee for the Secured Parties and the proceeds
Subordination
 
thereof shall be paid over to the Secured Parties on account of the Obligations, but without reducing or affecting in any manner the liability of such Guarantor under this Guaranty.
     Section 4.08 . If acceleration of the time for payment of any of the Obligations is stayed, in connection with any case commenced by or against any Guarantor or the Borrower under any Debtor Relief Laws, or otherwise, all such amounts shall nonetheless be payable by such Guarantor immediately upon demand by the Secured Parties.
Stay of Acceleration
     Section 4.09 . Each Guarantor acknowledges and agrees that it has the sole responsibility for, and has adequate means of, obtaining from the Borrower and any other Guarantor such information concerning the financial condition, business and operations of the Borrower and any such other Guarantor as such Guarantor requires, and that none of the Secured Parties has any duty, and such Guarantor is not relying on the Secured Parties at any time, to disclose to such Guarantor any information relating to the business, operations or financial condition of the Borrower or any other Guarantor (such Guarantor waiving any duty on the part of the Secured Parties to disclose such information and any defense relating to the failure to provide the same).
Condition of Borrower
     Section 4.10 . It is the intention of the Guarantors, the Lenders and the Borrower that the obligations of each Guarantor hereunder shall be in, but not in excess of, the maximum amount permitted by applicable law. To that end, but only to the extent such obligations would otherwise be avoidable, the obligations of each Guarantor hereunder shall be limited to the maximum amount that, after giving effect to the incurrence thereof, would not render such Guarantor insolvent or unable to make payments in respect of any of its indebtedness as such indebtedness matures or leave such Guarantor with an unreasonably small capital. The need for any such limitation shall be determined, and any such needed limitation shall be effective, at the time or times that such Guarantor is deemed, under applicable law, to incur the Obligations hereunder. Any such limitation shall be apportioned amongst the Obligations pro rata in accordance with the respective amounts thereof. This paragraph is intended solely to preserve the rights of the Lenders under this Credit Agreement to the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, and neither the Guarantors, the Borrower nor any other Person shall have any right under this paragraph that it would not otherwise have under applicable law. The Borrower and each Guarantor agree not to commence any proceeding or action seeking to limit the amount of the obligation of such Guarantor under this by reason of this paragraph. For the purposes of this paragraph, "insolvency", "unreasonably small capital" and "unable to make payments in respect of any of its indebtedness as such indebtedness matures" shall be determined in accordance with applicable law.
Limitation on Guaranty
Article IV
     Section 4.11 . Upon the execution and delivery by any Person of a guaranty supplement in substantially the form of hereto (each, a ""), (i) such Person shall become and be a Guarantor hereunder, and each reference in the Loan Documents to a "Guarantor" shall also mean and be a reference to such Person, and each reference in any other Loan Document to a "Guarantor" shall also mean and be a reference to such Person, and (ii) each reference in the Loan Documents to "the Guaranty", "thereunder", "thereof" or words of like import referring to this Guaranty, shall mean and be a reference to this Guaranty as supplemented by such Guaranty Supplement.
Guaranty Supplements
Exhibit K
Guaranty Supplement
 
         Section 5.01 . The obligation of the L/C Issuer and each Lender to make the initial Credit Extension hereunder is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions precedent on or prior to the date of such initial Credit Extension:
Conditions of Initial Credit Extension
          (a) . The Administrative Agent's receipt of the following, each of which shall be originals or facsimiles (followed promptly by originals) unless otherwise specified, each properly executed by a Responsible Officer of the signing Loan Party, each dated the Closing Date (or, in the case of certificates of governmental officials, a recent date before the Closing Date) and each in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and each of the Lenders:
Execution of Loan Documents and Notes
          (i) this Credit Agreement duly executed and delivered by each of the Borrower, the Guarantors, the Lenders named on the signature pages hereof, the Swingline Lender, the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent;
          (ii) a Note executed by the Borrower in favor of each Lender requesting a Note; and
          (iii) the Pledge Agreement, the Security Agreement and the Intellectual Property Security Agreement(s), each duly executed and delivered by each of the Loan Parties party thereto and the Collateral Agent, together with:
          (A) with respect to the Pledge Agreement, certificates representing the Pledged Equity Interests referred to therein accompanied by undated stock powers executed in blank;
          (B) proper UCC-1 Financing Statements in form appropriate for filing under the Uniform Commercial Code of all jurisdictions that the Collateral Agent may deem necessary in order to perfect the Liens created under each of the Collateral Documents, covering the Collateral described in the Collateral Documents; and
          (C) evidence that all other action that the Collateral Agent may deem necessary in order to perfect the Liens created under the Collateral Documents has been taken (including receipt of duly executed payoff letters and UCC-3 termination statements).
          (b) . Each of the Loan Parties shall have certified to the Administrative Agent (with copies to be provided for each Lender) the name and signature of each of the persons authorized (i) to sign on its respective behalf this Credit Agreement and each of the other Loan Documents to which it is a party and (ii) in the case of the Borrower, to borrow under this Credit Agreement. The Lenders may conclusively rely on such certifications until they receive notice in writing from such Loan Party, as the case may be, to the contrary.
Signatures
          (c) . The Administrative Agent shall have received a loan certificate of each Loan Party, in substantially the form of , together with appropriate attachments which shall include, without limitation, the following items: (i) a true, complete and
Loan Certificates
Exhibit J
 
correct copy of the articles of incorporation, certificate of limited partnership or certificate of formation or organization of such Loan Party, certified by the Secretary of State of such Loan Party's organization, (ii) a true, complete and correct copy of the by-laws, partnership agreement or limited liability company or operating agreement of such Loan Party, (iii) a copy of the resolutions of the board of directors or other appropriate entity of such Loan Party authorizing the execution, delivery and performance by such Loan Party of this Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents to which it is a party and, with respect to the Borrower, authorizing the borrowings hereunder, and (iv) certificates of existence of such Loan Party issued by the Secretary of State or similar state official for the state of such Loan Party's organization.
          (d) . The Lenders shall have received favorable opinions of:
Opinions of Counsel to the Borrower and the Other Loan Parties
          (i) the general counsel for the Borrower and the other Loan Parties, substantially in the form of ; and
Exhibit E
          (ii) Sullivan & Cromwell LLP, special New York counsel to the Borrower and the other Loan Parties, substantially in the form of ;
Exhibit F
and covering such other matters as any Lender or Lenders or special New York counsel to the Administrative Agent, Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP, may reasonably request (and for purposes of such opinions such counsel may rely upon opinions of counsel in other jurisdictions, that such other counsel are satisfactory to special counsel to the Administrative Agent and such other opinions state that the Lenders are entitled to rely thereon).
provided
          (e) . Each Lender shall have received a favorable opinion of Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP, special New York counsel to the Administrative Agent, substantially in the form of and covering such other matters as any Lender or Lenders may reasonably request.
Opinion of Lenders' Counsel
Exhibit G
          (f) . The Lenders shall have received a Compliance Certificate showing that, after giving effect to this Credit Agreement and the Indebtedness contemplated to be incurred by the Borrower on the Closing Date and the use of proceeds thereof, (i) the Borrower is in compliance with the provisions of this Credit Agreement on a pro forma basis as of the Closing Date and (ii) the Cash Flow Ratio on the Closing Date after giving effect to all transactions contemplated by the Loan Documents on a pro forma basis shall not exceed 7.00 to 1.00.
Compliance Certificate
          (g) . Such other documents, filings, instruments and papers relating to the documents referred to herein and the transactions contemplated hereby as any Lender or special counsel to the Administrative Agent shall reasonably require shall have been received by the Administrative Agent, including information reasonably requested as described in Section 10.16.
Other Documents
          (h) . All fees required to be paid to the Administrative Agent, the Joint Lead Arrangers and the other Lenders on or before the Closing Date shall have been paid. Unless waived by the Administrative Agent, the Borrower shall have paid all fees, charges and disbursements of counsel to the Administrative Agent to the extent properly invoiced prior to or on the Closing Date, plus such additional amounts of such fees, charges and disbursements as shall constitute its reasonable estimate of such fees, charges and disbursements incurred or to be
Certain Fees
 
incurred by it through the closing proceedings ( that such estimate shall not thereafter preclude a final settling of accounts between the Borrower and the Administrative Agent).
provided
          (i) . The Borrower shall have obtained all consents and approvals of, and made all filings and registrations with, any Governmental Authority set forth on required with respect to this Credit Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby (other than as specified in ).
Regulatory Approvals
Schedule 6.03
Schedule 6.03
          (j) . The Administrative Agent shall have received (a) audited consolidated financial statements of the Borrower and its subsidiaries for the two fiscal years ended December 31, 2010 (and also, in the case of the year ended December 31, 2010, on a basis, unaudited consolidated financial statements giving effect to the Transaction as if it occurred at the beginning of such period), and unaudited consolidated financial statements of the Borrower and its subsidiaries (subject to year-end and audit adjustments) for any interim quarterly periods that have ended since the most recent of such audited financial statements and at least 45 days prior to the Closing Date, it being understood and agreed that the financial statements included in the Form 10 of the Borrower have been received by the Administrative Agent and satisfy this clause (a), and (b) forecasts prepared by management of the Borrower and its subsidiaries, each in form reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Financial Statements
pro forma
          (k) . A Solvency Certificate attesting to the Solvency of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, after giving effect to the Transaction and the incurrence of indebtedness related thereto, from the chief financial officer of the Borrower.
Solvency Certificate
          (l) . The Joint Lead Arrangers shall be satisfied that all transactions required to be completed as a condition to the tax-free nature of the Distribution Transaction have been completed or will be completed simultaneously with the initial fundings under the Facility.
Distribution Transaction
          (m) . The Lenders shall have received satisfactory evidence that the Existing RNS Credit Agreement concurrently with the Closing Date is being terminated and all Liens securing obligations under the Existing RNS Credit Agreement concurrently with the Closing Date are being released.
Existing RNS Credit Agreement
          (n) . The Borrower shall have received a corporate credit rating of the Borrower after giving effect to the Transaction and a rating for each of the Facilities, in each case, from Moody's and S&P.
Debt Ratings
          (o) . There shall not have occurred since December 31, 2010 any Materially Adverse Effect.
No Materially Adverse Effect
          (p) . The Administrative Agent shall have received a Request for Credit Extension in accordance with the requirements hereof.
Request for Credit Extension
Without limiting the generality of the provisions of , for purposes of determining compliance with the conditions specified in this , each Lender that has signed this Credit Agreement shall be deemed to have consented to, approved or accepted or to be satisfied with, each document or other matter required thereunder to be consented to or approved by or acceptable or satisfactory to a Lender unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from such Lender prior to the proposed Closing Date specifying its objection thereto.
Section 9.04
Section 5.01
 
          Section 5.02 . The obligation of the L/C Issuer and each Lender to make each Credit Extension hereunder (which shall not include any conversion or continuation of any outstanding Loan or any Credit Extension the proceeds of which are to reimburse (i) the Swingline Lender for Swingline Loans or (ii) the L/C Issuer for amounts drawn under a Letter of Credit) is subject to the additional conditions precedent that:
Conditions to all Credit Extensions
          (a) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would result from such proposed Credit Extension or from the application of proceeds thereof;
          (b) the representations and warranties of the Borrower and each other Loan Party in hereof or any other Loan Document, or which are contained in any document furnished at any time under or in connection herewith or therewith, shall be true and correct, in all material respects, on and as of the date of the making of, and after giving effect to, such Credit Extension with the same force and effect as if made on and as of such date, except to the extent that such representations and warranties expressly relate to an earlier date, in which case they shall be true and correct, in all material respects, as of such earlier date, and except that for purposes of this , the representations and warranties contained in and shall be deemed to refer to the most recent statements furnished pursuant to and , respectively;
Article VI
Section 5.02
Section 6.04(a)
(b)
Section 7.01(b)
(a)
          (c) to the extent requested by the Administrative Agent or any Lender, a senior executive of the Borrower shall have certified compliance with clauses (a) and (b) above to the Administrative Agent; and
          (d) the Administrative Agent and, if applicable, the L/C Issuer shall have received a Request for Credit Extension in accordance with the requirements hereof.
          The Borrower shall be deemed to have made a representation and warranty hereunder as of the time of each Credit Extension hereunder that the conditions specified in such clauses have been fulfilled as of such time.
          Each Loan Party represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders as follows:
          Section 6.01 . Each Loan Party and each of their Restricted Subsidiaries is a limited or general partnership, limited liability company or corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the Laws of its jurisdiction of organization and is duly qualified to transact business and is in good standing in all jurisdictions in which such qualification is necessary in view of the properties and assets owned and presently intended to be owned and the business transacted and presently intended to be transacted by it except for qualifications the lack of which, singly or in the aggregate, have not had and are not likely to have a Materially Adverse Effect, and each Loan Party and each of their Restricted Subsidiaries has full power, authority and legal right to perform its obligations under this Credit Agreement, the Notes and the other Loan Documents to which it is a party.
Existence, Qualification and Power
          Section 6.02 . and contain a complete and correct list, as of the Closing Date, of all Restricted Subsidiaries and
Subsidiaries; Affiliates; Loan Parties
Schedules 1.01(i)
1.01(ii)
 
Unrestricted Subsidiaries of the Borrower, respectively, and a description of the legal nature of such Subsidiaries (including, with respect to each Restricted Subsidiary, the jurisdiction of its incorporation or organization, the address of its principal place of business and its U.S. taxpayer identification number), the nature of the ownership interests (shares of stock or general or limited partnership or other interests) in such Subsidiaries and the holders of such interests and, except as disclosed to the Lenders in writing prior to the Closing Date, the Borrower and each of its Subsidiaries owns all of the ownership interests of its Subsidiaries indicated in such Schedules as being owned by the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, free and clear of all Liens except those created under the Collateral Documents, and all such ownership interests are validly issued and, in the case of shares of stock, fully paid and non-assessable. contains a complete and correct list, as of the Closing Date, of all Controlled Affiliates of the Borrower that are not Subsidiaries of the Borrower, the nature of the respective ownership interests in each such Affiliate, and the holder of each such interest.
Schedule 6.02
          Section 6.03 . The execution, delivery and performance by each of the Loan Parties of each Loan Document to which it is a party, and each Credit Extension hereunder, have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate or other organizational action and do not and will not: (a) subject to the consummation of the action described in hereof, violate any Law currently in effect (other than violations that, singly or in the aggregate, have not had and are not likely to have a Materially Adverse Effect), or any provision of any of the Borrower's or the Restricted Subsidiaries' respective organizational documents presently in effect; (b) conflict with or result in the breach of, or constitute a default or require any consent (except for the consents described on , each of which has been duly obtained) under, or require any payment to be made under (i) any Contractual Obligation to which the Borrower or any of the Restricted Subsidiaries is a party or their respective properties may be bound or affected or (ii) any order, injunction, writ or decree of any Governmental Authority or any arbitral award to which the Borrower or any of the Restricted Subsidiaries or their respective properties are subject (in each case, other than any conflict, breach, default or required consent that, singly or in the aggregate, have not had and are not likely to have a Materially Adverse Effect); or (c) except as provided under any Loan Document, result in, or require, the creation or imposition of any Lien upon or with respect to any of the properties or assets now owned or hereafter acquired by the Borrower or any of the Restricted Subsidiaries.
Authority; No Conflict
Section 6.12
Schedule 6.03
          Section 6.04 . The Borrower has furnished to each Lender:
Financial Condition
          (a) The consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of December 31, 2010, and the related consolidated statements of operations and members' capital or deficiency for the fiscal year ended on said date, said financial statements having been certified by a Registered Public Accounting Firm of nationally recognized standing reasonably acceptable to the Required Lenders; and
          (b) The unaudited consolidated balance sheets of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of March 31, 2011, and the related consolidated statements of operations for the Quarter then ended.
          All financial statements referred to above (i) are complete and correct in all material respects (subject, in the case of the unaudited financial statements referred to above, to year-end and audit adjustments), (ii) were prepared in accordance with GAAP consistently applied throughout the period covered thereby, except as otherwise expressly noted therein, and (iii) fairly present the financial condition of the respective entity or groups of entities which is or are the subject of such financial statements (as stated above), on a consolidated basis, as of the
 
respective dates of the balance sheets included in such financial statements and the results of operations of such entity or groups of entities for the respective periods ended on said dates.
          None of the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries had on any of said dates any material contingent liabilities, liabilities for Taxes, unusual forward or long-term commitments or unrealized or anticipated losses from any unfavorable commitments or operations which are substantial in amount, except as referred to or reflected or provided for in said financial statements of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of said respective dates or as disclosed to the Lenders in writing prior to the Closing Date. Except as disclosed to the Lenders in writing prior to the Closing Date, since December 31, 2010, there has been no material adverse change in the financial condition (from that shown by the respective balance sheet as of December 31, 2010 included in said financial statements) or the businesses or operations of the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries taken as a whole on a pro forma combined basis (after giving effect to the Indebtedness contemplated to be incurred on the Closing Date and the use of proceeds thereof).
          Section 6.05 . Except as disclosed to the Lenders on , there are no actions, suits, proceedings, claims or disputes pending, or to the knowledge of any Loan Party threatened, against any Loan Party or any Restricted Subsidiary or any of their respective properties or assets, before any court or arbitrator or by or before any Governmental Authority that, singly or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Materially Adverse Effect. None of the Loan Parties or any Restricted Subsidiary is in default under or in violation of or with respect to any Laws or any writ, injunction or decree of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority, except for (a) defaults or violations that have been cured or remedied on or prior to the date of this Credit Agreement and (b) defaults or violations which, if continued unremedied, would not be reasonably expected to have a Materially Adverse Effect.
Litigation, Compliance with Laws
Schedule 6.05
          Section 6.06 . Except as set forth on , each of the Loan Parties and the Restricted Subsidiaries has good title to its properties and assets, free and clear of all Liens, except those permitted by . To the knowledge of the Loan Parties, each of the Loan Parties and their Restricted Subsidiaries owns, or has the right to use, all Intellectual Property necessary for each of them to conduct its business substantially in the same manner as currently conducted, except to the extent that the failure to own or have such right would not be reasonably expected to have a Materially Adverse Effect. sets forth a complete and accurate list in all material respects as of the Closing Date of the locations of all Material Real Property owned by the Borrower or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries showing the street address or other relevant information and state.
Titles and Liens
Schedule 7.17
Section 7.17
Schedule 6.06
          Section 6.07 . (a) None of the proceeds of any of the Credit Extensions shall be used to purchase or carry, or to reduce or retire or refinance any credit incurred to purchase or carry, any Margin Stock or to extend credit to others for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any Margin Stock. If requested by the Administrative Agent or any Lender, the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent or such Lender statements in conformity with the requirements of Regulation U.
Regulation U; Investment Company Act
          (b) None of the Borrower, any Person Controlling the Borrower, or any Subsidiary is or is required to be registered as an "investment company" under the Investment Company Act of 1940.
          Section 6.08 . Each of the Loan Parties and the Restricted Subsidiaries has filed all Federal, state and other material tax returns that are required to be filed under any law
Taxes
 
applicable thereto except such returns as to which the failure to file, singly or in the aggregate, has not had and will not have a Materially Adverse Effect, and has paid, or made provision for the payment of, all Taxes shown to be due pursuant to said returns or pursuant to any assessment received by any of the Loan Parties or any of the Restricted Subsidiaries, except such Taxes, if any, as are being contested in good faith and as to which adequate reserves have been provided or as to which the failure to pay, singly or in the aggregate, has not had and is not likely to have a Materially Adverse Effect.
          Section 6.09 . The Obligations constitute "Senior Debt" (or the equivalent term) as such term is defined in each Subordinated Debt Document to which the Borrower or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries is a party and that contains such a definition or any similar definition.
Senior Debt
          Section 6.10 . None of the financial statements referred to in , certificates or any other written statements delivered by or on behalf of any Loan Party to the Administrative Agent or any Lender contains, as of the Closing Date, any untrue statement of a material fact nor do such financial statements, certificates and such other written statements, taken as a whole, omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements contained therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
Full Disclosure
Section 6.04
          Section 6.11 . None of the Loan Parties or their Restricted Subsidiaries is in default in the payment or performance or observance of any material Contractual Obligation, which default, either alone or in conjunction with all other such defaults, has had or is likely to have a Materially Adverse Effect.
No Default
          Section 6.12 . Except as set forth on , no approval or consent of, or filing or registration with, any (x) Governmental Authority or (y) any other third party, in the case of this ) pursuant to any Contractual Obligation that is material to the business of the Borrower or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries, is required in connection with (a) the execution, delivery and performance by, or enforcement against, any of the Loan Parties of any Loan Document to which it is a party, (b) the grant by any of the Loan Parties of the Liens granted by it pursuant to the Collateral Documents, (c) the perfection or maintenance of the Liens created under the Collateral Documents (including the first priority nature thereof) or (d) the exercise by the Administrative Agent or any Lender of its rights under the Loan Documents or the remedies in respect of the Collateral pursuant to the Collateral Documents. All approvals, consents, filings, registrations or other actions described in have been duly obtained, taken, given or made and are in full force and effect (other than as set forth in ).
Governmental and Third Party Approvals
Schedule 6.03
clause (y
Schedule 6.03
Schedule 6.03
          Section 6.13 . This Credit Agreement constitutes, and each other Loan Document when executed and delivered will constitute, the legal, valid and binding obligations of each of the Loan Parties that is a party thereto, enforceable in accordance with their respective terms (except for limitations on enforceability under bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency and other similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and limitations on the availability of the remedy of specific performance imposed by the application of general equitable principles).
Binding Agreements
          Section 6.14 . Except as disclosed to the Lenders in writing prior to the Closing Date, there are no collective bargaining agreements between the Borrower or the Restricted Subsidiaries and any trade or labor union or other employee collective bargaining agent.
Collective Bargaining Agreements
 
          Section 6.15 . contains a complete and correct list, as of the Closing Date, of all Investments of the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries (other than any Investments in other Restricted Subsidiaries) in excess of $5,000,000, showing the respective amounts of each such Investment and the respective entity (or group thereof) in which each such Investment has been made.
Investments
Schedule 6.15
          Section 6.16 . Except that would not reasonably be expected to have a Materially Adverse Effect, (i) neither the Borrower nor any ERISA Affiliate has, as a result of maintaining or terminating a Plan or withdrawing from a Multiemployer Plan, (A) incurred, or reasonably expects to incur, any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to any Plan, (B) incurred, or reasonably expects to incur, any liability under Section 4201 or 4203 of ERISA with respect to a Multiemployer Plan, or (C) engaged in a transaction during the past five years that could be subject to Section 4069 or 4212(c) of ERISA; (ii) no Termination Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur with respect to any Plan; (iii) neither the Borrower nor any ERISA Affiliate has been notified by the sponsor of a Multiemployer Plan that such Multiemployer Plan is in reorganization (within the meaning of Section 4241 of ERISA), insolvent (within the meaning of Section 4245 of ERISA) or has been determined to be in "endangered" or "critical" status within the meaning of Section 432 of the Code or Section 305 of ERISA, and no such Multiemployer Plan is reasonably expected to be in reorganization, insolvent or in "endangered" or "critical" status.
ERISA Compliance
          Section 6.17 . As of the Closing Date, the Loan Parties and their Restricted Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, after giving effect to the transactions contemplated hereby and by the other Loan Documents, are Solvent.
Solvency
          Section 6.18 Except as would not individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Materially Adverse Effect, since December 31, 2010, neither the businesses nor the properties of any Loan Party or any Restricted Subsidiary is or has been affected by any fire, explosion, accident or other casualty (whether or not covered by insurance).
Casualty, Etc.
          Section 6.19 . The provisions of the Collateral Documents are effective to create in favor of the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties a legal, valid and enforceable first priority Lien (subject to Liens permitted by ) on all right, title and interest of the Borrower and the Guarantors in the Collateral described therein. Except for filings completed prior to the Closing Date or as otherwise contemplated hereby or by the Collateral Documents, no filing or other action will be necessary to perfect such Liens.
Collateral Documents
Section 7.17
          Section 6.20 . Except as set forth on and with such exceptions as, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to have a Materially Adverse Effect:
Environmental Compliance
Schedule 6.20
     (i) (A) the business of the Loan Parties and their Restricted Subsidiaries is in compliance with all applicable Environmental Laws; and (B) all real property owned by the Loan Parties and their Restricted Subsidiaries is in compliance with all applicable Environmental Laws;
     (ii) (A) to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, there are no underground storage tanks on any of the real property owned by the Loan Parties or any of their Restricted Subsidiaries, and (B) to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, no Hazardous Materials have been spilled or released in, on or under any of the real property owned by the Loan Parties or any of their Restricted
 
Subsidiaries in an amount that would trigger a reporting or remediation obligation under current Environmental Laws;
     (iii) none of the Loan Parties or their Restricted Subsidiaries have received any written notice, order, directive, claim or demand from any Governmental Authority with respect to any actual or potential liability under Environmental Laws on the part of any Loan Party or Restricted Subsidiary in connection with the business of the Loan Parties and their Restricted Subsidiaries that remains outstanding;
     (iv) to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, none of the Loan Parties, their Restricted Subsidiaries nor any of their respective predecessors is currently in any negotiations with any person that would require, and agreements or undertakings with any Person that require, the cleanup of Hazardous Materials on the real property or any third party site by the Loan Parties and their Restricted Subsidiaries;
     (v) no Hazardous Materials generated by the Loan Parties or their Restricted Subsidiaries in connection with the business of the Loan Parties or their Restricted Subsidiaries are the subject of a written claim or demand from any third party;
     (vi) no actions or proceedings are pending or, to the knowledge of the Borrower, threatened, to revoke, modify or terminate any permit issued to the Loan Parties or their Restricted Subsidiaries under Environmental Laws; and
     (vii) with respect to the business of the Loan Parties and their Restricted Subsidiaries, neither the Borrower nor the Loan Parties nor their Restricted Subsidiaries are the subject of any outstanding written notice, order or claim with any Governmental Authority or other Person relating to the business of the Loan Parties and their Restricted Subsidiaries regarding Environmental Laws.
          Section 6.21 . (Existing Indebtedness), (Existing Guarantees) and (Existing Liens) contain complete and correct lists, as of the Closing Date, of all credit agreements, indentures, purchase agreements, obligations in respect of letters of credit, guarantees and other instruments (including Capital Lease Obligations) in effect on the Closing Date providing for, evidencing, securing or otherwise relating to any Indebtedness of the Loan Parties or their Restricted Subsidiaries in a principal or face amount equal to $5,000,000 or more and such lists correctly set forth the names of the debtor or lessee and creditor or lessor with respect to the Indebtedness outstanding or to be outstanding thereunder, the rate of interest or rentals, a description of any security given or to be given therefor, and the maturity or maturities or expiration date or dates thereof.
Other Debt
Schedule 7.15
Schedule 7.16
Schedule 7.17
     From the Closing Date and so long as the Commitments of the Lenders shall be in effect and until the payment in full of all Obligations hereunder, the expiration or termination of all Letters of Credit and the performance of all other Obligations of the Loan Parties under the Loan Documents, each of the Loan Parties agrees that, unless (x) in the case of a Financial Covenant, the Required Revolving/Term A Lenders and (y) in the case of any other covenant, the Required Lenders, shall otherwise consent in writing:
 
          A. Informational Covenants:
        Section 7.01 . The Borrower will deliver to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Financial Statements and Other Information
          (a) As soon as available and in any event within 60 days after the end of each of the first three Quarters of each fiscal year of the Borrower: (A) consolidated statements of operations of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries, taken together, and, for any Restricted Group Reporting Period, of the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries, taken together, for such Quarter and for the period from the beginning of such fiscal year to the end of such Quarter and (B) the related consolidated balance sheets and consolidated cash flow statements of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries, taken together, and, for any Restricted Group Reporting Period, of the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries, taken together, as of the end of such Quarter (which financial statements (other than statements of cash flows) shall set forth in comparative form the corresponding figures as of the end of and for the corresponding Quarter in the preceding fiscal year), all in reasonable detail and accompanied by a certificate in the form of of a senior financial executive of the Borrower certifying such financial statements as fairly presenting the financial condition and results of operations of the respective entities covered thereby in accordance with GAAP, excluding accompanying footnotes to the consolidated financial statements and subject, however, to year-end and audit adjustments, which certificate shall include a statement that the senior financial executive signing the same has no knowledge, except as specifically stated, that any Default has occurred and is continuing.
Exhibit D-1
          (b) As soon as available and in any event within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Borrower: (A) consolidated statements of operations of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries, taken together, and, for any Restricted Group Reporting Period, of the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries, taken together, for such fiscal year, and (B) the related consolidated balance sheets and cash flow statements of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries, taken together, and, for any Restricted Group Reporting Period, of the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries, taken together, as of the end of such fiscal year (which financial statements (other than cash flow statements), beginning with the financial statements for the year ended December 31, 2012, shall set forth in comparative form the corresponding figures as of the end of and for the preceding fiscal year), all in reasonable detail and prepared in accordance with GAAP and accompanied by (x) an opinion of a Registered Public Accounting Firm of nationally recognized standing selected by the Borrower and reasonably acceptable to the Required Lenders as to said consolidated financial statements of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries and a certificate of such accountants stating that, in making the examination necessary for said opinion, they obtained no knowledge, except as specifically stated, of any failure by the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiaries to perform or observe any of its covenants relating to financial matters in this Credit Agreement, and (y) a certificate in the form of of a senior financial executive of the Borrower stating that such financial statements are correct and complete and fairly present the financial condition and results of operations of the respective entities covered thereby as of the end of and for such fiscal year and that the executive signing the same has no knowledge, except as specifically stated, that any Default has occurred and is continuing.
Exhibit D-2
          (c) Promptly after their becoming available, to the extent not provided pursuant to or , copies of all financial statements and reports which the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary shall have sent to the holders of the Senior Notes, any Permitted Debt and any Indebtedness specified in , to the extent such statements and reports
Section 7.01(a)
7.01(b)
Schedule 7.15
 
contain information relating to the designation of the Borrower's Subsidiaries as "restricted subsidiaries" under the Debt Instruments governing any such Indebtedness, and to the calculation of financial ratios thereunder and copies of all regular and periodic reports, if any, which the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary shall have filed with the SEC or with any national securities exchange.
          (d) Concurrently with the delivery of the financial statements referred to in and (or on or prior to December 30, 2011 in the case of the Quarter ending September 30, 2011), a Compliance Certificate, duly completed signed by the chief executive officer, chief financial officer, treasurer or controller of the Borrower.
Section 7.01(a)
(b)
          (e) As soon as possible and in any event within ten days after any senior executive of the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary or of any general partner of any Restricted Subsidiary shall have obtained knowledge of the occurrence of a Default, a statement describing such Default and the action which is proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
          (f) From time to time, with reasonable promptness, such further information regarding the business, affairs and financial condition of the Loan Parties and their Restricted Subsidiaries as the Administrative Agent or any Lender, through the Administrative Agent, may reasonably request.
          (g) Concurrently with the delivery of the financial statements referred to in and , a list of any new, or redesignation with respect to, Restricted Subsidiaries and Unrestricted Subsidiaries.
Section 7.01(a)
(b)
          (h) As soon as available, but in any event within the time period in which the Borrower must deliver its annual audited financials under , a report supplementing , identifying all Material Real Property acquired or disposed of by any Loan Party during such fiscal year.
Section 7.01(a)
Schedule 6.06
          Following the closing of the Distribution Transaction, documents or information required to be delivered pursuant to this (to the extent any such documents or information are included in materials otherwise filed with the SEC) shall be deemed to have been delivered on the date on which (i) the Borrower files quarterly reports on Form 10-Q and annual reports on Form 10-K, as applicable, with the SEC, or on the date on which the Borrower provides a link thereto on the Borrower's website on the Internet at the website address listed in or (ii) such documents are posted on the Borrower's behalf on an Internet or intranet website, if any, to which each Lender and the Administrative Agent have access (whether a commercial, third-party website or whether sponsored by the Administrative Agent); that: (A) the Borrower shall deliver paper copies of such documents to the Administrative Agent or any Lender that requests the Borrower to deliver such paper copies until a written request to cease delivering paper copies is given by the Administrative Agent or such Lender and (B) the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent (by facsimile or electronic mail) of the posting of any such documents and provide to the Administrative Agent by electronic mail electronic versions (, soft copies) of such documents. Notwithstanding anything contained herein, in every instance the Borrower shall be required to provide paper copies of the Compliance Certificates required by to the Administrative Agent. Except for such Compliance Certificates, the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to request the delivery or to maintain copies of the documents referred to above, and in any event shall have no responsibility to monitor compliance by the Borrower with any such request for delivery, and each Lender shall be solely responsible for requesting delivery to it or maintaining its copies of such documents.
Section 7.01
Section 10.02
provided
i.e.
Section 7.01(d)
 
          B. Affirmative Covenants:
          Section 7.02 . Each of the Loan Parties will, and will cause its Restricted Subsidiaries to, pay and discharge all material Taxes imposed upon it or upon its income or profits, or upon any properties or assets belonging to it, and all material fees or other charges for all lawful claims which, if unpaid, could be reasonably expected to become a Lien (other than Permitted Liens) upon the property of any of the Loan Parties or any of their Restricted Subsidiaries, that none of the Loan Parties or their Restricted Subsidiaries shall be required to pay any such Tax, fee or other claim as to which the such Loan Party or Restricted Subsidiary has a good faith basis to believe is not due and owing and, to the extent then appropriate, the payment thereof is being contested in good faith and by proper proceedings, provided that such Loan Party or Restricted Subsidiary maintains adequate reserves in accordance with GAAP with respect thereto.
Taxes and Claims
provided
          Section 7.03 . Each of the Loan Parties will, and will cause its Restricted Subsidiaries to, maintain insurance issued by financially sound and reputable insurance companies with respect to its properties and business in such amounts and against such risks as is usually carried by owners of similar businesses and properties in the same general areas in which such Loan Party or Restricted Subsidiary operates. Each of the Loan Parties will, and will cause its Restricted Subsidiaries to, require that each insurance policy on its assets and properties name the Administrative Agent, as administrative agent for the Secured Parties, as additional insured and loss payee to the extent of the Obligations. The Borrower will furnish (or cause to be furnished) to any Lender, upon the request of such Lender from time to time, full information as to the insurance maintained in accordance with this .
Insurance
Section 7.03
          Section 7.04 . Each of the Loan Parties will, and will cause its Restricted Subsidiaries to, preserve, renew and maintain in full force and effect its legal existence and good standing under the Laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, and all of its rights, privileges, licenses and franchises, except (i) where a failure to do so, singly or in the aggregate, is not likely to have a Materially Adverse Effect or (ii) pursuant to a transaction expressly permitted pursuant to this Credit Agreement.
Maintenance of Existence; Conduct of Business
          Section 7.05 . Each of the Loan Parties will, and will cause its Restricted Subsidiaries to, preserve and protect its properties and assets necessary in its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted and except where a failure to do so, singly or in the aggregate, is not likely to have a Materially Adverse Effect, and will permit representatives of the Administrative Agent (and solely during the continuance of an Event of Default, the respective Revolving Credit Lenders and Term A Lenders) to visit and inspect such properties, and to examine and make extracts from its books and records, during normal business hours.
Maintenance of and Access to Properties
          Section 7.06 . Each of the Loan Parties will, and will cause its Restricted Subsidiaries to, comply with the requirements of all applicable Laws (including but not limited to Environmental Laws) and all orders, writs, injunctions and decrees of any Governmental Authority a breach of which is likely to have, singly or in the aggregate, a Materially Adverse Effect, except where contested in good faith and by proper proceedings if it maintains adequate reserves in accordance with GAAP with respect thereto.
Compliance with Applicable Laws
          Section 7.07 . Each of the Loan Parties will promptly give to the Administrative Agent notice in writing (and the Administrative Agent will notify each Lender) of all actions, suits, proceedings, claims or disputes before any courts, arbitrators or Governmental
Litigation
 
Authority against it or its Restricted Subsidiaries or, to its knowledge, otherwise affecting it or any of its respective properties or assets, except actions, suits, proceedings, claims or disputes which are not reasonably likely to, singly or in the aggregate, have a Materially Adverse Effect. Following the initial notice of each such action, suit, proceeding, claim or dispute, supplementary notices of all material developments in respect thereof shall be given from time to time in like manner. The parties hereby acknowledge that the prompt notice to the Administrative Agent and each Lender required by this shall be satisfied by public reporting of such actions, suits, proceedings, claims or disputes by the Borrower with the SEC in a filing made pursuant to Securities Laws.
Section 7.07
        Section 7.08 . (a) Any New Subsidiary acquired or formed by the Borrower shall be deemed an Unrestricted Subsidiary unless the provisions of would not permit the Investment in such Unrestricted Subsidiary at the time of its acquisition or formation.
Subsidiaries
Section 7.18
          (b) The Borrower may designate, so long as (i) no Default exists or would result therefrom and (ii) the Borrower is in pro forma compliance with the Financial Covenants recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended Quarter for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to , any New Subsidiary, including a New Subsidiary deemed to be an Unrestricted Subsidiary pursuant to clause (a) above, as a Restricted Subsidiary by giving a notice captioned "Designation of Restricted Subsidiary" to the Administrative Agent promptly upon the acquisition or formation of such New Subsidiary, such notice to specify whether such New Subsidiary has been designated as a "restricted subsidiary" for purposes of any Debt Instruments governing any Permitted Debt or any Indebtedness specified in . Promptly upon such designation, the Borrower will cause such New Restricted Subsidiary to undertake all of the obligations of (i) a "Restricted Subsidiary" under this Credit Agreement, and (ii) in the event that the New Restricted Subsidiary is a wholly owned Domestic Subsidiary (x) a "Guarantor" under this Credit Agreement, (y) a "Grantor" under the Security Agreement and Intellectual Property Agreement, and (z) if applicable, a "Pledgor" under the Pledge Agreement. Each such New Restricted Subsidiary shall thereafter be a "Restricted Subsidiary" and, in the event that the New Restricted Subsidiary is a wholly owned Domestic Subsidiary, a "Guarantor" for all purposes of this Credit Agreement, a "Grantor" for all purposes of the Security Agreement, and (if applicable) a "Pledgor" for all purposes of the Pledge Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Borrower may cause, at its election, in order to meet the conditions applicable to an Exchange or a Permitted Acquisition hereunder, a New Restricted Subsidiary that is not a wholly owned Domestic Subsidiary to undertake all of the obligations of (I) a "Guarantor" under this Agreement, (II) a "Grantor" under the Security Agreement, and (III) if applicable, a "Pledgor" under the Pledge Agreement. Each such New Restricted Subsidiary so designated shall thereafter be a "Guarantor" for all purposes of this Agreement, a "Grantor" for all purposes of the Security Agreement and (if applicable) a "Pledgor" for all purposes of the Pledge Agreement.
Section 7.01
Schedule 7.15
          (c) (i) The Borrower may redesignate, so long as (i) no Default exists or would result therefrom and (ii) the Borrower is in pro forma compliance with the Financial Covenants recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended Quarter for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to , any Restricted Subsidiary as an Unrestricted Subsidiary or any Unrestricted Subsidiary as a Restricted Subsidiary by giving a notice to the Administrative Agent captioned "Redesignation of Restricted Subsidiary" or "Redesignation of Unrestricted Subsidiary", as the case may be. In the case of any redesignation of any Unrestricted Subsidiary as a Restricted Subsidiary, promptly upon such redesignation, the Borrower will cause (by documentation reasonably satisfactory to the Required Lenders) such New Restricted Subsidiary to undertake all of the obligations of (A) a "Restricted Subsidiary"
Section 7.01
 
under this Credit Agreement, (B) in the event that the New Restricted Subsidiary is a wholly owned Domestic Subsidiary, (x) a "Guarantor" under this Credit Agreement, (y) a "Grantor" under the Security Agreement and Intellectual Property Agreement, and (z) if applicable, a "Pledgor" under the Pledge Agreement. Each such New Restricted Subsidiary shall thereafter be a "Restricted Subsidiary" and, in the event that the New Restricted Subsidiary is a Domestic Subsidiary, a "Guarantor" for all purposes of this Credit Agreement, a "Grantor" for all purposes of the Security Agreement, and (if applicable) a "Pledgor" for all purposes of the Pledge Agreement.
          (d) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this , in no event shall (i) any Operating Company be redesignated as an Unrestricted Subsidiary, or (ii) any New Subsidiary be designated, or any Unrestricted Subsidiary be redesignated, as a Restricted Subsidiary if not owned directly by the Borrower or another Restricted Subsidiary.
Section 7.08
          Section 7.09 . (a) Maintain proper books of record and account, in which entries that are full, true and correct in all material respects and are in conformity with GAAP consistently applied shall be made of all material financial transactions and material matters involving the assets and business of the Loan Parties or the Restricted Subsidiaries, as the case may be; and (b) except to the extent failure to do so would not reasonably be expected to have a Materially Adverse Effect, maintain such books of record and account in conformity with all applicable requirements of any Governmental Authority having regulatory jurisdiction over the Loan Parties or the Restricted Subsidiaries, as the case may be.
Books and Records
          Section 7.10 . Use the proceeds of the Credit Extensions to (i) refinance certain Indebtedness of the Borrower and its subsidiaries, (ii) make permitted investments, acquisitions and distributions, and (iii) fund working capital and general corporate purposes of the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries not in contravention of any Law or of any Loan Document, including the payment of fees and expenses related to the Transaction, including the Distribution Transaction and the transactions contemplated hereby. The Term B Notes will be issued on the Closing Date to the Initial Term B Lender in partial consideration for the transfer to the Borrower of the Programming Network Business.
Use of Proceeds
          Section 7.11 . Upon (x) the formation or acquisition of any new Subsidiary (other than an Unrestricted Subsidiary, a CFC or a Subsidiary that is held directly or indirectly by a CFC) by any Loan Party that is required to become a Guarantor, Grantor and, if applicable, Pledgor under , or (y) the acquisition of any property by any Loan Party if such property, in the reasonable judgment of the Administrative Agent, shall not already be subject to a perfected first priority security interest in favor of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties, then the Borrower shall, at the Borrower's expense:
Covenant to Guarantee Obligations and Give Security
Section 7.08
     (i) within 30 days (or such longer period as the Administrative Agent may agree in its reasonable discretion) after such formation or acquisition, cause such Subsidiary (if it has not already done so), to duly execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent a Guaranty Supplement;
     (ii) within 30 days (or such longer period as the Administrative Agent may agree in its reasonable discretion) after such formation or acquisition, furnish to the Administrative Agent a description of the real and personal property of such Subsidiary or such newly-acquired property, in detail reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent;
 
     (iii) within 45 days (or such longer period as the Administrative Agent may agree in its reasonable discretion) after such formation or acquisition, cause such Subsidiary (if it has not already done so) to duly execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent supplemental Collateral Documents, as specified by and in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (or in substantially the form attached to the Security Agreement, if applicable) (including delivery of all certificates representing Pledged Equity Interests in and of such Subsidiary, and other instruments of the type specified in );
Section 5.01(a)(iii)
     (iv) within 60 days (or such longer period as the Administrative Agent may agree in its reasonable discretion) after such formation or acquisition, cause such Subsidiary (if it has not already done so) to take any actions required under the Security Agreement (including the recording of mortgages with respect to any Material Real Property so acquired, the filing of UCC financing statements, the giving of notices and the endorsement of notices on title documents) may be reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to vest in the Administrative Agent (or in any representative of the Administrative Agent designated by it) valid and subsisting Liens on the properties subject to the supplemental Collateral Documents delivered pursuant to this ; that, for the avoidance of doubt, in the case of an entity that is a first-tier CFC, such pledge shall be limited to 66% of the capital stock of such CFC or, if as a result in a Change in Law there is an increase or decrease in the amount of capital stock of a CFC that may be pledged without being treated as an indirect pledge of such CFC's assets, such percentage as provided by such Change in Law rounded down to the nearest whole number of percentage points; and
Section 7.11
provided
     (v) within 60 days after such formation or acquisition in the case of any Material Real Property, deliver, (i) upon the request of the Administrative Agent in its reasonable discretion, to the Administrative Agent with respect to each parcel of Material Real Property owned by each Loan Party or newly acquired or newly formed Subsidiary, the Mortgages, title reports and surveys, each in scope, form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, (ii) to the extent received by the Borrower, to the Administrative Agent with respect to each parcel of Material Real Property owned by each Loan Party or newly acquired or newly formed Subsidiary, engineering, soils and other reports, and environmental assessment reports and (iii) to the Administrative Agent, all other items set forth on , each in scope, form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Schedule 7.16
          Section 7.12 . Promptly upon request by the Administrative Agent, or any Lender through the Administrative Agent, each Loan Party shall (a) correct any material defect or error that may be discovered in any Loan Document or in the execution, acknowledgment, filing or recordation thereof, and (b) do, execute, acknowledge, deliver, record, re-record, file, re-file, register and re-register any and all such further acts, deeds, certificates, assurances and other instruments as the Administrative Agent, or any Lender through the Administrative Agent, may reasonably require from time to time in order to (i) carry out more effectively the purposes of the Loan Documents, (ii) to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Law, subject any Loan Party's or any of its Subsidiaries' properties, assets, rights or interests to the Liens now or hereafter intended to be covered by any of the Collateral Documents, (iii) perfect and maintain the validity, effectiveness and priority of any of the Collateral Documents and any of the Liens intended to be created thereunder and (iv) assure, convey, grant, assign, transfer, preserve, protect and confirm more effectively unto the Secured Parties the rights granted or now or hereafter intended to be granted to the Secured Parties under any Loan
Further Assurances
 
Document or under any other instrument executed in connection with any Loan Document to which any Loan Party or any of its Subsidiaries is or is to be a party, and cause each of its Subsidiaries to do so.
          Section 7.13 . The Loan Parties shall designate all Obligations as the sole "Designated Senior Indebtedness" (or an equivalent term) under, and defined in, any Subordinated Debt Documents.
Designation as Senior Debt
          Section 7.14 . In the case of the Borrower, at all times use commercially reasonable efforts to maintain public ratings issued by Moody's and S&P with respect to itself as an entity, and with respect to the Loans made hereunder.
Maintenance of Ratings
          C. Negative Covenants:
          Section 7.15 . None of the Loan Parties will, or will permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, create, incur or suffer to exist any Indebtedness except:
Indebtedness
          (i) Indebtedness hereunder;
          (ii) Indebtedness in respect of the Senior Notes, any Permitted Debt and any Permitted Refinancing Indebtedness;
          (iii) (i) obligations under or in respect of interest rate Swap Contracts up to an aggregate notional principal amount not to exceed at any time an amount equal to the Commitments of all the Lenders in the aggregate at such time and (ii) obligations owing under other Swap Contracts entered into in order to manage existing or anticipated exchange rate or commodity price risks and not for speculative purposes;
          (iv) Guarantees and letters of credit not prohibited by ;
Section 7.16
          (v) Indebtedness of any Loan Party owed to any other Loan Party;
          (vi) Indebtedness issued and outstanding on the Closing Date to the extent set forth on and any Permitted Refinancing Indebtedness related thereto;
Schedule 7.15
          (vii) Indebtedness incurred by the Borrower or any Guarantor as consideration for Permitted Acquisitions, so long as (i) such indebtedness is unsecured; (ii) the Borrower would be in compliance, on a pro forma basis after giving effect to the consummation of such acquisition and the incurrence or assumption of such indebtedness in connection therewith, with the Financial Covenants recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended Quarter for which financial statements were delivered pursuant to and calculated as if such acquisition was consummated and such indebtedness was incurred on the first day of the 12-month period then ended (such pro forma basis to include, in the Borrower's discretion, a reasonable estimate of savings from such acquisition (A) that have been realized, (B) for which the steps necessary for realization have been taken, or (C) for which the steps necessary for realization are reasonably expected to be taken within 12 months of the date of such acquisition, in each case, certified by the Borrower), (iii) before and after giving effect thereto, no default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, and (iv) such Indebtedness has a maturity date no earlier than the date that is six months after the Maturity Date with
Section 7.01
 
respect to the Term B Facility and has no mandatory redemptions prior to the Maturity Date with respect to the Term B Facility (other than customary asset sale and change of control offers that are subject to prior payment and termination of the Facilities);
          (viii) Capital Lease Obligations and purchase money obligations for fixed or capital assets in an aggregate amount outstanding at any one time not to exceed $75,000,000;
          (ix) Indebtedness in connection with issuance of one or more standby letters of credit or performance bonds securing obligations of the type set forth in clauses (i) and (ii) of the definition of "Permitted Liens";
          (x) Indebtedness consisting of (i) the financing of insurance premiums or (ii) take-or-pay obligations of the Borrower or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries contained in supply arrangements, in each case, in the ordinary course of business;
          (xi) cash management obligations and Indebtedness incurred in respect of netting services, overdraft protection and similar arrangements;
          (xii) Indebtedness of a Person existing at the time such Person became a Restricted Subsidiary or property was acquired from such Person to the extent such Indebtedness was not incurred in connection with or in contemplation of, such Person becoming a Restricted Subsidiary or the acquisition of such property, not to exceed in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding $20,000,000 and any Permitted Refinancing Indebtedness related thereto (it being understood that any accrued but unpaid interest and the amount of all expenses and premiums incurred in connection therewith added to any principal amount shall not constitute an increment in principal for purposes of this paragraph);
          (xiii) any earnout obligation that comprises a portion of the consideration for a Permitted Acquisition;
          (xiv) Indebtedness consisting of obligations under deferred compensation or other similar arrangements incurred by the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary in connection with the Transaction and any Permitted Acquisition;
          (xv) Monetization Indebtedness; that, the Borrower shall provide to the Administrative Agent prompt written notice of any such Monetization Indebtedness incurred by the Borrower or a Restricted Subsidiary together with a brief description of the terms thereof;
provided
          (xvi) Indebtedness incurred as consideration for any Permitted Acquisition and consisting solely of a deferred or contingent obligation to deliver Equity Interests in the Borrower; and
          (xvii) other Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary, to the extent not otherwise permitted by clauses through (xvi) of this , so long as the aggregate principal amount of all such Indebtedness outstanding at any one time pursuant to this clause shall not exceed the sum of $200,000,000.
(i)
Section 7.15
(xvii)
 
          Section 7.16 . None of the Loan Parties will, or will permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly (including, without limitation, by means of causing a bank to open a letter of credit), guarantee, endorse, contingently agree to purchase or to furnish funds for the payment or maintenance of, or otherwise be or become contingently liable upon or with respect to, the Indebtedness, other obligations, net worth, working capital or earnings of any Person, or guarantee the payment of dividends or other distributions upon the stock or other ownership interests of any Person, or agree to purchase, sell or lease (as lessee or lessor) property, products, materials, supplies or services primarily for the purpose of enabling a debtor to make payment of its obligations or to assure a creditor against loss (all such transactions being herein called ""), except:
Contingent Liabilities
Guarantees
          (i) the Guarantees in ;
Article IV
          (ii) endorsements of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection in the ordinary course of business;
          (iii) Guarantees by the Borrower or one or more of the Restricted Subsidiaries of Indebtedness of, and other obligations (incurred in the ordinary course of business) of, another Restricted Subsidiary, but only if such Indebtedness or obligations are permitted by this Credit Agreement;
          (iv) obligations under agreements to indemnify Persons who have issued bid or performance bonds or letters of credit issued in lieu of such bonds in the ordinary course of business of the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary securing performance by such Person of activities otherwise permissible hereunder;
          (v) Guarantees of the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries issued for the purpose of securing (a) production and product related arrangements, or (b) arrangements for the compensation of talent through third-party intermediaries;
          (vi) the Guarantees described on (as such schedule may be amended by the Borrower from time to time), undertaken in the ordinary course of business of the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries, including, without limitation, Guarantees issued for purposes of securing (a) programming or transponder rights, (b) Affiliation Agreements, (c) advertising representation agreements, marketing and service arrangements, (d) real estate leases, and extensions, replacements and modifications of the foregoing, provided that the aggregate amount of all such Guarantees under this at any time outstanding does not exceed $75,000,000;
Schedule 7.16
Section 7.16(vi)
          (vii) Capital Lease Obligations to the extent they constitute Guarantees by reason of having been assigned by the lessor to a lender to such lessor ( that the obligors in respect of such Capital Lease Obligations do not increase their liability by reason of such assignment);
provided
          (viii) unsecured Guarantees by Loan Parties of the Borrower's obligations in respect of (a) any Permitted Debt and (b) Indebtedness issued and outstanding under the Senior Notes Documents on the Closing Date, and any Permitted Refinancing Indebtedness in respect thereof;
          (ix) Letters of Credit;
 
          (x) any Guarantee by the Borrower or a Restricted Subsidiary of the obligations of any Unrestricted Subsidiary or any Restricted Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party, so long as (A) recourse to the Borrower or such Restricted Subsidiary thereunder is limited solely to             shares of capital stock of such Unrestricted Subsidiary, such Restricted Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party, or their Subsidiaries and to no other assets of the Borrower or the other Loan Parties and (B) neither the Borrower nor any Restricted Subsidiary agrees, in connection therewith, to any limitation on the amount of Indebtedness which may be incurred by them, to the granting of any Liens on assets of the Borrower or any of the Restricted Subsidiaries (other than shares of stock of such Unrestricted Subsidiary, such Restricted Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party, or their Subsidiaries), to any acquisition or disposition of any assets of the Borrower or the Restricted Subsidiaries (other than shares of capital stock of such Unrestricted Subsidiary, such Restricted Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party, or their Subsidiaries) or to any modification or supplement of this Credit Agreement or any agreement entered into by the Borrower or any of the Restricted Subsidiaries refinancing any substantial portion of the Indebtedness outstanding under this Credit Agreement;
          (xi) any Guarantee by the Borrower or a Restricted Subsidiary of the obligations or Indebtedness of any Unrestricted Subsidiary, Restricted Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party, or joint venture; that the aggregate amount of all such Guarantees, when combined with the aggregate amount of Investments in Unrestricted Subsidiaries and joint ventures made pursuant to , does not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
Section 7.18(xii)
          (xii) Guarantees which would constitute Investments which are not prohibited by ;
Section 7.18
          (xiii) Obligations under contracts providing for the acquisition of or provision of goods or services (including Leases or licenses of property) incurred in the ordinary course of business for which the Borrower or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries may be jointly and severally liable with Affiliates of the Borrower as to which costs are allocated (as among the Borrower and its Affiliates) based on cost, usage or other reasonable method of allocation; that the undertaking of such liabilities are not intended as a guaranty or other credit support of such obligations;
provided
          (xiv) any Guarantee by the Borrower or a Restricted Subsidiary of any obligation to the extent such obligation can be entirely satisfied (at the option of the Borrower or such Restricted Subsidiary) by the delivery of Equity Interests in the Borrower, if the Borrower agrees in a notice to the Administrative Agent that such obligation shall be satisfied solely by the delivery of such Equity Interests;
          (xv) Guarantees incurred in connection with a Monetization Transaction;
          (xvi) Guarantees of Leases of the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries entered into in the ordinary course of business;
          (xvii) any Guarantee by the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary of Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary which Indebtedness is permitted to be incurred under ; and
Section 7.15
 
          (xviii) other Guarantees, including, but not limited to, without duplication, surety bonds, by the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries; that the aggregate amount of the obligations guaranteed does not exceed $100,000,000 at any one time outstanding;
provided
, that, other than as permitted under clauses (x)-(xii) of this Section 7.16, no Loan Party shall Guarantee the obligations of any Restricted Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party.
provided
          Section 7.17 . None of the Loan Parties will, or will permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, create or suffer to exist, any mortgage, pledge, security interest, conditional sale or other title retention agreement, lien, charge or encumbrance upon any of its assets, now owned or hereafter acquired, securing any Indebtedness or other obligation (all such security being herein called ""), except:
Liens
Liens
          (i) Liens on property securing Indebtedness owed to the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary;
          (ii) Liens securing Capital Lease Obligations or other Indebtedness for the deferred acquisition price of property or services to the extent such Liens attach solely to the property acquired with or subject to such Indebtedness;
          (iii) Liens securing all of the obligations of the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, including Liens in favor of a Hedge Bank or a Non-Interest Rate Hedge Bank, as the case may be, in connection with a Secured Hedge Agreement;
          (iv) Permitted Liens and Permitted Encumbrances (as defined in a Mortgage);
          (v) other Liens on property or assets in effect on the Closing Date to the extent set forth on ;
Schedule 7.17
          (vi) Liens on Equity Interests in any Unrestricted Subsidiary or joint venture of the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary;
          (vii) Liens (i)(A) on advances of cash or Cash Equivalents in favor of the seller of any property to be acquired in an Investment permitted pursuant to to be applied against the purchase price for such Investment or (B) consisting of an agreement to dispose of any property in a disposition permitted under , in each case, solely to the extent such Investment or disposition, as the case may be, would have been permitted on the date of the creation of such Lien and (ii) on cash earnest money deposits made by the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary in connection with any transaction that constitutes or will constitute a Permitted Acquisition; and
Section 7.18
Section 7.24
          (viii) Liens securing Monetization Indebtedness.
In addition, neither the Borrower nor any Restricted Subsidiary will enter into or permit to exist any undertaking by it or affecting any of its properties whereby the Borrower or such Restricted Subsidiary shall agree with any Person (other than the Lenders or the Administrative Agent) not to create or suffer to exist any Liens in favor of any other Person, that the foregoing restriction shall not apply to any such undertaking contained in any indenture or other agreement
provided
 
(i) governing any Indebtedness outstanding at the date hereof and identified on hereto, (ii) governing any Indebtedness in respect of the Senior Notes, the Permitted Debt (to the extent that such undertaking in any Permitted Debt is no more restrictive than the corresponding terms of the Senior Notes) and any renewals, extensions or refundings thereof, (iii) governing specific property to be sold pursuant to an executed agreement with respect to an asset sale permitted hereunder, or (iv) constituting a customary restriction on assignment, subletting, or other transfer contained in Leases, licenses, franchises and other similar agreements entered into in the ordinary course of business or otherwise creating a Permitted Lien ( that any restriction referred to in clauses (iii) or (iv) is limited to the property or asset subject to such sale, Lease, license, franchise or other similar agreement or Permitted Lien, as the case may be).
Schedule 7.15
provided
          Section 7.18 . None of the Loan Parties will, or will permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly, (a) make or permit to remain outstanding any advances, loans, accounts receivable (other than (x) accounts receivable arising in the ordinary course of business of such Loan Party or Restricted Subsidiary and (y) accounts receivable owing to any Loan Party or Restricted Subsidiary from any Unrestricted Subsidiary for management or other services or other overhead or shared expenses allocated in the ordinary course of business provided by such Loan Party or Restricted Subsidiary to such Unrestricted Subsidiary) or other extensions of credit (excluding, however, accrued and unpaid interest in respect of any advance, loan or other extension of credit) or capital contributions to (by means of transfers of property to others, or payments for property or services for the account or use of others, or otherwise) any Person (other than any Loan Party), (b) purchase or own any stocks, bonds, notes, debentures or other securities (including, without limitation, any interests in any limited liability company, partnership, joint venture or any similar enterprise) of, any Person (other than a Loan Party), or (c) purchase or acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) assets of another Person (other than any Loan Party) that constitute a business unit or all or a substantial part of the business of, such Person (all such transactions referred to in clauses (a), (b) and (c) being herein called ""), except for:
Investments
Investments
          (i) Investments in cash, Cash Equivalents and marketable securities;
          (ii) Investments set forth on and any modification, replacement, renewal or extension thereof; , that the amount of the Investment outstanding on the Closing Date is not increased except pursuant to the terms of such Investment or as otherwise permitted by this ;
Schedule 6.15
provided
Section 7.18
          (iii) receivables owing to the Borrower or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries, including receivables from and advances to suppliers, if created, acquired or made in the ordinary course of business and payable or dischargeable in accordance with customary trade terms;
          (iv) loans and advances to officers, directors, employees, consultants and members of management (including for travel, entertainment, relocation and analogous business expenses) in an aggregate amount not to exceed $5,000,000 at any time outstanding; provided that such loans and advances shall comply with all applicable Laws;
          (v) Investments (including debt obligations) (i) received in connection with the bankruptcy and reorganization of suppliers and customers in settlement of delinquent obligations of, and (ii) received in connection with the settlement of other disputes with customers and suppliers;
 
          (vi) to the extent that they constitute Investments, (A) Indebtedness not prohibited by ; (B) Guarantees not prohibited by other than clause (xii) thereof, (C) Liens not prohibited by , or (D) Restricted Payments not prohibited by ;
Section 7.15
Section 7.16
Section 7.17
Section 7.19
          (vii) Permitted Acquisitions;
          (viii) Investments consisting of extensions of credit or endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business;
          (ix) Investments consisting of notes, other similar instruments or non-cash consideration received in connection with any disposition not prohibited by ;
Section 7.24
          (x) Investments to the extent financed with Equity Interests of the Borrower;
          (xi) Investments in Swap Contracts entered into in order to manage existing or anticipated interest rate, exchange rate or commodity price risks and not for speculative purposes;
          (xii) Investments in one or more Unrestricted Subsidiaries, Restricted Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties, or joint ventures; that the aggregate amount of all such Investments, when combined with the aggregate amount of Guarantees permitted pursuant to , does not exceed $100,000,000 at any one time outstanding;
provided
Section 7.16(xi)
          (xiii) advances of payroll payments to employees in the ordinary course of business;
          (xiv) Investments of the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries consisting of settlements of overdue debts or accounts with customers and suppliers in bankruptcy in the ordinary course of business;
          (xv) other Investments of the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary; , that (A) no Default shall have occurred and be continuing at the time such Investment is made or would result from the making of such Investment, (B) the Loan Parties shall be in compliance on a pro forma basis after giving effect to such Investment with the Financial Covenants, recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended Quarter for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to and calculated as if such Investment was consummated on the first day of the 12-month period then ended, (C) at the time of such Investment, the Cash Flow Ratio shall be less than or equal to 6.00 to 1.00 on a pro forma basis after giving effect to such Investment, and (D) during any time that the Cash Flow Ratio is greater than or equal to 4.75 to 1.00 (such compliance to be determined on the basis of the financial information most recently delivered to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to or ), at the time of such Investment after giving effect to the making thereof, the aggregate amount of Investments made pursuant to this clause (xv)(D) and not repaid or otherwise returned, together with the aggregate amount of Restricted Payments made pursuant to clause (vi)(D) of , shall not exceed (i) the sum of (a) $100 million (b) the net proceeds from any sale or issuance of Equity Interests by the Borrower to any
provided
Section 7.01
Section 7.01(a)
(b)
Section 7.19
plus
 
Person (other than the Borrower or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries) after the Closing Date (with non-cash proceeds to be valued by the Borrower in good faith) (c) an amount equal to (1) Cumulative Operating Cash Flow (2) 1.4 by Cumulative Interest Expense;
plus
minus
multiplied
          (xvi) Permitted Affiliate Payments; and
          (xvii) other investments of the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary, to the extent not otherwise permitted by clauses (i) through (xvi) of this ; that the aggregate amount of all such Investments made pursuant to this clause does not exceed $100,000,000 at any one time outstanding;
Section 7.18
provided
, that the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary may convert the form of any outstanding Investment by the Borrower or such Restricted Subsidiary in any Unrestricted Subsidiary or Restricted Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party that was permitted under this when first made by the Borrower or a Restricted Subsidiary at all times prior to any Responsible Officer having knowledge of the occurrence and continuance of a Default.
provided
Section 7.18
          Section 7.19 . None of the Loan Parties will, or will permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly, declare or make or declare any Restricted Payment (other than any Restricted Payment payable (and paid) in Equity Interests of the Borrower), or incur any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to do so at any time, except for:
Restricted Payments
          (i) the Borrower and the Restricted Subsidiaries may make dividends and other distributions payable solely in the same class of Equity Interests of such Person;
          (ii) Permitted Affiliate Payments;
          (iii) repurchases of Equity Interests in a cashless transaction deemed to occur upon exercise or vesting of restricted stock, stock options or warrants;
          (iv) so long as no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would result therefrom, the Borrower may make Restricted Payments with the proceeds received from the issuance of its Equity Interests (other than the issuance of Equity Interests to a Loan Party or any Subsidiary thereof);
          (v) to the extent constituting Restricted Payments, the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries may enter into transactions permitted by and ; and
Sections 7.23
7.24
          (vi) other Restricted Payments of the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary; , that (A) no Default shall have occurred and be continuing at the time such Restricted Payment is made or would result from the making or declaration of such Restricted Payment, (B) the Loan Parties shall be in compliance on a pro forma basis after giving effect to such Restricted Payment with the Financial Covenants, recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended Quarter for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to and calculated as if such Restricted Payment was made on the first day of the 12-month period then ended, (C) at the time of such Restricted Payment, the Cash Flow Ratio shall be less than or equal to 6.00 to 1.00 on a pro forma basis after giving effect to such Restricted Payment, and (D)
provided
Section 7.01
 
during any time that the Cash Flow Ratio is greater than or equal to 4.75 to 1.00 (such compliance to be determined on the basis of the financial information most recently delivered to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to or ), at the time of such Restricted Payment after giving effect to the making thereof, the aggregate amount of Restricted Payments made pursuant to this clause (vi)(D), together with the aggregate amount of Investments made pursuant to clause (xv)(D) of and not repaid or otherwise returned, shall not exceed (i) the sum of (a) $100 million (b) the net proceeds from any sale or issuance of Equity Interests by the Borrower to any Person (other than the Borrower or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries) after the Closing Date (with non-cash proceeds to be valued by the Borrower in good faith) (c) an amount equal to (1) Cumulative Operating Cash Flow (2) 1.4 by Cumulative Interest Expense.
Section 7.01(a)
(b)
Section 7.18
plus
plus
minus
multiplied
          Section 7.20 . Other than as set forth on , none of the Loan Parties will, or will permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, effect any transaction with any Affiliate of the Borrower that is not a Restricted Subsidiary, having a value, or for consideration having a value, in excess of $20,000,000 unless the board of directors (or the person duly authorized to perform similar functions) of the Borrower or such other Restricted Subsidiary shall make a good faith determination that the terms of such transaction are, taken as a whole, no less favorable to the Borrower or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be, than would at the time be obtainable for a comparable transaction in arms-length dealing with an unrelated third party; , however, that this provision shall not apply to (i) overhead and other ordinary course allocations of costs and services on a reasonable basis, (ii) allocations of tax liabilities and other tax-related items among the Borrower and its Affiliates based principally upon the financial income, taxable income, credits and other amounts directly related to the respective parties, to the extent that the share of such liabilities and other items allocable to the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries shall not exceed the amount that such Persons would have been responsible for as a direct taxpayer, (iii) Distribution Transaction Agreements and amendments, renewals and extensions thereof on terms not materially less favorable in the aggregate to the interests of the Lenders than those existing on the date hereof, and (iv) any Investment permitted by or any Restricted Payment permitted by .
Transactions with Affiliates
Schedule 7.20
provided
Section 7.18
Section 7.19
          Section 7.21 . None of the Loan Parties will, or will permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, modify or supplement, or consent to any waiver of any of the provisions of, any Debt Instrument governing any Permitted Debt or any Indebtedness specified in except to the extent, after giving effect thereto, that such Permitted Debt or other Indebtedness could be incurred on such modified or supplemented terms by such Loan Party or Restricted Subsidiary on the effective date of the modification, supplement or consent. In addition, none of the Loan Parties will, or will permit any of their Restricted Subsidiaries to, enter into any amendment, or agree to or accept any waiver, of any of the provisions of (a) the certificate of incorporation or organization, by-laws, limited liability company agreement, partnership agreement or any other governing document of any of the Loan Parties or their Restricted Subsidiaries, in each case if doing so would materially adversely affect the rights of the Loan Parties, the Restricted Subsidiaries, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders, or any of them, or (b) any other agreement between any of the Loan Parties or the Restricted Subsidiaries, on the one hand, and any of its Affiliates, on the other hand, which would have a Materially Adverse Effect.
Amendments of Certain Instruments
Schedule 7.15
          Section 7.22 . None of the Loan Parties will, or will permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, engage in any material line of business substantially different from those lines of business conducted by the Loan Parties and their Restricted
Change in Nature of Business
 
Subsidiaries on the Closing Date or any business reasonably related or incidental thereto, other than reasonable extensions thereof.
          Section 7.23 . None of the Loan Parties will, or will permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, merge, dissolve, liquidate, consolidate with or into another Person, or Dispose of (whether in one transaction or in a series of transactions) all or substantially all of its assets (whether now owned or hereafter acquired) to or in favor of any Person, except that, so long as no Event of Default exists or would result therefrom:
Fundamental Changes
          (i) any Restricted Subsidiary may merge, dissolve, liquidate or consolidate with or into (i) the Borrower, that the Borrower shall be the continuing or surviving Person, (ii) a Loan Party, that the Loan Party shall be the continuing or surviving Person, or (iii) any one or more other Restricted Subsidiaries, that when any wholly owned Subsidiary is merging with another Subsidiary, such wholly owned Subsidiary shall be the continuing or surviving Person;
provided
provided
provided
          (ii) any Loan Party (other than the Borrower) may Dispose of (whether in one transaction or in a series of transactions) all or substantially all of its assets (whether now owned or hereafter acquired, upon voluntary liquidation or otherwise) to the Borrower or to another Loan Party;
          (iii) any Restricted Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party may Dispose of (whether in one transaction or in a series of transactions) all or substantially all its assets (whether now owned or hereafter acquired, upon voluntary liquidation or otherwise) to (i) another Restricted Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party or (ii) to a Loan Party;
          (iv) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries may consummate the Transaction;
          (v) any Restricted Subsidiary may merge, dissolve, liquidate or consolidate with or into another Person (subject to clause (i)) or be subject to a transaction resulting in the Disposition of (whether in one transaction or in a series of transactions) all or substantially all of its assets (so long such Disposition is not a Disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries, taken as a whole) (whether now owned or hereafter acquired, upon voluntary liquidation or otherwise) to or in favor of any Person in a transaction permitted under Section 7.24; and
          (vi) any Loan Party or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries may merge, dissolve, liquidate or consolidate with or into any other Person or permit any other Person to merge, dissolve, liquidate or consolidate with or into it; that (i) in the case of a merger, dissolution, liquidation or consolidation to which a wholly owned Subsidiary of the Borrower is a party, the Person surviving such merger, dissolution, liquidation or consolidation shall be a wholly owned Subsidiary of the Borrower, (ii) in the case of any merger, dissolution, liquidation or consolidation to which the Borrower is a party, the Borrower is the surviving Person, (iii) in the case of any merger, dissolution, liquidation or consolidation to which any Loan Party is a party, a Loan Party is the surviving Person, and (iv) in the case of a merger, dissolution, liquidation or consolidation to which a Restricted Subsidiary is a party, the Person surviving such merger, dissolution, liquidation or consolidation shall be a Restricted Subsidiary.
provided
 
          Section 7.24 . None of the Loan Parties will, or will permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, make any Disposition or enter into any agreement to make any Disposition, except:
Dispositions
          (i) Dispositions of obsolete, worn out, damaged, surplus or otherwise no longer used or useful machinery, parts, equipment or other assets no longer used or useful in the conduct of the business of the Borrower or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business;
          (ii) Dispositions of cash, Cash Equivalents, inventory, materials and other current assets in the ordinary course of business (including the sale, transfer or other disposition of overdue or disputed accounts receivable, in connection with the compromise or collection thereof) and the conversion of cash into Cash Equivalents and Cash Equivalents into cash;
          (iii) Dispositions of property subject to Events of Loss;
          (iv) the sale or issuance of any Subsidiary's Equity Interests to the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary; that any Guarantor shall only issue or sell its Equity Interests to the Borrower or another Guarantor;
provided
          (v) Dispositions by the Borrower to any Subsidiary or any Subsidiary to the Borrower or to the Borrower or another Subsidiary of the Borrower; that if the transferor is a Restricted Subsidiary, the transferee thereof must either be the Borrower or a Restricted Subsidiary; , that if the transferor is the Borrower or a Guarantor, the transferee must be either the Borrower or a Guarantor;
provided
provided
further
          (vi) Dispositions that are Investments not prohibited by or Dispositions that are permitted by ;
Section 7.18
Section 7.24
          (vii) Dispositions of property or assets from a Loan Party to a Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party or to a joint venture of a Loan Party; , that as of the date of such Disposition the aggregate fair market value of property and assets subject to such Dispositions (determined at the time of such Dispositions) pursuant to this during the term of this Agreement does not exceed $100,000,000;
provided
clause (vii)
          (viii) Dispositions or Exchanges by the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries to the extent that the Net Cash Proceeds of any such Disposition or Exchange are applied to prepay the Term Loans pursuant to (and to the extent required by) ;
Section 2.04
          (ix) Dispositions of Investments in joint ventures to the extent required by, or made pursuant to buy/sell arrangements between the joint venture parties set forth in joint venture arrangements or similar binding arrangements (i) in substantially the form as such arrangements are in effect on the Closing Date and (ii) to the extent that the Net Cash Proceeds of any such Disposition are applied to prepay the Term Loans pursuant to (and to the extent required by) ;
Section 2.04(b)(ii)
          (x) Dispositions of Unrestricted Subsidiaries;
 
          (xi) Leases, subleases, licenses or sublicenses of assets or properties in the ordinary course of business and which do not materially interfere with the business of the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries;
          (xii) Dispositions of Intellectual Property which, in the reasonable good faith determination of the Borrower, are not material to the conduct of the business of the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries, and the licensing or sublicensing of Intellectual Property rights and other transfers of Intellectual Property and copyrighted material in the ordinary course of business or that are otherwise not material to the conduct of the business of the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries;
          (xiii) Dispositions of assets or properties to the extent that such assets or properties are exchanged for credit against the purchase price of similar replacement assets or properties or the proceeds of such Disposition are reasonably promptly applied to the purchase price of such replacement assets or properties, in each case, in the ordinary course of business;
          (xiv) termination of Swap Contracts;
          (xv) the settlement of tort or other litigation claims, that if any such settled claim shall have a value in excess of $25,000,000, the board of directors or similar governing body of the Borrower determines it to be fair and reasonable in light of the circumstances;
provided
          (xvi) Dispositions in accordance with a Distribution Transaction Agreement; and
          (xvii) any Disposition that involves property or assets having a fair market value of less than $25,000,000;
that (A) with respect to above, any such Disposition or Exchange shall be for fair market value and, with respect to any Disposition (but not any Exchange), at least 75% of the consideration received therefor by the Loan Parties or any such Restricted Subsidiary shall be in the form of cash or Cash Equivalents (including by way of any Monetization Transaction) and (B) after giving effect to any such Disposition or Exchange pursuant to , (1) the Loan Parties shall be in compliance on a pro forma basis with the Financial Covenants, recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended Quarter for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to and calculated as if such Disposition occurred on the first day of the 12-month period then ended and (2) no Event of Default shall exist or shall result therefrom.
provided
clause (viii)
clause (viii)
Section 7.01
          D. Financial Covenants:
          Section 7.25 . The Borrower and other Loan Parties will cause, for each Quarter, the ratio of Annual Operating Cash Flow for the period ending with such Quarter to Annual Total Interest Expense for the period ending with such Quarter to be at least the following respective amounts at all times during the following respective periods:
Operating Cash Flow to Total Interest Expense
 
          Section 7.26 . The Borrower and other Loan Parties will not permit the Cash Flow Ratio to exceed the following respective amounts at any time during the following respective periods:
Cash Flow Ratio
          Section 8.01 . Each of the following shall constitute an "Event of Default":
Events of Default
          (a) Any representation or warranty in this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document or in any certificate, statement or other document furnished to the Lenders or the Administrative Agent pursuant hereto (including, without limitation, any amendment thereto), or any certification made or deemed to have been made by any Loan Party to any Lender or the Administrative Agent hereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect, or shall be breached, in any material respect when made or deemed made; that any representation made pursuant to in respect of the absence of any Default shall not constitute an Event of Default if (i) at the time of such representation, such Default was not known to a Responsible Officer of the Borrower and (ii) prior to such Default, the absence of which is the subject of such representation, becoming an Event of Default, such Default has been cured or waived in accordance with this Credit Agreement; or
provided
Section 5.02
          (b) Default in the payment when due of any principal of any Revolving Credit Loan, Term Loan, Swingline Loan or any L/C Obligation, default in the deposit when due of funds as Cash Collateral in respect of Swingline Loans or L/C Obligations or default in the payment when due of interest on any Revolving Credit Loan, Term Loan or on any L/C Obligation, or any fee due hereunder or any other amount payable to any Revolving Credit Lender, Term Lender or the Administrative Agent hereunder, and the failure to pay such interest, fee or such other amount within two Business Days after the same becomes due; or
 
          (c) Default by any of the Loan Parties in the performance or observance of any of its agreements in (other than , , , , , , , , , , , and but including ); or
Article VII
Section 7.01
Section 7.02
Section 7.03
Section 7.05
Section 7.06
Section 7.07
Section 7.08
Section 7.09
Section 7.10
Section 7.11
Section 7.14
Section 7.18
Section 7.20
Section 7.01(e)
          (d) Default by any of the Loan Parties in the performance or observance of any of its other agreements herein (other than those specified in ) or in any other Loan Document, which shall remain unremedied for 30 days after notice thereof shall have been given to the Borrower by any Lender or the Administrative Agent ( that such period shall be fifteen days and no such notice shall be required in the case of a default under ); or
Section 8.01(c)
provided
Section 7.01(d)
          (e) Any Indebtedness of any of the Loan Parties (including any Indebtedness hereunder) or any of the Restricted Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount of $25,000,000 or more, excluding (i) any Indebtedness owing solely to the Borrower or a Restricted Subsidiary and (ii) any Indebtedness for the deferred purchase price of property or services owed to the Person providing such property or services as to which the Borrower or such Restricted Subsidiary has a good faith basis to believe is not due and owing and, to the extent then appropriate, is contesting its obligation to pay the same in good faith and by proper proceedings and for which the Borrower or such Restricted Subsidiary has established appropriate reserves (such Indebtedness under clauses (i) and (ii) above herein called ""), shall (i) become due before stated maturity by the acceleration of the maturity thereof by reason of default or (ii) become due by its terms and shall not be promptly paid or extended; or
Excluded Indebtedness
          (f) Any default under any indenture, credit agreement or loan agreement or other agreement or instrument under which Indebtedness of any of the Loan Parties or any of the Restricted Subsidiaries constituting indebtedness for borrowed money in an aggregate principal amount of $25,000,000 or more is outstanding (other than Excluded Indebtedness), or by which any such Indebtedness is evidenced, shall have occurred and shall continue for a period of time sufficient to permit the holder or holders of any such Indebtedness (or a trustee or agent on its or their behalf) to accelerate the maturity thereof or to enforce any Lien provided for by any such indenture, agreement or instrument, as the case may be, unless such default shall have been permanently waived by the respective holder of such Indebtedness; or
          (g) Any Loan Party or any Significant Restricted Subsidiary shall (i) apply for or consent to the appointment of, or the taking of possession by, a receiver, custodian, trustee or liquidator of itself or of all or a substantial part of its property, (ii) admit in writing its inability, or be generally unable, to pay its debts as they become due, (iii) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, (iv) be adjudicated as bankrupt or insolvent, (v) commence a voluntary case under any Debtor Relief Law (as now or hereafter in effect), (vi) file a petition seeking to take advantage of any Debtor Relief Law, (vii) acquiesce in writing to, or fail to controvert in a timely and appropriate manner, any petition filed against any of the Loan Parties or any Significant Restricted Subsidiary in any involuntary case under any such Debtor Relief Law, or (viii) take any action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing; or
          (h) A case or other proceeding shall be commenced, without the application, approval or consent of any of the Loan Parties or any Significant Restricted Subsidiary, in any court of competent jurisdiction, seeking the liquidation, reorganization, dissolution, winding up, or composition or readjustment or debts of such Loan Party or Significant Restricted Subsidiary, the appointment of a trustee, receiver, custodian, liquidator or the like of such Loan Party or Significant Restricted Subsidiary or of all or any substantial part of its assets, or any other similar action with respect to such Loan Party or Significant Restricted Subsidiary under any Debtor
 
Relief Law, and such case or proceeding shall continue undismissed, or unstayed and in effect, for any period of 60 consecutive days, or an order for relief against any of the Loan Parties or any Significant Restricted Subsidiary shall be entered in an involuntary case under any Debtor Relief Law (as now or hereafter in effect); or
          (i) (i) A judgment for the payment of money in excess of $25,000,000 (to the extent not covered by insurance) shall be rendered against any Loan Party or any Restricted Subsidiary and such judgment shall remain unsatisfied and in effect for any period of 30 consecutive days without a stay of execution or (if a stay is not provided for by applicable law) without having been fully bonded or (ii) a final judgment or final judgments for the payment of money are entered by a court or courts of competent jurisdiction against any Loan Party or any Restricted Subsidiary and either (x) an enforcement proceeding shall have been commenced by any creditor upon such judgment or (y) such judgment remains undischarged and unbonded for a period (during which execution shall not be effectively stayed) of 60 days; , that, the aggregate of all such judgments exceeds $25,000,000 (to the extent not covered by insurance); or
provided
          (j) (i) Any Termination Event shall occur; (ii) an application for a minimum funding waiver with respect to any Plan is made; (iii) any Person shall engage in any Prohibited Transaction involving any Plan; (iv) the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate is in "default" (as defined in Section 4219(c)(5) of ERISA) with respect to payments to a Multiemployer Plan resulting from the Borrower's or any ERISA Affiliate's complete or partial withdrawal (as described in Section 4203 or 4205 of ERISA) from such Multiemployer Plan; (v) the conditions for imposition of a lien under Section 303(k) of ERISA shall have been met with respect to a Plan; (vi) the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate shall fail to pay when due an amount which is payable by it to the PBGC or to a Plan under Title IV of ERISA; (vii) the assumption of, or any material increase in, the contingent liability of the Borrower or any Restricted Subsidiary with respect to any post-retirement welfare liability; and any or all of such events described in clauses (i) through (vii) as applicable result in a liability of the Borrower or ERISA Affiliate in excess of $25,000,000; or
          (k) Dolan Family Interests shall cease at any time to have beneficial ownership (within the meaning of Rule 13d-3 (as in effect on the Closing Date) promulgated under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) of shares of the capital stock of the Borrower having sufficient votes to elect (or otherwise designate) at such time a majority of the members of the Board of Directors of the Borrower; or
          (l) Any of the Loan Parties or any of their respective Affiliates (including any Restricted Subsidiary) institutes any proceedings seeking to establish or any Person obtains a judgment establishing that (i) any provision of the Loan Documents is invalid, not binding or unenforceable or (ii) the Lien created, or purported to be created, by the Loan Documents is not a valid and perfected first priority security interest in the property in which such Lien is created, or purported to be created, pursuant to the Loan Documents.
          Section 8.02 .
Remedies upon Event of Default
          (a) . If any Revolving/Term A Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Administrative Agent shall, at the request of, or may, with the consent of, the Required Revolving/Term A Lenders, take any or all of the following actions:
Revolving/Term A Event of Default
          (i) declare the commitment of each Revolving Credit Lender and each Term A Lender to make Loans and any obligation of (a) the L/C Issuer to make L/C
 
Credit Extensions and (b) the Swingline Lender to make Swingline Loans to be terminated, whereupon such commitments and obligation shall be terminated;
          (ii) declare the unpaid principal amount of all outstanding Revolving Credit Loans and Term A Loans, all interest accrued and unpaid thereon, and all other amounts owing or payable to any Revolving Credit Lender or Term A Lender or under any other Loan Document to be immediately due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby expressly waived by the Borrower;
          (iii) require that the Borrower Cash Collateralize the L/C Obligations (in an amount equal to the then Outstanding Amount thereof); and
          (iv) exercise on behalf of itself, the Revolving Credit Lenders and the Term A Lenders and the L/C Issuer all rights and remedies available to it and such Lenders under the Loan Documents.
          (b) . If any Event of Default (other than a Revolving/Term A Event of Default) occurs and is continuing, the Administrative Agent shall, at the request of, or may, with the consent of, the Required Lenders, take any or all of the following actions:
Other Event of Default
          (i) declare the commitment of each Lender to make Loans and any obligation of (a) the L/C Issuer to make L/C Credit Extensions and (b) the Swingline Lender to make Swingline Loans to be terminated, whereupon such commitments and obligations shall be terminated;
          (ii) declare the unpaid principal amount of all outstanding Loans, all interest accrued and unpaid thereon, and all other amounts owing or payable hereunder or under any other Loan Document to be immediately due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby expressly waived by the Borrower;
          (iii) require that the Borrower Cash Collateralize the L/C Obligations (in an amount equal to the then Outstanding Amount thereof); and
          (iv) exercise on behalf of itself, the Lenders and the L/C Issuer all rights and remedies available to it and such Lenders under the Loan Documents;
, , that upon the occurrence of an actual or deemed entry of an order for relief with respect to the Borrower under the Bankruptcy Code, the obligation of each Lender to make Loans, any obligation of the Swingline Lender to advance Swingline Loans and any obligation of the L/C Issuer to make L/C Credit Extensions shall automatically terminate, the unpaid principal amount of all outstanding Loans and all interest and other amounts as aforesaid shall automatically become due and payable, and the obligation of the Borrower to Cash Collateralize the L/C Obligations as aforesaid shall automatically become effective, in each case without further act of the Administrative Agent or any Lender.
provided
however
          Section 8.03 . After the exercise of remedies provided for in (or after the Loans have automatically become immediately due and payable and the L/C Obligations have automatically been required to be Cash Collateralized as set forth in the
Application of Funds
Section 8.02
 
proviso to ), any amounts received on account of the Obligations shall be applied by the Administrative Agent in the following order:
Section 8.02
     , to payment of that portion of the Obligations constituting fees, indemnities, expenses and other amounts (including fees, charges and disbursements of counsel to the Administrative Agent and amounts payable under ) payable to the Administrative Agent in its capacity as such;
First
Article III
     , to payment of that portion of the Obligations constituting fees, indemnities and other amounts (other than principal, interest and Letter of Credit Fees) payable to the Lenders and the L/C Issuer (including fees, charges and disbursements of counsel to the respective Lenders and the L/C Issuer and amounts payable under ), ratably among them in proportion to the respective amounts described in this clause payable to them;
Second
Article III
Second
     , to payment of that portion of the Obligations constituting accrued and unpaid Letter of Credit Fees and interest on the Loans, L/C Borrowings and other Obligations, to the extent due and payable, ratably among the Lenders and the L/C Issuer in proportion to the respective amounts described in this clause payable to them;
Third
Third
     , to payment of that portion of the Obligations constituting unpaid principal of the Loans, L/C Borrowings and amounts owing under Secured Hedge Agreements and Secured Cash Management Agreements, and which have become due and owing, ratably among the Lenders, the L/C Issuer, the Hedge Banks and the Cash Management Banks in proportion to the respective amounts described in this clause held by them;
Fourth
Fourth
     , to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer, to Cash Collateralize that portion of L/C Obligations comprised of the aggregate undrawn amount of Letters of Credit; and
Fifth
     , the balance, if any, after all of the Obligations have been indefeasibly paid in full, to the Borrower or as otherwise required by Law.
Last
          Subject to , amounts used to Cash Collateralize the aggregate undrawn amount of Letters of Credit pursuant to clause above shall be applied to satisfy drawings under such Letters of Credit as they occur. If any amount remains on deposit as Cash Collateral after all Letters of Credit have either been fully drawn or expired, such remaining amount shall be applied to the other Obligations, if any, in the order set forth above.
Section 2.03(c)
Fifth
          Section 9.01 . (a) Each of the Lender Parties hereby irrevocably appoints JPMCB to act on its behalf as the Administrative Agent hereunder and under the other Loan Documents and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms hereof or thereof, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. The provisions of this Article are solely for the benefit of the Administrative Agent, and the Lender Parties, and neither the Borrower nor any other Loan Party shall have rights as a third party beneficiary of any of such provisions.
Appointment and Authority
 
          (b) The Administrative Agent shall also act as the "" under the Loan Documents, and each of the Lenders (in its capacities as a Lender, potential Hedge Bank and potential Cash Management Bank) and the L/C Issuer hereby irrevocably appoints and authorizes the Administrative Agent to act as the agent of such Lender and the L/C Issuer for purposes of acquiring, holding and enforcing any and all Liens on Collateral granted by any of the Loan Parties to secure any of the Obligations, together with such powers and discretion as are reasonably incidental thereto. In this connection, the Administrative Agent, as "collateral agent" and any co-agents, sub-agents and attorneys-in-fact appointed by the Administrative Agent pursuant to for purposes of holding or enforcing any Lien on the Collateral (or any portion thereof) granted under the Collateral Documents, or for exercising any rights and remedies thereunder at the direction of the Administrative Agent), shall be entitled to the benefits of all provisions of this and (including , as though such co-agents, sub-agents and attorneys-in-fact were the "collateral agent" under the Loan Documents) as if set forth in full herein with respect thereto.
collateral agent
Section 9.05
Article IX
Article X
Section 10.04(c)
          Section 9.02 . (a) The Person serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender Party as any other Lender Party and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent and the term "Lender Party" or "Lender Parties" shall, unless otherwise expressly indicated or unless the context otherwise requires, include the Person serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder in its individual capacity. Such Person and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to, act as the financial advisor or in any other advisory capacity for and generally engage in any kind of business with the Borrower or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if such Person were not the Administrative Agent hereunder and without any duty to account therefor to the Lender Parties.
Administrative Agent Individually
          (b) Each Lender Party understands that the Person serving as Administrative Agent, acting in its individual capacity, and its Affiliates (collectively, the "") are engaged in a wide range of financial services and businesses (including investment management, financing, securities trading, corporate and investment banking and research) (such services and businesses are collectively referred to in this as "") and may engage in the Activities with or on behalf of one or more of the Loan Parties or their respective Affiliates. Furthermore, the Agent's Group may, in undertaking the Activities, engage in trading in financial products or undertake other investment businesses for its own account or on behalf of others (including the Loan Parties and their Affiliates and including holding, for its own account or on behalf of others, equity, debt and similar positions in the Borrower, another Loan Party or their respective Affiliates), including trading in or holding long, short or derivative positions in securities, loans or other financial products of one or more of the Loan Parties or their Affiliates. Each Lender Party understands and agrees that in engaging in the Activities, the Agent's Group may receive or otherwise obtain information concerning the Loan Parties or their Affiliates (including information concerning the ability of the Loan Parties to perform their respective Obligations hereunder and under the other Loan Documents) which information may not be available to any of the Lender Parties that are not members of the Agent's Group. None of the Administrative Agent nor any member of the Agent's Group shall have any duty to disclose to any Lender Party or use on behalf of the Lender Parties, and shall not be liable for the failure to so disclose or use, any information whatsoever about or derived from the Activities or otherwise (including any information concerning the business, prospects, operations, property, financial and other condition or creditworthiness of any Loan Party or any Affiliate of any Loan Party) or to account for any revenue or profits obtained in connection with the Activities, except that the Administrative Agent shall deliver or otherwise make available to each Lender Party such
Agent's Group
Section 9.02
Activities
 
documents as are expressly required by any Loan Document to be transmitted by the Administrative Agent to the Lender Parties.
          (c) Each Lender Party further understands that there may be situations where members of the Agent's Group or their respective customers (including the Loan Parties and their Affiliates) either now have or may in the future have interests or take actions that may conflict with the interests of any one or more of the Lender Parties (including the interests of the Lender Parties hereunder and under the other Loan Documents). Each Lender Party agrees that no member of the Agent's Group is or shall be required to restrict its activities as a result of the Person serving as Administrative Agent being a member of the Agent's Group, and that each member of the Agent's Group may undertake any Activities without further consultation with or notification to any Lender Party. None of (i) this Credit Agreement nor any other Loan Document, (ii) the receipt by the Agent's Group of information (including Information) concerning the Loan Parties or their Affiliates (including information concerning the ability of the Loan Parties to perform their respective Obligations hereunder and under the other Loan Documents) nor (iii) any other matter shall give rise to any fiduciary, equitable or contractual duties (including without limitation any duty of trust or confidence) owing by the Administrative Agent or any member of the Agent's Group to any Lender Party including any such duty that would prevent or restrict the Agent's Group from acting on behalf of customers (including the Loan Parties or their Affiliates) or for its own account.
          Section 9.03 . (a) The Administrative Agent's duties hereunder and under the other Loan Documents are solely ministerial and administrative in nature and the Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, but shall be required to act or refrain from acting (and shall be fully protected in so acting or refraining from acting) upon the written direction of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be expressly provided for herein or in the other Loan Documents), provided that the Administrative Agent shall not be required to take any action that, in its opinion or the opinion of its counsel, may expose the Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates to liability or that is contrary to any Loan Document or applicable law.
Duties of Administrative Agent; Exculpatory Provisions
          (b) The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it (i) with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary, or as the Administrative Agent shall believe in good faith shall be necessary, under the circumstances as provided in or or (ii) in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct. The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default or the event or events that give or may give rise to any Default unless and until the Borrower or any Lender Party shall have given notice to the Administrative Agent describing such Default and such event or events.
Section 10.06
Section 8.02)
          (c) Neither the Administrative Agent nor any member of the Agent's Group shall be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty, representation or other information made or supplied in or in connection with this Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered hereunder or thereunder or in connection herewith or therewith or the adequacy, accuracy and/or completeness of the information contained therein, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth herein or therein or the occurrence of any Default, (iv) the validity, enforceability,
 
effectiveness or genuineness of this Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other agreement, instrument or document or the perfection or priority of any Lien or security interest created or purported to be created by the Collateral Documents or (v) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in Article V or elsewhere herein, other than (but subject to the foregoing clause (ii)) to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
          (d) Nothing in this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document shall require the Administrative Agent or any of its Related Parties to carry out any "know your customer" or other checks in relation to any Person on behalf of any Lender Party and each Lender Party confirms to the Administrative Agent that it is solely responsible for any such checks it is required to carry out and that it may not rely on any statement in relation to such checks made by the Administrative Agent or any of its Related Parties.
          Section 9.04 . The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing (including any electronic message, Internet or intranet website posting or other distribution) believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed, sent or otherwise authenticated by the proper Person. The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to have been made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon. In determining compliance with any condition hereunder to the making of a Loan, or the issuance of a Letter of Credit, that by its terms must be fulfilled to the satisfaction of a Lender Party, the Administrative Agent may presume that such condition is satisfactory to such Lender Party unless an officer of the Administrative Agent responsible for the transactions contemplated hereby shall have received notice to the contrary from such Lender Party prior to the making of such Loan or the issuance of such Letter of Credit, and in the case of a Borrowing, such Lender Party shall not have made available to the Administrative Agent such Lender Party's ratable portion of such Borrowing. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrower or any other Loan Party), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
Reliance by Administrative Agent
          Section 9.05 . The Administrative Agent may perform any and all of its duties and exercise its rights and powers hereunder or under any other Loan Document by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all of its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through their respective Related Parties. Each such sub-agent and the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and each such sub-agent shall be entitled to the benefits of all provisions of this and (as though such sub-agents were the "Administrative Agent" under the Loan Documents) as if set forth in full herein with respect thereto.
Delegation of Duties
Article IX
Section 10.04
          Section 9.06 . (a) The Administrative Agent may at any time give notice of its resignation to the Lender Parties and the Borrower. Upon receipt of any such notice of resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, in consultation with the Borrower, to appoint a successor, which shall be a bank with an office in the United States, or an Affiliate of any such bank with an office in the United States. If no such successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation (such 30-day period, the ""), then the retiring Administrative Agent may on
Resignation of Administrative Agent
Lender Party Appointment Period
 
behalf of the Lender Parties, appoint a successor Administrative Agent meeting the qualifications set forth above. In addition and without any obligation on the part of the retiring Administrative Agent to appoint, on behalf of the Lender Parties, a successor Administrative Agent, the retiring Administrative Agent may at any time upon or after the end of the Lender Party Appointment Period notify the Borrower and the Lender Parties that no qualifying Person has accepted appointment as successor Administrative Agent and the effective date of such retiring Administrative Agent's resignation. Upon the resignation effective date established in such notice and regardless of whether a successor Administrative Agent has been appointed and accepted such appointment, the retiring Administrative Agent's resignation shall nonetheless become effective and (i) the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations as Administrative Agent hereunder and under the other Loan Documents and (ii) all payments, communications and determinations provided to be made by, to or through the Administrative Agent shall instead be made by or to each Lender Party directly, until such time as the Required Lenders appoint a successor Administrative Agent as provided for above in this paragraph. Upon the acceptance of a successor's appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all of the rights, powers, privileges and duties as Administrative Agent of the retiring (or retired) Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from all of its duties and obligations as Administrative Agent hereunder or under the other Loan Documents (if not already discharged therefrom as provided above in this paragraph). The fees payable by the Borrower to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Borrower and such successor. After the retiring Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, the provisions of this and shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while the retiring Administrative Agent was acting as Administrative Agent.
Article IX
Section 10.04
          (b) Any resignation pursuant to this Section by a Person acting as Administrative Agent shall, unless such Person shall notify the Borrower and the Lender Parties otherwise, also act to relieve such Person and its Affiliates of any obligation to advance or issue new, or extend existing, Swingline Loans or Letters of Credit where such advance, issuance or extension is to occur on or after the effective date of such resignation. Upon the acceptance of a successor's appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder, (i) such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all of the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring L/C Issuer and Swingline Lender, (ii) the retiring L/C Issuer and Swingline Lender shall be discharged from all of their respective duties and obligations hereunder or under the other Loan Documents, (iii) the successor Swingline Lender shall enter into an Assignment and Assumption and acquire from the retiring Swingline Lender each outstanding Swingline Loan of such retiring Swingline Lender for a purchase price equal to par plus accrued interest and (iv) the successor L/C Issuer shall issue letters of credit in substitution for the Letters of Credit, if any, outstanding at the time of such succession or make other arrangement satisfactory to the retiring L/C Issuer to effectively assume the obligations of the retiring L/C Issuer with respect to such Letters of Credit.
          (c) In addition to the foregoing, if a Lender becomes, and during the period it remains, a Defaulting Lender or a Potential Defaulting Lender, the L/C Issuer and/or the Swingline Lender may, at any time, upon giving 20 Business Days' prior written notice to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent, resign as L/C Issuer or Swingline Lender, respectively, effective at the close of business New York time on a date specified in such notice; that such resignation by the L/C Issuer shall have no effect on the validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit then outstanding or on the obligations of the Borrower or any Lender under this
provided
 
Credit Agreement with respect to any such outstanding Letter of Credit or otherwise to the L/C Issuer; and , , that such resignation by the Swingline Lender shall have no effect on its rights in respect of any outstanding Swingline Loans or on the obligations of the Borrower or any Lender under this Credit Agreement with respect to any such outstanding Swingline Loan.
provided
further
          Section 9.07 .
Non-Reliance on Administrative Agent and Other Lender Parties
          (a) Each Lender Party confirms to the Administrative Agent, each other Lender Party and each of their respective Related Parties that it (i) possesses (individually or through its Related Parties) such knowledge and experience in financial and business matters that it is capable, without reliance on the Administrative Agent, any other Lender Party or any of their respective Related Parties, of evaluating the merits and risks (including tax, legal, regulatory, credit, accounting and other financial matters) of (x) entering into this Credit Agreement, (y) making Loans and other extensions of credit hereunder and under the other Loan Documents and (z) in taking or not taking actions hereunder and thereunder, (ii) is financially able to bear such risks and (iii) has determined that entering into this Credit Agreement and making Loans and other extensions of credit hereunder and under the other Loan Documents is suitable and appropriate for it.
          (b) Each Lender Party acknowledges that (i) it is solely responsible for making its own independent appraisal and investigation of all risks arising under or in connection with this Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents, (ii) that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent, any other Lender Party or any of their respective Related Parties, made its own appraisal and investigation of all risks associated with, and its own credit analysis and decision to enter into, this Credit Agreement based on such documents and information, as it has deemed appropriate and (iii) it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent, any other Lender Party or any of their respective Related Parties, continue to be solely responsible for making its own appraisal and investigation of all risks arising under or in connection with, and its own credit analysis and decision to take or not take action under, this Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, which may include, in each case:
     (A) the financial condition, status and capitalization of the Borrower and each other Loan Party;
     (B) the legality, validity, effectiveness, adequacy or enforceability of this Credit Agreement and each other Loan Document and any other agreement, arrangement or document entered into, made or executed in anticipation of, under or in connection with any Loan Document;
     (C) determining compliance or non-compliance with any condition hereunder to the making of a Loan, or the issuance of a Letter of Credit and the form and substance of all evidence delivered in connection with establishing the satisfaction of each such condition;
     (D) the adequacy, accuracy and/or completeness of any information delivered by the Administrative Agent, any other Lender Party or by any of their respective Related Parties under or in connection with this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby or any other agreement, arrangement or document entered into, made or executed in anticipation of, under or in connection with any Loan Document.
 
          Section 9.08 . Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, none of the Persons acting as Joint Lead Arranger, Joint Bookrunners, Syndication Agents or Co-Documentation Agents listed on the cover page hereof shall have any powers, duties or responsibilities under this Credit Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents, except in its capacity, as applicable, as the Administrative Agent or as a Lender Party hereunder.
No Other Duties, Etc
          Section 9.09 . In case of the pendency of any receivership, insolvency, liquidation, bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, adjustment, composition or other judicial proceeding relative to any Loan Party, the Administrative Agent (irrespective of whether the principal of any Loan or L/C Obligation shall then be due and payable as herein expressed or by declaration or otherwise and irrespective of whether the Administrative Agent shall have made any demand on the Borrower) shall be entitled and empowered, by intervention in such proceeding or otherwise
Administrative Agent May File Proofs of Claim
               (a) to file and prove a claim for the whole amount of the principal and interest owing and unpaid in respect of the Loans, L/C Obligations and all other Obligations that are owing and unpaid and to file such other documents as may be necessary or advisable in order to have the claims of the Lenders, the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent (including any claim for the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Lenders, the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent and their respective agents and counsel and all other amounts due the Lenders, the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent under and , allowed in such judicial proceeding; and
Section 2.03(i)
(j)
Section 2.08
               (b) to collect and receive any monies or other property payable or deliverable on any such claims and to distribute the same;
and any custodian, receiver, assignee, trustee, liquidator, sequestrator or other similar official in any such judicial proceeding is hereby authorized by each Lender and the L/C Issuer to make such payments to the Administrative Agent and, if the Administrative Agent shall consent to the making of such payments directly to the Lenders and the L/C Issuer, to pay to the Administrative Agent any amount due for the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Administrative Agent and its agents and counsel, and any other amounts due the Administrative Agent under .
Section 2.08
          Nothing contained herein shall be deemed to authorize the Administrative Agent to authorize or consent to or accept or adopt on behalf of any Lender or the L/C Issuer any plan of reorganization, arrangement, adjustment or composition affecting the Obligations or the rights of any Lender or the L/C Issuer or to authorize the Administrative Agent to vote in respect of the claim of any Lender the L/C Issuer or in any such proceeding.
          Section 9.10 . The Secured Parties and the L/C Issuer irrevocably authorize the Administrative Agent, at its option and in its discretion,
Collateral and Guaranty Matters
               (a) to release any Lien on any property granted to or held by the Administrative Agent under any Loan Document (i) upon termination of the Aggregate Commitments and payment in full of all Obligations (other than contingent indemnification obligations) and the expiration or termination of all Letters of Credit, (ii) that is sold or to be sold as part of or in connection with any sale permitted hereunder or under any other Loan Document, or (iii) if approved, authorized or ratified in writing in accordance with ;
Section 10.01
 
          (b) to release any Guarantor from its obligations under the Guaranty if such Person ceases to be a Subsidiary as a result of a transaction permitted hereunder; and
          (c) to subordinate any Lien on any property granted to or held by the Administrative Agent under any Loan Document to the holder of any Lien on such property that is permitted by .
Section 7.17(ii)
          Upon request by the Administrative Agent at any time, the Required Lenders will confirm in writing the Administrative Agent's authority to release or subordinate its interest in particular types or items of property, or to release any Guarantor from its obligations under the Guaranty pursuant to this . In each case as specified in this , the Administrative Agent will, at the Borrower's expense, execute and deliver to the applicable Loan Party such documents as such Loan Party may reasonably request to evidence the release of such item of Collateral from the assignment and security interest granted under the Collateral Documents or to subordinate its interest in such item, or to release such Guarantor from its obligations under the Guaranty, in each case in accordance with the terms of the Loan Documents and this .
Section 9.10
Section 9.10
Section 9.10
          Section 9.11 . Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, if at any time the Required Lenders determine that the Person serving as Administrative Agent is (without taking into account any provision in the definition of "Defaulting Lender" or "Potential Defaulting Lender" requiring notice from the Administrative Agent or any other party) a Defaulting Lender or a Potential Defaulting Lender, the Required Lenders (determined after giving effect to ) may by notice to the Borrower and such Person remove such Person as Administrative Agent and appoint a replacement Administrative Agent hereunder with the consent of the Borrower (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld), that (i) such removal shall, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, in any event become effective if no such replacement Administrative Agent is appointed hereunder within 30 days after the giving of such notice and (ii) no such consent of the Borrower shall be required if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing at the time of such appointment.
Removal of Administrative Agent
Section 10.01
provided
          Section 10.01 . No amendment or waiver of any provision of this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, and no consent to any departure by the Borrower or any other Loan Party therefrom, shall be effective unless in writing signed by the Borrower or the applicable Loan Party, as the case may be, and (i) in the case of an amendment or waiver of any Financial Covenant or Revolving/Term A Event of Default, the Required Revolving/Term A Lenders and (ii) in the case of an amendment or waiver of any other provision or Event of Default, the Required Lenders, and acknowledged by the Administrative Agent, and each such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the specific purpose for which given; , , that no such amendment, waiver or consent shall:
Amendments, Etc
provided
however
               (a) waive any conditions set forth in as to the initial Credit Extension hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender;
Section 5.01
 
          (b) extend or increase the Commitment of a Lender (or reinstate any Commitment of a Lender terminated pursuant to ) without the written consent of such Lender;
Section 8.02
          (c) postpone any date fixed by this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document for any payment (excluding mandatory prepayments) of principal, interest, fees or other amounts due to the Lenders (or any of them) hereunder or under such other Loan Document without the written consent of each Lender entitled to such payment;
          (d) reduce the principal of, or the rate of interest specified herein on, any Loan or L/C Borrowing, or (subject to clause (v) of the second proviso to this ) any fees or other amounts payable hereunder or under any other Loan Document, or change the manner of computation of any financial ratio (including any change in any applicable defined term) used in determining the Applicable Rate that would result in a reduction of any interest rate on any Loan or any fee payable hereunder without the written consent of each Lender entitled to such amount; , , that only the consent of the Required Lenders shall be necessary to amend the definition of "Default Rate" or to waive any obligation of the Borrower to pay interest or Letter of Credit Fees at the Default Rate;
Section 10.01
provided
however
          (e) amend any provision of this Credit Agreement that would alter the allocation of payments between Term A Lenders and Term B Lenders, without the prior written consent of each of the Required Term A Lenders and the Required Term B Lenders;
          (f) change (i) any provision of this or the definition of "Required Lenders" or any other provision hereof specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to amend, waive or otherwise modify any rights hereunder or make any determination or grant any consent hereunder (other than the definitions specified in clause (ii) of this ), without the written consent of each Lender or (ii) the definition of "Required Revolving Lenders," "Required Term A Lenders," "Required Term B Lenders," "Required Revolving/Term A Lenders" or "Required Incremental Term Lenders" without the written consent of each Lender under the applicable Facility or Facilities;
Section 10.01
Section 10.01(f)
          (g) release all or substantially all of the Collateral in any transaction or series of related transactions, without the written consent of each Lender;
          (h) release or remove all or substantially all of the value of the Guarantees, taken as a whole, without the written consent of each Lender; or
          (i) impose any greater restriction on the ability of any Lender under a Facility to assign any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the written consent of (i) if such Facility is the Term A Facility, the Required Term A Lenders, (ii) if such Facility is the Term B Facility, the Required Term B Lenders, (iii) if such Facility is the Revolving Credit Facility, the Required Revolving Lenders, and (iv) if such Facility is an Incremental Term Facility, the Required Incremental Term Lenders with respect to such Incremental Term Facility, if any;
and , , that (i) no amendment, waiver or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the L/C Issuer in addition to the Lenders required above, affect the rights or duties of the L/C Issuer under this Credit Agreement or any Issuer Document relating to any Letter of Credit issued or to be issued by it; (ii) no amendment, waiver or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the Swingline Lender in addition to the Lenders required above, affect the rights or duties of the Swingline Lender under this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document; (iii) no
provided
further
 
amendment, waiver or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the Administrative Agent in addition to the Lenders required above, affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent under this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document; (iv) may not be amended, waived or otherwise modified without the consent of each Granting Lender all or any part of whose Loans are being funded by an SPC at the time of such amendment, waiver or other modification; and (v) the Fee Letters may be amended, or rights or privileges thereunder waived, in a writing executed only by the parties thereto.
Section 10.06(h)
          Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, during such period as a Lender is a Defaulting Lender, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Law such Lender shall not be entitled to vote in respect of amendments and waivers hereunder and the Commitment and the outstanding Loans or other Credit Extension of such Lender hereunder shall not be taken into account in determining whether the Required Lenders or all of the Lenders, as the case may be, have approved any such amendment or waiver (and the definition of "Required Lenders" shall automatically be deemed modified accordingly for the duration of such period); , that any such amendment or waiver that would increase or extend the term of the Commitment of such Defaulting Lender, or extend the date fixed for the payment of principal or interest owing to such Defaulting Lender hereunder, or reduce the principal amount of any obligation owing to such Defaulting Lender, or reduce the amount of or the rate or amount of interest on any amount owing to such Defaulting Lender, or of any fee payable to such Defaulting Lender hereunder, or alter the terms of this proviso, shall require the consent of such Defaulting Lender.
provided
          Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, no Affiliate of the Borrower that is a Lender shall have any right to approve or disapprove any amendment, waiver or consent hereunder and any amendment, waiver or consent which by its terms requires the consent of all Lenders or each affected Lender may be effected with the consent of the applicable Lenders other than such affiliated Lenders, except that any waiver, amendment or modification requiring the consent of all Lenders or each affected Lender that by its terms affects any such affiliated Lender in its capacity as a Lender more adversely than other affected Lenders shall require the consent of such affiliated Lender.
          Section 10.02 All notices, demands, requests, consents and other communications provided for in this Credit Agreement shall be given in writing, or by any telecommunication device capable of creating a written record (including electronic mail), and addressed to the party to be notified as follows:
Notices; Effectiveness; Electronic Communications
(i)    if to the Borrower or any other Loan Party,
AMC Networks Inc. 11 Penn Plaza New York, New York 10001 Attention: Sean Sullivan Telephone: 646-393-8135 Facsimile: 646-273-7392
:
Each with a copy to
Sullivan & Cromwell LLP Attention: John Mead 125 Broad Street New York, New York 10004-2498 Telephone: (212) 558-3764
 
Facsimile No.: (212) 558-3588 E-mail Address: meadj@sullcrom.com
(ii)   if to the Administrative Agent
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. Loan and Agency Services Group 1111 Fannin, 10th Floor Houston, Texas 77002 Attention: Yi-Chun Kuo Facsimile No.: (713) 750-2878 E-mail Address: yi-chun.kuo@jpmorgan.com
Each with a copy to:
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. 383 Madison Avenue New York, New York 10179 Attention: John Kowalczuk Facsimile No.: (212) 270-5127 E-mail Address: john.kowalczuk@jpmorgan.com
(iii)  if to the Collateral Agent
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. Loan and Agency Services Group 1111 Fannin, 10th Floor Houston, Texas 77002 Attention: Yi-Chun Kuo Facsimile No.: (713) 750-2878 E-mail Address: yi-chun.kuo@jpmorgan.com
Each with a copy to:
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. 383 Madison Avenue New York, New York 10179 Attention: John Kowalczuk Facsimile No.: (212) 270-5127 E-mail Address: john.kowalczuk@jpmorgan.com
(iv)  if to the L/C Issuer,
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. Global Trade Services 10420 Highland Manor Drive, Floor 4 Tampa, Florida 33610-9128 Attention: Letter of Credit Department Facsimile: (813) 432-5162 E-mail Address: james.alonzo@jpmchase.com
(v)   if to the Swingline Lender
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. Loan and Agency Services Group
 
1111 Fannin, 10th Floor Houston, Texas 77002 Attention: Yi-Chun Kuo Facsimile No.: (713) 750-2878 E-mail Address: yi-chun.kuo@jpmorgan.com
:
Each with a copy to
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. 383 Madison Avenue New York, New York 10179 Attention: John Kowalczuk Facsimile No.: (212) 270-5127 E-mail Address: john.kowalczuk@jpmorgan.com
(v)   if to any other Lender Party, to it at its address (or facsimile number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
or at such other address as shall be notified in writing (x) in the case of the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the Swingline Lender, to the other parties and (y) in the case of all other parties, to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent.
          (b) All notices, demands, requests, consents and other communications described in clause (a) shall be effective (i) if delivered by hand, including any overnight courier service, upon personal delivery, (ii) if delivered by mail, on the date five Business Days after dispatch by certified or registered mail, (iii) if delivered by posting to an Approved Electronic Platform, an Internet website or a similar telecommunication device requiring that a user have prior access to such Approved Electronic Platform, website or other device (to the extent permitted by below to be delivered thereunder), when such notice, demand, request, consent and other communication shall have been made generally available on such Approved Electronic Platform, Internet website or similar device to the class of Person being notified (regardless of whether any such Person must accomplish, and whether or not any such Person shall have accomplished, any action prior to obtaining access to such items, including registration, disclosure of contact information, compliance with a standard user agreement or undertaking a duty of confidentiality) and such Person has been notified in respect of such posting that a communication has been posted to the Approved Electronic Platform and (iv) if delivered by electronic mail or any other telecommunications device, when transmitted to an electronic mail address (or by another means of electronic delivery) as provided in clause (a); , that if such notice or communication is given pursuant to clause (iii) or (iv) hereof and is not posted or transmitted, as applicable, during the normal business hours of the recipient, such notice or communication shall be deemed to have been sent at the opening of business on the next Business Day of the recipient; , , that notices and communications to the Administrative Agent pursuant to or shall not be effective until received by the Administrative Agent.
clause (d)
provided
provided
however
Article II
Article IX
          (c) Notwithstanding clauses (a) and (b) (unless the Administrative Agent requests that the provisions of clause (a) and (b) be followed) and any other provision in this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document providing for the delivery of any Approved Electronic Communication by any other means, the Loan Parties shall deliver all Approved Electronic Communications to the
 
Administrative Agent by properly transmitting such Approved Electronic Communications in an electronic/soft medium in a format acceptable to the Administrative Agent to oploanswebadmin@citigroup.com or such other electronic mail address (or similar means of electronic delivery) as the Administrative Agent may notify to the Borrower. Nothing in this clause (c) shall prejudice the right of the Administrative Agent or any Lender Party to deliver any Approved Electronic Communication to any Loan Party in any manner authorized in this Credit Agreement or to request that the Borrower effect delivery in such manner.
          (d) . (i) Each of the Lender Parties and each Loan Party agree that the Administrative Agent may, but shall not be obligated to, make the Approved Electronic Communications available to the Lender Parties by posting such Approved Electronic Communications on IntraLinks or a substantially similar electronic platform chosen by the Administrative Agent to be its electronic transmission system (the "").
Electronic Communications
Approved Electronic Platform
          (ii) Although the Approved Electronic Platform and its primary web portal are secured with generally-applicable security procedures and policies implemented or modified by the Administrative Agent from time to time (including, as of the Closing Date, a dual firewall and a User ID/Password Authorization System) and the Approved Electronic Platform is secured through a single-user-per-deal authorization method whereby each user may access the Approved Electronic Platform only on a deal-by-deal basis, each of the Lender Parties and each Loan Party acknowledges and agrees that the distribution of material through an electronic medium is not necessarily secure and that there are confidentiality and other risks associated with such distribution. In consideration for the convenience and other benefits afforded by such distribution and for the other consideration provided hereunder, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, each of the Lender Parties and each Loan Party hereby approves distribution of the Approved Electronic Communications through the Approved Electronic Platform and understands and assumes the risks of such distribution.
          (iii) THE APPROVED ELECTRONIC PLATFORM AND THE APPROVED ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATIONS ARE PROVIDED "AS IS" AND "AS AVAILABLE". NONE OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT NOR ANY OTHER MEMBER OF THE AGENT'S GROUP WARRANT THE ACCURACY, ADEQUACY OR COMPLETENESS OF THE APPROVED ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATIONS OR THE APPROVED ELECTRONIC PLATFORM AND EACH EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS ANY LIABILITY FOR ERRORS OR OMISSIONS IN THE APPROVED ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATIONS OR THE APPROVED ELECTRONIC PLATFORM. NO WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY, INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, ANY WARRANTY OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, NON-INFRINGEMENT OF THIRD PARTY RIGHTS OR FREEDOM FROM VIRUSES OR OTHER CODE DEFECTS, IS MADE BY THE AGENT PARTIES IN CONNECTION WITH THE APPROVED ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATIONS OR THE APPROVED ELECTRONIC PLATFORM.
          (iv) Each of the Lender Parties and each Loan Party agree that the Administrative Agent may, but (except as may be required by applicable law) shall not be obligated to, store the Approved Electronic Communications on the Approved Electronic Platform in accordance with the Administrative Agent's generally-applicable document retention procedures and policies.
 
          (e) . The Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Lenders shall be entitled to rely and act upon any notices (including telephonic Committed Loan Notices) purportedly given by or on behalf of the Borrower even if (i) such notices were not made in a manner specified herein, were incomplete or were not preceded or followed by any other form of notice specified herein, or (ii) the terms thereof, as understood by the recipient, varied from any confirmation thereof. The Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, each Lender and the Related Parties of each of them from all losses, costs, expenses and liabilities resulting from the reliance by such Person on each notice purportedly given by or on behalf of the Borrower. All telephonic notices to and other telephonic communications with the Administrative Agent may be recorded by the Administrative Agent, and each of the parties hereto hereby consents to such recording.
Reliance by Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and Lenders
          (f) . Each of the Administrative Agent and the Lender Parties agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below), except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its Affiliates and to its and its Affiliates' respective partners, directors, officers, employees, agents, advisors and representatives on a need to know basis (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (b) to the extent requested by any regulatory authority purporting to have jurisdiction over it (including any self-regulatory authority, such as the National Association of Insurance Commissioners), (c) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party hereto, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or under any other Loan Document, any action or proceeding relating to this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, the enforcement of rights hereunder or thereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this Section (other than in the case of a pledge to any Federal Reserve Bank or other central banking authority), to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Credit Agreement, (ii) any pledge referred to in , (iii) any actual or prospective swap counterparty (or its managers, administrators, trustees, partners, directors, officers, employees, agents, advisors and other representatives) surety, reinsurer, guarantor or credit liquidity enhancer (or their advisors) to or in connection with any swap, derivative or other similar transaction under which payments are to be made by reference to the Obligations or to the Borrower and its obligations or to this Credit Agreement or payments hereunder, (iv) to any rating agency when required by it or (v) the CUSIP Service Bureau or any similar organization, (g) with the written consent of the Borrower or (h) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, any Lender Party or any of their respective Affiliates on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Borrower or any other Loan Party. For purposes of this Section, "" means all information received from any Loan Party or any Subsidiary thereof relating to any Loan Party or any Subsidiary thereof or any of their respective businesses, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent or any Lender Party on a non-confidential basis prior to disclosure by any Loan Party or any Subsidiary thereof, that, in the case of information received from a Loan Party or any such Subsidiaries after the Closing Date, such information is not marked "PUBLIC" or otherwise identified at the time of delivery as confidential.
Confidentiality
Section 10.06(f)
Information
provided
          (g) . (i) Certain of the Lenders may enter into this Credit Agreement and take or not take action hereunder or under the other Loan Documents on the basis of information that does not contain material non-public information with respect to any of the Loan Parties or their securities (""). Other Lenders may enter into this Credit Agreement and take or not take action hereunder or under the other Loan Documents
Treatment of Information
Restricting Information
 
on the basis of information that may contain Restricting Information. Each Lender Party acknowledges that United States federal and state securities laws prohibit any Person from purchasing or selling securities on the basis of material, non-public information concerning the such issuer of such securities or, subject to certain limited exceptions, from communicating such information to any other Person. Neither the Administrative Agent nor any of its Related Parties shall, by making any Communications (including Restricting Information) available to a Lender Party, by participating in any conversations or other interactions with a Lender Party or otherwise, make or be deemed to make any statement with regard to or otherwise warrant that any such information or Communication does or does not contain Restricting Information nor shall the Administrative Agent or any of its Related Parties be responsible or liable in any way for any decision a Lender Party may make to limit or to not limit its access to Restricting Information. In particular, none of the Administrative Agent nor any of its Related Parties (i) shall have, and the Administrative Agent, on behalf of itself and each of its Related Parties, hereby disclaims, any duty to ascertain or inquire as to whether or not a Lender Party has or has not limited its access to Restricting Information, such Lender Party's policies or procedures regarding the safeguarding of material, nonpublic information or such Lender Party's compliance with applicable laws related thereto or (ii) shall have, or incur, any liability to any Loan Party or Lender Party or any of their respective Related Parties arising out of or relating to the Administrative Agent or any of its Related Parties providing or not providing Restricting Information to any Lender Party.
          (ii) Each Loan Party agrees that (i) all Communications it provides to the Administrative Agent intended for delivery to the Lender Parties whether by posting to the Approved Electronic Platform or otherwise shall be clearly and conspicuously marked "PUBLIC" if such Communications do not contain Restricting Information which, at a minimum, means that the word "PUBLIC" shall appear prominently on the first page thereof, (ii) by marking Communications "PUBLIC," each Loan Party shall be deemed to have authorized the Administrative Agent and the Lender Parties to treat such Communications as either publicly available information or not material information (although, in this latter case, such Communications may contain sensitive business information and, therefore, remain subject to the confidentiality undertakings of with respect to such Loan Party or its securities for purposes of United States Federal and state securities laws, (iii) all Communications marked "PUBLIC" may be delivered to all Lender Parties and may be made available through a portion of the Approved Electronic Platform designated "Public Side Information," and (iv) the Administrative Agent shall be entitled to treat any Communications that are not marked "PUBLIC" as Restricting Information and may post such Communications to a portion of the Approved Electronic Platform not designated "Public Side Information." Neither the Administrative Agent nor any of its Affiliates shall be responsible for any statement or other designation by a Loan Party regarding whether a Communication contains or does not contain material non-public information with respect to any of the Loan Parties or their securities nor shall the Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates incur any liability to any Loan Party, any Lender Party or any other Person for any action taken by the Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates based upon such statement or designation, including any action as a result of which Restricting Information is provided to a Lender Party that may decide not to take access to Restricting Information. Nothing in this shall modify or limit a Lender Party's obligations under with regard to Communications and the maintenance of the confidentiality of or other treatment of Information.
Section 10.02(f)
Section 10.02(g)
Section 10.02(f)
          (iii) Each Lender Party acknowledges that circumstances may arise that require it to refer to Communications that might contain Restricting Information.
 
Accordingly, each Lender Party agrees that it will nominate at least one designee to receive Communications (including Restricting Information) on its behalf and identify such designee (including such designee's contact information) on such Lender Party's Administrative Questionnaire. Each Lender Party agrees to notify the Administrative Agent from time to time of such Lender Party's designee's e-mail address to which notice of the availability of Restricting Information may be sent by electronic transmission.
          (iv) Each Lender Party acknowledges that Communications delivered hereunder and under the other Loan Documents may contain Restricting Information and that such Communications are available to all Lender Parties generally. Each Lender Party that elects not to take access to Restricting Information does so voluntarily and, by such election, acknowledges and agrees that the Administrative Agent and other Lender Parties may have access to Restricting Information that is not available to such electing Lender Party. None of the Administrative Agent nor any Lender Party with access to Restricting Information shall have any duty to disclose such Restricting Information to such electing Lender Party or to use such Restricting Information on behalf of such electing Lender Party, and shall not be liable for the failure to so disclose or use, such Restricting Information.
          (v) The provisions of the foregoing clauses of this are designed to assist the Administrative Agent, the Lender Parties and the Loan Parties, in complying with their respective contractual obligations and applicable law in circumstances where certain Lender Parties express a desire not to receive Restricting Information notwithstanding that certain Communications hereunder or under the other Loan Documents or other information provided to the Lender Parties hereunder or thereunder may contain Restricting Information. Neither the Administrative Agent nor any of its Related Parties warrants or makes any other statement with respect to the adequacy of such provisions to achieve such purpose nor does the Administrative Agent or any of its Related Parties warrant or make any other statement to the effect that a Loan Party's or Lender Party's adherence to such provisions will be sufficient to ensure compliance by such Loan Party or Lender Party with its contractual obligations or its duties under applicable law in respect of Restricting Information and each of the Lender Parties and each Loan Party assumes the risks associated therewith.
Section 10.02(g)
     Section 10.03 . No failure on the part of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or any Lender to exercise, and no delay by any such Person in exercising, and no course of dealing with respect to, any right, remedy, power or privilege under this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any right, remedy, power or privilege under this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right, power or privilege. The right, remedy, power or privilege provided herein, and provided under any other Loan Document, are cumulative and not exclusive of any right, remedy, power or privilege provided by law.
No Waiver; Cumulative Remedies
     Section 10.04 . (a) . The Borrower shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates (including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP, counsel for the Administrative Agent and of special and local counsel to the Lenders retained by the Administrative Agent following consultation with the Borrower), for which an invoice has been presented to the Borrower, in connection with the preparation, due diligence, administration, syndication and closing of this Credit Agreement and
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver
Costs and Expenses
 
the other Loan Documents or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions hereof or thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the L/C Issuer, for which an invoice has been presented to the Borrower, in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the L/C Issuer (including the fees, charges and disbursements of one primary counsel for the Administrative Agent and one additional counsel for the Lenders) for which an invoice has been presented to the Borrower, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights (A) in connection with this Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or (B) in connection with Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit.
          (b) . The Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent (and any sub-agent thereof), the Joint Lead Arrangers, the Lenders, the L/C Issuer and each of their respective Affiliates, officers, directors, employees, members, partners and agents (each such Person being called an "") against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related reasonable out-of-pocket documented expenses (including, without limitation, the reasonable out-ofpocket documented and invoiced fees, disbursements and other charges of (a) one counsel, (b) in the case of a material conflict between two or more Indemnitees, as so determined in the reasonable opinion of existing counsel, one additional counsel, and (c) one local counsel in each applicable jurisdiction), incurred by any Indemnitee or asserted against any Indemnitee by any third party or by the Borrower or any other Loan Party (but excluding any proceeding brought by a Lender against any other Lender (in such Lender's capacity as a Lender and not in any capacity as a Joint Lead Arranger or the Administrative Agent)) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of this Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby or thereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respective obligations hereunder or thereunder or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, or, in the case of the Administrative Agent (and any sub-agent thereof) and its Affiliates, officers, directors, employees and agents only, the administration of this Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use or proposed use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by the L/C Issuer to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property owned or operated by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding (or preparation of a defense in connection therewith) relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory, whether brought by a third party or by the Borrower or any other Loan Party or any of the Borrower's or such Loan Party's directors, shareholders or creditors, and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto, in all cases, whether or not caused by or arising, in whole or in part, out of the comparative, contributory or sole negligence of the Indemnitee; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses (x) are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee or (y) result from a claim brought by the Borrower or any other Loan Party against an Indemnitee for material breach of such Indemnitee's material obligations hereunder or under any other Loan Document, if the Borrower or such Loan Party has obtained a judgment in its favor on such claim from a court of competent jurisdiction.
Indemnification by the Borrower
Indemnitee
provided
 
          (c) . To the extent that the Borrower for any reason fails to indefeasibly pay any amount required under subsection (a) or (b) of this Section to be paid by it to the Administrative Agent (or any sub-agent thereof), the L/C Issuer or any Related Party of any of the foregoing, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent (or any such sub-agent), the L/C Issuer or such Related Party, as the case may be, such Lender's Applicable Percentage (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount, that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent (or any such sub-agent) or the L/C Issuer in its capacity as such, or against any Related Party of any of the foregoing acting for the Administrative Agent (or any such sub-agent) or L/C Issuer in connection with such capacity. The obligations of the Lenders under this subsection (c) are subject to the provisions of .
Reimbursement by Lenders
provided
Section 2.11(d)
          (d) . To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the Borrower shall not assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof. No Indemnitee referred to in subsection (b) above shall be liable for any damages arising from the use by unintended recipients of any information or other materials distributed by it through telecommunications, electronic or other information transmission systems in connection with this Credit Agreement or the other Loan Documents or the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby.
Waiver of Consequential Damages, Etc
          (e) . All amounts due under this Section shall be payable not later than ten Business Days after demand therefor.
Payments
          (f) . The agreements in this Section shall survive the resignation of the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer, the replacement of any Lender, the termination of the Aggregate Commitments and the repayment, satisfaction or discharge of all the other Obligations.
Survival
     Section 10.05 . To the extent that any payment by or on behalf of the Borrower is made to the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or any Lender, or the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or any Lender exercises its right of setoff, and such payment or the proceeds of such setoff or any part thereof is subsequently invalidated, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside or required (including pursuant to any settlement entered into by the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or such Lender in its discretion) to be repaid to a trustee, receiver or any other party, in connection with any proceeding under any Debtor Relief Law or otherwise, then (a) to the extent of such recovery, the obligation or part thereof originally intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued in full force and effect as if such payment had not been made or such setoff had not occurred, and (b) each Lender and the L/C Issuer severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent upon demand its applicable share (without duplication) of any amount so recovered from or repaid by the Administrative Agent, plus interest thereon from the date of such demand to the date such payment is made at a rate per annum equal to the Federal Funds Rate from time to time in effect. The obligations of the Lenders and the L/C Issuer under clause (b) of the preceding sentence shall survive the payment in full of the Obligations and the termination of this Credit Agreement.
Payments Set Aside
 
     Section 10.06 . (a) . The provisions of this Credit Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, except that neither the Borrower nor any other Loan Party may assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent and each Lender and no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder except (i) to an Eligible Assignee in accordance with the provisions of , (ii) by way of participation in accordance with the provisions of , (iii) by way of pledge or assignment of a security interest subject to the restrictions of , or (iv) to an SPC in accordance with the provisions of (and any other attempted assignment or transfer by any party hereto shall be null and void). Nothing in this Credit Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, Participants to the extent provided in subsection (d) of this Section and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Credit Agreement.
Successors and Assigns
Successors and Assigns Generally
Section 10.06(b)
Section 10.06(d)
Section 10.06(f)
Section 10.06(h)
          (b) . Any Lender (other than the Swingline Lender with respect to the Swingline Loans) may at any time assign to one or more Eligible Assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Credit Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans (including for purposes of this , participations in L/C Obligations) at the time owing to it); that any such assignment shall be subject to the following conditions:
Assignments by Lenders
Section 10.06(b)
provided
          (i) .
Minimum Amounts
          (A) in the case of an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Commitment under any Facility and the Loans at the time owing to it under such Facility or in the case of an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund, no minimum amount need be assigned; and
          (B) in any case not described in subsection (b)(i)(A) of this Section, the aggregate amount of the Commitment (which for this purpose includes Loans outstanding thereunder) or, if the Commitment is not then in effect, the principal outstanding balance of the Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment, determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent or, if "Trade Date" is specified in the Assignment and Assumption, as of the Trade Date, shall not be less than $5,000,000, in the case of any assignment in respect of the Revolving Credit Facility or Term A Facility, or $1,000,000, in the case of any assignment in respect of the Term B Facility or Incremental Facility, if any, unless each of the Administrative Agent and, so long as no Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Borrower otherwise consents (each such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed); , , that concurrent assignments to members of an Assignee Group and concurrent assignments from members of an Assignee Group to a single Eligible Assignee (or to an Eligible Assignee and members of its Assignee Group) will be treated as a single assignment for purposes of determining whether such minimum amount has been met; , that, in any case, unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, after giving effect to an assignment under any Facility, the
provided
however
provided further
 
aggregate amount of the Facility held by such assigning Lender shall not be less than $10,000,000, in the case of any assignment in respect of the Revolving Credit Facility, or $1,000,000, in the case of any assignment in respect of the Term A Facility, Term B Facility or Incremental Facility, if any.
          (ii) . Each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Credit Agreement with respect to the Loans or the Commitment assigned, except that this clause (ii) shall not prohibit any Lender from assigning all or a portion of its rights and obligations among separate Facilities on a non-pro rata basis;
Proportionate Amounts
          (iii) . No consent shall be required for any assignment except to the extent required by subsection (b)(i)(B) of this Section and, in addition:
Required Consents
          (A) the consent of the Borrower (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) shall be required unless (1) an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing at the time of such assignment or (2) such assignment is to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund; , no consent of the Borrower shall be required for an assignment by the Initial Term B Lender; , the Borrower shall be deemed to have consented to any assignment of Term Loans unless it shall object thereto by written notice to the Administrative Agent within seven (7) Business Days after having received written notice thereof;
provided
provided
further
          (B) the consent of the Administrative Agent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) shall be required for assignments in respect of (i) any Term Commitment or Revolving Credit Commitment if such assignment is to a Person that is not a Lender with a Commitment in respect of the applicable Facility, an Affiliate of such Lender or an Approved Fund with respect to such Lender or (ii) any Term Loan to a Person that is not a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund or the Borrower or any of its Affiliates or Subsidiaries; and
          (C) the consent of the L/C Issuer (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) shall be required for any assignment that increases the obligation of the assignee to participate in exposure under one or more Letters of Credit (whether or not then outstanding).
          (iv) . The parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee in the amount of $3,500; ; , , that concurrent assignments to members of an Assignee Group and concurrent assignments from members of an Assignee Group to a single Eligible Assignee (or to an Eligible Assignee and members of its Assignee Group) will be treated as a single assignment for purposes of determining the processing and recordation fee; , , that the Administrative Agent may, in its sole discretion, elect to waive such processing and recordation fee in the case of any assignment. The assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire.
Assignment and Assumption
provided
however
provided
further
 
          (v) . No such assignment shall be made to a natural person.
No Assignment to Natural Persons
     Subject to acceptance and recording thereof by the Administrative Agent pursuant to subsection (c) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption, the Eligible Assignee thereunder shall be a party to this Credit Agreement and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Credit Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Credit Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Credit Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of , , and with respect to facts and circumstances occurring prior to the effective date of such assignment). Upon request, the Borrower (at its expense) shall execute and deliver a Note to the assignee Lender. Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Credit Agreement that does not comply with this subsection shall be treated for purposes of this Credit Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with .
Section
3.01
Section 3.04
Section 3.05
Section 10.04
Section 10.06(d)
          (c) . The Administrative Agent, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at the Administrative Agent's Office a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitments of, and principal amounts of the Loans and L/C Obligations owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ""). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Credit Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrower and any Lender at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
Register
          (d) . Any Lender may at any time, without the consent of, or notice to, the Borrower or the Administrative Agent, sell participations to any Person (other than a natural person or the Borrower or any of the Borrower's Affiliates or Subsidiaries) (each, a "") in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and/or obligations under this Credit Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and/or the Loans (including such Lender's participations in L/C Obligations) owing to it); that (i) such Lender's obligations under this Credit Agreement shall remain unchanged, (ii) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (iii) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the L/C Issuer shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Credit Agreement. Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Credit Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Credit Agreement; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, waiver or other modification described in , , , or of the first proviso to that affects such Participant. Subject to of this Section, the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of , and to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to . To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of
Participations
Participant
provided
provided
clauses (b)
(c)
(d)
(f)
(g)
Section 10.01
subsection (e)
Section 3.01
Section 3.04
Section 3.05
Section 10.06(b)
Section
 
as though it were a Lender; such Participant agrees to be subject to as though it were a Lender.
10.07
provided
Section 2.12
          (e) . A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under or than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrower's prior written consent. A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of unless the Borrower is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower, to comply with as though it were a Lender.
Limitations upon Participant Rights
Section 3.01
Section 3.04
Section 3.01
Section 3.01(e)
          (f) . Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Credit Agreement (including under its Note, if any) to secure obligations of such Lender, including any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank or other central banking authority; that no such pledge or assignment shall release such Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
Certain Pledges
provided
          (g) . The words "execution," "signed," "signature," and words of like import in any Assignment and Assumption shall be deemed to include electronic signatures or the keeping of records in electronic form, each of which shall be of the same legal effect, validity or enforceability as a manually executed signature or the use of a paper-based recordkeeping system, as the case may be, to the extent and as provided for in any applicable law, including the Federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, the New York State Electronic Signatures and Records Act, or any other similar state laws based on the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.
Electronic Execution of Assignments
          (h) . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, any Lender (a "") may grant to a special purpose funding vehicle identified as such in writing from time to time by the Granting Lender to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower (an "") the option to provide all or any part of any Loan that such Granting Lender would otherwise be obligated to make pursuant to this Credit Agreement; that (i) nothing herein shall constitute a commitment by any SPC to fund any Loan, and (ii) if an SPC elects not to exercise such option or otherwise fails to make all or any part of such Loan, the Granting Lender shall be obligated to make such Loan pursuant to the terms hereof or, if it fails to do so, to make such payment to the Administrative Agent as is required under . Each party hereto hereby agrees that (i) neither the grant to any SPC nor the exercise by any SPC of such option shall increase the costs or expenses or otherwise increase or change the obligations of the Borrower under this Credit Agreement (including its obligations under ), (ii) no SPC shall be liable for any indemnity or similar payment obligation under this Credit Agreement for which a Lender would be liable, and (iii) the Granting Lender shall for all purposes, including the approval of any amendment, waiver or other modification of any provision of any Loan Document, remain the lender of record hereunder. The making of a Loan by an SPC hereunder shall utilize the Commitment of the Granting Lender to the same extent, and as if, such Loan were made by such Granting Lender. In furtherance of the foregoing, each party hereto hereby agrees (which agreement shall survive the termination of this Credit Agreement) that, prior to the date that is one year and one day after the payment in full of all outstanding commercial paper or other senior debt of any SPC, it will not institute against, or join any other Person in instituting against, such SPC any bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, insolvency, or liquidation proceeding under the laws of the United
Special Purpose Funding Vehicles
Granting Lender
SPC
provided
Section 2.11(b)(ii)
Section 3.04
 
States or any State thereof. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, any SPC may (i) with notice to, but without prior consent of the Borrower and the Administrative Agent and with the payment of a processing fee in the amount of $2,500, assign all or any portion of its right to receive payment with respect to any Loan to the Granting Lender and (ii) disclose on a confidential basis any non-public information relating to its funding of Loans to any rating agency, commercial paper dealer or provider of any surety or Guarantee or credit or liquidity enhancement to such SPC.
          (i) . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, if at any time JPMCB assigns all of its Revolving Credit Commitments and Revolving Credit Loans pursuant to , JPMCB may, upon 30 days' notice to the Borrower and the Lenders, resign as Swingline Lender or L/C Issuer. In the event of any such resignation as Swingline Lender or L/C Issuer, the Borrower shall be entitled to appoint from among the Lenders a successor Swingline Lender or L/C Issuer, as the case may be, hereunder; , , that no failure by the Borrower to appoint any such successor shall affect the resignation of JPMCB as Swingline Lender or L/C Issuer. If JPMCB resigns as Swingline Lender, it shall retain all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the Swingline Lender hereunder with respect to all Swingline Loans outstanding as of the effective date of its resignation as Swingline Lender and all Obligations with respect thereto (including the right to require the Lenders to make Base Rate Loans or fund Mandatory Borrowings pursuant to ). If JPMCB resigns as L/C Issuer, it shall retain all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the L/C Issuer hereunder with respect to all Letters of Credit outstanding as of the effective date of its resignation as L/C Issuer and all L/C Obligations with respect thereto (including the right to require the Lenders to make Base Rate Loans or fund risk participations in Unreimbursed Amounts pursuant to . Upon the appointment and acceptance of a successor L/C Issuer, (a) such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all of the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring L/C Issuer, and (b) the successor L/C Issuer shall issue letters of credit in substitution for the Letters of Credit, if any, outstanding at the time of such succession or make other arrangements satisfactory to JPMCB to effectively assume the obligations of JPMCB with respect to such Letters of Credit.
Resignation as Swingline Lender and L/C Issuer after Assignment
Section 10.06(b)
provided
however
Section 2.03(c)
Section 2.03(c))
     Section 10.07 . If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender, the L/C Issuer and each of their respective Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final, in whatever currency) at any time held and other obligations (in whatever currency) at any time owing by such Lender, the L/C Issuer or any such Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower or any other Loan Party against any and all of the obligations of the Borrower or such Loan Party now or hereafter existing under this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document to such Lender or the L/C Issuer, irrespective of whether or not such Lender or the L/C Issuer shall have made any demand under this Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document and although such obligations of the Borrower or such Loan Party may be contingent or unmatured or are owed to a branch or office of such Lender or the L/C Issuer different from the branch or office holding such deposit or obligated on such indebtedness. The rights of each Lender, the L/C Issuer and their respective Affiliates under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) that such Lender, the L/C Issuer or their respective Affiliates may have. Each Lender and the L/C Issuer agrees to notify the Borrower and the Administrative Agent promptly after any such setoff and application, that the failure to give such notice shall not affect the validity of such setoff and application.
Right of Setoff
provided
 
     Section 10.08 . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in any Loan Document, the interest paid or agreed to be paid under the Loan Documents shall not exceed the maximum rate of non-usurious interest permitted by applicable Law (the ""). If the Administrative Agent or any Lender shall receive interest in an amount that exceeds the Maximum Rate, the excess interest shall be applied to the principal of the Loans or, if it exceeds such unpaid principal, refunded to the Borrower. In determining whether the interest contracted for, charged, or received by the Administrative Agent or a Lender exceeds the Maximum Rate, such Person may, to the extent permitted by applicable Law, (a) characterize any payment that is not principal as an expense, fee, or premium rather than interest, (b) exclude voluntary prepayments and the effects thereof, and (c) amortize, prorate, allocate, and spread in equal or unequal parts the total amount of interest throughout the contemplated term of the Obligations hereunder.
Interest Rate Limitation
Maximum Rate
     Section 10.09 . This Credit Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto in different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof. Except as provided in , this Credit Agreement shall become effective when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof that, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties hereto. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Credit Agreement by telecopy or electronic transmission shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Credit Agreement.
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness
Section 5.01
     Section 10.10 . All representations and warranties made hereunder and in any other Loan Document or other document delivered pursuant hereto or thereto or in connection herewith or therewith shall survive the execution and delivery hereof and thereof. Such representations and warranties have been or will be relied upon by the Administrative Agent and each Lender, regardless of any investigation made by the Administrative Agent or any Lender or on their behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default at the time of any Credit Extension, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as any Loan or any other Obligation hereunder shall remain unpaid or unsatisfied or any Letter of Credit shall remain outstanding.
Survival of Representations and Warranties
     Section 10.11 . If any provision of this Credit Agreement or the other Loan Documents is held to be illegal, invalid or unenforceable, (a) the legality, validity and enforceability of the remaining provisions of this Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents shall not be affected or impaired thereby and (b) the parties shall endeavor in good faith negotiations to replace the illegal, invalid or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the illegal, invalid or unenforceable provisions. The invalidity of a provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability
     Section 10.12 . If any Lender requests compensation under , or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to , or if any Lender gives a notice pursuant to , or if any Lender is a Defaulting Lender and the Borrower gives a notice pursuant to , or if any Lender does not agree to any request by the
Replacement of Lenders
Section 3.04
Section 3.01
Section 3.02
Section 2.16(f)
 
Borrower for a consent, approval, amendment or waiver hereunder that requires the consent or approval of all of the Lenders, then the Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in, and consents required by, , all of its interests, rights and obligations under this Credit Agreement and the related Loan Documents to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment), that:
Section 10.05)
provided
     (a) the Borrower shall have paid to the Administrative Agent the assignment fee specified in ;
Section 10.06(b)
     (b) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and L/C Advances, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder and under the other Loan Documents (including any amounts under ) from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrower (in the case of all other amounts);
Section 3.05
     (c) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under or payments required to be made pursuant to , such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments thereafter; and
Section 3.04
Section 3.01
     (d) such assignment does not conflict with applicable Laws.
     A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment or delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Borrower to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
     Section 10.13 . (a) . THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAW OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Etc
GOVERNING LAW
          (b) . THE BORROWER AND EACH OTHER LOAN PARTY IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY SUBMITS, FOR ITSELF AND ITS PROPERTY, TO THE EXCLUSIVE JURISDICTION OF THE COURTS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK AND OF THE FEDERAL COURTS OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA SITTING IN THE BOROUGH OF MANHATTAN, AND ANY APPELLATE COURT FROM ANY THEREOF, IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT OR ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT, OR FOR RECOGNITION OR ENFORCEMENT OF ANY JUDGMENT, AND EACH OF THE PARTIES HERETO IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY AGREES THAT ALL CLAIMS IN RESPECT OF ANY SUCH ACTION OR PROCEEDING SHALL BE HEARD AND DETERMINED IN SUCH NEW YORK STATE COURT OR, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, IN SUCH FEDERAL COURT. EACH OF THE PARTIES HERETO AGREES THAT A FINAL JUDGMENT IN ANY SUCH ACTION OR PROCEEDING SHALL BE CONCLUSIVE AND MAY BE ENFORCED IN OTHER JURISDICTIONS BY SUIT ON THE JUDGMENT OR IN ANY OTHER MANNER PROVIDED BY LAW. NOTHING IN THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT OR IN ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT SHALL AFFECT ANY RIGHT THAT THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT, ANY LENDER OR THE L/C ISSUER MAY OTHERWISE HAVE TO BRING ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING RELATING TO THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT OR ANY OTHER
SUBMISSION TO JURISDICTION
 
LOAN DOCUMENT AGAINST THE BORROWER OR ANY OTHER LOAN PARTY OR ITS PROPERTIES IN THE COURTS OF ANY JURISDICTION.
          (c) . THE BORROWER AND EACH OTHER LOAN PARTY IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY OBJECTION THAT IT MAY NOW OR HEREAFTER HAVE TO THE LAYING OF VENUE OF ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT OR ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT IN ANY COURT REFERRED TO IN PARAGRAPH (B) OF THIS SECTION. EACH OF THE PARTIES HERETO HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, THE DEFENSE OF AN INCONVENIENT FORUM TO THE MAINTENANCE OF SUCH ACTION OR PROCEEDING IN ANY SUCH COURT.
WAIVER OF VENUE
          (d) . EACH PARTY HERETO IRREVOCABLY CONSENTS TO SERVICE OF PROCESS IN THE MANNER PROVIDED FOR NOTICES IN . NOTHING IN THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT WILL AFFECT THE RIGHT OF ANY PARTY HERETO TO SERVE PROCESS IN ANY OTHER MANNER PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW.
SERVICE OF PROCESS
SECTION 10.02
     Section 10.14 . EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT OR ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY OR THEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PERSON HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PERSON WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT AND THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
Waiver of Jury Trial
     Section 10.15 . In connection with all aspects of each transaction contemplated hereby, the Borrower acknowledges and agrees that: (i) the credit facilities provided for hereunder and any related arranging or other services in connection therewith (including in connection with any amendment, waiver or other modification hereof or of any other Loan Document) are an arm's-length commercial transaction between the Borrower and its Affiliates, on the one hand, and the Administrative Agent and Joint Lead Arrangers, on the other hand, and the Borrower is capable of evaluating and understanding and understands and accepts the terms, risks and conditions of the transactions contemplated hereby and by the other Loan Documents (including any amendment, waiver or other modification hereof or thereof); (ii) in connection with the process leading to such transaction, the Administrative Agent and the Joint Lead Arrangers each is and has been acting solely as a principal and is not the financial advisor, agent or fiduciary, for the Borrower or any of its Affiliates, stockholders, creditors or employees or any other Person; (iii) neither the Administrative Agent, any Lender nor any Joint Lead Arranger has assumed or will assume an advisory, agency or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Borrower with respect to any of the transactions contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto, including with respect to any amendment, waiver or other modification hereof or of any
No Advisory or Fiduciary Responsibility
 
other Loan Document (irrespective of whether the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Joint Lead Arranger has advised or is currently advising the Borrower or any of its Affiliates on other matters) and neither the Administrative Agent, any Lender nor any Joint Lead Arranger has any obligation to the Borrower or any of its Affiliates with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby except those obligations expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents; (iv) the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Joint Lead Arrangers and their respective Affiliates may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Borrower and its Affiliates, and neither the Administrative Agent nor any Joint Lead Arranger has any obligation to disclose any of such interests by virtue of any advisory, agency or fiduciary relationship; and (v) the Administrative Agent and the Joint Lead Arrangers have not provided and will not provide any legal, accounting, regulatory or tax advice with respect to any of the transactions contemplated hereby (including any amendment, waiver or other modification hereof or of any other Loan Document) and the Borrower has consulted its own legal, accounting, regulatory and tax advisors to the extent it has deemed appropriate. The Borrower hereby waives and releases, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any claims that it may have against the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Joint Lead Arrangers with respect to any breach or alleged breach of agency or fiduciary duty.
     Section 10.16 . Each Lender that is subject to the USA PATRIOT Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)) (the "Patriot Act") and the Administrative Agent (for itself and not on behalf of any Lender) hereby notifies the Borrower that pursuant to the requirements of the Patriot Act, it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies each Loan Party, which information includes the name and address of each Loan Party and other information that will allow such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as applicable, to identify each Loan Party in accordance with the Patriot Act.
USA PATRIOT Act Notice
     Section 10.17 . No limited partner, member, officer, manager, employee, director, stockholder or other holder of an ownership interest of or in any Loan Party or any partnership, limited liability company, corporation or other entity which is a stockholder or other holder of an ownership interest of or in any Loan Party shall have any personal liability in respect of such obligations by reason of his, her or its status as such limited partner, officer, manager, employee, director, stockholder or holder. In addition, no general partner of any Loan Party that is a partnership, joint venture or joint adventure shall have any personal liability in respect of such Loan Party's obligation under this Credit Agreement or the Notes by reason of his, her or its status as such general partner.
No Liability of Members, Partners and Other Persons
     Section 10.18 . The Borrower hereby confirms that it has authorized and directed each Person whose preparation or delivery to the Administrative Agent or the Lenders of any opinion, report or other information is a condition or covenant under this Credit Agreement (including under and ) to so prepare or deliver such opinions, reports or other information for the benefit of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders. The Borrower agrees to confirm such authorizations and directions provided for in this from time to time as may be requested by the Administrative Agent.
Authorization of Third Parties to Deliver Information and Discuss Affairs
Article V
Article VII
Section 10.18
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Credit Agreement to be duly executed as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.4
          AMC Networks Inc., a Delaware corporation, hereby certifies as follows:
          1. The name of the corporation is AMC Networks Inc. The date of filing of its original certificate of incorporation with the Secretary of State was March 9, 2011.
          2. This restated certificate of incorporation amends, restates and integrates the provisions of the certificate of incorporation of said corporation and has been duly adopted in accordance with the provisions of Sections 242 and 245 of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware by written consent of the holder of all of the outstanding stock entitled to vote thereon and all of the outstanding stock of each class entitled to vote thereon as a class in accordance with the provisions of Section 228 of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
          3. The text of the certificate of incorporation is hereby amended and restated to read herein as set forth in full:
          FIRST. The name of this corporation (hereinafter called the "") is AMC Networks Inc.
Corporation
          SECOND. The name and address, including street, number, city and county, of the registered office of the Corporation in the State of Delaware is Corporation Service Company, 2711 Centerville Road, Suite 400, City of Wilmington, County of New Castle.
          THIRD. The nature of the business and of the purposes to be conducted and promoted by the Corporation are to conduct any lawful business, to promote any lawful purpose, and to engage in any lawful act or activity for which corporations may be organized under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
          FOURTH. The aggregate number of shares of capital stock which the Corporation shall have authority to issue shall be four hundred and ninety-five million (495,000,000) shares, which shall be divided into the following classes:
 
     (a) three hundred and sixty million (360,000,000) shares shall be of a class designated Class A common stock, par value $0.01 per share ("");
Class A Common Stock
     (b) ninety million (90,000,000) shares shall be of a class designated Class B common stock, par value $0.01 per share ("" and together with Class A Common Stock, "");
Class B Common Stock
Common Stock
     (c) forty-five million (45,000,000) shares shall be of a class designated preferred stock, par value $0.01 per share ("").
Preferred Stock
          When the filing of this Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware becomes effective in accordance with the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the ""), shares of common stock, par value, $.01 per share, of the Corporation (""), in the aggregate outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall automatically be reclassified as and converted into an aggregate of 57,813,256.75 shares of Class A Common Stock and 13,534,418.25 shares of Class B Common Stock. From and after the Effective Time, certificates that previously represented shares of Old Common Stock shall, until the same are presented for exchange, represent the number of shares of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock into which such shares of Old Common Stock were reclassified and converted pursuant hereto.
Effective Time
Old Common Stock
          The following is a statement of (a) the designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights, and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions thereof, of the Common Stock; and (b) the authority expressly vested in the Board of Directors hereunder with respect to the issuance of series of Preferred Stock:
A. Common Stock.
     
I. Priority of Preferred Stock.
          Each of the Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock is subject to all the powers, rights, privileges, preferences and priorities of any series of Preferred Stock as are stated and expressed herein and as shall be stated and expressed in any Certificates of Designations filed with respect to any series of Preferred Stock pursuant to authority expressly granted to and vested in the Board of Directors by the provisions of Paragraph B of this Article FOURTH.
     
II. Dividends.
          Subject to (a) any other provisions of this Certificate of Incorporation including, without limitation, Section A.V of this Article FOURTH, and (b) the provisions of any Certificates of Designations filed with respect to any series of Preferred Stock, holders of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock shall be entitled to receive equally on a per share basis such dividends and other distributions in cash, stock or property of the Corporation as may be declared thereon by the Board of Directors from time to time out of assets or funds of the
 
Corporation legally available therefor; that, subject to Section A.V of this Article, the Board of Directors shall declare no dividend, and no dividend shall be paid, with respect to any outstanding share of Class A Common Stock or Class B Common Stock, whether paid in cash or property, unless, simultaneously, the same dividend is paid with respect to each share of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock.
provided
     
III. Voting.
          (a) Except as otherwise required (i) by statute, (ii) pursuant to the provisions of this Certificate of Incorporation, or (iii) pursuant to the provisions of any Certificates of Designations filed with respect to any series of Preferred Stock, the holders of Common Stock shall have the sole right and power to vote on all matters on which a vote of stockholders is to be taken. At every meeting of the stockholders, each holder of Class A Common Stock shall be entitled to cast one (1) vote in person or by proxy for each share of Class A Common Stock standing in his or her name on the transfer books of the Corporation and each holder of Class B Common Stock shall be entitled to cast ten (10) votes in person or by proxy for each share of Class B Common Stock standing in his or her name on the transfer books of the Corporation.
          Except in the election of directors of the Corporation (voting in respect of which shall be governed by the terms set forth in subsections (b) and (c) of this Section III) and as otherwise required (i) by statute, (ii) pursuant to the provisions of this Certificate of Incorporation, or (iii) pursuant to the provisions of any Certificates of Designations filed with respect to any series of Preferred Stock, the holders of Common Stock shall vote together as a single class; , that the affirmative vote or consent of the holders of at least 66 2/3% of the outstanding shares of Class B Common Stock, voting separately as a class, shall be required for (1) the authorization or issuance of any additional shares of Class B Common Stock and (2) any amendment, alteration or repeal of any of the provisions of this Certificate of Incorporation which adversely affects the powers, preferences or rights of Class B Common Stock. Except as provided in the previous sentence, the number of authorized shares of any class of Common Stock may be increased or decreased (but not below the number of shares thereof then outstanding) by the affirmative vote of the holders of the majority of the stock of the Corporation entitled to vote.
provided
          (b) With respect to the election of directors:
          (i) If on the record date for notice of any meeting of stockholders of the Corporation at which directors are to be elected by the holders of Common Stock (the ""), the aggregate number of outstanding shares of Class A Common Stock is at least 10% of the total aggregate number of outstanding shares of Common Stock, holders of Class A Common Stock shall vote together as a separate class and shall be entitled to elect 25% of the total number of Common Stock Directors; that if such 25% is not a whole number, then the holders of Class A Common Stock, voting together as a separate class, shall be entitled to elect the nearest higher whole number of directors that is at least 25% of the total number of the Common Stock Directors. Subject to subsection (iii) of this Section III(b), holders of Class B Common
Common Stock Directors
provided,
 
Stock shall vote together as a separate class to elect the remaining Common Stock Directors;
          (ii) If on the record date for notice of any meeting of stockholders of the Corporation at which Common Stock Directors are to be elected, the aggregate number of outstanding shares of Class A Common Stock is less than 10% of the total aggregate number of outstanding shares of Common Stock, the holders of Common Stock shall vote together as a single class with respect to the election of the Common Stock Directors and the holders of Class A Common Stock, voting together as a separate class, shall not have the right to elect 25% of the Common Stock Directors, but shall have one (1) vote per share for all Common Stock Directors and the holders of Class B Common Stock shall be entitled to ten (10) votes per share for all Common Stock Directors; and
          (iii) If on the record date for notice of any meeting of stockholders of the Corporation at which Common Stock Directors are to be elected, the aggregate number of outstanding shares of Class B Common Stock is less than 12 1/2% of the total aggregate number of outstanding shares of Common Stock, then the holders of Class A Common Stock, voting together as a separate class, shall continue to elect a number of directors equal to 25% of the total number of Common Stock Directors (or the next highest whole number) in accordance with subsection (b)(i) of this Section III and, in addition, shall vote together with the holders of Class B Common Stock, as a single class, to elect the remaining Common Stock Directors, with the holders of Class A Common Stock entitled to one (1) vote per share for all Common Stock Directors and the holders of Class B Common Stock entitled to ten (10) votes per share for all Common Stock Directors.
          (c) Any vacancy in the office of a Common Stock Director elected by the holders of Class A Common Stock voting as a separate class during the term for which such Common Stock Director was elected shall be filled by a vote of holders of Class A Common Stock voting as a separate class, and any vacancy in the office of a Common Stock Director elected by the holders of Class B Common Stock voting as a separate class during the term for which such Common Stock Director was elected shall be filled by a vote of holders of Class B Common Stock voting as a separate class or, in the absence of a stockholder vote, in the case of a vacancy in the office of a Common Stock Director elected by either class during the term for which such Common Stock Director was elected, such vacancy may be filled by the remaining directors of such class. Except as provided in the foregoing sentence, any vacancy on the Board of Directors may be filled by a vote of holders of Class A Common Stock or the Common Stock Directors elected thereby if the number of Common Stock Directors elected thereby is then less than 25% of the total number of Common Stock Directors, and otherwise may be filled by a vote of holders of Class B Common Stock or the Common Stock Directors elected thereby; , that in each case at the time of the filling of such vacancy, the holders of such class of stock were then entitled to elect directors to the Board of Directors by class vote. Any director elected by the Board of Directors to fill a vacancy shall serve until the next annual meeting of stockholders (at which time such person's term shall expire) and until such person's successor has been duly
provided
 
elected and qualified. If the Board of Directors increases the number of directors in accordance with Article FIFTH of this Certificate of Incorporation, any newly created directorship may be filled by the Board of Directors; that, so long as the holders of Class A Common Stock have the rights provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this Section III in respect of the last preceding annual meeting of stockholders to elect 25% of the total number of Common Stock Directors, (i) the Board of Directors may be so enlarged by the directors only to the extent that at least 25% of the enlarged board consists of (1) Common Stock Directors elected by the holders of Class A Common Stock, (2) persons appointed to fill vacancies created by the death, resignation or removal of persons elected by the holders of Class A Common Stock or (3) persons appointed by Common Stock Directors elected by holders of Class A Common Stock or persons appointed to fill vacancies created by the death, resignation or removal of persons elected by holders of Class A Common Stock and (ii) each person filling a newly-created directorship is designated either (x) as a Common Stock Director to be elected by holders of Class A Common Stock and is appointed by Common Stock Directors elected by holders of Class A Common Stock or persons appointed to fill vacancies created by the death, resignation or removal of persons elected by holders of Class A Common Stock or (y) as a Common Stock Director to be elected by holders of Class B Common Stock and is appointed by Common Stock Directors elected by holders of Class B Common Stock or persons appointed to fill vacancies created by the death, resignation or removal of persons elected by the holders of Class B Common Stock.
provided
          (d) Notwithstanding anything in this Section III to the contrary, the holders of Class A Common Stock shall have exclusive voting power on all matters upon which, pursuant to this Certificate of Incorporation or applicable laws, the holders of Common Stock are entitled to vote, at any time when no shares of Class B Common Stock are issued and outstanding.
          (e) Wherever any provision of this Certificate of Incorporation or the By-laws of the Corporation sets forth a specific percentage of the shares outstanding and entitled to vote which is required for approval or ratification of any action upon which the vote of the stockholders is required or may be obtained, such provision shall mean such specified percentage of the votes entitled to be cast by holders of shares then outstanding and entitled to vote on such action.
          (f) From and after the date on which Cablevision Systems Corporation ("Cablevision") first distributes to its stockholders shares of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock pursuant to the Distribution Agreement, dated as of June 6, 2011, between the Corporation and Cablevision, no action of stockholders of the Corporation required or permitted to be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders of the Corporation may be taken without a meeting of stockholders, without prior notice and without a vote, and the power of the stockholders of the Corporation to consent in writing to the taking of any action without a meeting is specifically denied. Notwithstanding this clause (f), the holders of any series of Preferred Stock of the Corporation shall be entitled to take action by written consent to such extent, if any, as may be provided in the terms of such series.
 
     
IV. Conversion Rights.
          (a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Article FOURTH, each share of Class B Common Stock shall be convertible at any time and from time to time, at the option of the holder thereof, at the office of any transfer agent for such Class B Common Stock and at such other place or places, if any, as the Board of Directors may designate, or, if the Board of Directors shall fail so to designate, at the principal office of the Corporation (attention of the Secretary of the Corporation), into one (1) fully paid and non-assessable share of Class A Common Stock. Upon conversion, the Corporation shall make no payment or adjustment on account of dividends accrued or in arrears on Class B Common Stock surrendered for conversion or on account of any dividends on the Class A Common Stock issuable on such conversion; that the foregoing shall not affect the right of any holder of Class B Common Stock on the record date for any dividend to receive payment of such dividend. Before any holder of Class B Common Stock shall be entitled to convert the same into Class A Common Stock, he or she shall surrender the certificate or certificates for such Class B Common Stock at the office of said transfer agent (or other place as provided above), which certificate or certificates, if the Corporation shall so request, shall be duly endorsed to the Corporation or in blank or accompanied by proper instruments of transfer to the Corporation or in blank (such endorsements or instruments of transfer to be in form satisfactory to the Corporation), and shall give written notice to the Corporation at said office that he or she elects so to convert said Class B Common Stock in accordance with the terms of this Section IV, and shall state in writing therein the name or names in which he or she wishes the certificate or certificates for Class A Common Stock to be registered. Every such notice of election to convert shall constitute a binding contract between the holder of such Class B Common Stock and the Corporation, whereby the holder of such Class B Common Stock shall be deemed to subscribe for the amount of Class A Common Stock which he or she shall be entitled to receive upon such conversion, and, in satisfaction of such subscription, to deposit the Class B Common Stock to be converted and to release the Corporation from all liability thereunder, and thereby the Corporation shall be deemed to agree that the surrender of the certificate or certificates therefor and the extinguishment of liability thereon shall constitute full payment of such subscription for Class A Common Stock to be issued upon such conversion. The Corporation will as soon as practicable after such deposit of a certificate or certificates for Class B Common Stock, accompanied by the written notice, issue and deliver at the office of said transfer agent (or other place as provided above) to the person for whose account such Class B Common Stock was so surrendered, or to his nominee or nominees, a certificate or certificates for the number of full shares of Class A Common Stock to which he shall be entitled as aforesaid. Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this Section IV, such conversion shall be deemed to have been made as of the date of such surrender of the Class B Common Stock to be converted; and the person or persons entitled to receive the Class A Common Stock issuable upon conversion of such Class B Common Stock shall be treated for all purposes as the record holder or holders of such Class A Common Stock on such date. Upon conversion of shares of Class B Common Stock, shares of Class B Common Stock so converted will be canceled and retired by the Corporation, such shares shall not be reissued and the number of shares of Class B Common Stock which the Corporation shall have authority to issue shall be decreased by the number of shares of Class B
provided,
 
Common Stock so converted and the Board of Directors shall take such steps as are required to so retire such shares.
          (b) The issuance of certificates for shares of Class A Common Stock upon conversion of shares of Class B Common Stock shall be made without charge for any stamp or other similar tax in respect of such issuance. However, if any such certificate is to be issued in a name other than that of the holder of the share or shares of Class B Common Stock converted, the person or persons requesting the issuance thereof shall pay to the Corporation the amount of any tax which may be payable in respect of any transfer involved in such issuance or shall establish to the satisfaction of the Corporation that such tax has been paid or that no such tax is due.
          (c) The Corporation shall not be required to convert Class B Common Stock, and no surrender of Class B Common Stock shall be effective for that purpose, while the stock transfer books of the Corporation are closed for any purpose; but the surrender of Class B Common Stock for conversion during any period while such books are closed shall be deemed effective for conversion immediately upon the reopening of such books, as if the conversion had been made on the date such Class B Common Stock was surrendered.
          (d) The Corporation will at all times reserve and keep available, solely for the purpose of issue upon conversion of the outstanding shares of Class B Common Stock, such number of shares of Class A Common Stock as shall be issuable upon the conversion of all such outstanding shares; that nothing contained herein shall be construed to preclude the Corporation from satisfying its obligations in respect of the conversion of the outstanding shares of Class B Common Stock by delivery of shares of Class A Common Stock which are held in the treasury of the Corporation. The Corporation covenants that if any shares of Class A Common Stock, required to be reserved for purposes of conversion hereunder, require registration with or approval of any governmental authority under any federal or state law before such shares of Class A Common Stock may be issued upon conversion, the Corporation will use its best efforts to cause such shares to be duly registered or approved, as the case may be. The Corporation will endeavor to list the shares of Class A Common Stock required to be delivered upon conversion prior to such delivery upon each national securities exchange, if any, upon which the outstanding Class A Common Stock is listed at the time of such delivery. The Corporation covenants that all shares of Class A Common Stock which shall be issued upon conversion of the shares of Class B Common Stock will, upon issue, be fully paid and non-assessable and not entitled to any preemptive rights.
provided,
     
V. Securities Distributions.
          (a) The Corporation may declare and pay a dividend or distribution consisting of shares of Class A Common Stock, Class B Common Stock or any other securities of the Corporation or any other person (hereinafter sometimes called a "") to holders of one or more classes of Common Stock only in accordance with the provisions of this Section V.
share distribution
 
          (b) If at any time a share distribution is to be made with respect to Class A Common Stock or Class B Common Stock, such share distribution may be declared and paid only as follows:
          (i) a share distribution consisting of shares of Class A Common Stock (or Convertible Securities (as defined below) convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for shares of Class A Common Stock) to holders of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock, on an equal per share basis;
          (ii) a share distribution consisting of shares of Class A Common Stock (or Convertible Securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for shares of Class A Common Stock) to holders of Class A Common Stock and, on an equal per share basis, shares of Class B Common Stock (or like Convertible Securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for shares of Class B Common Stock) to holders of Class B Common Stock; and
          (iii) a share distribution consisting of any class or series of securities of the Corporation or any other person other than as described in clauses (i) and (ii) of this subsection (a) of this Section V, either (1) on the basis of a distribution of identical securities, on an equal per share basis, to holders of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock or (2) on the basis of a distribution of one class or series of securities to holders of Class A Common Stock and another class or series of securities to holders of Class B Common Stock; that the securities so distributed (and, if the distribution consists of Convertible Securities, the securities into which such Convertible Securities are convertible or for which they are exercisable or exchangeable) do not differ in any respect other than differences in their rights (other than voting rights) consistent in all material respects with the differences between the Class A Common Stock and the Class B Common Stock and difference in their relative voting rights, with holders of shares of Class B Common Stock receiving the class or series having the higher relative voting rights (without regard to whether such voting rights differ to a greater or lesser extent than the corresponding differences in the voting rights of the Class A Common Stock and the Class B Common Stock provided in Section A.III of this Article FOURTH); that if the securities so distributed constitute capital stock of a subsidiary of the Corporation, such voting rights shall not differ to a greater extent than the corresponding differences in voting rights of the Class A Common Stock and the Class B Common Stock provided in Section A.III of this Article FOURTH, and provided in each case that such distribution is otherwise made on an equal per share basis, as determined by the Board of Directors in its sole discretion.
provided,
provided,
          For purposes of this Certificate of Incorporation, "" shall mean any securities of the Corporation (other than any class of Common Stock) or any subsidiary thereof that are convertible into, exchangeable for or evidence the right to purchase any shares of any class of Common Stock, whether upon conversion, exercise, exchange, pursuant to anti-dilution provisions of such securities or otherwise.
Convertible Securities
 
     
VI. Liquidation Rights.
          In the event of any liquidation, dissolution, or winding up of the Corporation, whether voluntary or involuntary, after payment or provision for payment of the debts and other liabilities of the Corporation and after payment in full of the amounts to be paid to holders of Preferred Stock as set forth in any Certificates of Designations filed with respect thereto, the remaining assets and funds of the Corporation shall be divided among, and paid ratably to the holders of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock (including those persons who shall become holders of Class A Common Stock by reason of the conversion of their shares of Class B Common Stock) as a single class. For the purposes of this Section VI, a consolidation or merger of the Corporation with one or more other corporations or business entities shall not be deemed to be a liquidation, dissolution or winding up, voluntary or involuntary.
     
VII. Reclassifications, Etc.
          Neither the Class A Common Stock nor the Class B Common Stock may be subdivided, consolidated, reclassified or otherwise changed unless contemporaneously therewith the other class of Common Stock is subdivided, consolidated, reclassified or otherwise changed in the same proportion and in the same manner.
     
VIII. Mergers, Consolidations, Etc.
          In any merger, consolidation or business combination of the Corporation with or into another corporation, whether or not the Corporation is the surviving corporation, the consideration per share to be received by holders of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock in such merger, consolidation or business combination must be identical to that received by holders of the other class of Common Stock, except that in any such transaction in which shares of capital stock are distributed, such shares may differ as to voting rights to the extent and only to the extent that the voting rights of the Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock differ as provided herein.
     
IX. Rights and Warrants.
          In case the Corporation shall issue rights or warrants to purchase shares of capital stock of the Corporation, the terms of the rights and warrants, and the number of rights or warrants per share, to be received by holders of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock must be identical to that received by holders of the other class of Common Stock, except that the shares of capital stock into which such rights or warrants are exercisable may differ as to voting rights to the extent and only to the extent that the voting rights of the Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock differ as provided herein.
 
B. Preferred Stock.
     
I. Issuance.
          Preferred Stock may be issued from time to time in one or more series, the shares of each series to have such powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights, and qualifications, limitations or restrictions thereof, as are stated and expressed herein or in a Certificate or Certificates of Designations providing for the issuance of such series, adopted by the Board of Directors as hereinafter provided.
     
II. Powers of the Board of Directors.
          Authority is hereby expressly granted to the Board of Directors to authorize the issue of one or more series of Preferred Stock, and with respect to each series to set forth in a Certificate or Certificates of Designations provisions with respect to the issuance of such series, the powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights, and qualifications, limitations or restrictions thereof of the shares of each series of Preferred Stock, including without limitation the following:
     (a) The maximum number of shares to constitute such series and the distinctive designation thereof;
     (b) Whether the shares of such series shall have voting rights, in addition to any voting rights provided by law, and, if so, the terms of such voting rights;
     (c) The dividend rate, if any, on the shares of such series, the conditions and dates upon which such dividends shall be payable, the preference or relation which such dividends shall bear to the dividends payable on any other class or classes or on any other series of capital stock, and whether such dividends shall be cumulative or non-cumulative;
     (d) Whether the shares of such series shall be subject to redemption by the Corporation, and, if made subject to redemption, the times, prices and other terms and conditions of such redemption;
     (e) The rights of the holders of shares of such series upon the liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation;
     (f) Whether or not the shares of such series shall be subject to the operation of a retirement or sinking fund, and, if so, the extent to and manner in which any such retirement or sinking fund shall be applied to the purchase or redemption of the shares of such series for retirement or to other corporate purposes and the terms and provisions relative to the operation thereof;
 
     (g) Whether or not the shares of such series shall be convertible into, or exchangeable for, shares of stock of any other class or classes, or of any other series of the same class, and if so convertible or exchangeable, the price or prices or the rate or rates of conversion or exchange and the method, if any, of adjusting the same;
     (h) The limitations and restrictions, if any, to be effective while any shares of such series are outstanding upon the payment of dividends or making of other distributions on, and upon the purchase, redemption or other acquisition by the corporation of the Class A Common Stock, the Class B Common Stock or any other class or classes of stock of the corporation ranking junior to the shares of such series either as to dividends or upon liquidation;
     (i) The conditions or restrictions, if any, upon the creation of indebtedness of the corporation or upon the issue of any additional stock (including additional shares of such series or of any other series or of any other class) ranking on a parity with or prior to the shares of such series as to dividends or distribution of assets on liquidation, dissolution or winding up; and
     (j) Any other preference and relative, participating, optional, or other special rights, and qualifications, limitations or restrictions thereof as shall not be inconsistent with this Article FOURTH.
     
III. Ranking.
          All shares of any one series of Preferred Stock shall be identical with each other in all respects, except that shares of any one series issued at different times may differ as to the dates from which dividends, if any, thereon shall be cumulative; and all series shall rank equally and be identical in all respects, except as permitted by the foregoing provisions of Section B.II of this Article FOURTH; and all shares of Preferred Stock shall rank senior to the Common Stock both as to dividends and upon liquidation.
     
IV. Liquidation Rights.
          Except as shall be otherwise stated and expressed in the Certificate or Certificates of Designations adopted by the Board of Directors with respect to any series of Preferred Stock, in the event of any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation, before any payment or distribution of the assets of the Corporation (whether capital or surplus) shall be made to or set apart for the holders of any class or classes of stock of the Corporation ranking junior to the Preferred Stock upon liquidation, the holders of the shares of the Preferred Stock shall be entitled to receive payment at the rate fixed in the resolution or resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors providing for the issue of such series, plus (if dividends on shares of such series of Preferred Stock shall be cumulative) an amount equal to all dividends (whether or not earned or declared) accumulated to the date of final distribution to such holders; but they shall be entitled to no further payment. Except as aforesaid, if, upon any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation, the assets of the Corporation, or proceeds thereof, distributable among the holders of the shares of the Preferred Stock shall be insufficient to pay in full the preferential
 
amount aforesaid, then such assets, or the proceeds thereof, shall be distributed among such holders ratably in accordance with the respective amounts which would be payable on such shares if all amounts payable thereon were paid in full. For the purposes of this Section IV, a consolidation or merger of the Corporation with one or more other corporations or business entities shall not be deemed to be a liquidation, dissolution or winding up, voluntary or involuntary.
     
V. Voting.
          Except as shall be otherwise stated and expressed herein or in the Certificate or Certificates of Designations adopted by the Board of Directors with respect to the issuance of any series of Preferred Stock and except as otherwise required by the laws of the State of Delaware, the holders of shares of Preferred Stock shall have, with respect to such shares, no right or power to vote on any question or in any proceeding or to be represented at, or to receive notice of, any meeting of stockholders.
          FIFTH. The management of the business and the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation, including the election of the Chairman, if any, the President, the Treasurer, the Secretary, and other principal officers of the Corporation, shall be vested in its Board of Directors. The number of directors of the Corporation shall be fixed by the By-Laws of the Corporation and may be altered from time to time as provided therein. A director shall be elected to hold office until the expiration of the term for which such person is elected (which shall expire at the next annual meeting of stockholders after such person's election), and until such person's successor shall be duly elected and qualified.
          SIXTH. Whenever a compromise or arrangement is proposed between the Corporation and its creditors or any class of them and/or between the Corporation and its stockholders or any class of them, any court of equitable jurisdiction within the State of Delaware may, on the application in a summary way of the Corporation or any creditor or stockholder thereof or on the application of any receiver or receivers appointed for this corporation under the provisions of Section 291 of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware or on the application of trustees in dissolution or of any receiver or receivers appointed for the Corporation under the provisions of Section 279 of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware order a meeting of the creditors or class of creditors, and/or the stockholders or class of stockholders of the Corporation, as the case may be, to be summoned in such manner as the said court directs. If a majority in number representing three-fourths in value of the creditors or class of creditors, and/or of the stockholders or class of stockholders of the Corporation, as the case may be, agree to any compromise or arrangement and to any reorganization of the Corporation as a consequence of such compromise or arrangement, and the said reorganization shall, if sanctioned by the court to which the said application has been made, be binding on all the creditors or class of creditors, and/or on all the stockholders or class of stockholders, of the Corporation, as the case may be, and also on this corporation.
 
          SEVENTH. The power to make, alter, or repeal the By-Laws, and to adopt any new By-Law, shall be vested in the Board of Directors and the stockholders entitled to vote in the election of directors.
          EIGHTH. The Corporation shall, to the fullest extent permitted by Section 145 of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, as the same may be amended and supplemented, or by any successor thereto, indemnify any and all persons whom it shall have power to indemnify under said section from and against any and all of the expenses, liabilities or other matters referred to in or covered by said section. Such right to indemnification shall continue as to a person who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors and administrators of such a person. The indemnification provided for herein shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which those seeking indemnification may be entitled under any By-Law, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors or otherwise.
          No director of the Corporation shall be personally liable to the Corporation or its stockholders for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director, except that this paragraph shall not eliminate or limit the liability of a director (A) for any breach of the director's duty of loyalty to the Corporation or its stockholders, (B) for acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law, (C) under Section 174 of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, or (D) for any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit.
          NINTH. No contract or transaction between the Corporation and one or more of its directors or officers, or between the Corporation and any other corporation, partnership, association or other organization in which one or more of its directors or officers are directors or officers, or have a financial interest, shall be void or voidable solely for this reason, or solely because the director or officer is present at or participates in the meeting of the Board of Directors or committee thereof which authorizes the contract or transaction, or solely because such director's or officer's votes are counted for such purpose, if:
     A. The material facts as to the director's or officer's relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the Board of Directors or the committee, and the Board of Directors or committee in good faith authorizes the contract or transaction by the affirmative votes of a majority of the disinterested directors, even though the disinterested directors be less than a quorum; or
     B. The material facts as to the director's or officer's relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the stockholders entitled to vote thereon, and the contract or transaction is specifically approved in good faith by vote of the stockholders; or
     C. The contract or transaction is fair as to the Corporation as of the time it is authorized, approved or ratified, by the Board of Directors, a committee thereof, or the stockholders.
 
          Common or interested directors may be counted in the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the Board of Directors or of a committee which authorizes the contract or transaction.
          TENTH.
          It is recognized that (a) certain directors and officers of the Corporation and its subsidiaries (the "") have served and may serve as directors, officers, employees and agents of Cablevision Systems Corporation and of Madison Square Garden, Inc. ("MSG") and their subsidiaries and successors (each of the foregoing is an ""), (b) the Corporation and its subsidiaries, directly or indirectly, may engage in the same, similar or related lines of business as those engaged in by any Other Entity and other business activities that overlap with or compete with those in which such Other Entity may engage, (c) the Corporation or its subsidiaries may have an interest in the same areas of business opportunity as an Other Entity, (d) the Corporation will derive substantial benefits from the service as directors or officers of the Corporation and its subsidiaries of Overlap Persons, and (e) it is in the best interests of the Corporation that the rights of the Corporation, and the duties of any Overlap Persons, be determined and delineated as provided in this Article TENTH in respect of any Potential Business Opportunities (as defined below) and in respect of the agreements and transactions referred to herein. The provisions of this Article TENTH will, to the fullest extent permitted by law, regulate and define the conduct of the business and affairs of the Corporation and its officers and directors who are Overlap Persons in connection with any Potential Business Opportunities and in connection with any agreements and transactions referred to herein. Any person purchasing or otherwise acquiring any shares of capital stock of the Corporation, or any interest therein, will be deemed to have notice of and to have consented to the provisions of this Article TENTH. References in this Article TENTH to "directors," "officers," "employees" and "agents" of any person will be deemed to include those persons who hold similar positions or exercise similar powers and authority with respect to any other entity that is a limited liability company, partnership, joint venture or other non-corporate entity.
Overlap Persons
Other Entity
          If a director or officer of the Corporation who is an Overlap Person is presented or offered, or otherwise acquires knowledge of, a potential transaction or matter that may constitute or present a business opportunity for the Corporation or any of its subsidiaries, in which the Corporation or any of its subsidiaries could, but for the provisions of this Article TENTH, have an interest or expectancy (any such transaction or matter, and any such actual or potential business opportunity, a ""), (i) such Overlap Person will, to the fullest extent permitted by law, have no duty or obligation to refrain from referring such Potential Business Opportunity to any Other Entity and, if such Overlap Person refers such Potential Business Opportunity to an Other Entity, such Overlap Person shall have no duty or obligation to refer such Potential Business Opportunity to the Corporation or to any of its subsidiaries or to give any notice to the Corporation or to any of its subsidiaries regarding such
Potential Business Opportunity
 
Potential Business Opportunity (or any matter related thereto), (ii) if such Overlap Person refers a Potential Business Opportunity to an Other Entity, such Overlap Person, to the fullest extent permitted by law, will not be liable to the Corporation as a director, officer, stockholder or otherwise, for any failure to refer such Potential Business Opportunity to the Corporation, or for referring such Potential Business Opportunity to any Other Entity, or for any failure to give any notice to the Corporation regarding such Potential Business Opportunity or any matter relating thereto; (iii) any Other Entity may participate, engage or invest in any such Potential Business Opportunity notwithstanding that such Potential Business Opportunity may have been referred to such Other Entity by an Overlap Person, and (iv) if a director or officer who is an Overlap Person refers a Potential Business Opportunity to an Other Entity, then, as between the Corporation and/or its subsidiaries, on the one hand, and such Other Entity, on the other hand, the Corporation and its subsidiaries shall be deemed to have renounced any interest, expectancy or right in or to such Potential Business Opportunity or to receive any income or proceeds derived therefrom solely as a result of such Overlap Person having been presented or offered, or otherwise acquiring knowledge of, such Potential Business Opportunity, unless in each case referred to in clause (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv), such Potential Business Opportunity satisfies all of the following conditions (any Potential Business Opportunity that satisfies all of such conditions, a ""): (A) such Potential Business Opportunity was expressly presented or offered to the Overlap Person solely in his or her capacity as a director or officer of the Corporation; (B) the Overlap Person believed that the Corporation possessed, or would reasonably be expected to be able to possess, the resources necessary to exploit such Potential Business Opportunity; and (C) substantially all of such opportunity, at the time it is presented to the Overlap Person, is, and is expected to remain, an "Independent Film Network;" that the Corporation or any of its subsidiaries is directly engaged in that business at the time the Potential Business Opportunity is presented or offered to the Overlap Person. For purposes hereof, an "" shall mean a nationally distributed cable television network that (i) has at least fifty million viewing subscribers in the United States, (ii) at least 75% of its (x) programming is comprised of and (y) revenues are derived from, independent films and other programming relating to the world of independent film, and (iii) is not targeted to sports fans or music fans (including, without limitation, such network does not feature a material portion of music or sports-related programming). The Corporation hereby renounces, on behalf of itself and its subsidiaries, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any interest or expectancy in any Potential Business Opportunity that is not a Restricted Potential Business Opportunity. In the event the Corporation's board of directors declines to pursue a Restricted Potential Business Opportunity, Overlap Persons shall be free to refer such Restricted Potential Business Opportunity to an Other Entity.
Restricted Potential Business Opportunity
provided,
Independent Film Network
C. Certain Agreements and Transactions Permitted.
          No contract, agreement, arrangement or transaction (or any amendment, modification or termination thereof) entered into between the Corporation and/or any of its subsidiaries, on the one hand, and Cablevision or MSG and/or any of their subsidiaries, on the other hand, before the Corporation ceased to be an indirect, wholly-owned subsidiary of Cablevision shall be void or voidable or be considered unfair to the Corporation or any of its subsidiaries solely because an Other Entity is a party thereto, or because any directors, officers or
 
employees of an Other Entity were present at or participated in any meeting of the board of directors, or a committee thereof, of the Corporation, or the board of directors, or committee thereof, of any subsidiary of the Corporation, that authorized the contract, agreement, arrangement or transaction (or any amendment, modification or termination thereof), or because his, her or their votes were counted for such purpose. The Corporation may from time to time enter into and perform, and cause or permit any of its subsidiaries to enter into and perform, one or more contracts, agreements, arrangements or transactions (or amendments, modifications or supplements thereto) with an Other Entity. To the fullest extent permitted by law, no such contract, agreement, arrangement or transaction (nor any such amendments, modifications or supplements), nor the performance thereof by the Corporation, or any subsidiary of the Corporation, or by an Other Entity, shall be considered contrary to any fiduciary duty owed to the Corporation (or to any subsidiary of the Corporation, or to any stockholder of the Corporation or any of its subsidiaries) by any director or officer of the Corporation (or by any director or officer of any subsidiary of the Corporation) who is an Overlap Person. To the fullest extent permitted by law, no director or officer of the Corporation or any subsidiary of the Corporation who is an Overlap Person thereof shall have or be under any fiduciary duty to the Corporation (or to any subsidiary of the Corporation, or to any stockholder of the Corporation or any of its subsidiaries) to refrain from acting on behalf of the Corporation or Cablevision or MSG, or any of their respective subsidiaries, in respect of any such contract, agreement, arrangement or transaction or performing any such contract, agreement, arrangement or transaction in accordance with its terms and each such director or officer of the Corporation or any subsidiary of the Corporation who is an Overlap Person shall be deemed to have acted in good faith and in a manner such person reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the Corporation and its subsidiaries, and shall be deemed not to have breached his or her duties of loyalty to the Corporation or any of its subsidiaries or any of their respective stockholders, and not to have derived an improper personal benefit therefrom.
D. Amendment of Article TENTH.
          No alteration, amendment or repeal of, or adoption of any provision inconsistent with, any provision of this Article TENTH will have any effect upon (a) any agreement between the Corporation or a subsidiary thereof and any Other Entity, that was entered into before the time of such alteration, amendment or repeal or adoption of any such inconsistent provision (the ""), or any transaction entered into in connection with the performance of any such agreement, whether such transaction is entered into before or after the Amendment Time, (b) any transaction entered into between the Corporation or a subsidiary thereof and any Other Entity, before the Amendment Time, (c) the allocation of any business opportunity between the Corporation or any subsidiary thereof and any Other Entity before the Amendment Time, or (d) any duty or obligation owed by any director or officer of the Corporation or any subsidiary of the Corporation (or the absence of any such duty or obligation) with respect to any Potential Business Opportunity which such director or officer was offered, or of which such director or officer otherwise became aware, before the Amendment Time (regardless of whether any proceeding relating to any of the above is commenced before or after the Amendment Time)."
Amendment Time
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, AMC NETWORKS INC. has caused this certificate to be signed by Joshua W. Sapan, its President and Chief Executive Officer, on the 28th day of June, 2011.

Exhibit 99.5
 
 
     . The shares of stock in the corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of the corporation's stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by a certificate theretofore issued until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Notwithstanding the adoption of such a resolution by the Board, to the extent, if any, required by applicable law, every holder of stock in the corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to have a certificate signed by, or in the name of, the corporation by the Chairman, the Chief Executive Officer or Vice Chairman, if any, or by the President, if any, or a Vice President and by the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of the corporation certifying the number of shares owned by him in the corporation. If such certificate is countersigned by a transfer agent other than the corporation or its employee or by a registrar other than the corporation or its employee, any other signature on the certificate may be a facsimile. In case any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the corporation with the same effect as if he were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
1. Certificates; Uncertificated Shares
          Whenever the corporation shall be authorized to issue more than one class of stock or more than one series of any class of stock, and whenever the corporation shall issue any shares of its stock as partly paid stock, the certificates representing shares of any such class or series or of any such partly paid stock shall set forth thereon the statements prescribed by the General Corporation Law. Any restrictions on the transfer or registration of transfer of any shares of stock of any class or series shall be noted conspicuously on the certificate representing such shares. Within a reasonable time after the issuance or transfer of uncertificated stock, the corporation shall send to the registered owner thereof a written notice containing the information required by law to be set forth or stated on certificates or a statement that the corporation will furnish without charge to each stockholder who so requests the powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights of each class of stock or series thereof and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions of such preferences and/or rights.
 
          The corporation may issue a new certificate of stock in place of any certificate theretofore issued by it, alleged to have been lost, stolen, or destroyed, and the Board of Directors may require the owner of any lost, stolen, or destroyed certificate, or such owner's legal representative, to give the corporation a bond sufficient to indemnify the corporation against any claim that may be made against it on account of the alleged loss, theft, or destruction of any such certificate or the issuance of any such new certificate.
     . The corporation may, but shall not be required to, issue fractions of a share. In lieu thereof it shall either pay in cash the fair value of fractions of a share, as determined by the Board of Directors, to those entitled thereto or issue scrip or fractional warrants in registered form, either represented by a certificate or uncertificated, or bearer form over the manual or facsimile signature of an officer of the corporation or of its agent, exchangeable as therein provided for full shares, but such scrip or fractional warrants shall not entitle the holder to any rights of a stockholder except as therein provided. Such scrip or fractional warrants may be issued subject to the condition that the same shall become void if not exchanged for certificates representing full shares of stock or uncertificated full shares of stock before a specified date, or subject to the condition that the shares of stock for which such scrip or fractional warrants are exchangeable may be sold by the corporation and the proceeds thereof distributed to the holders of such scrip or fractional warrants, or subject to any other conditions which the Board of Directors may determine.
2. Fractional Share Interests
     . Upon compliance with provisions restricting the transfer or registration of transfer of shares of stock, if any, transfers or registration of transfer of shares of stock of the corporation shall be made only on the stock ledger of the corporation by the registered holder thereof, or by such holder's attorney thereunto authorized by power of attorney duly executed and filed with the Secretary of the corporation or with a transfer agent or a registrar, if any, and, in the case of shares represented by certificates, on surrender of the certificate or certificates for such shares of stock properly endorsed and the payment of all taxes due thereon.
3. Stock Transfers
     . For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, or for the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or the allotment of any rights, or entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the directors may fix, in advance, a date as the record date for any such determination of stockholders. Such date shall not be more than sixty days nor less than ten days before the date of such meeting, nor more than sixty days prior to any other action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for the determination of stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held; the record date for determining stockholders for any other purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto. When a determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders has been made as provided in this paragraph, such determination shall apply to any adjournment thereof; , , that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
4. Record Date for Stockholders
provided
however
 
     . As used herein in respect of the right to notice of a meeting of stockholders or a waiver thereof or to participate or vote thereat, the term "share" or "shares" or "share of stock" or "shares of stock" or "stockholder" or "stockholders" refers to an outstanding share or shares of stock and to a holder or holders of record of outstanding shares of stock when the corporation is authorized to issue only one class of shares of stock, and said reference is also intended to include any outstanding share or shares of stock and any holder or holders of record of outstanding shares of stock of any class upon which or upon whom the certificate of incorporation confers such rights where there are two or more classes or series of shares of stock or upon which or upon whom the General Corporation Law confers such rights notwithstanding that the certificate of incorporation may provide for more than one class or series of shares of stock, one or more of which are limited or denied such rights thereunder; , , that no such right shall vest in the event of an increase or a decrease in the authorized number of shares of stock of any class or series which is otherwise denied voting rights under the provisions of the certificate of incorporation, including any Preferred Stock which is denied voting rights under the provisions of the resolution or resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors with respect to the issuance thereof.
5. Meaning of Certain Terms
provided
however
     .
6. Stockholder Meetings
          . The annual meeting shall be held on the date and at the time fixed, from time to time, by the directors. A special meeting shall be held on the date and at the time fixed by the directors.
Time
          . Annual meetings and special meetings shall be held at such place, within or without the State of Delaware, as the directors may, from time to time, fix. Whenever the directors shall fail to fix such place, the meeting shall be held at the registered office of the corporation in the State of Delaware.
Place
          . Annual meetings and special meetings may be called by the Board of Directors only.
Call
          . Notice of all meetings shall be given, stating the place, date, and hour of the meeting. The notice of an annual meeting shall state that the meeting is called for the election of directors and for the transaction of other business which may properly come before the meeting, and shall (if any other action which could be taken at a special meeting is to be taken at such annual meeting) state such other action or actions as are known at the time of such notice. The notice of a special meeting shall in all instances state the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called. If any action is proposed to be taken which would, if taken, entitle stockholders to receive payment for their shares of stock, the notice shall include a statement of that purpose and to that effect. Except as otherwise provided by the General Corporation Law, a copy of the notice of any meeting shall be given, personally or by mail or in such other manner as may be permitted by the General Corporation Law, not less than ten days nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting, unless the lapse of the prescribed period of time shall have been waived, and directed to each stockholder at such stockholder's record address or at such other address which he may have furnished for such purpose in writing to the Secretary of the corporation. Notice by mail shall be deemed to be given when deposited, with postage thereof prepaid, in the United States mail. If a meeting is adjourned to another time, not
Notice or Waiver of Notice
 
more than thirty days hence, and/or to another place, and if an announcement of the adjourned time and/or place is made at the meeting, it shall not be necessary to give notice of the adjourned meeting unless the directors, after adjournment, fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting. Notice need not be given to any stockholder who submits a written waiver of notice before or after the time stated therein. Attendance of a person at a meeting of stockholders shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the stockholders need be specified in any written waiver of notice.
          . There shall be prepared and made, at least ten days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of at least ten days prior to the meeting either at a place within the city or other municipality or community where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof, and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present. The stock ledger shall be the only evidence as to who are the stockholders entitled to examine the stock ledger, the list required by this section or the books of the corporation, or to vote at any meeting of stockholders.
Stockholder List
          . Meetings of the stockholders shall be presided over by one of the following officers in the order or seniority and if present and acting, the Chairman, if any, the Executive Chairman, if any, the Chief Executive Officer, if any, a Vice Chairman, if any, the President, if any, a Vice President, a chairman for the meeting chosen by the Board of Directors, or, if none of the foregoing is in office and present and acting, by a chairman to be chosen by the stockholders. The Secretary of the corporation, or in his or her absence, an Assistant Secretary, shall act as secretary of every meeting, but if neither the Secretary nor an Assistant Secretary is present, the chairman for the meeting shall appoint a secretary of the meeting. The presiding officer shall: call the meeting to order; determine when proxies must be filed with the secretary of the meeting; open the polls, establish the time period for which polls remain open and close the polls; decide who may address the meeting and generally determine the order of business and time for adjournment of the meeting. The presiding officer shall also maintain proper and orderly conduct, and shall take all means reasonably necessary to prevent or cease disruptions, personal attacks or inflammatory remarks at the meeting. In addition to the powers and duties specified herein, the presiding officer shall have the authority to make all other determinations necessary for the order and proper conduct of the meeting.
Conduct of Meeting
          . Every stockholder may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy in all matters in which a stockholder is entitled to participate, whether by waiving notice of any meeting or voting or participating at a meeting. Such authorization may take any form permitted by the General Corporation Law. No proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date unless such proxy provides for a longer period. A duly executed proxy shall be irrevocable if it states that it is irrevocable and, if,
Proxy Representation
 
and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power. A proxy may be made irrevocable regardless of whether the interest with which it is coupled is an interest in the stock itself or an interest in the corporation generally.
          . The directors, in advance of any meeting, may, but need not, appoint one or more inspectors of election or judges of the vote, as the case may be, to act at the meeting or any adjournment thereof. If an inspector or inspectors or judge or judges are not appointed, the person presiding at the meeting may, but need not, appoint one or more inspectors or judges. In case any person who may be appointed as an inspector or judge fails to appear or act, the vacancy may be filled by appointment made by the person presiding thereat. Each inspector or judge, if any, before entering upon the discharge of such inspector's duties, shall take and sign an oath faithfully to execute the duties of inspector or judge at such meeting with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors or judges, if any, shall determine the number of shares of stock outstanding and the voting power of each, the shares of stock represented at the meeting, the existence of a quorum, the validity and effect of proxies, and shall receive votes or ballots, hear and determine all challenges and questions arising in connection with the right to vote, count and tabulate all votes or ballots, determine the result, and do such acts as are proper to conduct the election or vote with fairness to all stockholders. On request of the person presiding at the meeting, the inspector or inspectors or judge or judges, if any, shall make a report in writing of any challenge, question or matter determined by such inspector(s) and execute a certificate of any fact found by such inspector(s).
Inspectors and Judges
          . Except as the General Corporation Law or these by-laws may otherwise provide, the holders of a majority of the votes represented by the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum at a meeting of stockholders for the transaction of any business; , , that if the certificate of incorporation or the General Corporation Law provides that voting on a particular action is to be by class, a majority of the votes represented by the outstanding shares of stock of such class shall constitute a quorum at a meeting of stockholders for the authorization of such action. The stockholders present may adjourn the meeting despite the absence of a quorum. When a quorum is once present to organize a meeting, it is not broken by the subsequent withdrawal of any stockholders.
Quorum
provided
however
          . Except as otherwise provided in these by-laws, the certificate of incorporation or, with respect to Preferred Stock, the resolution or resolutions of the Board of Directors providing for the issuance thereof, and except as otherwise provided by the General Corporation Law, at every meeting of the stockholders, each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting shall be entitled to the number of votes as specified, and to the extent provided for, in the certificate of incorporation or, with respect to Preferred Stock, the resolution or resolutions of the Board of Directors providing for the issuance thereof, in person or by proxy, for each share of stock entitled to vote held by such stockholder. In the election of directors, a plurality of the votes cast by each class of stock, voting separately as a class, shall elect the directors that such class is authorized to elect as specified, and to the extent provided for, in the certificate of incorporation. Any other action shall be authorized by a majority of the votes cast except where the certificate of incorporation or the General Corporation Law prescribes a different percentage of votes and/or a different exercise of voting power. Voting by ballot shall not be required for corporate action except as otherwise provided by the General Corporation Law.
Voting
 
          . At any annual or special meeting of stockholders, proposals by stockholders and persons nominated for election as directors by stockholders shall be considered only if advance notice thereof has been timely given as provided herein. Notice of any proposal to be presented by any stockholder or of the name of any person to be nominated by any stockholder for election as a director of the corporation at any meeting of stockholders shall be given to the Secretary of the corporation not less than 60 nor more than 90 days prior to the date of the meeting; , , that if the date of the meeting is publicly announced or disclosed less than 70 days prior to the date of the meeting, such notice shall be given not more than ten days after such date is first so announced or disclosed. No additional public announcement or disclosure of the date of any annual meeting of stockholders need be made if the corporation shall have previously disclosed, in these by-laws or otherwise, that the annual meeting in each year is to be held on a determinable date, unless and until the Board of Directors determines to hold the meeting on a different date. Any stockholder who gives notice of any such proposal shall deliver therewith the text of the proposal to be presented and a brief written statement of the reasons why such stockholder favors the proposal and setting forth such stockholder's name and address, the number and class of all shares of each class of stock of the corporation beneficially owned by such stockholder and any material interest of such stockholder in the proposal (other than as a stockholder). Any stockholder desiring to nominate any person for election as a director of the corporation shall deliver with such notice a statement in writing setting forth the name of the person to be nominated, the number and class of all shares of each class of stock of the corporation beneficially owned by such person, the information regarding such person required by Item 401 of Regulation S-K adopted by the Securities and Exchange Commission (or the corresponding provisions of any regulation subsequently adopted by the Securities and Exchange Commission applicable to the corporation), such person's signed consent to serve as a director of the corporation if elected, such stockholder's name and address and the number and class of all shares of each class of stock of the corporation beneficially owned by such stockholder. As used herein, shares "beneficially owned" shall mean all shares as to which such person, together with such person's affiliates and associates (as defined in Rule 12b-2 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934), may be deemed to beneficially own pursuant to Rules 13d-3 and 13d-5 under the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, as well as all shares as to which such person, together with such person's affiliates and associates, has the right to become the beneficial owner pursuant to any agreement or understanding, or upon the exercise of warrants, options or rights to convert or exchange (whether such rights are exercisable immediately or only after the passage of time or the occurrence of conditions). The person presiding at the meeting shall determine whether such notice has been duly given and shall direct that proposals and nominees not be considered if such notice has not been given.
Advance Notice of Stockholder Proposals
provided
however
     . The business of the corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of the Board of Directors of the corporation. The use of the phrase "whole Board of Directors" herein refers to the total number of directors which the corporation would have if there were no vacancies.
1. Functions and Definitions
 
     . A director need not be a stockholder, a citizen of the United States, or a resident of the State of Delaware. The initial Board of Directors shall consist of 12 persons. Thereafter the number of directors constituting the whole Board of Directors shall be at least three. Subject to the foregoing limitation and except for the first Board of Directors, such number may be fixed from time to time by action of the Board of Directors only, or, if the number is not fixed, the number shall be 12.
2. Qualifications and Number
     . The first Board of Directors shall be elected by the incorporator and shall hold office until the next election of the class for which such directors have been chosen and until their successors have been elected and qualified or until their earlier resignation or removal. Any director may resign at any time upon written notice to the corporation. Thereafter, directors who are elected at an annual meeting of stockholders, and directors who are elected in the interim to fill vacancies and newly created directorships, shall hold office for the term of the class for which such directors shall have been chosen and until their successors have been elected and qualified or until their earlier resignation or removal. In the interim between annual meetings of stockholders or of special meetings of stockholders called for the election of directors and/or for the removal of one or more directors and for the filling of any vacancies in the Board of Directors, including vacancies resulting from the removal of directors for cause or without cause, any vacancy in the Board of Directors may be filled as provided in the certificate of incorporation.
3. Election and Term
     .
4. Meeting
          . Meetings shall be held at such time as the Board of Directors shall fix.
Time
          . The first meeting of each newly elected Board of Directors may be held immediately after each annual meeting of the stockholders at the same place at which the annual meeting of stockholders is held, and no notice of such meeting shall be necessary, provided a quorum shall be present. In the event such first meeting is not so held immediately after the annual meeting of the stockholders, it may be held at such time and place as shall be specified in the notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or at such time and place as shall be fixed by the consent in writing of all of the directors.
First Meeting
          . Meetings, both regular and special, shall be held at such place within or without the State of Delaware as shall be fixed by the Board of Directors.
Place
          . No call shall be required for regular meetings for which the time and place have been fixed. Special meetings may be called by or at the direction of the Chairman, if any, a Vice Chairman, if any, the Chief Executive Officer, or the President, if any, or of a majority of the directors in office.
Call
          . No notice shall be required for regular meetings for which the time and place have been fixed. Written, oral, electronic or any other mode of notice of the time and place shall be given for special meetings in sufficient time for the convenient assembly of the directors thereat. The notice of any meeting need not specify
Notice or Actual or Constructive Waiver
 
the purpose of the meeting. Any requirement of furnishing a notice shall be waived by any director who signs a written waiver of such notice before or after the time stated therein.
          Attendance of a director at a meeting of the Board of Directors shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
          . A majority of the whole Board of Directors shall constitute a quorum except when a vacancy or vacancies prevents such majority, whereupon a majority of the directors in office shall constitute a quorum; that such majority shall constitute at least one-third (1/3) of the whole Board of Directors. Any director may participate in a meeting of the Board of Directors by means of a conference telephone or similar communications equipment by means of which all directors participating in the meeting can hear each other, and such participation in a meeting of the Board of Directors shall constitute presence in person at such meeting. A majority of the directors present, whether or not a quorum is present, may adjourn a meeting to another time and place. Except as herein otherwise provided, and except as otherwise provided by the General Corporation Law or the certificate of incorporation, the act of the Board of Directors shall be the act by vote of a majority of the directors present at a meeting, a quorum being present. The quorum and voting provisions herein stated shall not be construed as conflicting with any provisions of the General Corporation Law and these by-laws which govern a meeting of directors held to fill vacancies and newly created directorships in the Board of Directors.
Quorum and Action
provided, however,
          . The Chairman, if any and if present and acting, shall preside at all meetings; otherwise, any other director chosen by the Board of Directors shall preside.
Chairman of the Meeting
     . Any or all of the directors may be removed for cause or without cause by the stockholders; , , that so long as the certificate of incorporation provides that each class of stock, voting separately as a class, shall elect a certain percentage of directors, a director may be removed without cause by stockholders only by the vote of the class of stock, voting separately as a class, that either elected such director or elected the predecessor of such director whose position was filled by such director due to the predecessor director's death, resignation or removal.
5. Removal of Directors
provided
however
     . Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
6. Action in Writing
     .
7. Executive Committee
          . The Board of Directors may appoint an Executive Committee of the Board of Directors of the corporation of such number of members as shall be determined from time to time by the Board of Directors. The term of office of each member of the Executive
Powers
 
Committee shall be co-extensive with the term of such member's office as director. Any member of the Executive Committee who shall cease to be a director of the corporation shall ipso facto cease to be a member of the Executive Committee. A majority of the members of the Executive Committee shall constitute a quorum for the valid transaction of business. The Executive Committee may meet at stated times or on two days' notice by any member of the Executive Committee to all other members, by delivered letter, by mail, by courier service or by email. The provisions of Section 4 of this Article II with respect to waiver of notice of meetings of the Board of Directors and participation at meetings of the Board of Directors by means of a conference telephone or similar communications equipment shall apply to meetings of the Executive Committee. The provisions of Section 6 of this Article II with respect to action taken by a committee of the Board of Directors without a meeting shall apply to action taken by the Executive Committee. The Executive Committee shall have and may exercise all the powers and authority of the board of directors in the management of the business and affairs of the corporation, except as limited by the General Corporation Law. The Executive Committee shall have power to make rules and regulations for the conduct of its business. Vacancies in the membership of the Executive Committee shall be filled by the Board of Directors from among the directors at a regular meeting, or at a special meeting held for that purpose.
          . The Executive Committee shall elect from its own members a chairman who shall hold office during the term of such person's office as a member of the Executive Committee. When present, the chairman shall preside over all meetings of the Executive Committee. The Executive Committee shall also elect a secretary of the Executive Committee who shall attend all meetings of the Executive Committee and keep the minutes of its acts and proceedings. Such secretary shall be a member of the Board of Directors and may, but need not, be a member of the Executive Committee.
Chairman and Secretary
          . The Executive Committee shall keep minutes of its acts and proceedings which shall be submitted at the next meeting of the Board of Directors, and any action taken by the Board of Directors with respect thereto shall be entered in the minutes of the Board of Directors.
Minutes
          . The Executive Committee may hold meetings, both regular and special, either within or without the State of Delaware, as shall be set forth in the Notice of the Meeting or in a duly executed Waiver of Notice thereof.
Meetings
     . The Board of Directors may from time to time, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, appoint other committees of the Board of Directors which shall have such powers and duties as the Board of Directors may properly determine. No such other committee of the Board of Directors shall be composed of fewer than two directors. Meetings of such committees of the Board of Directors may be held at any place, within or without the State of Delaware, from time to time designated by the Board of Directors or the committee in question. Such committees may meet at stated times or on two days' notice by any member of such committee to all other members, by delivered letter, by mail, by courier service or by email. The provisions of Section 4 of this Article II with respect to waiver of notice of meetings of the Board of Directors and participation at meetings of the Board of Directors by means of a conference telephone or similar communications equipment shall apply to meetings of such other committees.
8. Other Committees
 
     . The directors may elect or appoint an Executive Chairman, a Chief Executive Officer, a Chief Operating Officer, a Chief Financial Officer, a Chief Accounting Officer, one or more Vice Chairmen, a President, one or more Vice Presidents (one or more of whom may be denominated "Executive Vice President" or "Senior Vice President"), a Secretary, one or more Assistant Secretaries, a Treasurer, one or more Assistant Treasurers, a Controller, one or more Assistant Controllers and such other officers as they may determine. Any number of offices may be held by the same person.
1. Officers
     . Unless otherwise provided in the resolution of election or appointment, each officer shall hold office until the meeting of the Board of Directors following the next annual meeting of stockholders and until such officer's successor has been elected and qualified. The Board of Directors may remove any officer for cause or without cause.
2. Term of Office; Removal
     . All officers, as between themselves and the corporation, shall have such authority and duties as generally pertain to their respective offices, as well as such powers and duties as from time to time may be conferred by these by-laws, or, to the extent not so provided, by the Board of Directors. The Board of Directors may delegate to the Chairman or to the Chief Executive Officer the power and authority to define the authority and duties of any or all of the other officers of the corporation.
3. Authority and Duties
     . The Chairman, if any, shall preside at all meetings of the Board of Directors; otherwise, any other director chosen by the Board of Directors shall preside. The Chairman, if any, shall have such additional duties as the Board of Directors may prescribe. As used in these by-laws, the term "Chairman" means the Executive Chairman if any.
4. The Chairman
          Unless otherwise ordered by the Board of Directors, the Chairman, if any, the Executive Chairman, the Chief Executive Officer, a Vice Chairman, the President, a Vice President, the Secretary or the Treasurer shall have full power and authority on behalf of the corporation to attend and to act and vote at any meetings of stockholders of any corporation, or to execute written consents as a stockholder of any corporation, in which the corporation may hold stock and at any such meeting, or in connection with any such consent, shall possess and exercise any and all of the rights and powers incident to the ownership of such stock which as the owner thereof the corporation might have possessed and exercised if present or any of the foregoing officers of the corporation may in his or her discretion give a proxy or proxies in the name of the corporation to any other person or persons, who may vote said stock, execute any written consent, and exercise any and all other rights in regard to it here accorded to the officers. The Board of Directors by resolution from time to time may limit or curtail such power. The
 
officers named above shall have the same powers with respect to entities which are not corporations.
          The corporate seal shall be in such form as the Board of Directors shall prescribe.
          The books of the corporation may be kept within or without the State of Delaware, at such place or places as the Board of Directors may, from time to time, determine.
          The fiscal year of the corporation shall be fixed, and shall be subject to change, by the Board of Directors.
          The power to amend, alter, and repeal these by-laws and to adopt new by-laws shall be vested in both the Board of Directors and the stockholders entitled to vote in the election of directors.
          A. The corporation shall indemnify each person who was or is made a party or is threatened to be made a party to or is involved in any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she, or a person of whom he or she is the legal representative, is or was a director or officer of the corporation or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, including service with respect to employee benefit plans, whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in official capacity as a director, officer, employee or agent or alleged action in any other capacity while serving as a director, officer, employee or agent, to the maximum extent authorized by the General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than said law permitted the corporation to provide prior to such amendment), against all expense, liability and loss (including attorney's fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties and amounts paid or to be paid in settlement) reasonably incurred by such person in connection with such proceeding. Such indemnification shall continue as to a person who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee or agent and shall
 
inure to the benefit of his or her heirs, executors and administrators. The right to indemnification conferred in this Article shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition; that, if the General Corporation Law so requires, the payment of such expenses incurred by a director or officer in advance of the final disposition of a proceeding shall be made only upon receipt by the corporation of an undertaking by or on behalf of such person to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined that such person is not entitled to be indemnified by the corporation as authorized in this Article or otherwise.
provided, however,
          B. The right to indemnification and advancement of expenses conferred on any person by this Article shall not limit the corporation from providing any other indemnification permitted by law nor shall it be deemed exclusive of any other right which any such person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provision of the certificate of incorporation, by-law, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors or otherwise.
          C. The corporation may purchase and maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, or other enterprise against any expense, liability or loss, whether or not the corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability or loss under the General Corporation Law.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20110811092451.txt.gz
TIME:20110811092451
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 11, 2011, AMC Networks Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2011. A copy of the Registrant's press release is being furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety.
The information furnished pursuant to this Item 2.02, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities under that Section and shall not be deemed to be incorporated by reference into any filing of the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
Second Quarter 2011 Highlights:
 
 
 
 
: AMC Networks Inc. ("AMC Networks" or the "Company") (NASDAQ: AMCX) today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2011. AMC Networks became an independent public company on June 30, 2011.
New York, NY  August 11, 2011
President and Chief Executive Officer Josh Sapan said: "For the second quarter of 2011, AMC Networks delivered solid increases in net revenues and AOCF, driven primarily by the ongoing strength of our National Networks. With a record 31 Primetime Emmy nominations this year, we continue to focus on investing in quality original programming to drive ratings, differentiate our brands and provide value to our distributors and advertisers."
Second quarter net revenues increased $32 million, or 12.3%, to $292 million over the second quarter of 2010, led by 10.5% growth at National Networks and a 29.5% increase in International and Other. Adjusted Operating Cash Flow ("AOCF")
1
totaled $112 million, an increase of 9.2% or $9 million versus the prior year period. The AOCF increase resulted from 7.4% growth at National Networks and a $1 million improvement in the AOCF deficit at International and Other. Operating income was $82 million, an increase of 14.8% or $11 million versus the prior year period. The operating income increase resulted from 11.4% growth at National Networks and a $1 million improvement in operating loss at International and Other.
Second quarter net income from continuing operations was $27 million ($0.39 per share), compared with $31 million ($0.44 per share) in the second quarter of 2010. The decrease resulted from $20 million of costs related to the redemption of debt in connection with the spin-off from Cablevision partially offset by reductions in interest expense and income tax expense.
Net cash provided by operating activities was $119 million for the first six months of 2011, a decrease of $13 million from the prior year period as increased operating performance was more than offset by increased cash interest payments, due to the early redemption of debt, and increased working capital. Free Cash Flow
1
for the first six months of 2011 was $115 million, a decrease of $15 million from the prior year period. The decrease reflects the decline in net cash provided by operating activities as well as an increase in capital expenditures over the prior year period.
 
 
Segment Results
 
National Networks
National Networks consists of the Company's four nationally distributed programming networks, AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel.
National Networks revenues for the second quarter of 2011 increased 10.5% to $267 million, AOCF rose 7.4% to $117 million, and operating income grew 11.4% to $92 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Growth in revenues was primarily led by a 21.3% increase in advertising revenue. The increase in advertising revenue was led by AMC and WE tv, which saw an increase in pricing over the prior year period, and to a lesser extent by an increase at IFC. Affiliate fee revenue increased 3.8%. The growth was primarily attributable to increases at AMC and WE tv in affiliate rates and subscribers.
AOCF increased 7.4% to $117 million reflecting the increases in revenue partially offset by an increase of 13% in operating expenses primarily due to increased programming and marketing expenses. Operating income totaled $92 million, an increase of $9 million or 11.4%. The increase reflects the growth in AOCF as well as a reduction in amortization expense.
International and Other
International and Other primarily consists of AMC/Sundance Channel Global, the Company's international programming business; IFC Films, the Company's independent film distribution business; AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, the Company's network technical services business; and VOOM HD.
International and Other revenues for the second quarter of 2011 increased 29.5% or $7 million, AOCF improved $1 million to a deficit of $5 million, and operating loss improved $1 million to a deficit of $9 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Growth in revenues reflects an increase in theatrical and digital revenue at IFC Films, as well as an increase in affiliate fee revenues related to the Company's international operations.
The improvement in AOCF resulted from the increase in revenue as well as a reduction in litigation expenses in the quarter related to VOOM HD partially offset by increased programming and marketing expenses. Operating loss decreased as a result of the improvement in AOCF.
 
Other Matters
On June 30, 2011, AMC Networks completed its spin-off from Cablevision Systems Corporation. AMC Networks became an independent public company on that date and now owns the cable programming networks and related businesses previously owned and operated by Cablevision's Rainbow Media Holdings subsidiary. AMC Networks' Class A common stock is listed on the NASDAQ under the symbol AMCX.
On August 8, 2011, the Company prepaid $50 million of the outstanding balance of the Term A Credit Facility.
Description of Non-GAAP Measures
The Company defines adjusted operating cash flow ("AOCF"), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as operating income (loss) before depreciation and amortization (including impairments), excluding share-based compensation expense or benefit and restructuring charges or credits. Because it is based upon operating income (loss), AOCF also excludes interest expense (including cash interest expense) and other non-operating income and expense items. We believe that the exclusion of share-based compensation expense or benefit allows investors to better track the performance of the various operating units of our business without regard to the distortive effects of fluctuating stock prices in the case of stock appreciation rights and, in the case of restricted shares and stock options, the settlement of an obligation that is not expected to be made in cash.
The Company presents AOCF as a measure of our ability to service our debt and make continuing investments. We believe AOCF is an appropriate measure for evaluating the operating performance of our business segments and the company on a consolidated basis. AOCF and similar measures with similar titles are common performance measures used by investors, analysts and peers to compare performance in our industry.
Internally, the Company uses net revenues and AOCF measures as the most important indicators of our business performance, and evaluates management's effectiveness with specific reference to these indicators. AOCF should be viewed as a supplement to and not a substitute for operating income (loss), net income (loss), cash flows from operating activities, and other measures of performance and/or liquidity presented in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP"). Since AOCF is not a measure of performance calculated in accordance with GAAP, this measure may not be comparable to similar measures with similar titles used by other companies. For a reconciliation of AOCF to operating income (loss), please see page 6 of this release.
The Company defines Free Cash Flow from Continuing Operations, ("Free Cash Flow"), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as net cash provided by operating activities (continuing operations) less capital expenditures (continuing operations), both of which are reported in our Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. Net cash provided by operating activities excludes net cash provided by operating activities of our discontinued operations. We believe the most comparable GAAP financial measure of our liquidity is net cash provided by operating activities. We believe that Free Cash Flow is useful as an indicator of our overall liquidity, as the amount of Free Cash Flow generated in any period is representative of cash that is available for debt repayment, investment, and other discretionary and non-discretionary cash uses. We also believe that Free Cash Flow is one of several benchmarks used by analysts and investors who follow our industry for comparison of our liquidity with other companies in our industry, although our measure of Free Cash Flow may not be directly comparable to similar measures reported by other companies. For a reconciliation of Free Cash Flow to net cash provided by operating activities, please see page 7 of this release.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
This earnings release may contain statements that constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management's current expectations and are subject to uncertainty and changes in circumstances. Investors are cautioned that any such forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance or results and involve risks and uncertainties, and that actual results or developments may differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including financial community and rating agency perceptions of the Company and its business, operations, financial condition and the industries in which it operates and the factors described in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including the sections entitled "Risk Factors" and "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" contained therein. The Company disclaims any obligation to update any forward-looking statements contained herein.
Conference Call Information
AMC Networks will host a conference call today at 10:00 a.m. EST to discuss its second quarter 2011 results. To listen to the call, visit http://www.amcnetworks.com or dial 1-877-347-9170, using the following passcode: 88075698.
About AMC Networks Inc.
AMC Networks owns and operates several of cable television's most recognized brands delivering high quality content to audiences and a valuable platform to distributors and advertisers. The Company manages its business through two reportable operating segments: (i) National Networks, which includes AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel; and (ii) International and Other, which includes AMC/Sundance Channel Global, our international programming business; IFC Films, the Company's independent film distribution business; and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology (formerly Rainbow Network Communications), the Company's network technical services business. For more information on AMC Networks, please visit the Company's website at http://www.amcnetworks.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20111110091427.txt.gz
TIME:20111110091427
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 10, 2011, AMC Networks Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2011. A copy of the Registrant's press release is being furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety.
The information furnished pursuant to this Item 2.02, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities under that Section and shall not be deemed to be incorporated by reference into any filing of the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
:
Third Quarter 2011 Highlights
 
 
 
: AMC Networks Inc. ("AMC Networks" or the "Company") (NASDAQ: AMCX) today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2011.
New York, NY  November 10, 2011
President and Chief Executive Officer Josh Sapan said: "The core of our growth strategy continues to be our investment in original programming. season two premiere, which was the highest rated dramatic show ever in basic cable history against key adult demos, and our performance in the 2011-2012 upfront, underscores the strength of this strategy. In September, AMC also won a record fourth consecutive Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Drama Series for . Our programming successes are reflected in solid financial results as we continued to increase net revenues, AOCF and operating income in the third quarter."
The Walking Dead
Mad Men
Third quarter net revenues increased $12 million, or 4.6%, to $284 million over the third quarter of 2010, led by 3.9% growth at National Networks and a 13.8% increase in International and Other. Adjusted Operating Cash Flow ("AOCF")
1
totaled $123 million, an increase of 14.6% or $16 million versus the prior year period. The AOCF increase resulted from 16.0% growth at National Networks partially offset by a $1 million decline in AOCF at International and Other. Operating income was $94 million, an increase of 22.8% or $18 million versus the prior year period. The operating income increase resulted from 24.1% growth at National Networks partially offset by a $1 million increase in the operating loss at International and Other.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2011, net revenues increased $69 million, or 8.8%, to $849 million, AOCF increased $33 million, or 11.1%, to $335 million, and operating income increased $38 million, or 18.0%, to $247 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Third quarter net income from continuing operations was $40 million ($0.56 per diluted share), compared with $34 million ($0.49 per diluted share) in the third quarter of 2010. The increase resulted from the growth in operating income and a decrease in income tax expense partially offset by an increase in interest expense.
Net income from continuing operations for the nine months ended September 30, 2011 was $97 million ($1.38 per diluted share), compared with $88 million ($1.28 per diluted share) in the prior year period.
Net cash provided by operating activities was $202 million for the first nine months of 2011, an increase of $8 million from the prior year period. The increase was the result of the improved operating performance and a reduction in cash interest payments partially offset by increased working capital and income tax payments. Free Cash Flow
1
for the first nine months of 2011 was $195 million, an increase of $8 million from the prior year period. The results reflect the increase in net cash provided by operating activities and flat capital expenditures over the prior year period.
 
 
Segment Results
 
National Networks
National Networks consists of the Company's four nationally distributed programming networks, AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel.
National Networks revenues for the third quarter of 2011 increased 3.9% to $258 million, AOCF rose 16.0% to $123 million, and operating income grew 24.1% to $99 million, all compared to the prior year period.
National Networks revenues for the nine months ended September 30, 2011 increased 7.6% to $777 million, AOCF rose 9.9% to $346 million, and operating income grew 15.5% to $272 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Growth in third quarter revenues was primarily led by a 6.9% increase in affiliate and other revenues. The increase in affiliate and other revenues was primarily attributable to increases in affiliate rates and viewing subscribers at AMC and WE tv as well as a non-recurring contractual adjustment that benefited Sundance Channel and IFC results. Advertising revenues in the quarter were essentially flat primarily due to the absence of , which aired on AMC in the prior year period. For the nine months ended September 30, 2011, advertising revenues grew 11.6% over the comparable prior year period.
Mad Men
Third quarter AOCF increased 16.0% to $123 million reflecting the increase in revenues as well as a decrease of 5.1% in operating expenses. The decrease in operating expenses was primarily attributable to lower marketing and corporate expenses partially offset by an increase in programming expenses as compared to the prior year period. Operating income totaled $99 million, an increase of $19 million or 24.1%. The increase reflects the growth in AOCF as well as a reduction in amortization and share based compensation expense.
International and Other
International and Other primarily consists of AMC/Sundance Channel Global, the Company's international programming business; IFC Films, the Company's independent film distribution business; AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, the Company's network technical services business; and VOOM HD.
 
International and Other revenues for the third quarter of 2011 increased 13.8% to $31 million, AOCF declined $1 million, and operating loss increased $1 million to a deficit of $4 million, all compared to the prior year period.
International and Other revenues for the nine months ended September 30, 2011 increased 22.9% to $86 million, AOCF improved $3 million to a deficit of $12 million, and operating loss decreased $2 million to a deficit of $25 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Growth in third quarter revenues reflects an increase in theatrical revenues at IFC Films, as well as an increase in affiliate fee revenues related to the Company's international operations.
The decline in third quarter AOCF resulted from increased programming and marketing expenses which more than offset the increase in revenue and a reduction in litigation expenses in the quarter related to VOOM HD. Operating loss increased as a result of the decline in AOCF.
Other Matters
Year-to-date, the Company has prepaid $100 million of the outstanding balance of the Term A Credit Facility. The total prepaid amount consists of two $50 million payments made on August 8, 2011 and October 11, 2011, respectively.
Description of Non-GAAP Measures
The Company defines Adjusted Operating Cash Flow ("AOCF"), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as operating income (loss) before depreciation and amortization (including impairments), excluding share-based compensation expense or benefit and restructuring charges or credits. Because it is based upon operating income (loss), AOCF also excludes interest expense (including cash interest expense) and other non-operating income and expense items. The Company believes that the exclusion of share-based compensation expense or benefit allows investors to better track the performance of the various operating units of the business without regard to the distortive effects of fluctuating stock prices in the case of stock appreciation rights and, in the case of restricted shares and stock options, the settlement of an obligation that is not expected to be made in cash.
The Company presents AOCF as a measure of its ability to service its debt and make continuing investments. The Company believes that AOCF is an appropriate measure for evaluating the operating performance of the business segments and the Company on a consolidated basis. AOCF and similar measures with similar titles are common performance measures used by investors, analysts and peers to compare performance in the industry.
Internally, the Company uses net revenues and AOCF measures as the most important indicators of its business performance, and evaluates management's effectiveness with specific reference to these indicators. AOCF should be viewed as a supplement to and not a substitute for operating income (loss), net income (loss), cash flows from operating activities, and other measures of performance and/or liquidity presented in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP"). Since AOCF is not a measure of performance calculated in accordance with GAAP, this measure may not be comparable to similar measures with similar titles used by other companies. For a reconciliation of AOCF to operating income (loss), please see page 6 of this release.
The Company defines Free Cash Flow from Continuing Operations, ("Free Cash Flow"), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as net cash provided by operating activities (continuing operations) less capital expenditures (continuing operations), both of which are reported in our Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. Net cash provided by operating activities excludes net cash provided by operating activities of discontinued operations. The Company believes the most comparable GAAP financial measure of its
 
liquidity is net cash provided by operating activities. The Company believes that Free Cash Flow is useful as an indicator of its overall liquidity, as the amount of Free Cash Flow generated in any period is representative of cash that is available for debt repayment, investment, and other discretionary and non-discretionary cash uses. The Company also believes that Free Cash Flow is one of several benchmarks used by analysts and investors who follow the industry for comparison of its liquidity with other companies in the industry, although the Company's measure of Free Cash Flow may not be directly comparable to similar measures reported by other companies. For a reconciliation of Free Cash Flow to net cash provided by operating activities, please see page 7 of this release.
Forward-Looking Statements
This earnings release may contain statements that constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management's current expectations and are subject to uncertainty and changes in circumstances. Investors are cautioned that any such forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance or results and involve risks and uncertainties, and that actual results or developments may differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including financial community and rating agency perceptions of the Company and its business, operations, financial condition and the industries in which it operates and the factors described in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including the sections entitled "Risk Factors" and "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" contained therein. The Company disclaims any obligation to update any forward-looking statements contained herein.
Conference Call Information
AMC Networks will host a conference call today at 10:30 a.m. EST to discuss its third quarter 2011 results. To listen to the call, visit http://www.amcnetworks.com or dial 1-877-347-9170, using the following passcode: 19752329.
About AMC Networks Inc.
AMC Networks owns and operates several of cable television's most recognized brands delivering high quality content to audiences and a valuable platform to distributors and advertisers. The Company manages its business through two reportable operating segments: (i) National Networks, which includes AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel; and (ii) International and Other, which includes AMC/Sundance Channel Global, our international programming business; IFC Films, the Company's independent film distribution business; and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology (formerly Rainbow Network Communications), the Company's network technical services business. For more information on AMC Networks, please visit the Company's website at http://www.amcnetworks.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20120306170725.txt.gz
TIME:20120306170725
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
[Full Name of Employee]
[Date]
Dear [First Name]:
Pursuant to the 2011 Cash Incentive Plan (the "") of AMC Networks Inc. (the ""), you have been selected by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of AMC Networks Inc. (the "Company") to receive a contingent cash award (the "") effective as of March     , 2012 (the "").
Plan
Company
Award
Effective Date
 
Capitalized terms used, but not defined, in this agreement (this "Agreement") have the meanings given to them in the Plan. The Award is subject to the terms and conditions set forth below:
1. . In accordance with the terms of this Performance Award Agreement, the target amount of your contingent Award is $                     (the ""), which may be increased or decreased to the extent the performance objectives set forth on hereto (the "") have been attained in respect of the period from                      through                      (the ""). The Award, calculated in accordance with Annex 1 attached hereto, will become payable to you upon the date on which the Committee (as defined in Section 10 below) determines the Company's performance against the Objectives (the "") , that you have remained in the continuous employ of the Company or one of its Affiliates from the Effective Date through the Award Date.
Amount and Payment of Award
Target Award
Annex 1
Objectives
Performance Period
Award Date
provided
2. . If, on the Award Date, you are no longer employed by the Company or one of its Affiliates for any reason, other than as a result of your death, then you will automatically forfeit all of your rights and interest in the Award regardless of whether the Objectives are attained.
Termination of Employment
3. . If, prior to the end of the Performance Period, your employment with the Company or any of its Affiliates is terminated as a result of your death then your estate will receive, promptly (and in any event within 30 days) following the date of such termination, payment of the Target Award prorated for the number of completed months of your employment
Death
during the Performance Period prior to such termination. If after the end of the Performance Period but prior to the Award Date, your employment with the Company or any of its Affiliates is terminated as a result of your death then your estate will receive, on the date payment is made to active eligible employees of the Company, the Award, if any, to which you would have been entitled on the Award Date had your employment not been so terminated.
4. .
Going Private Transaction or Change in Control
a. Going Private Transaction. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, if at any time a Going Private Transaction (as defined below) occurs and immediately prior to such transaction you are employed by the Company or one of its Affiliates, the Target Award shall become payable to you whether or not the Objectives have been attained at the earlier of (i) January 1, 2015, , that you remain in the continuous employ of the Company or one of its Affiliates from the Effective Date through such date or (ii) the date subsequent to the Going Private Transaction on which your employment with the Company or the surviving entity is terminated (A) by the Company or the surviving entity other than for Cause (as defined below) or (B) by you for Good Reason (as defined below). Notwithstanding the foregoing, if you become entitled to payment of the Target Award by virtue of a termination in accordance with (ii)(A) or (ii)(B) of this Section 4(a) and are determined by the Company to be a "specified employee" within the meaning of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended ("Section 409A of the IRC"), the Target Award shall be paid to you on the earlier of: (i) January 1, 2015, (ii) the date that is six months from your date of employment termination and (iii) any other date on which such payment or any portion thereof would be a permissible distribution under Section 409A of the IRC. In the event of such a determination, the Company shall promptly following the date of your employment termination set aside such amount for your benefit in a "rabbi trust" that satisfies the requirements of Revenue Procedure 92-64, and on a monthly basis shall deposit into such trust interest in arrears (compounded quarterly at the rate provided below) until such time as such amount, together with all accrued interest thereon, is paid to you in full pursuant to the previous sentence); , that no payment will be made to such rabbi trust if it would be contrary to law or cause you to incur additional tax under Section 409A of the IRC. The initial interest rate shall be the average of the one-year LIBOR fixed rate equivalent for the ten business days prior to the date of your employment termination.
provided
provided
b. Change in Control. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement but subject to the subsections of this Section 4(b), if at any time a Change of Control (as defined below) of the Company occurs and immediately prior to such transaction you are employed by the Company or one of its Affiliates, you will be entitled to the payment of the Target Award whether or not the Objectives have been attained.
i. If the actual Change of Control:
(A) is a permissible distribution event under Section 409A of the IRC or payment of the Award promptly upon such event is otherwise permissible under Section 409A of the IRC (including, for the avoidance of doubt, by reason of the inapplicability of Section 409A of the IRC to the Award), then the Target Award shall be paid to you by the Company promptly following the Change of Control; or
 
(B) is not a permissible distribution event under Section 409A of the IRC and payment of the Award promptly upon such event is not otherwise permissible under Section 409A of the IRC, then the Target Award shall be paid to you by the Company (together with interest thereon pursuant to Section 4(b)(ii) below) on the earliest to occur of:
(1) any subsequent date on which you are no longer employed by the Company or any of its Affiliates for any reason other than termination of your employment by one of such entities for Cause (provided that if you are determined by the Company to be a "specified employee" within the meaning of Section 409A of the IRC, six months from such date);
(2) any other date on which such payment or any portion thereof would be a permissible distribution under Section 409A of the IRC; or
(3) January 1, 2015.
ii. Upon any Change of Control, to the extent any amounts are due to be paid to you at a later date pursuant to Section 4(b)(i)(B) above, the Company shall promptly following the Change of Control set aside such amount for your benefit in a "rabbi trust" that satisfies the requirements of Revenue Procedure 92-64, and on a monthly basis shall deposit into such trust interest in arrears (compounded quarterly at the rate provided below) until such time as such amount, together with all accrued interest thereon, is paid to you in full pursuant to Section 4(b)(i)(B) above); , that no payment will be made to such rabbi trust if it would be contrary to law or cause you to incur additional tax under Section 409A of the IRC. The initial interest rate shall be the average of the one-year LIBOR fixed rate equivalent for the ten business days prior to the date of the Change of Control and shall adjust annually based on the average of such rate for the ten business days prior to each anniversary of the Change of Control.
provided
If and to the extent that any payment under this Section 4 is determined by the Company to constitute "non-qualified deferred compensation" subject to Section 409A of the IRC and is payable to you by reason of your termination of employment, then such payment shall be made to you only upon a "separation from service" as defined for purposes of Section 409A of the IRC under applicable regulations.
For purposes of this Agreement, "" means, your (i) commission of an act of fraud, embezzlement, misappropriation, willful misconduct, gross negligence or breach of fiduciary duty against the Company or an Affiliate thereof, or (ii) commission of any act or omission that results in a conviction, plea of no contest, plea of , or imposition of unadjudicated probation for any crime involving moral turpitude or any felony.
Cause
nolo contendere
For purposes of this Agreement, "" means the acquisition, in a transaction or a series of related transactions, by any person or group, other than Charles F. Dolan or members of the immediate family of Charles F. Dolan or trusts for the benefit of Charles F. Dolan or his immediate family (or an entity or entities controlled by any of them) or any employee benefit plan sponsored or maintained by the Company, of the power to direct the management of the Company or substantially all its assets (as constituted immediately prior to such transaction or transactions).
Change of Control
 
For purposes of this Agreement, "" means a transaction involving the purchase of Company securities described in Rule 13e-3 to the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934.
Going Private Transaction
For purposes of this Agreement, "" means: (a) without your express written consent any reduction in your base salary or bonus potential, or any material impairment or material adverse change in your working conditions (as the same may from time to time have been improved or, with your written consent, otherwise altered, in each case, after the Effective Date) at any time after or within ninety (90) days prior to the Going Private Transaction including, without limitation, any material reduction of your other compensation, executive perquisites or other employee benefits (measured, where applicable, by level or participation or percentage of award under any plans of the Company), or material impairment or material adverse change of your level of responsibility, authority, autonomy or title, or to your scope of duties; (b) any failure by the Company to comply with any of the provisions of this Agreement, other than an insubstantial or inadvertent failure remedied by the Company promptly after receipt of notice thereof given by you; (c) the Company's requiring you to be based at any office or location more than thirty-five (35) miles from your location immediately prior to the Going Private Transaction except for travel reasonably required in the performance of your responsibilities; or (d) any failure by the Company to obtain the assumption and agreement to perform this Agreement by a successor.
Good Reason
5. . Except for a right which has accrued to receive a payment on account of the Award, this Agreement shall automatically terminate and be of no further force and effect on the Award Date.
Termination
6. . You may not transfer, assign, pledge or otherwise encumber the Award other than to the extent provided in the Plan.
Transfer Restrictions
7. . The Plan will at all times be unfunded and, except as set forth in Section 4(b) of this Agreement, no provision will at any time be made with respect to segregating any assets of the Company or any of its Affiliates for payment of any benefits under the Plan, including, without limitation, those covered by this Agreement. Your right or that of your estate to receive payments under this Agreement shall be an unsecured claim against the general assets of the Company, including any rabbi trust established pursuant to Section 4(b). Neither you nor your estate shall have any rights in or against any specific assets of the Company other than the assets held by the rabbi trust established pursuant to Section 4(b).
Unfunded Obligation
8. . You hereby acknowledge that you have reviewed with your own tax advisors the federal, state and local tax consequences of receiving the Award. You hereby represent to the Company that you are relying solely on such advisors and not on any statements or representations of the Company, its Affiliates or any of their respective agents. If, in connection with the Award, the Company is required to withhold any amounts by reason of any federal, state or local tax, such withholding shall be effected in accordance with Section 8 of the Plan.
Tax Representations and Tax Withholding
9. You hereby agree that if the Company shall owe you any amount that does not constitute "non-qualified deferred compensation" pursuant to Section 409A of the IRC
Right of Offset.
 
(the "") under this Agreement, then the Company shall have the right to offset against the Company-Owed Amount, to the maximum extent permitted by law, any amounts that you may owe to the Company or its Affiliates of whatever nature.
Company-Owed Amount
10. . For purposes of this Agreement, the term "" means the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company or any replacement committee established under, and as more fully defined in, the Plan.
The Committee
Committee
11. . The Committee has full discretion with respect to any actions to be taken or determinations to be made in connection with this Agreement, and its determinations shall be final, binding and conclusive.
Committee Discretion
12. . The Committee reserves the right at any time and from time to time to amend or revise the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, except that the Committee may not make any such amendment or revision in a manner unfavorable to you (other than if immaterial) without your consent. Any amendment of this Agreement shall be in writing and signed by an authorized member of the Committee or a person or persons designated by the Committee.
Amendment
13. . The Award and all other amounts payable hereunder are subject to the Plan.
Award Subject to the Plan
14. . Except for any employment agreement between you and the Company or any of its Affiliates in effect as of the date of the grant hereof (as such employment agreement may be modified, renewed or replaced), this Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire understanding and agreement of you and the Company with respect to the Award covered hereby and supersede all prior understandings and agreements. In the event of a conflict among the documents with respect to the terms and conditions of the Award covered hereby, the documents will be accorded the following order of authority: the terms and conditions of the Plan will have highest authority followed by the terms and conditions of your employment agreement, if any, followed by the terms and conditions of this Agreement.
Entire Agreement
15. . The terms and conditions of this Agreement shall be binding upon, and shall inure to the benefit of, the Company and its successors and assigns.
Successors and Assigns
16. . This Agreement shall be deemed to be made under, and in all respects be interpreted, construed and governed by and in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York.
Governing Law
17. . You irrevocably submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of the State of New York and the Federal courts of the United States located in the Southern District and Eastern District of the State of New York in respect of the interpretation and enforcement of the provisions of this Agreement and the Plan, and hereby waive, and agree not to assert, as a defense that you are not subject thereto or that the venue thereof may not be appropriate. You agree that the mailing of process or other papers in connection with any action or proceeding in any manner permitted by law shall be valid and sufficient service.
Jurisdiction and Venue
 
18. . No waiver by the Company at any time of any breach by you of, or compliance with, any term or condition of this Agreement or the Plan to be performed by you shall be deemed a waiver of the same, any similar or any dissimilar term or condition at the same or at any prior or subsequent time.
Waiver
19. . The provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed severable and the invalidity or unenforceability of any term or condition hereof shall not affect the validity or enforceability of the other terms and conditions set forth herein.
Severability
20. . By acceptance of this Agreement, you shall be considered in agreement that the Award shall be considered special incentive compensation and will be exempt from inclusion as "wages" or "salary" in pension, retirement, life insurance and other employee benefits arrangements of the Company and its Affiliates, except as determined otherwise by the Company. In addition, each of your beneficiaries shall be deemed to be in agreement that the Award shall be exempt from inclusion in "wages" or "salary" for purposes of calculating benefits of any life insurance coverage sponsored by the Company or any of its Affiliates.
Exclusion from Compensation Calculation
21. . Nothing contained in this Agreement or the Plan shall be construed to confer on you any right to continue in the employ of the Company or any Affiliate, or derogate from the right of the Company or any Affiliate, as applicable, to retire, request the resignation of, or discharge you, at any time, with or without cause.
No Right to Continued Employment
22. Notwithstanding Section 2(a) of the Plan, for purposes of Sections 2, 3, 4 (other than the definition of "Cause" set forth in such Section), 9 and 14 of this Agreement, "Affiliate" of the Company shall mean the direct and indirect subsidiaries of the Company.
Affiliates of the Company.
23. . It is the Company's intent that payments under this Agreement be exempt from, or comply with, the requirements of Section 409A of the IRC, and that this Agreement be administered and interpreted accordingly. If and to the extent that any payment or benefit under this Agreement, or any plan or arrangement of the Company or its affiliates, is determined by the Company to constitute "non-qualified deferred compensation" subject to Section 409A of the IRC and is payable to you by reason of your termination of employment, then (a) such payment or benefit shall be made or provided to you only upon a "separation from service" as defined for purposes of Section 409A of the IRC under applicable regulations and (b) if you are a "specified employee" (within the meaning of Section 409A of the IRC and as determined by the Company), such payment or benefit shall not be made or provided before the date that is six months after the date of your separation from service (or your earlier death). Any amount not paid in respect of the six month period specified in the preceding sentence will be paid to you, together with interest on such delayed amount at the rate equal to the average of the one-year LIBOR fixed rate equivalent for the ten business days prior to the date of your separation from service (or your earlier death), in a lump sum after the expiration of such six month period. The Committee will determine the Company's performance against the Objectives under Section 1 hereof during the calendar year immediately following the Performance Period. This Section 23 will also apply to all previous awards granted to you pursuant to the Plan.
Section 409A
 
24. . The headings in this Agreement are for purposes of convenience only and are not intended to define or limit the construction of the terms and conditions of this Agreement.
Headings
25. . Upon execution by you, this Agreement shall be effective from and as of the Effective Date.
Effective Date
26. . Execution of this Agreement by the Company may be in the form of an electronic or similar signature, and such signature shall be treated as an original signature for all purposes.
Signatures
 
By your signature, you (i) acknowledge that a complete copy of the Plan and an executed original of this Agreement have been made available to you and (ii) agree to all of the terms and conditions set forth in the Plan and this Agreement.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.2
[Full Name of Employee]
[Date]
Dear [First Name]:
Pursuant to AMC Networks Inc. 2011 Employee Stock Plan (the ""), you have been selected by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors (as more fully described in Section 11, the "") of AMC Networks Inc. (the ""), effective as of [            ], 2012 (the "Grant Date") to receive [            ] restricted stock units (""). The Units are granted subject to the terms and conditions set forth below and in the Plan.
Plan
Committee
Company
Units
Capitalized terms used but not defined in this agreement (this "") have the meanings given to them in the Plan. The Units are subject to the terms and conditions set forth below:
Agreement
1. Each Unit shall represent an unfunded, unsecured promise by the Company to deliver to you one share of the Company's Class A Common Stock, par value $.01 per share ("Share") on the Delivery Date. In accordance with Section 10(b) of the Plan, in the discretion of the Committee, in lieu of all or any portion of the Shares otherwise deliverable in respect of your Units, the Company may deliver a cash amount equal to the number of such Shares multiplied by the Fair Market Value of a Share on the date when Shares would otherwise have been issued, as determined by the Committee.
Awards.
2. Subject to Sections 3 and 4, none of your Units will vest and you will forfeit all of them if you do not remain continuously employed with the Company or one of its Subsidiaries from the Grant Date through the [            ] anniversary of the Grant Date (the "") [ ", provided the performance criteria set forth in Annex 2 attached hereto (the "") have been satisfied as of the Vesting Date, as determined by the Committee"].
Vesting.
Vesting Date
For Performance RSUs only:
Performance Criteria
3. If your employment is terminated as a result of your death, all of the Units will vest as of the termination date. If your employment is terminated for other reasons, the Committee may, in its sole discretion determine to vest all or a portion of the Units (but shall be under no obligation to consider doing so).
Vesting in the Event of Death and Other Circumstances.
4. As set forth in attached hereto, your entitlement to the Units may be affected in the event of a Change of Control of the Company or a going-private transaction (each as defined in attached hereto).
Change of Control/Going Private Transaction.
Annex 1
Annex 1
5. You may not transfer, assign, pledge or otherwise encumber the Units, other than to the extent provided in the Plan.
Transfer Restrictions.
6. You shall not be deemed to be the holder of Shares, and shall not have any of the rights of a stockholder with respect to any Units, unless and until the Company shall have issued and delivered Shares to you and your name shall have been entered as a stockholder of record on the books of the Company. Pursuant to Section 10(c) of the Plan, all ordinary (as determined by the Committee in its sole discretion) cash dividends that would have been paid upon any Shares underlying your Units had such Shares been issued will be retained by the Company for your account until your Units vest and such dividends will be paid to you (without interest) on the Delivery Date to the extent that your Units vest.
Right to Vote and Receive Dividends.
7. . You hereby acknowledge that you have reviewed with your own tax advisors the federal, state and local tax consequences of receiving the Units. You hereby represent to the Company that you are relying solely on such advisors and not on any statements or representations of the Company, its Affiliates or any of their respective agents. If, in connection with the Units, the Company is required to withhold any amounts by reason of any federal, state or local tax, such withholding shall be effected in accordance with Section 16 of the Plan.
Tax Representations and Tax Withholding
8. It is the Company's intent that payments under this Agreement shall comply with Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code ("Section 409A") to the extent applicable, and that the Agreement be administered accordingly. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement or any employment agreement you have entered into with the Company, to the extent that any payment or benefit under this Agreement is determined by the Company to constitute "non-qualified deferred compensation" subject to Section 409A and is payable to you by reason of your termination of employment, then (a) such payment or benefit shall be made or provided to you only upon a "separation from service" as defined for purposes of Section 409A under applicable regulations and (b) if you are a "specified employee" (within the meaning of Section 409A and as determined by the Company), such payment or benefit shall not be made or provided before the date that is six months after the date of your separation from service (or your earlier death).
Section 409A.
9. Subject to Sections 8, 10 and 13 and except as otherwise provided in this Agreement, the Shares will be delivered in respect of vested Units (if any) on the first to occur of the following events (i) to you on or promptly after the Vesting Date (but in no case more than 15 days after such date), (ii) in the event of your death to your estate after your death and during the calendar year in which your death occurs (or such later date as may be permitted under Section 409A) and (iii) in the event of any other termination of your employment (including pursuant to the provisions of ) to you on the ninetieth (90th) day following your termination of employment (the ""). Unless otherwise determined by the Committee, delivery of the Shares at the Delivery Date will be by book-entry credit to an account in your name that the Company has established at a custody agent (the ""). The Company's transfer agent, Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. shall act as the custodian of the Shares; , the Company may in its sole discretion appoint another custodian to replace Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. On the Delivery Date, if you have complied with your obligations under this Agreement and that your tax obligations with respect to the vested Units are
Delivery.
Annex 1
Delivery Date
custodian
however
provided
 
appropriately satisfied, we will instruct the custodian to electronically transfer your Shares to a brokerage or other account on your behalf (or make such other arrangements for the delivery of the Shares to you as we reasonably determine).
10. . You hereby agree that the Company shall have the right to offset against its obligation to deliver shares of Class A Common Stock, cash or other property under this Agreement to the extent that it does not constitute "non-qualified deferred compensation" pursuant to Section 409A, any outstanding amounts of whatever nature that you then owe to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
Right of Offset
11. . For purposes of this Agreement, the term "Committee" means the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company or any replacement committee established under, and as more fully defined in, the Plan.
The Committee
12. . The Committee has full discretion with respect to any actions to be taken or determinations to be made in connection with this Agreement, and its determinations shall be final, binding and conclusive.
Committee Discretion
13. The Committee reserves the right at any time to amend the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, except that the Committee shall not make any amendment or revision in a manner unfavorable to you (other than if immaterial), without your consent. No consent shall be required for amendments made pursuant to Section 12 of the Plan, except that, for purposes of Section 19 of the Plan, Section 4 and Annex 1 of this Agreement are deemed to be "terms of an Award Agreement expressly refer[ring] to an Adjustment Event." Any amendment of this Agreement shall be in writing and signed by an authorized member of the Committee or a person or persons designated by the Committee.
Amendment.
14. The Units covered by this Agreement are subject to the Plan.
Units Subject to the Plan.
15. For purposes of this Agreement, mean any entities that are controlled, directly or indirectly, by the Company, or in which the Company owns, directly or indirectly, more than 50% of the equity interests.
Subsidiaries.
"Subsidiaries"
16. Except for any employment agreement between you and the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in effect as of the date of the grant hereof (as such employment agreement may be modified, renewed or replaced), this Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire understanding and agreement of you and the Company with respect to the Units covered hereby and supersede all prior understandings and agreements. Except as provided in Sections 8 and 15, in the event of a conflict among the documents with respect to the terms and conditions of the Units covered hereby, the documents will be accorded the following order of authority: the terms and conditions of the Plan will have highest authority followed by the terms and conditions of your employment agreement, if any, followed by the terms and conditions of this Agreement.
Entire Agreement.
17. The terms and conditions of this Agreement shall be binding upon, and shall inure to the benefit of, the Company and its successors and assigns.
Successors and Assigns.
 
18. This Agreement shall be deemed to be made under, and in all respects be interpreted, construed and governed by and in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York.
Governing Law.
19. You irrevocably submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of the State of New York and the Federal courts of the United States located in the Southern District and Eastern District of the State of New York in respect of the interpretation and enforcement of the provisions of this Agreement, and hereby waive, and agree not to assert, as a defense that you are not subject thereto or that the venue thereof may not be appropriate. You agree that the mailing of process or other papers in connection with any action or proceeding in any manner permitted by law shall be valid and sufficient service.
Jurisdiction and Venue.
20. . No waiver by the Company at any time of any breach by you of, or compliance with, any term or condition of this Agreement or the Plan to be performed by you shall be deemed a waiver of the same, any similar or any dissimilar term or condition at the same or at any prior or subsequent time.
Waiver
21. . The provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed severable and the invalidity or unenforceability of any term or condition hereof shall not affect the validity or enforceability of the other terms and conditions set forth herein.
Severability
22. . By acceptance of this Agreement, you shall be deemed to be in agreement that the Units covered hereby shall be considered special incentive compensation and will be exempt from inclusion as "wages" or "salary" in pension, retirement, life insurance and other employee benefits arrangements of the Company and its Affiliates, except as determined otherwise by the Company. In addition, each of your beneficiaries shall be deemed to be in agreement that all such shares be exempt from inclusion in "wages" or "salary" for purposes of calculating benefits of any life insurance coverage sponsored by the Company or any of its Affiliates.
Exclusion from Compensation Calculation
23. . Nothing contained in this Agreement or the Plan shall be construed to confer on you any right to continue in the employ of the Company or any Affiliate, or derogate from the right of the Company or any Affiliate, as applicable, to retire, request the resignation of, or discharge you, at any time, with or without cause.
No Right to Continued Employment
24. The headings in this Agreement are for purposes of convenience only and are not intended to define or limit the construction of the terms and conditions of this Agreement.
Headings.
25. Upon execution by you, this Agreement shall be effective from and as of the Grant Date.
Effective Date.
26. Execution of this Agreement by the Company and/or you may be in the form of an electronic, manual or similar signature, and such signature shall be treated as an original signature for all purposes.
Signatures.
 
By your electronic signature, you (i) acknowledge that a complete copy of the Plan and this Agreement have been made available to you and (ii) agree to all of the terms and conditions set forth in the Plan and this Agreement.
 
 
In the event of a "Change of Control" of the Company or a "going private transaction," as defined below, your entitlement to Units shall be as follows:
1. If the Company or the "surviving entity," as defined below, has shares of common stock (or partnership units) traded on a national stock exchange or on the over-the-counter market as reported on NASDAQ, the Committee shall, no later than the effective date of the transaction which results in a Change of Control or going private transaction either (A) convert your unvested Units into an amount of cash equal to (i) the number of your unvested Units multiplied by (ii) the "offer price per share," the "acquisition price per share" or the "merger price per share," each as defined below, whichever of such amounts is applicable or (B) arrange to have the surviving entity grant to you an award of restricted stock units (or partnership units) for shares of the Surviving Entity on the same terms and with a value equivalent to your unvested Units which will, in the good faith determination of the Committee, provide you with an equivalent profit potential.
2. If the Company or the surviving entity does not have shares of common stock (or partnership units) traded on a national stock exchange or on the over-the-counter market as reported on NASDAQ, the Committee shall convert your unvested Units into an amount of cash equal to the amount calculated as per Paragraph 1(A) above.
3. The cash award provided in Paragraph 1 or 2 shall become payable to you at the earlier of (a) the date on which your Units are scheduled to vest (provided that you remain continuously employed with the Company or one of its Subsidiaries through such date), or (b) the date on which your employment with the Company or the surviving entity is terminated (i) by the Company or the surviving entity other than for Cause, if such termination occurs within three (3) years of the Change of Control or going private transaction, (ii) by you for "good reason," as defined below, if such termination occurs within three (3) years of the Change of Control or going private transaction or (iii) by you for any reason at least six (6) months, but not more than nine (9) months after the effective date of the Change of Control or going private transaction; provided that clause (iii) herein shall not apply in the event that your rights in the Units are converted into a right to receive an amount of cash in accordance with paragraph (A) of Section 1. The amount payable in cash shall be payable together with interest from the effective date of the Change of Control or going private transaction until the date of payment at (a) the weighted average cost of capital of the Company immediately prior to the effectiveness of the Change of Control or going private transaction, or (b) if the Company (or the surviving entity) sets aside the funds in a trust or other funding arrangement, the actual earnings of such trust or other funding arrangement.
4. As used herein,
"" means your (i) commission of an act of fraud, embezzlement, misappropriation, willful misconduct, gross negligence or breach of fiduciary duty against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or (ii) commission of any act or omission that results in a conviction, plea of no contest, plea of or imposition of unadjudicated probation for any crime involving moral turpitude or any felony.
Cause
nolo contendere,
 
"" means the acquisition, in a transaction or a series of related transactions, by any person or group, other than Charles F. Dolan or members of the immediate family of Charles F. Dolan or trusts for the benefit of Charles F. Dolan or his immediate family (or an entity or entities controlled by any of them) or any employee benefit plan sponsored or maintained by the Company, of the power to direct the management of the Company or substantially all its assets (as constituted immediately prior to such transaction or transactions).
Change of Control
"" means the entity that owns, directly or indirectly, after consummation of any transaction, substantially all the assets of the Company as constituted immediately prior to consummation of such transaction. If any such entity is at least majority-owned, directly or indirectly, by any entity (a "") which has shares of common stock (or partnership units) traded on a national stock exchange or the over-the-counter market, as reported on NASDAQ, then such parent entity shall be deemed to be the surviving entity, provided that if there shall be more than one such parent entity, the parent entity closest to ownership of substantially all the assets of the Company shall be deemed to be the surviving entity. If in connection with any transaction, a Change of Control or going private transaction occurs and no entity shall own, after consummation of such transaction, substantially all the assets of the Company as constituted immediately prior to consummation of such transaction, then, notwithstanding any other provision of this Paragraph 4 to the contrary, there shall not be deemed to be a surviving entity so that the provisions of Paragraph 1(B) shall not be applicable.
Surviving entity
parent entity
"" means a transaction involving the purchase of Company securities described in Rule 13e-3 to the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934.
Going private transaction
"" means
Good reason
a. without your express written consent any reduction in your base salary or bonus potential, or any material impairment or material adverse change in your working conditions (as the same may from time to time have been improved or, with your written consent, otherwise altered, in each case, after the Grant Date) at any time after or within ninety (90) days prior to the Change of Control including, without limitation, any material reduction of your other compensation, executive perquisites or other employee benefits (measured, where applicable, by level or participation or percentage of award under any plans of the Company), or material impairment or material adverse change of your level of responsibility, authority, autonomy or title, or to your scope of duties;
b. any failure by the Company to comply with any of the provisions of this Agreement, other than an insubstantial or inadvertent failure remedied by the Company promptly after receipt of notice thereof given by you;
c. the Company's requiring you to be based at any office or location more than thirty-five (35) miles from your location immediately prior to such event except for travel reasonably required in the performance of your responsibilities; or
 
d. any failure by the Company to obtain the assumption and agreement to perform this Agreement by a successor as contemplated by Paragraph 1.
"" shall mean, in the case of a tender offer or exchange offer which results in a Change of Control or going private transaction (an ""), the greater of (i) the highest price per share of common stock paid pursuant to the Offer, or (ii) the highest fair market value per share of common stock during the ninety-day period ending on the date of a Change of Control or going private transaction. Any securities or property which are part or all of the consideration paid for shares of common stock in the Offer shall be valued in determining the Offer Price per Share at the higher of (A) the valuation placed on such securities or property by the Company, person or other entity making such offer or (B) the valuation placed on such securities or property by the Committee.
Offer price per share
Offer
"" shall mean, in the case of a merger, consolidation, sale, exchange or other disposition of assets that results in a Change of Control or going private transaction (a ""), the greater of (i) the fixed or formula price for the acquisition of shares of common stock occurring pursuant to the Merger, and (ii) the highest fair market value per share of common stock during the ninety-day period ending on the date of such Change of Control or going private transaction. Any securities or property which are part or all of the consideration paid for shares of common stock pursuant to the Merger shall be valued in determining the merger price per share at the higher of (A) the valuation placed on such securities or property by the Company, person or other entity which is a party with the Company to the Merger, or (B) the valuation placed on such securities or property by the Committee.
Merger price per share
Merger
"" shall mean the greater of (i) the highest price per share stated on the Schedule 13D or any amendment thereto filed by the holder of twenty percent (20%) or more of the Company's voting power which gives rise to the Change of Control or going private transaction, and (ii) the highest fair market value per share of common stock during the ninety-day period ending on the date of such Change of Control or going private transaction.
Acquisition price per share
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20120315091624.txt.gz
TIME:20120315091624
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 15, 2012, AMC Networks Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the year and quarter ended December 31, 2011. A copy of the Registrant's press release is being furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety.
The information furnished pursuant to this Item 2.02, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities under that Section and shall not be deemed to be incorporated by reference into any filing of the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
:
Full Year 2011 Highlights
 
 
 
: AMC Networks Inc. ("AMC Networks" or the "Company") (NASDAQ: AMCX) today reported financial results for the full year and fourth quarter ended December 31, 2011.
New York, NYMarch 15, 2012
President and Chief Executive Officer Josh Sapan said: "2011 was a landmark year for AMC Networks. We completed our successful spin-off from Cablevision and achieved strong financial results, delivering double digit growth in net revenues, AOCF and operating income for the full year. Our National Networks continued to deliver original programming that attracts a highly engaged audience and critical acclaim, including AMC's , which has broken ratings records and become a global phenomenon. We capitalized on new digital distribution platforms and expanded the reach of our networks into new international markets. As we look at the year ahead, we are well positioned to continue this momentum and will maintain our focus on creating value for shareholders, advertisers and distribution partners."
The Walking Dead
Fourth Quarter Results
Fourth quarter net revenues increased $40 million, or 13.6%, to $339 million over the fourth quarter of 2010, led by 12.0% growth at National Networks and a 14.5% increase in International and Other. Adjusted Operating Cash Flow ("AOCF")
1
totaled $107 million, an increase of 7.1% or $7 million versus the prior year period. The AOCF increase resulted from a 2.6% decline at National Networks offset by a $7 million increase in AOCF at International and Other. National Networks AOCF included a charge of $18 million related to the write-off of a programming asset. Operating income was $79 million, an increase of 12.6% or $9 million versus the prior year period. Operating income at National Networks was essentially flat and results at International and Other improved by $6 million over the prior year period.
Fourth quarter net income from continuing operations was $29 million ($0.40 per diluted share), compared with $30 million ($0.43 per diluted share) in the fourth quarter of 2010. The decrease resulted from an increase in interest expense partially offset by growth in operating income and a decrease in income tax expense.
Full Year Results
Full year 2011 net revenues increased $109 million, or 10.1%, to $1.188 billion over full year 2010, led by 8.8% growth at National Networks and a 20.2% increase in International and Other. AOCF totaled $442 million, an increase of 10.1% or $40 million versus the prior year period. The AOCF increase
 
 
resulted from 6.8% growth at National Networks and a $10 million improvement in the AOCF deficit at International and Other. Operating income was $327 million, an increase of 16.7% or $47 million versus the prior year period. The operating income increase resulted from 11.8% growth at National Networks and an $8 million reduction in operating loss at International and Other.
Full year 2011 net income from continuing operations was $126 million ($1.79 per diluted share), compared with $118 million ($1.71 per diluted share) in full year 2010. The increase resulted from the growth in operating income and a decrease in income tax expense partially offset by an increase in interest expense and costs related to the redemption of debt in connection with the spin-off from Cablevision.
Net cash provided by operating activities was $255 million for the full year 2011, a decrease of $11 million from the prior year period. The decrease was the result of an increase in working capital, cash interest payments and income tax payments partially offset by the improved operating performance. Free Cash Flow
2
for the full year 2011 was $240 million, a decrease of $9 million from the prior year period. The results reflect the decrease in net cash provided by operating activities partially offset by a reduction in capital expenditures over the prior year period.
Segment Results
 
National Networks
National Networks consists of the Company's four nationally distributed programming networks, AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel.
Fourth Quarter Results
National Networks revenues for the fourth quarter 2011 increased 12.0% to $305 million, AOCF declined 2.6% to $101 million, and operating income grew 0.4% to $77 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Growth in revenues was primarily led by a 14.7% increase in advertising revenues. The increase in advertising revenues was led by AMC. Affiliate and other revenues increased 10.0%. The growth in affiliate and other revenues was primarily attributable to increases in affiliate fees at AMC and WE tv as well as an increase in other revenues due to increased digital distribution revenues.
The decline in AOCF reflected an increase in programming expense, including the $18 million charge previously noted, and marketing expense partially offset by the increase in revenues and a decrease in corporate expenses as compared to the prior year period. The operating income increase reflected the decline in AOCF offset by a reduction in amortization expense.
 
 
Full Year Results
National Networks revenues for full year 2011 increased 8.8% to $1.082 billion, AOCF rose 6.8% to $448 million, and operating income grew 11.8% to $349 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Growth in full year revenues was primarily led by a 12.5% increase in advertising revenues. The increase in advertising revenues was led by AMC and to a lesser extent increases at IFC and WE tv. Affiliate and other revenues increased 6.4%. The growth in affiliate and other revenues was primarily attributable to increases in affiliate fees at AMC as well as an increase in other revenues due to increased digital distribution revenues.
Growth in full year AOCF reflected the increase in revenues partially offset by an increase in operating expenses. The increase in operating expenses was primarily attributable to higher programming and marketing expenses partially offset by a decrease in corporate expenses as compared to the prior year period. The full year operating income increase reflected the growth in AOCF as well as a reduction in amortization expense.
International and Other
International and Other primarily consists of AMC/Sundance Channel Global, the Company's international programming business; IFC Films, the Company's independent film distribution business; AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, the Company's network technical services business; and VOOM HD.
Fourth Quarter Results
International and Other revenues for the fourth quarter of 2011 increased 14.5% to $39 million, AOCF improved to $7 million, and operating income improved $6 million to $3 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Growth in fourth quarter revenues reflected an increase in revenues at IFC Films as well as an increase in affiliate fee revenues related to the Company's international operations.
The improvement in fourth quarter AOCF resulted from the increase in revenues and a reduction in litigation expenses related to VOOM HD. Operating income improved as a result of the improvement in AOCF.
Full Year Results
International and Other revenues for full year 2011 increased 20.2% to $126 million, AOCF improved $10 million to a deficit of $5 million, and operating loss improved $8 million to a deficit of $22 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Growth in full year revenues reflected an increase in affiliate fee revenues related to the Company's international operations as well as an increase in revenues at IFC Films.
The improvement in full year AOCF resulted from the increase in revenues and a reduction in litigation expenses related to VOOM HD partially offset by increased programming and marketing expenses. Operating loss improved as a result of the improvement in AOCF partially offset by an increase in depreciation expense.
 
Other Matters
On March 8, 2012, the Company prepaid $50 million of the outstanding balance of the Term A Credit Facility. In addition, the Company prepaid $100 million of the outstanding balance of the Term A Credit Facility from July 1, 2011 through December 31, 2011. The 2011 prepaid amount consisted of two $50 million payments made on August 8, 2011 and October 11, 2011, respectively.
Description of Non-GAAP Measures
The Company defines Adjusted Operating Cash Flow ("AOCF"), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as operating income (loss) before depreciation and amortization, excluding share-based compensation expense or benefit and restructuring charges or credits. Because it is based upon operating income (loss), AOCF also excludes interest expense (including cash interest expense) and other non-operating income and expense items. The Company believes that the exclusion of share-based compensation expense or benefit allows investors to better track the performance of the various operating units of the business without regard to the distortive effects of fluctuating stock prices in the case of stock appreciation rights and, in the case of restricted shares and stock options, the settlement of an obligation that is not expected to be made in cash.
The Company presents AOCF as a measure of its ability to service its debt and make continuing investments. The Company believes that AOCF is an appropriate measure for evaluating the operating performance of the business segments and the Company on a consolidated basis. AOCF and similar measures with similar titles are common performance measures used by investors, analysts and peers to compare performance in the industry.
Internally, the Company uses net revenues and AOCF measures as the most important indicators of its business performance, and evaluates management's effectiveness with specific reference to these indicators. AOCF should be viewed as a supplement to and not a substitute for operating income (loss), net income (loss), cash flows from operating activities, and other measures of performance and/or liquidity presented in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP"). Since AOCF is not a measure of performance calculated in accordance with GAAP, this measure may not be comparable to similar measures with similar titles used by other companies. For a reconciliation of AOCF to operating income (loss), please see page 7 of this release.
The Company defines Free Cash Flow from Continuing Operations, ("Free Cash Flow"), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as net cash provided by operating activities (continuing operations) less capital expenditures (continuing operations), both of which are reported in our Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. Net cash provided by operating activities excludes net cash provided by operating activities of discontinued operations. The Company believes the most comparable GAAP financial measure of its liquidity is net cash provided by operating activities. The Company believes that Free Cash Flow is useful as an indicator of its overall liquidity, as the amount of Free Cash Flow generated in any period is representative of cash that is available for debt repayment, investment, and other discretionary and non-discretionary cash uses. The Company also believes that Free Cash Flow is one of several benchmarks used by analysts and investors who follow the industry for comparison of its liquidity with other companies in the industry, although the Company's measure of Free Cash Flow may not be directly comparable to similar measures reported by other companies. For a reconciliation of Free Cash Flow to net cash provided by operating activities, please see page 8 of this release.
Forward-Looking Statements
This earnings release may contain statements that constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management's current expectations and are subject to uncertainty and changes in circumstances.
 
Investors are cautioned that any such forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance or results and involve risks and uncertainties, and that actual results or developments may differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including financial community and rating agency perceptions of the Company and its business, operations, financial condition and the industries in which it operates and the factors described in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including the sections entitled "Risk Factors" and "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" contained therein. The Company disclaims any obligation to update any forward-looking statements contained herein.
Conference Call Information
AMC Networks will host a conference call today at 10:00 a.m. EST to discuss its full year and fourth quarter 2011 results. To listen to the call, visit http://www.amcnetworks.com or dial 1-877-347-9170, using the following passcode: 48964730.
About AMC Networks Inc.
AMC Networks owns and operates several of cable television's most recognized brands delivering high quality content to audiences and a valuable platform to distributors and advertisers. The Company manages its business through two reportable operating segments: (i) National Networks, which includes AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel; and (ii) International and Other, which includes AMC/Sundance Channel Global, our international programming business; IFC Films, the Company's independent film distribution business; and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, the Company's network technical services business. For more information on AMC Networks, please visit the Company's website at http://www.amcnetworks.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20120510090129.txt.gz
TIME:20120510090129
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 10, 2012, AMC Networks Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2012. A copy of the Registrant's press release is being furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety.
The information furnished pursuant to this Item 2.02, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities under that Section and shall not be deemed to be incorporated by reference into any filing of the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
First Quarter 2012 Highlights:
 
 
 
: AMC Networks Inc. ("AMC Networks" or the "Company") (NASDAQ: AMCX) today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2012.
New York, NY  May 10, 2012
President and Chief Executive Officer Josh Sapan said: "2012 got off to a strong start for AMC Networks, with double digit increases in net revenues, AOCF and operating income. Continued viewer enthusiasm for our programming resulted in ratings gains for our national networks, most notably AMC's , which ended its second season with nine million total viewers, an increase of 50% over last season's finale. The series reigns as the highest-rated scripted drama in basic cable history in advertiser's key demos. The fifth season of AMC's currently ranks as the most watched season ever of the series, outperforming the prior season by double-digits. These successes underscore the strength of our original programming strategy, which continues to drive audience and advertiser demand for our networks."
The Walking Dead
Mad Men
First quarter net revenues increased $53 million, or 19.5%, to $326 million over the first quarter of 2011, led by 20.8% growth at National Networks and a 3.8% increase in International and Other. Adjusted Operating Cash Flow ("AOCF")
1
totaled $126 million, an increase of 26.2% or $26 million versus the prior year period. The AOCF increase resulted from 25.4% growth at National Networks partially offset by a $1 million decline in AOCF at International and Other. Operating income was $97 million, an increase of 37.3% or $26 million versus the prior year period. The operating income increase resulted from 33.4% growth at National Networks partially offset by a $1 million increase in the operating loss at International and Other.
First quarter net income from continuing operations was $43 million ($0.60 per diluted share), compared with $30 million ($0.43 per diluted share) in the first quarter of 2011. The increase resulted from the growth in operating income partially offset by an increase in interest expense.
Net cash provided by operating activities was $77 million for the three months ended March 31, 2012, an increase of $29 million from the prior year period. The increase was the result of the improved operating performance and a reduction in working capital and income tax payments partially offset by an increase in cash interest payments. Free Cash Flow
1
for the three months ended March 31, 2012 was $74 million, an increase of $27 million from the prior year period. The results reflect the increase in net cash provided by operating activities partially offset by an increase in capital expenditures over the prior year period.
 
Segment Results
 
National Networks
National Networks consists of the Company's four nationally distributed programming networks, AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel.
National Networks revenues for the first quarter 2012 increased 20.8% to $304 million, AOCF rose 25.4% to $133 million, and operating income grew 33.4% to $109 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Growth in revenues was primarily led by a 29.7% increase in advertising revenues. The increase in advertising revenues was led by AMC. Affiliate and other revenues increased 15.0%. The growth in affiliate and other revenues was primarily attributable to increases in affiliate fees as well as an increase in other revenues due to increased international distribution revenues.
First quarter AOCF increased 25.4% to $133 million reflecting the increase in revenues partially offset by an increase in operating expenses. The increase in operating expenses was primarily attributable to higher programming and marketing expenses partially offset by a decrease in corporate expenses compared to the prior year period. The operating income increase reflected the growth in AOCF.
International and Other
International and Other primarily consists of AMC/Sundance Channel Global, the Company's international programming business; IFC Films, the Company's independent film distribution business; AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, the Company's network technical services business; and VOOM HD.
International and Other revenues for the first quarter of 2012 increased 3.8% to $26 million, AOCF declined $1 million to a deficit of $8 million, and operating loss increased $1 million to $13 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Growth in first quarter revenues reflected an increase in revenues at IFC Films and an increase in affiliate fee revenues related to the Company's international operations partially offset by a decline at Broadcasting & Technology.
First quarter AOCF reflected the increase in revenues and a reduction in litigation expenses related to VOOM HD offset by an increase in operating expenses related to the Company's international operations. Operating loss results reflected the AOCF performance.
 
Other Matters
As noted in the press release issued by the Company on May 4, 2012 and disclosed in our Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended March 31, 2012 filed today with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Dish Network, LLC has notified AMC Networks of its intention to terminate carriage of Sundance Channel effective May 20, 2012 and AMC, WE tv and IFC effective July 1, 2012. We believe that Dish Network's notification of termination of carriage of our national networks is directly related to the ongoing litigation between DISH Network and VOOM HD. The financial impact on us will depend on several factors, including the length of time our networks are not carried on DISH Network's platform, and may be material to our financial results.
As previously disclosed, the Company voluntarily prepaid $50 million of the outstanding balance of the Term A Credit Facility on March 8, 2012.
Description of Non-GAAP Measures
The Company defines Adjusted Operating Cash Flow ("AOCF"), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as operating income (loss) before depreciation and amortization, excluding share-based compensation expense or benefit and restructuring charges or credits. Because it is based upon operating income (loss), AOCF also excludes interest expense (including cash interest expense) and other non-operating income and expense items. The Company believes that the exclusion of share-based compensation expense or benefit allows investors to better track the performance of the various operating units of the business without regard to the distortive effects of fluctuating stock prices in the case of stock appreciation rights and, in the case of restricted shares, restricted share units and stock options, the settlement of an obligation that is not expected to be made in cash.
The Company believes that AOCF is an appropriate measure for evaluating the operating performance of the business segments and the Company on a consolidated basis. AOCF and similar measures with similar titles are common performance measures used by investors, analysts and peers to compare performance in the industry.
Internally, the Company uses net revenues and AOCF measures as the most important indicators of its business performance, and evaluates management's effectiveness with specific reference to these indicators. AOCF should be viewed as a supplement to and not a substitute for operating income (loss), net income (loss), and other measures of performance presented in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP"). Since AOCF is not a measure of performance calculated in accordance with GAAP, this measure may not be comparable to similar measures with similar titles used by other companies. For a reconciliation of AOCF to operating income (loss), please see page 6 of this release.
The Company defines Free Cash Flow from Continuing Operations, ("Free Cash Flow"), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as net cash provided by operating activities (continuing operations) less capital expenditures (continuing operations), both of which are reported in our Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. Net cash provided by operating activities excludes net cash provided by operating activities of discontinued operations. The Company believes the most comparable GAAP financial measure of its liquidity is net cash provided by operating activities. The Company believes that Free Cash Flow is useful as an indicator of its overall liquidity, as the amount of Free Cash Flow generated in any period is representative of cash that is available for debt repayment, investment, and other discretionary and non-discretionary cash uses. The Company also believes that Free Cash Flow is one of several benchmarks used by analysts and investors who follow the industry for comparison of its liquidity with other companies in the industry, although the Company's measure of Free Cash Flow may not be directly comparable to similar measures reported by other companies. For a reconciliation of Free Cash Flow to net cash provided by operating activities, please see page 7 of this release.
Forward-Looking Statements
This earnings release may contain statements that constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management's current expectations and are subject to uncertainty and changes in circumstances. Investors are cautioned that any such forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance or results and involve risks and uncertainties, and that actual results or developments may
 
differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including financial community and rating agency perceptions of the Company and its business, operations, financial condition and the industries in which it operates and the factors described in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including the sections entitled "Risk Factors" and "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" contained therein. The Company disclaims any obligation to update any forward-looking statements contained herein.
Conference Call Information
AMC Networks will host a conference call today at 10:00 a.m. ET to discuss its first quarter 2012 results. To listen to the call, visit http://www.amcnetworks.com or dial 1-877-347-9170, using the following passcode: 70929425.
About AMC Networks Inc.
AMC Networks owns and operates several of cable television's most recognized brands delivering high quality content to audiences and a valuable platform to distributors and advertisers. The Company manages its business through two reportable operating segments: (i) National Networks, which includes AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel; and (ii) International and Other, which includes AMC/Sundance Channel Global, our international programming business; IFC Films, the Company's independent film distribution business; and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, the Company's network technical services business. For more information on AMC Networks, please visit the Company's website at http://www.amcnetworks.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20120606163104.txt.gz
TIME:20120606163104
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(a) On June 5, 2012, AMC Networks Inc. (the "Company") held its 2012 Annual Meeting of Stockholders. In accordance with the Company's Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, the Class A stockholders have one vote per share and the Class B stockholders have ten votes per share. The proposals are described in detail in the Company's proxy statement for the 2012 Annual Meeting of Stockholders filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission on April 24, 2012.
(b) Stockholders voted on the matters set forth below. The final results for the votes regarding each proposal are set forth below.
 
 
The Company's Class B stockholders elected the following eight directors listed below to the Board of Directors, each for a one-year term. The votes regarding this proposal were as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: June 6, 2012
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20120809092525.txt.gz
TIME:20120809092525
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 9, 2012, AMC Networks Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2012. A copy of the Registrant's press release is being furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety.
The information furnished pursuant to this Item 2.02, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities under that Section and shall not be deemed to be incorporated by reference into any filing of the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act.
 
(d) Exhibits. The following Exhibit is furnished as part of this Report on Form 8-K:
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
:
Second Quarter 2012 Highlights
 
 
 
: AMC Networks Inc. ("AMC Networks" or the "Company") (NASDAQ: AMCX) today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2012.
New York, NY  August 9, 2012
President and Chief Executive Officer Josh Sapan said: "In the second quarter, AMC Networks delivered solid financial results with double-digit percentage increases in net revenues, AOCF and operating income. The results were driven by continued advertiser demand and renewals with distributors, most recently AT&T, with whom we reached a new, long-term agreement. Last month, the Company received 36 Emmy Award nominations, more than any other basic cable television group. This critical reception helps drive the growth of our business and our financial performance. As has been widely reported, DISH Network dropped our networks to gain leverage in an unrelated lawsuit. The trial is scheduled to begin September 18 in New York State Supreme Court."
Second quarter net revenues increased $36 million, or 12.2%, to $328 million over the second quarter of 2011, led by 14.4% growth at National Networks which more than offset a decline of $4 million in International and Other. Adjusted Operating Cash Flow ("AOCF")
1
totaled $127 million, an increase of 13.6% or $15 million versus the prior year period. The AOCF increase resulted from 16.0% growth at National Networks partially offset by a $5 million decline in AOCF at International and Other. Operating income was $98 million, an increase of 19.4% or $16 million versus the prior year period. The operating income increase resulted from 21.6% growth at National Networks partially offset by a $5 million increase in the operating loss at International and Other.
For the six months ended June 30, 2012, net revenues increased $89 million, or 15.7%, to $654 million, AOCF increased $41 million, or 19.5%, to $253 million, and operating income increased $42 million, or 27.7%, to $195 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Second quarter net income from continuing operations was $41 million ($0.57 per diluted share), compared with $27 million ($0.39 per diluted share) in the second quarter of 2011. The increase resulted from the growth in operating income and the absence of costs related to the redemption of debt in connection with the spin-off from Cablevision partially offset by an increase in interest expense.
Net income from continuing operations for the six months ended June 30, 2012 was $84 million ($1.17 per diluted share), compared with $57 million ($0.82 per diluted share) in the prior year period.
 
Net cash provided by operating activities was $166 million for the six months ended June 30, 2012, an increase of $46 million from the prior year period. The increase was primarily the result of the improved operating performance. Free Cash Flow
2
for the six months ended June 30, 2012 was $159 million, an increase of $44 million from the prior year period. The results reflect the increase in net cash provided by operating activities partially offset by an increase in capital expenditures over the prior year period.
Segment Results
 
National Networks
National Networks consists of the Company's four nationally distributed programming networks, AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel.
National Networks revenues for the second quarter 2012 increased 14.4% to $305 million, AOCF rose 16.0% to $136 million, and operating income grew 21.6% to $111 million, all compared to the prior year period.
National Networks revenues for the six months ended June 30, 2012 increased 17.5% to $609 million, AOCF rose 20.5% to $269 million, and operating income grew 27.2% to $221 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Second quarter growth in revenues was led by a 13.4% increase in advertising revenues to $130 million. The increase in advertising revenues was led by AMC. Affiliate and other revenues increased 15.2% to $176 million. The growth in affiliate and other revenues was primarily attributable to increases in affiliate fees as well as increased digital distribution, home video and international revenues from the licensing of our programming.
Second quarter AOCF increased 16.0% to $136 million reflecting the increase in revenues partially offset by an increase in operating expenses. The increase in operating expenses was primarily attributable to higher programming and marketing expenses partially offset by a decrease in corporate expenses compared to the prior year period. The operating income increase reflected the growth in AOCF as well as a reduction in amortization expense.
International and Other
International and Other primarily consists of AMC/Sundance Channel Global, the Company's international programming business; IFC Films, the Company's independent film distribution business; AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, the Company's network technical services business; and VOOM HD.
 
 
International and Other revenues for the second quarter of 2012 declined $4 million to $26 million, AOCF declined $5 million to a deficit of $9 million, and operating loss increased $5 million to $14 million, all compared to the prior year period.
International and Other revenues for the six months ended June 30, 2012 declined $3 million to $53 million, AOCF declined $6 million to a deficit of $18 million, and operating loss increased $6 million to $27 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Second quarter revenues reflected an increase in affiliate fee revenues related to the Company's international operations more than offset by a decline in revenues at IFC Films and Broadcasting & Technology.
Second quarter AOCF reflected the decrease in revenues and an increase in litigation expenses related to VOOM HD. Operating loss results reflected the AOCF performance.
Other Matters
On May 20, 2012, DISH Network, LLC ("DISH Network") terminated carriage of the Sundance Channel and on July 1, 2012 DISH Network terminated carriage of AMC, WE tv and IFC. We believe that DISH Network's termination of carriage is directly related to the ongoing litigation between DISH Network and VOOM HD. The financial impact on us will depend on several factors, including the length of time our networks are not carried on DISH Network's platform and if, when and on what terms DISH Network and the Company enter into new carriage agreements. The termination of DISH Network's carriage will have a material impact on our revenues, AOCF and operating income in future periods. Although DISH Network's termination has reduced the Company's total subscribers by approximately 13%, the impact on our AOCF and operating income, if it continues, will be materially higher.
Year-to-date, the Company has voluntarily prepaid $100 million of the outstanding balance of the Term A Credit Facility. The total prepaid amount consists of two $50 million payments made on March 8, 2012 and July 9, 2012, respectively.
Description of Non-GAAP Measures
The Company defines Adjusted Operating Cash Flow ("AOCF"), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as operating income (loss) before depreciation and amortization, share-based compensation expense or benefit and restructuring expenses or credits. Because it is based upon operating income (loss), AOCF also excludes interest expense (including cash interest expense) and other non-operating income and expense items. The Company believes that the exclusion of share-based compensation expense or benefit allows investors to better track the performance of the various operating units of the business without regard to the effect of the settlement of an obligation that is not expected to be made in cash.
The Company believes that AOCF is an appropriate measure for evaluating the operating performance of the business segments and the Company on a consolidated basis. AOCF and similar measures with similar titles are common performance measures used by investors, analysts and peers to compare performance in the industry.
Internally, the Company uses net revenues and AOCF measures as the most important indicators of its business performance, and evaluates management's effectiveness with specific reference to these indicators. AOCF should be viewed as a supplement to and not a substitute for operating income (loss), net income (loss), and other measures of performance presented in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP"). Since AOCF is not a measure of performance calculated in accordance with GAAP, this measure may not be comparable to similar measures with similar titles used by other companies. For a reconciliation of AOCF to operating income (loss), please see page 6 of this release.
 
The Company defines Free Cash Flow from Continuing Operations, ("Free Cash Flow"), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as net cash provided by operating activities (continuing operations) less capital expenditures (continuing operations), both of which are reported in our Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. Net cash provided by operating activities excludes net cash provided by operating activities of discontinued operations. The Company believes the most comparable GAAP financial measure of its liquidity is net cash provided by operating activities. The Company believes that Free Cash Flow is useful as an indicator of its overall liquidity, as the amount of Free Cash Flow generated in any period is representative of cash that is available for debt repayment, investment, and other discretionary and non-discretionary cash uses. The Company also believes that Free Cash Flow is one of several benchmarks used by analysts and investors who follow the industry for comparison of its liquidity with other companies in the industry, although the Company's measure of Free Cash Flow may not be directly comparable to similar measures reported by other companies. For a reconciliation of Free Cash Flow to net cash provided by operating activities, please see page 7 of this release.
Forward-Looking Statements
This earnings release may contain statements that constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management's current expectations and are subject to uncertainty and changes in circumstances. Investors are cautioned that any such forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance or results and involve risks and uncertainties, and that actual results or developments may differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including financial community and rating agency perceptions of the Company and its business, operations, financial condition and the industries in which it operates and the factors described in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including the sections entitled "Risk Factors" and "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" contained therein. The Company disclaims any obligation to update any forward-looking statements contained herein.
Conference Call Information
AMC Networks will host a conference call today at 10:00 a.m. ET to discuss its second quarter 2012 results. To listen to the call, visit http://www.amcnetworks.com or dial 1-877-347-9170, using the following passcode: 10964539.
About AMC Networks Inc.
AMC Networks owns and operates several of cable television's most recognized brands delivering high quality content to audiences and a valuable platform to distributors and advertisers. The Company manages its business through two reportable operating segments: (i) National Networks, which includes AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel; and (ii) International and Other, which includes AMC/Sundance Channel Global, our international programming business; IFC Films, the Company's independent film distribution business; and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, the Company's network technical services business. For more information on AMC Networks, please visit the Company's website at http://www.amcnetworks.com.
Contacts
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20121018164744.txt.gz
TIME:20121018164744
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This current report on Form 8-K (the "Amendment") amends a current report on Form 8-K, filed on June 6, 2012 (the "Original Filing"), in which AMC Networks Inc. (the "Company") reported voting results for its Annual Meeting of Stockholders held on June 5, 2012 (the "2012 Annual Meeting"), including the voting results for the Company's non-binding stockholder vote regarding the frequency of future say-on-pay votes advisory votes on executive compensation (the "Say on Pay Vote"). Except as set forth below, this Amendment does not modify or update any other disclosure contained in the Original Filing.
On October 3, 2012, the Company's Board of Directors approved holding future Say on Pay Votes every three years until the next advisory vote on the frequency of the Say on Pay Vote. This is consistent with the recommendation of the Board of Directors to its stockholders and the preference of the Company's Class A Stockholders and Class B Stockholders, voting together as a single class; as represented by their votes at the 2012 Annual Meeting.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: October 18, 2012
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20121022080147.txt.gz
TIME:20121022080147
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On October 21, 2012, VOOM HD Holdings LLC, f.k.a Rainbow HD Holdings LLC ("VOOM HD"), a subsidiary that is currently 80% owned by AMC Networks Inc. (the "Company"), and which, as described below, will become a 100% owned subsidiary of the Company as part of the settlement, and CSC Holdings, LLC, a wholly owned subsidiary of Cablevision Systems Corporation ("Cablevision") entered into a confidential settlement agreement and release (the "Settlement Agreement") with DISH Network L.L.C. f/k/a EchoStar Satellite L.L.C. ("DISH Network"), and for certain limited purposes, MSG Holdings, L.P., The Madison Square Garden Company and EchoStar Corporation, to settle litigation between VOOM HD and DISH Network involving various claims arising out of a joint venture between the parties.
The principal terms of the Settlement Agreement are as follows:
 
 
 
As previously disclosed in the Company's SEC filings, Cablevision and the Company entered into an agreement which provides that Cablevision, on the one hand, and the Company, on the other hand, will share equally in the proceeds (including in the value of any non-cash consideration) of any settlement of the litigation with DISH Network. Following the settlement, the allocation of the proceeds between Cablevision and the Company will be determined pursuant to the existing agreement between Cablevision and the Company relating to this litigation. The disclosure above updates the disclosure in the Company's report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended June 30, 2012, Note 7. Commitments and Contingencies.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: October 22, 2012

Exhibit 99.1
 
 Cablevision Systems Corporation (NYSE: CVC) and AMC Networks (NASDAQ: AMCX) today announced that they have settled their litigation with DISH Network LLC (NASDAQ: DISH) related to VOOM HD Holdings LLC. The lawsuit, VOOM HD Holdings LLC v. EchoStar Satellite LLC, was filed in the Supreme Court of the State of New York, County of New York.
BETHPAGE, N.Y., October 21, 2012
The settlement agreements include the following components:
 
 
 
Promptly after payment of the cash settlement is received, the parties will file a joint stipulation to dismiss the lawsuit with prejudice. The allocation of the settlement proceeds between Cablevision and AMC Networks will be determined pursuant to the existing agreement relating to this litigation between the two companies.
Said Josh Sapan, President and CEO, AMC Networks: "We are glad to partner again with DISH Network and are delighted to bring back our popular channels and programming to their customers."
About Cablevision
Cablevision Systems Corporation is one of the nation's leading media and telecommunications companies. In addition to delivering its Optimum-branded cable, Internet, and voice offerings throughout the New York area, the Company owns and operates cable systems serving homes in four Western states. Cablevision's local media properties include News 12 Networks, MSG Varsity and Newsday Media Group. Cablevision also owns and operates Clearview Cinemas. Additional information about Cablevision is available on the web at .
www.cablevision.com
About AMC Networks Inc.
Dedicated to producing and distributing quality programming and content for more than 30 years, AMC Networks Inc. owns and operates several of the most popular and award-winning brands in cable television. AMC, IFC, Sundance Channel, WE tv, and IFC Films deliver distinctive, compelling and culturally relevant content that engages audiences across multiple platforms. The company also operates AMC/Sundance Channel Global, an international programming business, and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, a full-service network programming feed origination and distribution company.
This press release may contain statements that constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Investors are cautioned that any such forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance or results and involve risks and uncertainties, and that actual results or developments may differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including financial community and rating agency perceptions of Cablevision and AMC Networks and their respective businesses, operations, financial condition and the industries in which each operates and the factors described in the respective companies' filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including the sections entitled "Risk Factors" and "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" contained therein. Cablevision and AMC Networks each disclaims any obligation to update any forward-looking statements contained herein.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20121108091704.txt.gz
TIME:20121108091704
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): November 8, 2012
 
AMC Networks Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
(212) 324-8500
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Item 2.02    Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 8, 2012, AMC Networks Inc. (the Registrant) issued a press release announcing its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2012. A copy of the Registrants press release is being furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety.
The information furnished pursuant to this Item 2.02, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities under that Section and shall not be deemed to be incorporated by reference into any filing of the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act.
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits. The following Exhibit is furnished as part of this Report on Form 8-K:
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
AMC NETWORKS INC. REPORTS
THIRD QUARTER 2012 RESULTS
Third Quarter 2012 Highlights
:
New York, NY  November 8, 2012
: AMC Networks Inc. (AMC Networks or the Company) (NASDAQ: AMCX) today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2012.
President and Chief Executive Officer Josh Sapan said: We've enjoyed a long relationship with DISH Network and are delighted to partner with them again in bringing our channels and programming to their subscribers. While the litigation and associated carriage dispute impacted our third quarter financials, that issue is behind us and we are fully focused on continuing our strategy of investing in quality original programming. We continue to see very healthy demand for our popular programming from advertisers and viewers alike. We're particularly proud of the stellar performance of AMC's
The Walking Dead
, which premiered last month to become the biggest show of the fall season among adults 18-49, outperforming broadcast and cable hits including
Modern Family
,
The Big Bang
Theory
, 
The Voice
and
Jersey Shore
.
Third quarter net revenues increased $48 million, or 17.0%, to $332 million over the third quarter of 2011, led by 18.5% growth at National Networks which more than offset a decline of $1 million in International and Other. Adjusted Operating Cash Flow (AOCF)
1
totaled $110 million, a decrease of 10.9% or $13 million versus the prior year period. AOCF reflected the impact of the litigation and associated carriage dispute with DISH Network. National Networks AOCF decreased $7 million and International and Other AOCF declined $8 million versus the prior year period. Operating income was $87 million, a decrease of 8.0% or $8 million versus the prior year period. The operating income decrease was the result of flat operating income at National Networks and a $9 million increase in the operating loss at International and Other.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2012, net revenues increased $137 million, or 16.2%, to $986 million, AOCF increased $28 million, or 8.4%, to $363 million, and operating income increased $35 million, or 14.1%, to $282 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Third quarter net income from continuing operations was $37 million ($0.51 per diluted share), compared with $40 million ($0.56 per diluted share) in the third quarter of 2011. The decrease resulted from the decline in operating income partially offset by a decrease in interest expense.
Net income from continuing operations for the nine months ended September 30, 2012 was $121 million ($1.68 per diluted share), compared with $97 million ($1.38 per diluted share) in the prior year period.
1.    See definition of Adjusted Operating Cash Flow (AOCF) included in the discussion of non-GAAP financial measures on page 3 of this earnings release.
1
Net cash provided by operating activities was $224 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2012, an
increase of $22
million from the prior year period. The increase was primarily the result of the
improved operating performance partially offset by an increase in cash interest payments. Free Cash Flow
2
for the nine months ended September 30, 2012 was $210 million, an increase of $15 million from the prior year period. The results reflect the increase in net cash provided by operating activities partially offset by an increase in capital expenditures over the prior year period.
Segment Results
National Networks
National Networks consists of the Companys four nationally distributed programming networks, AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel.
National Networks revenues for the third quarter 2012 increased 18.5% to $306 million, AOCF declined 5.5% to $116 million, and operating income was flat at $99 million, all compared to the prior year period.
National Networks revenues for the nine months ended September 30, 2012 increased 17.9% to $916 million, AOCF rose 11.2% to $385 million, and operating income grew 17.2% to $319 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Third quarter growth in revenues was led by a 24.3% increase in affiliate and other revenues to $199 million. The increase in affiliate and other revenues was primarily attributable to growth in digital and licensing distribution revenues partially offset by a decline in affiliate fees. Advertising revenues increased 9.1% to $107 million. The increase in advertising revenues was due to strong demand for our original programming, primarily at AMC.
Third quarter AOCF decreased 5.5% to $116 million reflecting the increase in revenues offset by an increase in operating expenses. The increase in operating expenses was primarily attributable to higher programming expense, including a write-off of $8 million, and marketing expenses compared to the prior year period. As previously noted, AOCF was negatively impacted by the carriage dispute with DISH Network. The operating income performance reflected the decline in AOCF offset by a reduction in amortization expense.
International and Other
International and Other primarily consists of AMC/Sundance Channel Global, the Companys international
programming business; IFC Films, the Companys independent film distribution business; AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, the Companys network technical services business; and VOOM HD.
International and Other revenues for the third quarter of 2012 declined $1 million to $29 million, AOCF declined $8 million to a deficit of $8 million, and operating loss increased $9 million to $13 million, all compared to the prior year period.
2.    See definition of Free Cash Flow included in the discussion of non-GAAP financial measures on page 3 of this earnings release.
2
International and Other revenues for the nine months ended September 30, 2012 declined $4 million to $82 million, AOCF declined $14 million to a deficit of $26 million, and operating loss increased $15 million to $40 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Third quarter revenues reflected an increase in affiliate fee revenues related to the Companys international operations more than offset by a decline in revenues at Broadcasting & Technology and IFC Films.
The decline in third quarter AOCF primarily reflected the decrease in revenues and an increase in litigation expenses related to VOOM HD. Operating loss results reflected the decline in AOCF as well as an increase in depreciation expense.
Other Matters
On May 20, 2012, DISH Network, LLC (DISH Network) terminated carriage of Sundance Channel and on July 1, 2012 DISH Network terminated carriage of AMC, WE tv and IFC. We believe the termination, as we have previously stated, was directly related to ongoing litigation between DISH Network and VOOM HD. The termination had a material impact to revenues, AOCF and operating income in the current period. On October 21, 2012, DISH Network and the Company entered into a settlement agreement resolving the litigation. Simultaneously with the execution of the settlement agreement, DISH Network entered into a long-term affiliation agreement with the Company to carry AMC, IFC, Sundance Channel and WE tv. Please see the Companys Form 8-K filing dated October 22, 2012 as well as the Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2012 for further details.
Year-to-date, the Company has voluntarily prepaid $150 million of the outstanding balance of the Term A Credit Facility. The total prepaid amount consists of three $50 million payments made on March 8, 2012, July 9, 2012 and November 7, 2012, respectively.
Description of Non-GAAP Measures
The Company defines Adjusted Operating Cash Flow (AOCF), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as operating income (loss) before depreciation and amortization, share-based compensation expense or benefit and restructuring expenses or credits. Because it is based upon operating income (loss), AOCF also excludes interest expense (including cash interest expense) and other non-operating income and expense items. The Company believes that the exclusion of share-based compensation expense or benefit allows investors to better track the performance of the various operating units of the business without regard to the effect of the settlement of an obligation that is not expected to be made in cash.
The Company believes that AOCF is an appropriate measure for evaluating the operating performance of the business segments and the Company on a consolidated basis. AOCF and similar measures with similar titles are common performance measures used by investors, analysts and peers to compare performance in the industry.
Internally, the Company uses net revenues and AOCF measures as the most important indicators of its business performance, and evaluates managements effectiveness with specific reference to these indicators. AOCF should be viewed as a supplement to and not a substitute for operating income (loss), net income (loss), and other measures of performance presented in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP"). Since AOCF is not a measure of performance calculated in accordance with GAAP, this measure may not be comparable to similar measures with similar titles used by other companies. For a reconciliation of AOCF to operating income (loss), please see page 6 of this release.
The Company defines Free Cash Flow from Continuing Operations, (Free Cash Flow), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as net cash provided by operating activities (continuing operations) less capital expenditures (continuing operations), both of which are reported in our Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. Net cash provided by operating activities excludes net cash provided by operating activities of discontinued operations. The Company believes the most comparable GAAP financial measure of its liquidity is net cash provided by operating activities. The Company believes that Free Cash Flow is useful as an indicator of its overall liquidity, as the amount of Free Cash Flow generated in any period is representative of cash that is available for debt repayment, investment, and other discretionary and non-discretionary cash uses. The Company also believes that Free Cash Flow is one of several benchmarks used by analysts and investors who follow the industry for comparison of its liquidity with other companies in the industry, although the Companys measure of Free Cash Flow may not be directly comparable to similar measures reported by other companies. For a reconciliation of Free Cash Flow to net cash provided by operating activities, please see page 7 of this release.
3
Forward-Looking Statements
This earnings release may contain statements that constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management's current expectations and are subject to uncertainty and changes in circumstances. Investors are cautioned that any such forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance or results and involve risks and uncertainties, and that actual results or developments may differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including financial community and rating agency perceptions of the Company and its business, operations, financial condition and the industries in which it operates and the factors described in the Companys filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including the sections entitled "Risk Factors" and "Managements Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" contained therein. The Company disclaims any obligation to update any forward-looking statements contained herein.
Conference Call Information
AMC Networks will host a conference call today at 10:00 a.m. ET to discuss its third quarter 2012 results. To listen to the call, visit http://www.amcnetworks.com or dial 1-877-347-9170, using the following passcode: 40002600.
About AMC Networks Inc.
AMC Networks owns and operates several of cable televisions most recognized brands delivering high quality content to audiences and a valuable platform to distributors and advertisers. The Company manages its business through two reportable operating segments: (i) National Networks, which includes AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel; and (ii) International and Other, which includes AMC/Sundance Channel Global, our international programming business; IFC Films, the Companys independent film distribution business; and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, the Companys network technical services business. For more information on AMC Networks, please visit the Companys website at http://www.amcnetworks.com.
Contacts
        
    
        
4
AMC NETWORKS INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
Three and Nine Months Ended September 30, 2012 and 2011
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
(Unaudited)
5
AMC NETWORKS INC.
SUPPLEMENTAL FINANCIAL DATA
(Dollars in thousands)
(Unaudited)
6
AMC NETWORKS INC.
SUPPLEMENTAL FINANCIAL DATA
(In thousands)
(Unaudited)
7


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20121214084424.txt.gz
TIME:20121214084424
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 10, 2012, AMC Networks Inc. ("AMC Networks") agreed to sell, and certain of AMC Networks' subsidiaries (hereinafter, the "Guarantors") agreed to guarantee, $600,000,000 aggregate principal amount of senior notes due December 15, 2022 (the "Notes") in a registered public offering pursuant to an Underwriting Agreement, dated December 10, 2012 (the "Underwriting Agreement"), among AMC Networks, the Guarantors, and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, as representative of the underwriters named in Schedule I thereto. AMC Networks intends to use the net proceeds of the offering to repay the entire outstanding amount under its term loan B facility in an amount equal to approximately $587.6 million, with the remaining proceeds of approximately $0.4 million to be used for general corporate purposes. The Notes were registered by AMC Networks under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-185361). A copy of the Underwriting Agreement is attached as Exhibit 1.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The Notes will be issued pursuant to an indenture, to be dated as of December 17, 2012, as amended by the First Supplemental Indenture, also to be dated as of December 17, 2012 (together, the "Indenture"), among AMC Networks, the Guarantors and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee.
The Notes will bear interest at a rate of 4.75% per annum and mature on December 15, 2022. Interest will be payable semiannually on June 15 and December 15 of each year, commencing on June 15, 2013. The Notes are AMC Networks' general senior unsecured obligations and will rank equally with all of AMC Networks' and the Guarantors' existing and future unsecured and unsubordinated indebtedness, but will be effectively subordinated to all of AMC Networks' and the guarantors' existing and future secured indebtedness, including all borrowings and guarantees under AMC Networks' senior secured credit facility, to the extent of the assets securing that indebtedness.
On or after December 15, 2017, AMC Networks may redeem Notes, at its option, in whole or in part, at any time and from time to time, at the redemption prices (expressed as percentages of principal amount) set forth below, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, to the applicable redemption date, if redeemed during the twelve month period beginning on December 15 of the years indicated below:
 
 
 
1.1 Underwriting Agreement, dated as of December 10, 2012, among AMC Networks, the Guarantors, and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, as representative of the underwriters named in Schedule I thereto.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: December 14, 2012

Exhibit 1.1
December 10, 2012
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated
One Bryant Park
New York, NY 10036
As Representative of the Underwriters Named in Schedule I
Ladies and Gentlemen:
AMC Networks Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), proposes to issue and sell to each of the Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto (collectively, "you" or the "Underwriters"), for whom Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated is acting as representative (in such capacity, the "Representative"), $600,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 4.75% Senior Notes due 2022 (the "Notes"). The payment of principal, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes will be fully and unconditionally guaranteed on a senior basis, jointly and severally, by the guarantors listed on Part A of Schedule III hereto (the "Guarantors"), pursuant to their guarantees (the "Guarantees"). The Notes and the Guarantees are herein collectively referred to as the "Securities". The Securities are to be sold to each Underwriter, acting severally and not jointly, in the respective principal amounts as are set forth in Schedule I opposite the name of the Underwriter. The Securities are to be issued pursuant to an indenture to be dated as of the Closing Date (as defined below), between the Company, the Guarantors and U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee (the "Trustee"), as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture thereto, to be dated as of the Closing Date (as so supplemented, the "Indenture"). The Securities and the Indenture are more fully described in the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus referred to below.
The Company has prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "1933 Act"), and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, a registration statement on Form S-3ASR (File No. 333- 185361), including a prospectus, relating to the Securities. Such registration statement, at the time it became effective, including the information deemed to be part thereof at the time of its effectiveness pursuant to Rule 430A, 430B or 430C under the 1933 Act ("Rule 430 Information"), is referred to herein as the "Registration Statement." The term "Preliminary Prospectus" means any prospectus filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the 1933 Act included in the Registration Statement at the time of its effectiveness that omits Rule 430 Information, and the term "Prospectus" means the prospectus in the form first used (or made available upon request of purchasers pursuant to Rule 173 under the 1933 Act) in connection with confirmation of sales of the Securities. Any reference in this Agreement to the Registration Statement, the Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to
 
and include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act, as of the effective date of the Registration Statement or the date of such Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus, as the case may be, and any reference to "amend," "amendment" or "supplement" with respect to the Registration Statement, the Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any documents filed after such date under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "1934 Act"), and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder that are deemed to be incorporated by reference therein. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings given to such terms in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus.
At or prior to the time when sales of the Securities were first made (the "Time of Sale"), the Company had prepared the following information (collectively, the "Time of Sale Information"): a Preliminary Prospectus dated December 10, 2012, and any "free-writing prospectus" (as defined pursuant to Rule 405 under the 1933 Act) listed on Annex B hereto as constituting part of the Time of Sale Information. "Time of Sale" means 4:02 p.m. (Eastern time) on the date of this Agreement.
Section 1. . (a) Each of the Company and the Guarantors, jointly and severally, hereby represents and warrants to the Underwriters that:
Representations and Warranties of the Company and the Guarantors
(i) The Registration Statement is an "automatic shelf registration statement" as defined under Rule 405 of the 1933 Act that has been filed with the Commission not earlier than three years prior to the date hereof; and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of such registration statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the 1933 Act has been received by the Company. No order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued by the Commission and no proceeding for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the 1933 Act against the Company or related to the offering has been initiated or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened by the Commission; as of the applicable effective date of the Registration Statement and any amendment thereto, the Registration Statement complied and will comply in all material respects with the 1933 Act and the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended (the "Trust Indenture Act"), and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, and did not and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading; and as of the date of the Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto and as of the Closing Date, the Prospectus will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that the Company and the Guarantors make no representation and warranty with respect to (i) that part of the Registration Statement that constitutes the Statement of Eligibility and Qualification (Form T-1) of the Trustee under the Trust Indenture Act or (ii) any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing by an Underwriter to the Company expressly for use in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto.
provided
 
(ii) No order preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus has been issued by the Commission, and each Preliminary Prospectus, at the time of filing thereof, complied in all material respects with the 1933 Act and did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that the Company and Guarantors make no representation and warranty with respect to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing by an Underwriter to the Company expressly for use in any Preliminary Prospectus.
provided
(iii) The Time of Sale Information, at the Time of Sale did not, and at the Closing Date will not, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that the Company and Guarantors make no representation and warranty with respect to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing by an Underwriter to the Company expressly for use in such Time of Sale Information.
provided
(iv) The Company (including its agents and representatives, other than the Underwriters and their agents and representatives) has not prepared, made, used, authorized or approved and will not prepare, make, use, authorize or approve any "written communication" (as defined in Rule 405 under the 1933 Act) that constitutes an offer to sell or solicitation of an offer to buy the Securities (each such communication by the Company or its agents and representatives (other than a communication referred to in clauses (i) (ii) and (iii) below) an "Issuer Free Writing Prospectus") other than (i) any document not constituting a prospectus pursuant to Section 2(a)(10)(a) of the 1933 Act or Rule 134 under the 1933 Act, (ii) the Preliminary Prospectus, (iii) the Prospectus, (iv) the document set out in Schedule II hereto as constituting part of the Time of Sale Information and (v) any electronic road show or other written communications, in each case approved by the Representative. Each such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus complied in all material respects with the 1933 Act, has been or will be (within the time period specified in Rule 433) filed in accordance with the 1933 Act (to the extent required thereby) and, when taken together with the Preliminary Prospectus accompanying, or delivered prior to delivery of, such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, did not, and at the Closing Date will not, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that the Company and Guarantors make no representation and warranty with respect to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing by an Underwriter to the Company expressly for use in any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus.
provided
(v) (i) At the time of filing the Registration Statement, (ii) at the time of the most recent amendment thereto, if any, for the purposes of complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the 1933 Act (whether such amendment was by post-effective amendment, incorporated report filed pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the 1934 Act or form of prospectus), (iii) at the time the Company or any person acting on its behalf (within the
 
meaning, for this clause only, of Rule 163(c) of the 1933 Act) made any offer relating to the Securities in reliance on the exemption of Rule 163 of the 1933 Act, and (iv) as of the Time of Sale, the Company was and is a "well known seasoned issuer" as defined in Rule 405 of the 1933 Act.
(vi) (i) At the time of filing the Registration Statement and (ii) as of the Time of Sale (with such date being used as the determination date for purposes of this clause (ii)), the Company was not and is not an Ineligible Issuer (as defined in Rule 405 of the 1933 Act).
(vii) The documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, when they were filed with the Commission conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the 1934 Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder.
(viii) The Company is subject to Section 13 or 15(d) of the 1934 Act.
(ix) KPMG LLP, who have reported upon certain audited financial statements and schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus are an independent registered public accounting firm with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries within the meaning of the 1933 Act and the rules and regulations adopted by the Commission and the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States).
(x) The consolidated historical financial statements included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus present fairly the consolidated financial position of the Company and its subsidiaries as of the dates indicated and the consolidated results of operations and changes in financial position of the Company and its subsidiaries for the periods specified. Such financial statements have been prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods involved. The selected financial data included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus present fairly the information shown therein and have been compiled on a basis consistent with that of the audited consolidated financial statements included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus. The interactive data in eXtensible Business Reporting Language included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus have been prepared, in all material respects, in accordance with the Commission's rules applicable thereto.
(xi) The Company is a corporation duly formed, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware with power and authority under such laws to own, lease and operate its properties and conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus; and the Company is duly qualified to transact business as a foreign corporation and is in good standing in each other jurisdiction in which it owns or leases property of a nature, or transacts business of a type, that would make such qualification necessary, except to the extent that the failure to so qualify or be in good standing would not have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise.
 
(xii) The subsidiaries of the Company set forth on Part A (Guarantors) of Schedule III hereto, Part B (Non-Guarantor Restricted Subsidiaries) of Schedule III hereto and Part C (Unrestricted Subsidiaries) of Schedule III hereto are, as of the Time of Sale and as of the Closing Date, all of the subsidiaries of the Company (collectively, the "Subsidiaries").
(xiii) Each Guarantor that is a corporation or limited liability company is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation or organization with power and authority (corporate and other) under such laws to own, lease and operate its properties and conduct its business; and each such Guarantor that is a corporation or limited liability company is duly qualified to transact business as a foreign corporation or limited liability company, as applicable, and is in good standing in each other jurisdiction in which it owns or leases property of a nature, or transacts business of a type, that would make such qualification necessary, except to the extent that the failure to be so qualified or in good standing would not have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise. All of the outstanding shares of capital stock or membership interests of each Guarantor that is a corporation or limited liability company have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and nonassessable and, except as disclosed or contemplated by the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, are owned by the Company, directly or through one or more Subsidiaries, free and clear of any pledge, lien, security interest, mortgage, charge, claim, equity or encumbrance of any kind other than the liens permitted to be granted pursuant to that certain credit agreement, dated as of June 30, 2011, by and among the Company, certain of its Subsidiaries, JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, the other agents party thereto and the lenders party thereto from time to time, as amended or modified.
(xiv) AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology is a general partnership duly formed and validly existing under the laws of the State of New York and has the requisite power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and conduct its business.
(xv) The Company had at September 30, 2012 a duly authorized and outstanding capitalization as set forth in the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus in the column labeled "As of September 30, 2012  Actual" under the caption "Capitalization"; the Securities conform in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus and such description conforms in all material respects to the rights set forth in the instruments defining the same.
(xvi) The Notes have been duly authorized by the Company, and when executed, authenticated, issued and delivered in the manner provided for in the Indenture and sold and paid for as provided herein, the Notes will constitute valid and binding obligations of the Company entitled to the benefits of the Indenture and enforceable
 
against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(xvii) The Guarantees have been duly authorized by each of the Guarantors, and when executed, authenticated, issued and delivered in the manner provided for in the Indenture and sold and paid for as provided herein, each Guarantee will constitute a valid and binding obligation of the respective Guarantor entitled to the benefits of the Indenture and enforceable against the respective Guarantor in accordance with its terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(xviii) All of the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non-assessable; and none of the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company was issued in violation of any preemptive rights of any stockholder of the Company.
(xix) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
(xx) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by each of the Guarantors.
(xxi) The Indenture has been duly authorized by each of the Company and the Guarantors, and, when duly executed and delivered by the Company, the Guarantors and the other parties thereto, will constitute a valid and binding obligation of the Company and each of the Guarantors, enforceable against the Company and each of the Guarantors in accordance with its terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law); and the Indenture will conform in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus.
(xxii) Since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, except as otherwise stated therein or contemplated thereby, there has not been (A) any material loss or interference with the Company's business from fire, explosion, flood or other calamity, whether or not covered by insurance, or from any labor dispute or court or governmental action, order or decree, (B) any change in the capital stock or other ownership interests or long-term debt of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any change which the Company has reasonable cause to believe will involve any material adverse change, or any development involving a prospective material adverse change, in or affecting the financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operations of the
 
Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise, (C) any transaction entered into by the Company or any Subsidiary, other than in the ordinary course of business, that is material to the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise, or (D) any dividend or distribution of any kind declared, paid or made by the Company on its capital stock.
(xxiii) Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is in default in the performance or observance of any obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other agreement or instrument to which it is a party or by which it may be bound or to which any of its properties may be subject, except for such defaults that would not have a material adverse effect on the financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise. The execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Indenture (collectively, the "Operative Documents"), the issuance and delivery of the Securities, the consummation by the Company and the Guarantors of the transactions contemplated by the Operative Documents and the compliance by the Company and the Guarantors with the terms of the Operative Documents have been duly authorized by all necessary action (limited liability company, corporate or other, as applicable) on the part of the Company and the Guarantors and do not and will not result in any violation of the charter or by-laws or similar organizational documents of the Company or any Subsidiary, and do not and will not conflict with, or result in a breach of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or any Subsidiary under, (A) any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party or by which any of them may be bound or to which any of their respective properties may be subject (except for such conflicts, breaches or defaults or liens, charges or encumbrances that would not have a material adverse effect on the financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise), (B) any existing applicable law, rule, regulation, judgment, order or decree of any government, governmental instrumentality or court, domestic or foreign, having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective properties (except for such conflicts, breaches or defaults or liens, charges or encumbrances that would not have a material adverse effect on the financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise) or (C) any material agreement or other material instrument (including any franchise agreement, license, permit or other governmental authorization granted by the Federal Communications Commission (hereinafter called the "FCC"), or any other governing body having jurisdiction over cable television operations) binding upon the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (except for such conflicts, breaches or defaults or liens, charges or encumbrances that would not have a material adverse effect on the financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise).
(xxiv) The statements in the Registration Statement, the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus under "Risk Factors" and "Description of Notes," insofar as such statements constitute a summary of the legal matters, documents or proceedings
 
referred to therein, with respect to such legal matters, documents and proceedings, do not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading.
(xxv) Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, no authorization, approval, consent or license of any government, governmental instrumentality or court, domestic or foreign, is required (i) for the valid authorization, issuance, sale and delivery of the Securities in the United States, or (ii) for the execution, delivery or performance by the Company and the Guarantors of this Agreement or the Indenture except for (A) such as have been obtained or made by the Company and are in full force and effect under the 1933 Act, (B) the qualification of the Indenture under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, (C) registrations under state securities or blue sky laws and (D) any such consent, approval, authorization, order or registration the failure of which to obtain or make or the absence of which would result in no material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise.
(xxvi) Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, there is no action, suit or proceeding before or by any government, governmental instrumentality or court, domestic or foreign, now pending or, to the best of the Company's knowledge, threatened against or affecting the Company or any Subsidiary that the Company has reasonable cause to believe will result in any material adverse change in the consolidated financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise, or that will materially and adversely affect the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise, or that the Company has reasonable cause to believe will materially adversely affect the consummation of the transactions contemplated in this Agreement.
(xxvii) The Company and the Subsidiaries each has good and marketable title to all material properties and assets described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus as owned by it, free and clear of all liens, charges, encumbrances or restrictions, except such as (A) are described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus or (B) are neither material in amount nor materially significant in relation to the business of the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise; and any material real property and buildings under lease by the Company and the Subsidiaries are held by them under valid, subsisting and enforceable leases with such exceptions as do not interfere, to an extent material to the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise, with the use made and proposed to be made of such property and buildings by the Company and the Subsidiaries.
(xxviii) Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, the Company and the Subsidiaries each owns, possesses or has obtained all material agreements, governmental licenses, permits, certificates, consents, orders, approvals and other material authorizations necessary to own or lease, as the case may be, and to operate its properties and to carry on its business as presently
 
conducted; and, except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has received any notice of proceedings relating to revocation or modification of any such licenses, permits, certificates, consents, orders, approvals or authorizations.
(xxix) To the best knowledge of the Company and except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, no labor problem exists with its employees or with employees of the Subsidiaries that could reasonably be expected to materially and adversely affect the financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise.
Any certificate signed by any officer of the Company or any Guarantor and delivered to you or to counsel for the Underwriters in connection with the offering of the Securities shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company to each Underwriter as to the matters covered thereby.
Section 2. . (a) On the basis of the representations and warranties herein contained, and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company agrees to sell to each Underwriter, and each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at the purchase price to be paid by the Underwriters of 98.25%, the principal amount of Securities set forth opposite its name on Schedule I, plus accrued interest, if any, from December 17, 2012 plus any additional principal amount of Securities which it may become obligated to purchase pursuant to Section 10 hereof.
Purchase, Sale and Resale of the Securities; Closing
(b) Payment of the purchase price for, and delivery of, the Securities shall be made at the offices of Shearman & Sterling LLP, 599 Lexington Avenue, New York, New York 10022, or at such other place in The City of New York, at 9 a.m. on December 17, 2012 or at such other time not more than ten full business days thereafter as shall be agreed upon by the Company and the Representative, or as shall otherwise be provided in Section 10 (such date and time of payment and delivery being herein called the "Closing Date"). Payment shall be made by wire transfer of same day federal funds to the Company to an account designated by the Company to the Representative, against delivery of the Securities to the Underwriters for the respective accounts of the several Underwriters. The Securities shall be in minimum denominations of $2,000 or any integral multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof and registered in such names as the Representative may request in writing at least two full business days before the Closing Date.
(c) The Company understands that the Underwriters intend to make a public offering of the Securities as soon after the effectiveness of this Agreement as in the judgment of the Representative is advisable, and initially to offer the Securities on the terms set forth in the Prospectus. The Company acknowledges and agrees that the Underwriters may offer and sell Securities to or through any affiliate of an Underwriter and that any such affiliate may offer and sell Securities purchased by it to or through any Underwriter.
(d) Each of you hereby severally represents, warrants and agrees that (i) you have complied and will comply with all applicable provisions of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000 ("FSMA"), with respect to anything done by you in relation to the Securities in, from or otherwise involving the United Kingdom, and (ii) you have only communicated or caused to be communicated and will only communicate or cause to be communicated any invitation or inducement to engage in investment activity (within the meaning of section 21 of the FSMA) in connection with the issue or sale of any Securities to persons who (x) have professional experience in matters relating to investments, (y) are persons falling within Article 49(2)(a) to (d) ("high net worth companies, unincorporated associations, etc.") of the FSMA (Financial Promotion) Order 2001 (as amended) or (z) are persons to whom the invitation or inducement may otherwise lawfully be issued or passed on.
 
Section 3. . Each of the Company and the Guarantors, jointly and severally, covenants with the Underwriters as follows:
Certain Covenants of the Company and the Guarantors
(a) The Company will file the final Prospectus with the Commission within the time periods specified by Rule 424(b) and Rule 430A, 430B or 430C under the 1933 Act, will file any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (including the Term Sheet in the form of Schedule II hereto) to the extent required by Rule 433 under the 1933 Act; and will timely file all reports and any definitive proxy or information statements required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the 1934 Act subsequent to the date of the Prospectus and for so long as the delivery of a prospectus is required in connection with the offering or sale of the Securities; and the Company will furnish copies of the Prospectus and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (to the extent not previously delivered) to the Underwriters in New York City prior to 5:00 P.M., New York City time, on the business day next succeeding the date of this Agreement in such quantities as the Representative may reasonably request in writing. The Company will pay the registration fees for this offering within the time period required by Rule 456(b)(1)(i) under the 1933 Act and in any event prior to the Closing Date.
(b) The Company will deliver, without charge, upon written request, to each Underwriter (A) a conformed copy of the Registration Statement as originally filed and each amendment thereto, in each case excluding all exhibits and consents filed therewith, and (B) during the Prospectus Delivery Period (as defined below), as many copies of the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus (including all amendments and supplements thereto and documents incorporated by reference therein) and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus as the Representative may reasonably request in writing. As used herein, the term "Prospectus Delivery Period" means such period of time after the first date of the public offering of the Securities as in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriters a prospectus relating to the Securities is required by law to be delivered (or required to be delivered but for Rule 172 under the 1933 Act) in connection with sales of the Securities by any Underwriter or dealer to purchasers who are not affiliates of any Underwriter; provided that the Prospectus Delivery Period shall end on the date that is 90 days after the date hereof.
(c) Before making, preparing, using, authorizing, approving or filing any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, and before filing any amendment or supplement to the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus (other than a report or
 
statement required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the 1934 Act), the Company will furnish to counsel for the Underwriters a copy of the proposed Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, amendment or supplement for review and will not make, prepare, use, authorize, approve or file any such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or file any such proposed amendment or supplement to which the Representative reasonably objects.
(d) The Company will advise the Representative promptly, and confirm such advice in writing, (i) when any amendment to the Registration Statement has been filed or becomes effective; (ii) when any supplement to the Prospectus or any amendment to the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus has been filed (other than a report or statement required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the 1934 Act); (iii) of any request by the Commission for any amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or the receipt of any comments from the Commission relating to the Registration Statement or any other request by the Commission for any additional information; (iv) of the issuance by the Commission of any order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or the initiation or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatening of any proceeding for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the 1933 Act; (v) of the occurrence of any event within the Prospectus Delivery Period as a result of which the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances existing when the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus or any such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus is delivered to a purchaser, not misleading; and (vi) of the receipt by the Company of any notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the 1933 Act; and (vii) of the receipt by the Company of any notice with respect to any suspension of the qualification of the Securities for offer and sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose; and the Company will use its commercially reasonable efforts to prevent the issuance of any such order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, preventing or suspending the use of the Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus or suspending any such qualification of the Securities and, if any such order is issued, will obtain as soon as practicable the withdrawal thereof.
(e) If at any time during the Prospectus Delivery Period, (i) any event shall occur or condition exist as a result of which it is necessary, in the opinion of counsel for you or counsel for the Company to amend or supplement the Prospectus (or the Time of Sale Information to the extent the Prospectus is not yet available) in order that the Prospectus (or the Time of Sale Information to the extent the Prospectus is not yet available) will not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading in the light of the circumstances existing at the time it is delivered to a purchaser or (ii) it is necessary to amend or supplement the Prospectus (or the Time of Sale Information to the extent the Prospectus is not yet available) to comply with law, the Company will promptly notify the Underwriters thereof and prepare and file with the Commission and furnish to the Underwriters such amendment or supplement such that the statements in the Prospectus (or the Time of Sale Information to the extent the Prospectus is not
 
yet available) as so amended or supplemented will not, in the light of the circumstances, be misleading or so that the Prospectus (or the Time of Sale Information to the extent the Prospectus is not yet available) will comply with law. Except as otherwise required by the preceding sentence, the Company will not be obligated to update the Prospectus or the Time of Sale Information. Such updating may be done by means of the filing of one or more documents under the 1934 Act that are incorporated by reference in the Prospectus or Time of Sale Information.
(f) The Company will make generally available to its security holders and the Representative as soon as practicable an earning statement that satisfies the provisions of Section 11(a) of the 1933 Act and Rule 158 of the Commission promulgated thereunder covering a period of at least twelve months beginning with the first fiscal quarter of the Company occurring after the "effective date" (as defined in Rule 158) of the Registration Statement.
(g) The Company and each of the Guarantors will use its reasonable best efforts, in cooperation with you, to qualify the Securities for distribution under the applicable securities laws of such states and other jurisdictions as you may designate, if any, and to maintain such qualifications in effect for a period of not less than one year from the date of the Prospectus; , , that neither the Company nor any Guarantor shall be obligated to file any general consent to service of process or to qualify as a foreign entity or as a dealer in securities in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified or to subject itself to taxation in respect of doing business in any jurisdiction in which it is not otherwise so subject. The Company and the Guarantors will file such statements and reports as may be required by the laws of each jurisdiction in which the Securities have been qualified as above provided.
provided
however
(h) Neither the Company nor any Guarantor will be or become, at any time prior to the expiration of three years after the Closing Date, an open-end investment trust, unit investment trust or face-amount certificate company that is or is required to be registered under Section 8 of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
(i) The Company will apply the net proceeds that it receives from the offer and sale of the Securities in the manner set forth in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus under the caption "Use of Proceeds".
 
Section 4. . The Company will pay and bear all costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations under this Agreement, including (a) the preparation, printing and filing of the Registration Statement (including financial statements and exhibits) as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, (b) the preparation, printing and filing of the Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, any Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto, and the cost of furnishing copies thereof to the Underwriters, (c) the preparation, printing and distribution of this Agreement, the Indenture and the Securities, (d) the delivery of the Securities to the Underwriters, (e) the reasonable fees and disbursements of the Company's counsel and accountants, (f) any fees charged by rating agencies for rating the Securities, (g) the reasonable fees and expenses of the Trustee, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Trustee and the Transfer Agent, in connection with the Indenture and the Securities and (h) the preparation, printing and distribution of any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus to investors or prospective investors.
Payment of Expenses
If this Agreement is terminated by you in accordance with the provisions of Section 5 or 9(a)(i) or by the Company in accordance with the provisions of Section 9(b), the Company shall reimburse the Underwriters for their reasonable out-of-pocket expenses, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters.
Section 5. . The obligations of the several Underwriters to purchase and pay for the Securities that they have respectively agreed to purchase hereunder are subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties of each of the Company and the Guarantors contained herein on the date hereof and on the Closing Date or in certificates of any officer of the Company or any Guarantor delivered pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company and the Guarantors of their obligations hereunder, and to the following further conditions:
Conditions of Underwriters' Obligations
(a) No order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall be in effect, and no proceeding for such purpose, pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) or pursuant to Section 8A under the 1933 Act shall be pending before or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened by the Commission; the Prospectus and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus shall have been timely filed with the Commission under the 1933 Act (in the case of a Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, to the extent required by Rule 433 under the 1933 Act); and all requests by the Commission for additional information relating to the Registration Statement shall have been complied with to the reasonable satisfaction of the Representative.
(b) On the Closing Date, you shall have received a signed opinion and letter of Sullivan & Cromwell LLP, counsel for the Company, dated as of the Closing Date, to the effect set forth on Exhibit A.
(c) On the Closing Date, you shall have received a signed opinion of James G. Gallagher, Executive Vice President and General Counsel for the Company, dated as of the Closing Date, to the effect set forth on Exhibit B.
 
(d) On the Closing Date, you shall have received a signed opinion of Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris, Glovsky and Popeo, P.C., as special communications counsel to the Company, dated as of the Closing Date, to the effect set forth on Exhibit C.
(e) On the Closing Date, you shall have received the favorable opinion of Shearman & Sterling LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, dated as of the Closing Date, to the effect that the opinions delivered pursuant to Sections 5(b), 5(c) and 5(d) appear on their face to be appropriately responsive to the requirements of this Agreement except, specifying the same, to the extent waived by you, and with respect to the incorporation and legal existence of the Company, the Securities, this Agreement, the Indenture, the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus, the documents incorporated by reference therein and such other related matters as you may require. In rendering such opinion, such counsel may state that they express no opinion as to the laws of any jurisdiction other than the Federal laws of the United States, the laws of the State of New York and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, and no opinion as to federal or state communications laws. Such counsel may also state that, insofar as such opinion involves factual matters, they have relied, to the extent they deem proper, upon certificates of officers of the Company and the Guarantors and certificates of public officials.
(f) On the Closing Date, (i) the Prospectus, as it may then be amended or supplemented, shall not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, (ii) there shall not have been, since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus, any material adverse change or any development involving a prospective material adverse change, in or affecting the financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise, (iii) the Company and each of the Guarantors shall have complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions set forth herein on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to the Closing Date and (iv) the other representations and warranties of each of the Company and the Guarantors set forth in Section 1(a) hereof shall be accurate as though expressly made at and as of the Closing Date. On the Closing Date, you shall have received a certificate of the Chief Executive Officer, President, a Vice Chairman or a Vice President, of the Company, dated as of the Closing Date, to such effect.
(g) You shall have received from KPMG LLP (i) at the time of execution of this Agreement, a letter dated the date hereof and in accordance with statement on Auditing Standards No. 72, as amended, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representative and (ii) on the Closing Date, a letter, dated as of the Closing Date, to the effect that KPMG LLP reaffirms the statements made in the letter furnished pursuant to Section 5(g)(i), except that the specified date referred to shall be a date not more than five business days prior to the Closing Date.
(h) On or after the date hereof, (i) no downgrading shall have occurred in the rating accorded the Company's debt securities by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization", as such term is defined in Section 3(a)(62) of the 1934 Act, and (ii) no such organization shall have publicly announced that it is placing under surveillance or review, with possible negative implications, its rating of any of the Company's debt securities.
(i) On the Closing Date, counsel for the Underwriters shall have been furnished with all such documents, certificates and opinions as they may reasonably request for the purpose of enabling them to pass upon the issuance and sale of the Securities contemplated in this Agreement and the matters referred to in Section 5(d) and in order to evidence the accuracy and completeness of any of the representations, warranties or statements of the Company and the Guarantors, the performance of any of the covenants of the Company and the Guarantors, or the fulfillment of any of the conditions herein contained.
 
If any of the conditions specified in this Section 5 shall not have been fulfilled when and as required by this Agreement to be fulfilled, this Agreement may be terminated by you on notice to the Company at any time at or prior to the Closing Date, and such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party. Notwithstanding any such termination, the provisions of Sections 4, 6, 7 and 8 shall remain in effect.
Section 6. . (a) Each of the Company and the Guarantors agrees, jointly and severally, to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter and each person, if any, who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act as follows:
Indemnification
(i) against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, arising out of (i) an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement or caused by any omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, not misleading, or (ii) an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any Time of Sale Information, or caused by any omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;
(ii) against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, to the extent of the aggregate amount paid in settlement of any litigation, or investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or of any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission, if such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company; and
(iii) against any and all expense whatsoever, as incurred (including reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel chosen by you), reasonably incurred in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission, to the extent that any such expense is not paid under subparagraph (i) or (ii) above;
, , that this indemnity agreement does not apply to any loss, liability, claim, damage or expense to the extent arising out of an untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue
provided
however
 
statement or omission made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter expressly for use in any portion of the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus.
(b) Each Underwriter severally agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Company, each of the Guarantors, their respective directors, officers and each person, if any, who controls the Company or any Guarantor within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act, against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense (including reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel chosen by the Company) described in the indemnity agreement in Section 6(a), as incurred, but only with respect to untrue statements or omissions, or alleged untrue statements or omissions, made in any portion of the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter expressly for use therein.
(c) Each indemnified party shall give prompt notice to each indemnifying party of any action commenced against it in respect of which indemnity may be sought hereunder, but failure to so notify an indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have otherwise than on account of this indemnity agreement. An indemnifying party may participate at its own expense in the defense of such action; , , that counsel to the indemnifying party shall not (except with the consent of the indemnified party) also be counsel to the indemnified party. In no event shall the indemnifying party or parties be liable for the fees and expenses of more than one counsel for all indemnified parties in connection with any one action or separate but similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances.
provided
however
Section 7. . In order to provide for just and equitable contribution in circumstances under which the indemnity provided for in Section 6 is for any reason held to be unenforceable by the indemnified parties although applicable in accordance with its terms, the Company, the Guarantors and the Underwriters shall contribute to the aggregate losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses of the nature contemplated by such indemnity incurred by the Company, the Guarantors and one or more of the Underwriters, as incurred, in such proportions that the Underwriters are responsible for that portion represented by the percentage that the underwriting discount hereunder with respect to the offering of the Securities bears to the offering price of the Securities, and the Company and the Guarantors are responsible for the balance; that the amount to be contributed by the Company and the Guarantors on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other shall be in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative fault of the Company and the Guarantors on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other in connection with the statements or omissions that resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations; , however, that no person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the 1933 Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The obligations of the Underwriters under this Section 7 shall be several in proportion to their respective purchase obligations hereunder and not joint. For purposes of this Section, each person, if any, who controls an Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act shall have the same rights to contribution as
Contribution
provided
provided further
 
such Underwriter, and each director or officer of the Company and of the Guarantors and each person, if any, who controls the Company and the Guarantors within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act shall have the same rights to contribution as the Company and the Guarantors.
Section 8. . The agreements and other statements of the Company, the Guarantors or their officers and of the Underwriters set forth in or made pursuant to this Agreement will remain operative and in full force and effect regardless of any investigation made by or on behalf of the Company, any Guarantor or any Underwriter or controlling person within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act and will survive delivery of and payment for the Securities.
Agreements to Survive Delivery
Section 9. . (a) You may terminate this Agreement, by notice to the Company, at any time at or prior to the Closing Date (i) if there has been, since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus, any material adverse change or any development involving a prospective material adverse change in or affecting the financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise, or (ii) if there has occurred any outbreak or escalation of hostilities or other calamity or crisis the effect of which on the financial markets of the United States is such as to make it, in your judgment, impracticable to market the Securities or enforce contracts for the sale of Securities, or (iii) if trading in any securities of the Company has been suspended by the Commission, the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority or the NASDAQ Stock Market LLC, or if trading generally on the New York Stock Exchange or in the over the counter market has been suspended, or minimum or maximum prices for trading have been fixed, or maximum ranges for prices for securities have been required, by such exchange or by order of the Commission, the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority or any other governmental authority or (iv) if a banking moratorium has been declared by either federal or New York authorities.
Termination of Agreement
(b) If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to this Section, such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party, except to the extent provided in Section 4. Notwithstanding any such termination, the provisions of Sections 6, 7 and 8 shall remain in effect.
Section 10. . If one or more of the Underwriters shall fail on the Closing Date to purchase the Securities that it or they are obligated to purchase pursuant to this Agreement (the "Defaulted Securities"), you shall have the right, within 24 hours thereafter, to make arrangements for one or more of the non-defaulting Underwriters, or any other Underwriters, to purchase all, but not less than all, of the Defaulted Securities in such amounts as may be agreed upon and upon the terms set forth in this Agreement; if, however, you have not completed such arrangements within such 24-hour period, then:
Default by One or More of the Underwriters
(a) if the aggregate principal amount of Defaulted Securities does not exceed 10% of the Securities to be purchased pursuant to this Agreement, the non-defaulting Underwriters shall be obligated to purchase the full amount thereof in the proportions that their respective purchase obligation proportions bear to the purchase obligations of all non-defaulting Underwriters, or
(b) if the aggregate principal amount of Defaulted Securities exceeds 10% of the Securities to be purchased pursuant to this Agreement, this Agreement shall terminate without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter.
 
No action taken pursuant to this Section shall relieve any defaulting Underwriter from liability in respect of its default.
In the event of any such default that does not result in a termination of this Agreement, either you or the Company shall have the right to postpone the Closing Date for a period not exceeding seven days in order to effect any required changes in the Prospectus or in any other documents or arrangements. As used herein, the term "Underwriter" includes any person substituted for an Underwriter under this Section 10.
Section 11. . All notices and other communications under this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if delivered, mailed or transmitted by any standard form of telecommunication. Notices to you shall be directed, on behalf of the Representative, to Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, One Bryant Park, New York, New York 10036, Fax: (917) 267-7085, Attention: Legal Department, with a copy to Shearman & Sterling LLP, 599 Lexington Avenue, New York, New York 10022, attention of Robert Evans III, Esq. (fax: (646) 848-8830); and notices to the Company shall be directed to it at AMC Networks Inc., 11 Penn Plaza, New York, New York 10001, attention of James G. Gallagher (fax: (646) 273-7392), with a copy to Sullivan & Cromwell LLP, 125 Broad Street, New York, New York 10004, attention of John P. Mead, Esq. (fax: (212) 558-3588).
Notices
Section 12. . Each of the Company and the Guarantors acknowledges and agrees that (a) the purchase and sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement, including the determination of the public offering price of the Securities and any related discounts and commissions, is an arm's-length commercial transaction between the Company and the Guarantors, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, (b) in connection with the offering contemplated hereby and the process leading to such transaction the Underwriters are and have been acting solely as principals and are not the agent or fiduciary of the Company or any Guarantor, or their respective stockholders, creditors, employees or any other party, (c) the Underwriters have not assumed or will not assume an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company or any Guarantor with respect to the offering contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether the Underwriters have advised or are currently advising the Company or the Guarantors on other matters) and the Underwriters do not have any obligation to the Company or any Guarantor with respect to the offering contemplated hereby except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement, (d) the Underwriters and their affiliates may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Company and the Guarantors, and (e) the Underwriters have not provided any legal, accounting, regulatory or tax advice with respect to the offering contemplated hereby and the Company and the Guarantors have consulted its own legal, accounting, regulatory and tax advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate.
No Advisory or Fiduciary Relationship
Section 13. . This Agreement is made solely for the benefit of the several Underwriters, the Company, the Guarantors and, to the extent expressed, any person controlling the Company or any of the Underwriters, and the directors and officers of the
Parties
 
Company, the Guarantors, and their respective executors, administrators, successors and assigns and, subject to the provisions of Section 10, no other person shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement. The term "successors and assigns" shall not include any purchaser, as such purchaser, from any of the several Underwriters of the Securities. All of the obligations of the Underwriters hereunder are several and not joint.
Section 14. . This Agreement and any claim, controversy or dispute arising under this Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of New York and subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of the State of New York in the United States of America. Specified times of the day refer to New York City time.
Governing Law and Time
Section 15. . The captions included in this Agreement are included solely for convenience of reference and are not considered to be part of this Agreement.
Captions
Section 16. . This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts and when a counterpart has been executed by each party, all such counterparts taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, please sign and return to us a counterpart hereof, whereupon this instrument will become a binding agreement among the Company, the Guarantors and the Underwriters in accordance with its terms.
 
CONFIRMED AND ACCEPTED,
as of the date first above written:
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated
For itself and as Representative of the other Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto
 
 
Free Writing Prospectus
Dated December 10, 2012
Filed Pursuant to Rule 433
Registration Statement Number 333-185361
 
 
 
It is expected that that delivery of the Notes will be made to investors on or about December 17, 2012, which will be the 5th business day following the date of pricing of the Notes (such settlement being referred to as "T+5"). Under Rule 15c6-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, trades in the secondary market are required to settle in three business days, unless the parties to any such trade expressly agree otherwise. Accordingly, purchasers who wish to trade Notes prior to December 17, 2012 will be required, by virtue of the fact that the Notes initially settle in T+5, to specify an alternate settlement arrangement at the time of any such trade to prevent a failed settlement. Purchasers of the Notes who wish to trade the Notes prior to their date of delivery hereunder should consult their advisors.
The issuer has filed a registration statement, including a prospectus and a preliminary prospectus supplement, with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus and the preliminary prospectus supplement in that registration statement and other documents the issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the issuer and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at www.sec.gov. Alternatively, the issuer, any underwriter or any dealer participating in the offering will arrange to send you the prospectus and the preliminary prospectus supplement (or, if available, the prospectus supplement) if you request it by calling Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated at 1-800-294-1322 (toll free).
 
 
 
December 17, 2012
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith
                     Incorporated,
       As representative of the Underwriters named in Schedule I
       to the Underwriting Agreement referred to below,
               c/o Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith
                                           Incorporated,
                     One Bryant Park,
                             New York, New York 10036.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with the several purchases today by you and the other Underwriters named in Schedule I to the Underwriting Agreement, dated December 10, 2012 (the "Underwriting Agreement"), among AMC Networks Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), the guarantors named therein (the "Guarantors" and each, a "Guarantor"), and you, as Representative of the several Underwriters named therein (the "Underwriters"), of $600,000,000 principal amount of the Company's 4.75% Senior Notes due 2022 (the "Notes"), guaranteed (such guarantees herein called the "Guarantees") by the Guarantors (as defined in the Indenture referred to below) and issued pursuant to the Indenture, dated as of December 17, 2012, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture thereto, dated as of December 17, 2012 (together, the "Indenture"), among the Company, the Guarantors and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee (the "Trustee"), we, as counsel for the Company, have examined such corporate records, certificates and other documents, and such questions of law, as we have considered necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this opinion. Upon the basis of such examination, it is our opinion that:
1. The Company has been duly incorporated and the Company and the subsidiaries of the Company listed on Annex A1 hereto (the "Delaware Guarantors") are each an existing corporation or limited liability company, as applicable, in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware.
2. The subsidiaries of the Company listed on Annex A2 hereto (the "New York Guarantors," and together with the Delaware Guarantors, the "Covered Guarantors") are each a general partnership or limited liability company, as applicable, in good standing under the laws of the State of New York.
3. The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and the Covered Guarantors and duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939; the Notes have been duly authorized, executed, authenticated, issued and delivered; and the Indenture and the Notes constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable in accordance with their terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
4. Each of the Guarantees has been duly authorized, executed, issued and delivered by the Covered Guarantor issuing such Guarantee under the Indenture and constitutes a valid and legally binding obligation of such Covered Guarantor enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
5. All regulatory consents, authorizations, approvals and filings required to be obtained or made by the Company under the Covered Laws for the issuance, sale and delivery of the Notes by the Company to the several Underwriters have been obtained or made.
6. All regulatory consents, authorizations, approvals and filings required to be obtained or made by the Guarantors under the Covered Laws for the issuance and delivery of the Guarantees by the Guarantors to the several Underwriters have been obtained or made.
7. The execution and delivery by the Company of the Indenture and the Underwriting Agreement, the issuance of the Notes by the Company in accordance with the Indenture and the sale of the Notes by the Underwriters pursuant to the Underwriting Agreement do not, and the performance by the Company of its obligations under the Indenture and the Underwriting Agreement will not, violate the Company's Certificate of Incorporation or by-laws, as in effect on the date hereof.
8. The execution and delivery by each Covered Guarantor of the Indenture and the Guarantee of such Covered Guarantor and the issuance of the Guarantee of each such Covered Guarantor pursuant to the Indenture do not, and the performance by each Covered Guarantor of its obligations under the Indenture and the Guarantee of such Covered Guarantor will not, violate the Certificate of Incorporation or by-laws; or the Limited Liability Company Agreement or Operating Agreement, if applicable, of such Covered Guarantor, in each case as in effect on the date hereof.
9. The Underwriting Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and the Covered Guarantors named on the execution page thereto.
10. Assuming the due authorization, execution and delivery by AMC Networks Broadcasting and Technology, a New York general partnership ("NBT"), of the Indenture and the Guarantee issued by NBT, each of the Indenture and the Guarantee issued by NBT constitutes a valid and legally binding obligation of NBT enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
In connection with our opinion set forth in paragraph (10), above, we have assumed that NBT has the requisite partnership power and authority to execute and deliver, and to perform its obligations under, each of the Indenture and the Guarantee issued by NBT.
We are expressing no opinion in paragraphs (3), (4), (7), (8) and (10) above, insofar as performance by the Company and the Guarantors of their respective obligations under the Notes, the Guarantees, the Indenture or the Underwriting Agreement is concerned, as to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditor's rights. Also, for purposes of the opinions in paragraphs (5) and (6) above, "Covered Laws" means the federal laws of the United States and the laws of the State of New York (including the published rules or regulations thereunder) that in our experience normally are applicable to general business corporations and transactions such as those contemplated by the Notes, the Guarantees, the Indenture or the Underwriting Agreement; , , that such term does not include Federal or state securities laws, other antifraud laws and fraudulent transfer laws, tax laws, the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, antitrust laws, Federal or state communications or telecommunications laws or any law that is applicable to the Company, the Guarantors, the Notes, the Guarantees, the Indenture, the Underwriting Agreement or the transactions contemplated thereby solely as part of a regulatory regime applicable to the Company, the Guarantors or their respective affiliates due to its or their status, business or assets.
provided
however
The foregoing opinion is limited to the Federal laws of the United States, the laws of the State of New York, and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware and the Limited Liability Company Act of the State of Delaware, and we are expressing no opinion as to the effect of the laws of any other jurisdiction nor with respect to any Federal or state laws relating to communications and telecommunications, including laws which regulate individuals, companies or businesses because such entities provide communications or telecommunications services, including the provision of cable television services or telephone services.
In rendering the foregoing opinion, we have relied as to certain matters upon information obtained from public officials, officers of the Company and the Guarantors and other sources believed by us to be responsible, and we have assumed that the Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Trustee, that the Notes and the Guarantees conform to the specimen thereof examined by us, that the Trustee's certificates of authentication of the Notes have been manually signed by one of the Trustee's authorized officers, and that the signatures on all documents examined by us are genuine, assumptions which we have not independently verified.
11 PENN TV, LLC
AMC FILM HOLDINGS LLC
AMC/SUNDANCE CHANNEL GLOBAL NETWORKS LLC
AMC TELEVISION PRODUCTIONS LLC
AMERICAN MOVIE CLASSICS IV HOLDING CORPORATION
CROSSED PENS DEVELOPMENT LLC
DIGITAL STORE LLC
FIVE MOONS PRODUCTIONS I LLC
HALT AND CATCH FIRE PRODUCTIONS I LLC
IFC ENTERTAINMENT HOLDINGS LLC
IFC ENTERTAINMENT LLC
IFC FILMS LLC
IFC IN THEATERS LLC
IFC PRODUCTIONS I L.L.C.
IFC THEATRES CONCESSIONS LLC
IFC THEATRES, LLC
IPTV LLC
LS VOD COMPANY LLC
LS VOD HOLDINGS LLC
MAKING WAVES STUDIO PRODUCTIONS LLC
PEACH PIT PROPERTIES LLC
PHILLY PRODUCTIONS LLC
RAINBOW FILM HOLDINGS LLC
RAINBOW MEDIA ENTERPRISES, INC.
RAINBOW MEDIA HOLDINGS LLC
RAINBOW NATIONAL SERVICES LLC
RAINBOW PROGRAMMING HOLDINGS LLC
RECTIFY PRODUCTIONS LLC
RECTIFY PRODUCTIONS II LLC
RED MONDAY PROGRAMMING LLC
RMH GE HOLDINGS I, INC.
RNC HOLDING CORPORATION
RNC II HOLDING CORPORATION
SELECTS VOD LLC
SLEUTH SECRETS PRODUCTIONS LLC
SPORTS ON DEMAND LLC
SUNDANCE CHANNEL ASIA LLC
SUNDANCE CHANNEL EUROPE LLC
SUNDANCE CHANNEL L.L.C.
SUNDANCE FILM HOLDINGS LLC
THE INDEPENDENT FILM CHANNEL LLC
TURN PRODUCTIONS I LLC
TWD PRODUCTIONS LLC
TWD PRODUCTIONS II LLC
TWD PRODUCTIONS III LLC
TWD PRODUCTIONS IV LLC
VOOM HD HOLDINGS LLC
WE TV ASIA LLC
WE: WOMEN'S ENTERTAINMENT LLC
WEDDING CENTRAL LLC
YEAH IPTV LLC
AMC NETWORK ENTERTAINMENT LLC
AMC NETWORKS BROADCASTING & TECHNOLOGY
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith
                     Incorporated,
    As Representative of the Several Underwriters,
        One Bryant Park,
             New York, New York 10036.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
I am Executive Vice President and General Counsel of AMC Networks Inc. (the "Company") and, in such capacity, have acted as counsel for the Company and its subsidiaries, and am familiar with the Underwriting Agreement dated December 10, 2012 (the "Underwriting Agreement"), among the Company, the guarantors named therein (the "Guarantors", and each, a "Guarantor"), and you, as Representative of the several Underwriters named therein (the "Underwriters"), in connection with the offer and sale of $600,000,000 principal amount of the Company's 4.75% Senior Notes due 2022 (the "Notes"), guaranteed (such guarantees herein called the "Guarantees") by the Guarantors and issued pursuant to the Indenture, dated as of December 17, 2012, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture thereto, dated as of December 17, 2012 (together, the "Indenture"), among the Company, the Guarantors and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee (the "Trustee"). Except as otherwise specified herein, terms defined in the Underwriting Agreement and used herein are used as defined therein.
In that connection, I have examined executed counterparts of the Underwriting Agreement and the Indenture. I have also examined the originals or certified, conformed or photographic copies of such other documents, records, agreements and certificates of the Company and its subsidiaries and have made such examinations of law as I have deemed necessary to enable me to render the opinions hereinafter set forth. As to questions of fact relating to the Company and its subsidiaries material to the opinions hereinafter set forth, I have relied upon certificates of officers of the Company or such subsidiaries, as the case may be, as well as certificates of public officials.
Based upon and subject to the foregoing, I am of the opinion that:
1. The Company is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware with corporate power and authority under such laws to own, lease and operate its properties and conduct its business as described in the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus.
2. The Company is duly qualified to transact business as a foreign corporation and is in good standing in each other jurisdiction in which it owns or leases property of a nature, or transacts business of a type, that would make such qualification necessary, except where the failure to be so qualified would not have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise.
3. Each Guarantor that is a corporation or a limited liability company is duly incorporated or organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation or organization, with corporate or other power and authority under such laws to own, lease and operate its properties and conduct its business. Each Guarantor that is a partnership is duly organized under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization.
4. All of the outstanding shares of capital stock or membership interests, as the case may be, of each Guarantor that is a corporation or limited liability company have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and nonassessable. Except as disclosed in or as contemplated by the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus, all of such shares and membership interests and all the outstanding partnership interests of each Guarantor that is a partnership are owned by the Company, directly or through one or more subsidiaries, free and clear of any material pledge, lien, security interest, charge, claim, equity or encumbrance of any kind, except for liens permitted under that certain credit agreement, dated as of June 30, 2011, by and among the Company, certain of its subsidiaries, JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, the other agents party thereto and the lenders party thereto from time to time, as amended or modified. No holder thereof is subject to personal liability under limited liability company agreement, certificate of incorporation or by-laws or other organizational documents of the respective Guarantor or the corporation law or equivalent law of the jurisdiction in which such Guarantor is organized by reason of being such a holder and none of such shares was issued in violation of the preemptive rights of any securityholders of such Guarantor under limited liability company agreement, certificate of incorporation or by-laws or other organizational documents of such Guarantor or the corporation law or equivalent law of the jurisdiction in which such Guarantor is organized.
5. To my knowledge, there are no legal or governmental proceedings pending or threatened to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is or may be a party, or of which any of their properties are or may be the subject, of a character which are required to be disclosed in the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus, other than those disclosed in the Time of Sale Information.
6. All regulatory consents, authorizations, approvals and filings required to be obtained or made by the Company under the Covered Laws for the issuance, sale and delivery of the Notes by the Company to the several Underwriters have been obtained or made.
7. All regulatory consents, authorizations, approvals and filings required to be obtained or made by the Guarantors under the Covered Laws for the issuance and delivery of the Guarantees by the Guarantors to the several Underwriters have been obtained or made.
8. I do not know of any contracts or documents of a character required to be described or referred to in the documents incorporated by reference in the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus or to be filed as exhibits to the documents incorporated by reference in the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus that are not described, referred to or filed as required.
9. To my knowledge, no default exists in the performance or observance of any material obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, loan agreement, note, lease or other agreement or instrument that is described or referred to in the Company's 2011 Form 10-K or any subsequent Exchange Act report or filed as an exhibit thereto, which default would have a material adverse effect on the financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise.
10. The execution and delivery of the Underwriting Agreement and the Indenture by the Company and the Guarantors and the issuance and delivery of the Securities, the consummation by the Company and the Guarantors of the transactions contemplated in the Underwriting Agreement and compliance by the Company and the Guarantors with the terms of the Underwriting Agreement and the Indenture will not conflict with the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default under, any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement or other agreement or instrument known to me to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or any Subsidiary is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any Subsidiary is subject, which conflict, breach, violation or default would have a material adverse effect on the financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, nor will such action result in any violation of the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation or By-Laws of the Company or any law known to me of any New York or Delaware governmental agency or body having jurisdiction over the Company or any Subsidiary or any of their properties, which violation in each case would have a material adverse effect on the financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole; and no consent, approval, authorization, order, registration or qualification of or with any such court or governmental agency or body is required for the issue and sale of the Securities or the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated by the Underwriting Agreement, except with respect to such consents, approvals, authorizations, registrations or qualifications as may be required under state or foreign securities laws in connection with the purchase and distribution of the Securities by the Underwriters, as to which I express no opinion.
For purposes of the opinions in paragraphs (6) and (7) above, "Covered Laws" means the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware and the Limited Liability Company Act of the State of Delaware.
I am a member of the bar of the State of New York and do not herein intend to express any opinions as to any matters governed by any laws of any jurisdiction other than the State of New York, the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware and the Limited Liability Company Act of the State of Delaware.
December 17, 2012
MERRILL LYNCH, PIERCE, FENNER & SMITH INCORPORATED
As Representatives of the Underwriters
One Bryant Park
New York, New York 10036
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with the several purchases today by you pursuant to the Underwriting Agreement dated December 10, 2012 (the "Underwriting Agreement"), among AMC Networks Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), each of the guarantors listed on Schedule III to the Underwriting Agreement (the "Guarantors") and you, as Representatives of each of the Underwriters named in Schedule I of the Underwriting Agreement (the "Underwriters") of $600,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 4.75% Senior Notes due 2022 (the "Notes"), we have served as special federal communications law counsel to the Company. Capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein are used with the meanings given to such terms in the Underwriting Agreement.
This opinion is strictly confined to matters involving the federal Communications Act of 1934, as amended (the "Communications Act"), the rules and regulations of the Federal Communications Commission ("FCC"), and those provisions of the federal copyright law that are principally directed to the regulation of cable properties. This opinion is limited to the state of the law as it exists under the Communications Act, the rules and regulations of the FCC, and federal copyright law as of the date hereof.
Based on and subject to the foregoing, it is our opinion that:
 
 
This opinion is being delivered solely for your use in connection with the transactions described in the Underwriting Agreement and may not be relied upon in any respect by any
person other than you or your counsel, Shearman & Sterling LLP, for any reason. We assume no obligation to advise you of any changes in the foregoing that may occur after the date hereof. This opinion may not be quoted, referred to, or relied upon in full or in part for any purpose other than for that which it is given, nor may it be filed with or furnished to any government agency or other person or entity without our prior written consent.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20121217164058.txt.gz
TIME:20121217164058
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 17, 2012, AMC Networks Inc. ("AMC Networks") issued, and certain of AMC Networks' subsidiaries (hereinafter, the "Guarantors") guaranteed, $600,000,000 aggregate principal amount of senior notes due December 15, 2022 (the "Notes") in a registered public offering pursuant to an Underwriting Agreement, dated December 10, 2012, among AMC Networks, the Guarantors, and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, as representative of the underwriters named in Schedule I thereto. AMC Networks used the net proceeds of this offering to repay the entire outstanding amount under its term loan B facility in an amount equal to approximately $588.0 million, with the remaining proceeds to be used for general corporate purposes. The Notes were registered by AMC Networks under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-185361).
The Notes were issued pursuant to an indenture, dated as of December 17, 2012, as amended by the First Supplemental Indenture, also dated as of December 17, 2012, among AMC Networks, the Guarantors and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee.
The Notes will bear interest at a rate of 4.75% per annum and mature on December 15, 2022. Interest will be payable semiannually on June 15 and December 15 of each year, commencing on June 15, 2013. The Notes are AMC Networks' general senior unsecured obligations and will rank equally with all of AMC Networks' and the Guarantors' existing and future unsecured and unsubordinated indebtedness, but will be effectively subordinated to all of AMC Networks' and the guarantors' existing and future secured indebtedness, including all borrowings and guarantees under AMC Networks' senior secured credit facility, to the extent of the assets securing that indebtedness.
On or after December 15, 2017, AMC Networks may redeem Notes, at its option, in whole or in part, at any time and from time to time, at the redemption prices (expressed as percentages of principal amount) set forth below, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, to the applicable redemption date, if redeemed during the twelve month period beginning on December 15 of the years indicated below:
 
A copy of the First Supplemental Indenture and the Form of Notes is attached as Exhibit 4.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: December 17, 2012

Exhibit 4.1
 
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE (this ""), dated as of December 17, 2012, among AMC NETWORKS INC., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the GUARANTORS (as defined in the Base Indenture referred to below) and U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as Trustee (the "").
First Supplemental Indenture
Company
Trustee
, the Company, the Guarantors and the Trustee have executed and delivered an Indenture, dated as of December 17, 2012 (the "," and together with the First Supplemental Indenture, the ""), to provide for the issuance by the Company from time to time of Notes to be issued in one or mores series as provided in the Indenture to be Guaranteed by the Guarantors;
WHEREAS
Base Indenture
Indenture
, Section 901 of the Base Indenture provides, among other things, that the Company and the Trustee may enter into indentures supplemental to the Base Indenture, without the consent of any holders of Notes, to establish the form of any Note, as permitted by Section 201 of the Base Indenture, and to provide for the issuance of the Notes (as defined below), as permitted by Section 301 of the Base Indenture, and to set forth the terms thereof;
WHEREAS
, the Company desires to execute this First Supplemental Indenture pursuant to Section 201 of the Base Indenture to establish the form, and pursuant to Section 301 of the Base Indenture to provide for the issuance, of a series of its senior notes designated as its 4.75% Senior Notes due 2022 ("") in an initial aggregate principal amount of $600,000,000. The Notes are a series of Securities as referred to in Section 301 of the Base Indenture;
WHEREAS
Notes
, each of the Guarantors desires to execute this First Supplemental Indenture with respect to its Note Guarantee of the Notes and to make a notation of its Guarantee on the Notes (the "");
WHEREAS
Notation of Guarantee
, the Company has delivered to the Trustee an Opinion of Counsel and an Officers' Certificate pursuant to Sections 103 and 903 of the Base Indenture to the effect that the execution and delivery of the First Supplemental Indenture is authorized or permitted under the Base Indenture and that all conditions precedent provided for in the Base Indenture to the execution and delivery of this First Supplemental Indenture and the issuance of the Notes to be complied with by the Company have been complied with;
WHEREAS
, the Company has requested that the Trustee execute and deliver this First Supplemental Indenture;
WHEREAS
, all things necessary have been done by the Company and the Guarantors to make this First Supplemental Indenture, when executed and delivered by the Company and the Guarantors, a valid and legally binding instrument;
WHEREAS
 
, all things necessary have been done by the Company to make the Notes, when executed by the Company and authenticated and delivered in accordance with the provisions of this Indenture, the valid obligations of the Company; and
WHEREAS
, all things necessary have been done by the Guarantors to make the Notation of Guarantee affixed upon the Notes, when executed by the Guarantors in accordance with the provisions of this Indenture, the valid obligation of the Guarantors;
WHEREAS
NOW, THEREFORE:
In consideration of the premises stated herein and the purchase of the Notes by the holders thereof, the Company, the Guarantors and the Trustee mutually covenant and agree for the equal and proportionate benefit of the respective Holders from time to time as follows:
Section 1.01. . Notwithstanding any other provision of this First Supplemental Indenture, all provisions of this First Supplemental Indenture are expressly and solely for the benefit of the Holders and any such provisions shall not be deemed to apply to any other Securities issued under the Base Indenture and shall not be deemed to amend, modify or supplement the Base Indenture for any purpose other than with respect to the Notes. Unless otherwise expressly specified, references in this First Supplemental Indenture to specific Article numbers or Section numbers refer to Articles and Sections contained in this First Supplemental Indenture as they amend or supplement the Base Indenture, and not the Base Indenture or any other document. All Initial Notes and Additional Notes, if any, will be treated as a single class for all purposes of this Indenture, including waivers, amendments, redemptions and offers to purchase.
Application of First Supplemental Indenture
Section 2.01. . For purposes of this First Supplemental Indenture, all capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings ascribed to such terms in the Base Indenture, as amended hereby.
Certain Terms Defined in the Indenture
Section 2.02. . For the benefit of the Holders, Section 101 of the Base Indenture shall be amended by adding the following new definitions:
Definitions
"" has the meaning specified in Section 3.02(b) hereto.
Additional Notes
"" has the meaning specified in the recitals hereto.
Base Indenture
"" has the meaning specified in Section 3.01(a) hereto.
Global Note
"" has the meaning specified in the recitals hereto.
Indenture
"" has the meaning specified in Section 3.02(b) hereto.
Initial Notes
 
"" has the meaning specified in the recitals hereto.
Notes
"" has the meaning specified in the first paragraph hereto.
Trustee
The definition of "Redemption Price" in Section 101 of the Base Indenture shall not apply to the Notes and, with respect to the Notes, "Redemption Price" has the meaning specified in Section 3.03(b) hereof.
Section 3.01. . The Notes and the Trustee's certificate of authentication thereon shall be substantially in the form of attached hereto. The Notes shall be executed on behalf of the Company by an officer of the Company pursuant to Section 303 of the Base Indenture. The Notes may have notations, legends or endorsements required by law, stock exchange rules or usage. Each Note shall be dated the date of its authentication. The Notes shall be in minimum denominations of $2,000 and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof.
Form and Dating
Exhibit A
The terms and notations contained in the Notes shall constitute, and are hereby expressly made, a part of the Indenture, and the Company and the Trustee, by their execution and delivery of this First Supplemental Indenture, expressly agree to such terms and provisions and to be bound thereby.
(a) . The Notes shall be issued initially in global form (each, a "" and collectively, the ""), which shall be deposited with the Trustee as custodian for the Depositary and registered in the name of Cede & Co., the Depositary's nominee, duly executed on behalf of the Company by an officer of the Company, and authenticated by the Trustee in accordance with Section 202 of the Base Indenture.
Global Notes
Global Note
Global Notes
(b) . This Section 3.01(b) shall apply only to the Global Notes deposited with the Trustee as custodian for the Depositary.
Book-Entry Provisions
The Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall, in accordance with Section 202 of the Base Indenture, authenticate and hold, each Global Note as custodian for the Depositary.
Section 304(c) of the Base Indenture is hereby amended and restated in its entirety as follows:
"(c) Transfers of Book-Entry Securities shall be limited to transfers in whole, but not in part, to the Depositary, its successors or their respective nominees. Interests of Beneficial Owners in Book-Entry Securities may be transferred or exchanged for definitive Securities only if (i) the Depositary advises the Company and the Trustee in writing that it is no longer willing, able or qualified to discharge properly its responsibilities with respect to such Book-Entry Security and the Company does not appoint another institution to act as Depositary within 60 days, (ii) the Company, at its option, elects to terminate the book-entry system by executing and delivering to the Trustee and the Depositary a notice to such effect, or (iii) there shall have occurred and be continuing a Default or Event of Default with respect to the Securities represented by such Book-Entry Security."
 
Section 3.02. . The following terms relating to the Notes are hereby established pursuant to Section 301 of the Base Indenture:
Terms of the Notes
(a) . The Notes shall constitute a series of Notes having the title "4.75% Senior Notes due 2022".
Title
(b) . The aggregate principal amount of the Notes (the "") that may be initially authenticated and delivered under the Indenture shall be $600,000,000. The Company may from time to time, without the consent of the Holders, issue additional Notes ("") having the same ranking and the same interest rate, Maturity and other terms as the Initial Notes (except for any difference in the issue price and the payment of interest accruing prior to the issue date of such Additional Notes, or, in some cases, the first Interest Payment Date following the issue of such Additional Notes), and with the same CUSIP number as the Initial Notes; that if any Additional Notes are not fungible with the Initial Notes for U.S. federal income tax purposes, such Additional Notes shall have a separate CUSIP number. Any Additional Notes and the Initial Notes shall constitute a single series under the Indenture and all references to the Notes shall include the Initial Notes and any Additional Notes, unless the context otherwise requires. The aggregate principal amount of the Additional Notes shall be unlimited. No Additional Notes may be issued if any Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
Principal Amount
Initial Notes
Additional Notes
provided
(c) . The entire Outstanding principal of the Notes shall be payable on December 15, 2022.
Maturity Date
(d) . The rate at which the Notes shall bear interest shall be 4.75% per annum. The date from which interest shall accrue on the Notes shall be December 17, 2012, or the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or provided for. The Interest Payment Dates for the Notes shall be June 15 and December 15 of each year, beginning June 15, 2013. The interest so payable, and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date, shall be paid, in immediately available funds, to the Persons in whose names the Notes are registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest, which shall be the June 1 or December 1, as the case may be, immediately preceding such Interest Payment Date.
Interest Rate
(e) . The Trustee shall be the initial Paying Agent and Security Registrar. Payment of the principal and interest shall be made at the corporate office of the Trustee in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York; , that each installment of interest and principal on the Notes may, at the Company's option, be paid by check to the Holders at the Holder's address in the Security Register. The Notes shall initially be issued as Global Notes. Payments with respect to Notes represented by one or more Global Notes shall be made by wire transfer of immediately available funds to the account specified by the Depositary. Payments with respect to Notes represented by one or more definitive Notes held by a holder of at least U.S.$1,000,000 aggregate principal amount of Notes shall be made by wire transfer to a U.S. dollar account maintained by the payee with a bank in the United States if
Payment
provided, however
 
such Holder elects payment by wire transfer by giving written notice to the Trustee or the Paying Agent to such effect designating such account no later than 10 days immediately preceding the relevant due date for payment (or such other date as the Trustee or Paying Agent may accept in its discretion).
(f) . The currency of denomination of the Notes is Dollars. Payment of principal of and interest and premium, if any, on the Notes shall be made in Dollars.
Currency
Section 3.03. .
Optional Redemption
(a) On or after December 15, 2017, the Company may redeem the Notes, at its option in whole or in part at any time and from time to time, at the redemption prices (expressed as percentages of principal amount) set forth below, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, to the applicable Redemption Date, if redeemed during the twelve month period beginning on December 15 of the years indicated below:
 
(b) Each redemption price provided for in this Section 3.03 shall be referred to herein as the "". Any redemption pursuant to this Section 3.03 shall be made pursuant to the provisions of Sections 1101 through 1108 of the Base Indenture.
Redemption Price
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Indenture, any redemption of the Notes by the Company may be conditioned upon the occurrence of one or more conditions precedent. Any notice of redemption pursuant to Section 1104 of the Base Indenture shall contain, in addition to those items set forth in such Section, a description of conditions precedent to such redemption, if any.
Section 3.04. . Section 308(b) of the Base Indenture shall not be applicable to the Notes. The Company may not reset the interest rate of the Notes.
No Optional Reset
Section 3.05. . Section 309 of the Base Indenture shall not be applicable to the Notes. The Company may not extend the Stated Maturity of the Notes.
No Optional Extension of Stated Maturity
Section 3.06. . Payment of the principal of and interest on the Notes shall be made in Dollars. All provisions of the Base Indenture applicable to Securities because such Securities are payable in a Foreign Currency shall not be applicable to the Notes. The provisions of the Base Indenture that shall not be applicable to the Notes as a result of this Section 3.06 shall include, but are not limited to Sections 313 and 314 of the Base Indenture.
Dollar Denominated
Section 3.07. . Article Thirteen of the Base Indenture shall not be applicable to the Notes. The retirement of the Notes shall not be made pursuant to a sinking fund.
No Sinking Fund
 
Section 3.08. . Article Fourteen of the Base Indenture shall not be applicable to the Notes.
No Repayment at Option of Holders
Section 3.09. . Article Fifteen of the Base Indenture shall not be applicable to the Notes. Notwithstanding Article Fifteen of the Base Indenture, the Company shall not be permitted at any time or in any circumstance to terminate its obligations with respect to the Notes through defeasance or covenant defeasance.
Non-Defeasance
Section 3.10. . The Notes shall not be Bearer Securities. All provisions of the Base Indenture applicable to Securities because of the status of such Securities as Bearer Securities shall not be applicable to the Notes.
Not Issued in Bearer Form
Section 4.01. . If and to the extent that any provision of this First Supplemental Indenture limits, qualifies or conflicts with the duties imposed by Trust Indenture Act Sections 310 to 318, inclusive, or conflicts with any provision (an "incorporated provision") required by or deemed to be included in this First Supplemental Indenture by operation of such Trust Indenture Act Sections, such imposed duties or incorporated provision shall control. If any provision of this First Supplemental Indenture modifies or excludes any provision of the Trust Indenture Act that may be so modified or excluded, the latter provision shall be deemed to apply to this First Supplemental Indenture as so modified or excluded, as the case may be.
Conflict with Trust Indenture Act
Section 4.02. .
New York Law to Govern
THIS FIRST SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE, THE NOTES AND THE NOTE GUARANTEES SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, WITHOUT REGARD TO CONFLICTS OF LAWS PRINCIPLES. THIS FIRST SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE IS SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THE TRUST INDENTURE ACT THAT ARE REQUIRED TO BE PART OF THIS FIRST SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE AND SHALL, TO THE EXTENT APPLICABLE, BE GOVERNED BY SUCH PROVISIONS.
EACH OF THE COMPANY, EACH GUARANTOR AND THE TRUSTEE HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS FIRST SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE, THE NOTES, THE NOTE GUARANTEES OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
Section 4.03. . This First Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument. The exchange of copies of this First Supplemental Indenture and of signature pages by facsimile or PDF
Counterparts
 
transmission shall constitute effective execution and delivery of this First Supplemental Indenture as to the parties hereto and may be used in lieu of the original First Supplemental Indenture for all purposes. Signatures of the parties hereto transmitted by facsimile or PDF shall be deemed to be their original signatures for all purposes.
Section 4.04. . In case any provision in this First Supplemental Indenture or in the Notes shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
Separability Clause
Section 4.05. . The Base Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this First Supplemental Indenture, is in all respects ratified and confirmed. The Indenture shall be read, taken and construed as one and the same instrument. All provisions included in this First Supplemental Indenture with respect to the Notes supersede any conflicting provisions included in the Base Indenture unless not permitted by law. The Trustee accepts the trusts created by the Indenture, and agrees to perform the same upon the terms and conditions of the Indenture.
Ratification
Section 4.06. . The provisions of this First Supplemental Indenture shall become effective as of the date hereof.
Effectiveness
Section 4.07. . The Trustee accepts the trusts created by the Indenture, and agrees to perform the same upon the terms and conditions of the Indenture. The Trustee shall not be responsible in any manner whatsoever for or in respect of the validity or sufficiency of this First Supplemental Indenture or the due execution thereof by the Company and the Guarantors. The recitals contained herein shall be taken as the statements solely of the Company and the Guarantors, and the Trustee assumes no responsibility for the correctness thereof.
The Trustee
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this First Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed as of the date first above written.
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT A
THIS SECURITY IS A GLOBAL SECURITY WITHIN THE MEANING OF THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO AND IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A DEPOSITORY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF. THIS SECURITY MAY NOT BE EXCHANGED IN WHOLE OR IN PART FOR A SECURITY REGISTERED, AND NO TRANSFER OF THIS SECURITY IN WHOLE OR IN PART MAY BE REGISTERED, IN THE NAME OF ANY PERSON OTHER THAN SUCH DEPOSITORY OR ITS NOMINEE EXCEPT IN THE LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES DESCRIBED IN THE INDENTURE.
UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY (55 WATER STREET, NEW YORK, NEW YORK 10041) TO THE ISSUER OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER, EXCHANGE OR PAYMENT AND SUCH CERTIFICATE ISSUED IN EXCHANGE FOR THIS CERTIFICATE IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO., OR SUCH OTHER NAME AS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL, SINCE THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN.
 
AMC Networks Inc., a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware (herein called the "Company", which term includes any successor Person under the Indenture hereinafter referred to), for value received, hereby promises to pay to                     or its registered assigns, the principal sum of [                    ] Million Dollars ($[        ]) [Include if a Global Note: , as revised by the "Schedule of Exchanges of Interests in the Global Note" attached hereto,] on December 15, 2022, and to pay interest thereon from December 17, 2012 or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, semi-annually on June 15 and December 15 in each year, commencing June 15, 2013, to the Persons in whose names the Notes are registered at the close of business on the immediately preceding June 1 or December 1, as the case may be, at the rate of 4.75% per
 
annum, until the principal hereof is paid or made available for payment, , that any principal and premium, if any, and any such installment of interest, which is overdue shall bear interest at the rate of 4.75% per annum (to the extent that the payment of such interest shall be legally enforceable), from the dates such amounts are due until they are paid or made available for payment, and such interest shall be payable on demand). The interest so payable, and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date will, as provided in the Indenture (as defined on the reverse hereof), be paid to the Person in whose name this Note (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest, which shall be the June 1 or December 1 (whether or not a Business Day), as the case may be, next preceding such Interest Payment Date. Any such interest not so punctually paid or duly provided for will forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on such Regular Record Date and may either be paid to the Person in whose name this Note (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest to be fixed by the Trustee, notice whereof shall be given to Holders of Notes of this series not less than 10 days prior to such Special Record Date, or be paid at any time in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Notes of this series may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, all as more fully provided in said Indenture.
provided
however
Payment of the principal of (and premium, if any) and any such interest on this Note will be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in The City of New York, New York, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts; , , that at the option of the Company payment of interest may be made by check mailed to the address of the Person entitled thereto as such address shall appear in the Security Register.
provided
however
Reference is hereby made to the further provisions of this Note set forth on the reverse hereof, which further provisions shall for all purposes have the same effect as if set forth at this place.
Unless the certificate of authentication hereon has been executed by the Trustee referred to on the reverse hereof by manual signature, this Note shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Indenture or be valid or obligatory for any purpose.
 
I W W, the Company has caused this instrument to be duly executed.
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 
 
 
This is one of the Notes of the series designated therein referred to in the within-mentioned Indenture.
Dated:
 
 
This Note is one of a duly authorized issue of securities of the Company (herein called the "Notes"), issued and to be issued in one or more series under an Indenture, dated as of December 17, 2012, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture dated as of December 17, 2012 (herein collectively called the "Indenture", which term shall have the meaning assigned to it in such instrument), among the Company, the Guarantors and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee (herein called the "Trustee", which term includes any successor trustee under the Indenture), and reference is hereby made to the Indenture for a statement of the respective rights, limitations of rights, duties and immunities thereunder of the Company, the Guarantors, the Trustee and the Holders and of the terms upon which the Notes are, and are to be, authenticated and delivered. This Note is one of the series designated on the face hereof initially limited in aggregate principal amount to $600,000,000; , , that the Company may from time to time, without the consent of the Holders, issue Additional Notes having the same ranking and the same interest rate, Maturity and other terms as the Initial Notes (except for any difference in the issue price and the payment of interest accruing prior to the issue date of such Additional Notes, or, in some cases, the first Interest Payment Date following the issue of such Additional Notes), and with the same CUSIP number as the Initial Notes; that if any Additional Notes are not fungible with the Initial Notes for U.S. federal income tax purposes, such Additional Notes shall have a separate CUSIP number. Any Additional Notes and the Initial Notes shall constitute a single series under the Indenture and all references to the Notes shall include the Initial Notes and any Additional Notes, unless the context otherwise requires. The aggregate principal amount of the Additional Notes shall be unlimited. No Additional Notes may be issued if any Event of Default has occurred and is continuing. To the extent any provision of this Note conflicts with the express provisions of the Indenture, the provisions of the Indenture shall govern and be controlling.
provided
however
provided
On or after December 15, 2017, the Company may redeem the Notes, at its option in whole or in part at any time and from time to time, at the redemption prices (expressed as percentages of principal amount) set forth below, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, to the applicable Redemption Date, if redeemed during the twelve month period beginning on December 15 of the years indicated below:
 
In the event of redemption of this Note in part only, a new Note or Notes of this series and of like tenor for the unredeemed portion hereof will be issued in the name of the Holder hereof upon the cancellation hereof.
This Note does not have the benefit of any sinking fund obligations.
 
If an Event of Default with respect to the Notes shall occur and be continuing, the principal of the Notes may be declared due and payable in the manner and with the effect provided in the Indenture.
The Indenture permits, with certain exceptions as therein provided, the amendment thereof and the modification of the rights and obligations of the Company, the Guarantors and the rights of the Holders of the Notes of each series to be affected under the Indenture at any time by the Company, the Guarantors and the Trustee with the consent of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Notes at the time Outstanding of each series to be affected. The Indenture also contains provisions permitting the Holders of specified percentages in principal amount of the Notes of each series at the time Outstanding, on behalf of the Holders of all Notes of such series, to waive compliance by the Company with certain provisions of the Indenture and certain past defaults under the Indenture and their consequences. Any such consent or waiver by the Holder of this Note shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders of this Note and of any Note issued upon the registration of transfer hereof or in exchange herefor or in lieu hereof, whether or not notation of such consent or waiver is made upon this Note.
As provided in and subject to the provisions of the Indenture, the Holder of this Note shall not have the right to institute any proceeding with respect to the Indenture or for the appointment of a receiver or trustee or for any other remedy thereunder, unless such Holder shall have previously given the Trustee written notice of a continuing Event of Default with respect to the Notes of this series, the Holders of not less than 25% in principal amount of the Notes of this series at the time Outstanding shall have made written request to the Trustee to institute proceedings in respect of such Event of Default as Trustee and offered the Trustee indemnity or security reasonably satisfactory to it, and the Trustee shall not have received from the Holders of a majority in principal amount of Notes of this series at the time Outstanding a direction inconsistent with such request, and shall have failed to institute any such proceeding, for 60 days after receipt of such notice, request and offer of indemnity. The foregoing shall not apply to any suit instituted by the Holder of this Note for the enforcement of any payment of principal hereof or any premium or interest hereon on or after the respective due dates expressed herein.
No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Note or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and any premium and interest on this Note at the times, place and rate, and in the coin or currency, herein prescribed.
As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, the transfer of this Note may be registered and this Note may be exchanged as provided in the Indenture.
The Notes of this series are issuable only in registered form without coupons in denominations of $2,000 and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof.
No service charge shall be made for any such registration of transfer or exchange, but the Company may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge payable in connection therewith.
 
Prior to due presentment of this Note for registration of transfer, the Company, the Guarantors, the Trustee and any agent of the Company, the Guarantors or the Trustee may treat the Person in whose name this Note is registered as the owner hereof for all purposes, whether or not this Note be overdue, and neither the Company, the Guarantors, the Trustee nor any such agent shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
This Note shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York, without regard to conflicts of laws principles.
All terms used in this Note which are defined in the Indenture shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Indenture.
 
To assign this Note, fill in the form below:
I or we assign and transfer this Note to:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and irrevocably appoint as agent to transfer this Note on the books of the Company. The agent may substitute another to act for him.
                    
 
 
Your Signature: ______________________________________________________________________________________________                                                                                                                                                                                                    
                             (Sign exactly as your name appears on the other side of this Note)
Your Name: _________________________________________________________________________________________________
Date:
 
                    
Signature Guarantee: 
                                                                                                                                                                                      *
 
 
The following exchanges of an interest in this Global Note for an interest in another Global Note or for a definitive Note, or exchanges of an interest in another Global Note or a definitive Note for an interest in this Global Note have been made:
 
 
For value received, each Guarantor (which term includes any successor Person under the Indenture (defined below)) has, jointly and severally, unconditionally guaranteed, to the extent set forth in and subject to the provisions in the Indenture dated as of December 17, 2012, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture dated as of December 17, 2012 (herein collectively called the "Indenture", which term shall have the meaning assigned to it in such instrument), among AMC Networks Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), the Guarantors and U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee (the "Trustee"), (a) the due and punctual payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes of this series (as defined in the Indenture), whether at maturity, by acceleration, redemption, or otherwise, and the due and punctual payment of interest on overdue principal, premium, if any, and interest on such Notes, if lawful (subject in all cases to any applicable grace periods provided in the Indenture and these Notes), and the due and punctual performance of all other obligations of the Company to the Holders or the Trustee all in accordance with the terms of the Indenture and the Notes and (b) in case of any extension of time of payment or renewal of any Notes or any of such other obligations, the same shall be promptly paid in full when due or performed in accordance with the terms of the extension or renewal, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise. Each Holder, by accepting the same, (a) agrees to and shall be bound by such provisions and (b) appoints the Trustee attorney-in-fact of such Holder for such purpose.
Each Guarantor, and by acceptance of Notes of this series, each Holder, hereby confirms that it is the intention of all such parties that the Note Guarantee of such Guarantor not constitute (i) a fraudulent transfer or conveyance for purposes of Bankruptcy Law, the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act, or any similar federal, state or foreign law to the extent applicable to its Note Guarantee or (ii) an unlawful distribution under any applicable state law prohibiting shareholder distributions by an insolvent subsidiary to the extent applicable to its Note Guarantee.
 
IN WITNESS HEREOF, each Guarantor has caused this Notation of Guarantee to be signed manually or by facsimile by its duly authorized officers.
 
 
AMC TELEVISION PRODUCTIONS LLC
 
MAKING WAVES STUDIO PRODUCTIONS LLC,
as Guarantors
 
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
AMC Networks Inc.,
11 Penn Plaza,
New York, New York 10001.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with the registration under the Securities Act of 1933 (the "Act") of (i) $600,000,000 aggregate principal amount of 4.75% Senior Notes due 2022 (the "Notes") of AMC Networks Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and (ii) the Guarantees (the "Guarantees" and together with the Notes, the "Securities") of the Notes by certain subsidiaries of the Company (the "Guarantors"), pursuant to the Indenture, dated as of December 17, 2012, as amended by the First Supplemental Indenture, also dated as of December 17, 2012 (together, the "Indenture"), between the Company, the Guarantors and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee (the "Trustee"), we, as your counsel, have examined such corporate records, certificates and other documents, and such questions of law, as we have considered necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this opinion.
Upon the basis of such examination, we advise you that, in our opinion, the Notes constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company and the Guarantees constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Guarantors, in each case enforceable in accordance with their respective terms subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
As contemplated by the qualifications set forth above, in rendering the foregoing opinion, we are expressing no opinion as to Federal or state laws relating to fraudulent transfers.
The foregoing opinion is limited to the Federal laws of the United States and the laws of the State of New York, and we are expressing no opinion as to the effect
 
of the laws of any other jurisdiction nor with respect to any Federal or state laws relating to communications and telecommunications, including laws which regulate individuals, companies or businesses because such entities provide communications or telecommunications services, including the provision of cable television services or telephone services.
We have relied as to certain factual matters on information obtained from public officials, officers of the Company and the Guarantors and other sources believed by us to be responsible, and we have assumed that the Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Trustee, that the Notes conform to the specimen thereof examined by us, that the Trustee's certificate of authentication of the Notes has been manually signed by one of the Trustee's authorized officers, and the signatures on all documents examined by us are genuine, assumptions which we have not independently verified.
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K filed by the Company for purposes of incorporating this opinion into the registration statement relating to the Securities and to the references to us under the heading "Validity of the Notes and Guarantees" in the prospectus supplement relating to the Securities. In giving such consent, we do not thereby admit that we are in the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Act.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20130226092122.txt.gz
TIME:20130226092122
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
February 26, 2013
 
AMC Networks Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
(212) 324-8500
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Item 2.02    Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On
February 26, 2013
, AMC Networks Inc. (the Registrant) issued a press release announcing its financial results for the quarter and year ended
December 31, 2012
. A copy of the Registrants press release is being furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety.
The information furnished pursuant to this Item 2.02, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities under that Section and shall not be deemed to be incorporated by reference into any filing of the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act.
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits. The following Exhibit is furnished as part of this Report on Form 8-K:
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
AMC NETWORKS INC. REPORTS FULL
YEAR AND FOURTH QUARTER 2012 RESULTS
Full Year 2012 Highlights
:
New York, NY - February 26, 2013
: AMC Networks Inc. (AMC Networks or the Company) (NASDAQ: AMCX) today reported financial results for the full year and fourth quarter ended December 31, 2012.
President and Chief Executive Officer Josh Sapan said: "2012 was a successful year for AMC Networks. Our continued strategy of investing in original programming while developing strong brands with consumers resulted in record ratings, most notably for AMC's ratings juggernaut 'The Walking Dead.' We resolved our legal dispute with DISH Network, completed new carriage agreements with a number of leading distributors, and expanded our relationships with key advertisers. All of which, contributed to strong financial results for the full year and gives us confidence that we are well-positioned for continued success in the year ahead.
Fourth Quarter Results
Fourth quarter net revenues increased $28 million, or 8.2%, to $367 million over the fourth quarter of 2011, led by 10.8% growth at National Networks which more than offset a decline of $7 million at International and Other. Adjusted Operating Cash Flow (AOCF)
1
totaled $103 million, a decrease of 4.0% or $4 million versus the prior year period. As discussed in the Other Matters section of this release, AOCF reflected the impact of the litigation and associated temporary carriage termination with DISH Network. National Networks AOCF increased 5.6% and International and Other AOCF declined $11 million versus the prior year period. Operating income was $81 million, an increase of 2.0% or $2 million versus the prior year period. The operating income increase resulted from 15.5% growth at National Networks
partially
offset by a $12 million decrease in operating income at International and Other.
Fourth quarter net income from continuing operations was $15 million ($0.21 per diluted share), compared with $29 million ($0.40 per diluted share) in the fourth quarter of 2011. The decrease resulted from costs related to the repayment of the term loan B facility partially offset by growth in operating income.
Full Year Results
Full year 2012 net revenues increased $165 million, or 13.9%, to $1.353 billion over full year 2011, reflecting 15.9% growth at National Networks partially offset by a decrease of 8.8% at International and Other. AOCF totaled $465 million, an increase of 5.4% or $24 million versus the prior year period. AOCF reflected the impact of the litigation and associated temporary carriage termination with DISH Network. The AOCF increase resulted from 10.0% growth at National Networks partially offset by a decrease of $25 million at International and Other. Operating income was $363 million, an increase of 11.1% or $36 million versus the prior year period. The operating income increase resulted from 16.8% growth at National Networks partially offset by an increase of $27 million in operating loss at International and Other.
Full year 2012 net income from continuing operations was $136 million ($1.89 per diluted share), compared with $126 million ($1.79 per diluted share) in full year 2011. The increase resulted from the growth in operating income partially offset by an increase in interest expense.
1.    See definition of Adjusted Operating Cash Flow (AOCF) included in the discussion of non-GAAP financial measures on page 5 of this earnings release.
1
For the full year 2012, net cash provided by operating activities was $569 million and Free Cash Flow
2
was $551 million. These amounts include a preliminary disbursement of $350 million related to the VOOM HD lawsuit settlement. As discussed in the Other Matters section of this release, the $350 million disbursement is subject to the final resolution of the allocation of the proceeds from the VOOM HD lawsuit settlement. Excluding the $350 million related to the VOOM HD lawsuit settlement, net cash provided by operating activities was $219 million and Free Cash Flow was $201 million for the full year 2012. These amounts represent a decrease of $36 million and $39 million, respectively, compared to the full year 2011. Excluding the $350 million related to the VOOM HD lawsuit settlement, the $39 million decrease in free cash flow was primarily the result of an increase in cash interest, cash income taxes and capital expenditures partially offset by improved operating performance.
Segment Results
National Networks
National Networks consists of the Company's four nationally distributed programming networks, AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel.
Fourth Quarter Results
National Networks revenues for the fourth quarter 2012 increased 10.8% to $339 million, AOCF rose 5.6% to $107 million, and operating income grew 15.5% to $89 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Fourth quarter growth in revenues was led by a 16.0% increase in advertising revenues to $157 million. The increase in advertising revenues was due to strong demand for our original programming, primarily at AMC. Distribution and other revenues increased 6.8% to $182 million. The increase in distribution and other revenues was attributable to growth in affiliate fees partially offset by a decline in digital distribution revenues.
2.    See definition of Free Cash Flow included in the discussion of non-GAAP financial measures on page 5 of this earnings release.
2
Fourth quarter AOCF increased 5.6% to $107 million reflecting the increase in revenues offset by an increase in operating expenses. The increase in operating expenses was primarily attributable to higher programming and marketing expenses compared to the prior year period. As previously noted, AOCF was negatively impacted by the DISH Network temporary carriage termination. The operating income increase reflected the growth in AOCF and a reduction in amortization expense.
Full Year Results
National Networks revenues for the full year 2012 increased 15.9% to $1.254 billion, AOCF rose 10.0% to $492 million, and operating income grew 16.8% to $408 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Full year growth in revenues was led by a 16.9% increase in advertising revenues to $523 million. The increase in advertising revenues was led by AMC. Distribution and other revenues increased 15.2% to $731 million. The increase in distribution and other revenues was attributable to growth in digital and licensing distribution revenues as well as increases in affiliate fees.
Full year AOCF increased 10.0% to $492 million reflecting the increase in revenues offset by an increase in operating expenses. The increase in operating expenses was primarily attributable to higher programming and marketing expenses compared to the prior year period. As previously noted, AOCF was negatively impacted by the DISH Network temporary carriage termination. The operating income increase reflected the growth in AOCF and a reduction in amortization expense.
International and Other
International and Other primarily consists of AMC/Sundance Channel Global, the Company's international
programming business; IFC Films, the Company's independent film distribution business; AMC Networks
Broadcasting & Technology, the Company's network technical services business; and VOOM HD.
Fourth Quarter Results
International and Other revenues for the fourth quarter of 2012 declined $7 million to $33 million, AOCF
declined $11 million to a deficit of $4 million, and operating income decreased $12 million to a loss of $9 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Fourth quarter revenues reflected an increase in affiliate fee revenues related to the Company's international operations which was more than offset by a decline in revenues at IFC Films and Broadcasting & Technology.
The decline in fourth quarter AOCF primarily reflected the decrease in revenues and an increase in litigation expenses related to VOOM HD. Operating loss results reflected the decline in AOCF as well as an increase in depreciation expense.
Full Year Results
International and Other revenues for the full year 2012 declined $11 million to $115 million, AOCF declined $25 million to a deficit of $30 million, and operating loss increased $27 million to $49 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Full year revenues reflected an increase in affiliate fee revenues related to the Company's international operations which was more than offset by a decline in revenues at IFC Films and Broadcasting & Technology.
The decline in full year 2012 AOCF primarily reflected the decrease in revenues and an increase in litigation expenses related to VOOM HD. Operating loss results reflected the decline in AOCF as well as an increase in depreciation expense.
3
Other Matters
DISH Network
As previously disclosed, on May 20, 2012, DISH Network, LLC (DISH Network) terminated carriage of Sundance Channel and on July 1, 2012 DISH Network terminated carriage of AMC, IFC, and WE tv. We believe the termination was directly related to litigation between DISH Network and VOOM HD. On October 21, 2012, DISH Network and the Company entered into a settlement agreement resolving the litigation. Simultaneously with the execution of the settlement agreement, DISH Network entered into a long-term affiliation agreement with the Company that provided for the resumption of carriage of AMC, IFC, Sundance Channel and WE tv by no later than November 1, 2012. The temporary carriage termination had a material impact to AOCF and operating income for the three months and twelve months ended December 31, 2012.
Based on the Company's fair value assessment of the affiliation agreement, the affiliate fees payable by DISH Network to the Company from the effective date of the affiliation agreement of October 21, 2012 through December 31, 2013 are below fair value by approximately $31 million and the affiliate fees payable by DISH Network over the remaining terms of the affiliation agreement represent fair value. As a result, the Company recorded the $31 million excess of the fair value of the affiliation agreement over the contractual affiliation fees as deferred revenue on October 21, 2012, of which approximately $5 million was recognized as revenue during 2012 as the programming services were provided. The remaining $26 million is included in deferred revenue in the December 31, 2012 consolidated balance sheet and will be recognized ratably over 2013 as the programming services are provided.
In connection with the VOOM HD settlement agreement, DISH Network paid $700 million to an account for the benefit of Cablevision Systems Corporation (Cablevision) and the Company. Pending a determination of the allocation of the settlement proceeds, $350 million of the cash proceeds was distributed to each of Cablevision and the Company. Accordingly, the portion disbursed to the Company is included in cash and cash equivalents in the consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2012. The final amount to be allocated to the Company is yet to be determined and may be significantly less than $350 million.
Please see the Company's Form 10-K for the period ended December 31, 2012 for further details.
Debt
On December 17, 2012, the Company issued $600 million in aggregate principal amount of 4.75% senior notes due December 2022. The Company used the proceeds of this offering to repay its term loan B facility. In connection with this repayment, the Company recorded a write-off of $12 million principally related to a loss on the extinguishment of the debt. Additionally, the company recorded an unrealized loss of $9 million on the related interest swap contracts, which is included in interest expense.
As previously disclosed, the Company voluntarily prepaid $150 million of the outstanding balance of the Term A Credit Facility during the full year 2012. The total prepaid amount consists of three $50 million payments made on March 8, 2012, July 9, 2012 and November 7, 2012.
4
Description of Non-GAAP Measures
The Company defines Adjusted Operating Cash Flow (AOCF), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as operating income (loss) before depreciation and amortization, share-based compensation expense or benefit and restructuring expenses or credits. Because it is based upon operating income (loss), AOCF also excludes interest expense (including cash interest expense) and other non-operating income and expense items. The Company believes that the exclusion of share-based compensation expense or benefit allows investors to better track the performance of the various operating units of the business without regard to the effect of the settlement of an obligation that is not expected to be made in cash.
The Company believes that AOCF is an appropriate measure for evaluating the operating performance of the business segments and the Company on a consolidated basis. AOCF and similar measures with similar titles are common performance measures used by investors, analysts and peers to compare performance in the industry.
Internally, the Company uses net revenues and AOCF measures as the most important indicators of its business performance, and evaluates management's effectiveness with specific reference to these indicators. AOCF should be viewed as a supplement to and not a substitute for operating income (loss), net income (loss), and other measures of performance presented in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP"). Since AOCF is not a measure of performance calculated in accordance with GAAP, this measure may not be comparable to similar measures with similar titles used by other companies. For a reconciliation of AOCF to operating income (loss), please see page 8 of this release.
The Company defines Free Cash Flow from Continuing Operations, (Free Cash Flow), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as net cash provided by operating activities (continuing operations) less capital expenditures (continuing operations), both of which are reported in our Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. Net cash provided by operating activities excludes net cash provided by operating activities of discontinued operations. The Company believes the most comparable GAAP financial measure of its liquidity is net cash provided by operating activities. The Company believes that Free Cash Flow is useful as an indicator of its overall liquidity, as the amount of Free Cash Flow generated in any period is representative of cash that is available for debt repayment, investment, and other discretionary and non-discretionary cash uses. The Company also believes that Free Cash Flow is one of several benchmarks used by analysts and investors who follow the industry for comparison of its liquidity with other companies in the industry, although the Company's measure of Free Cash Flow may not be directly comparable to similar measures reported by other companies. For a reconciliation of Free Cash Flow to net cash provided by operating activities, please see page 9 of this release.
Forward-Looking Statements
This earnings release may contain statements that constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management's current expectations and are subject to uncertainty and changes in circumstances. Investors are cautioned that any such forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance or results and involve risks and uncertainties, and that actual results or developments may differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including financial community and rating agency perceptions of the Company and its business, operations, financial condition and the industries in which it operates and the factors described in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including the sections entitled "Risk Factors" and "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" contained therein. The Company disclaims any obligation to update any forward-looking statements contained herein.
5
Conference Call Information
AMC Networks will host a conference call today at 10:00 a.m. ET to discuss its full year and fourth quarter 2012 results. To listen to the call, visit http://www.amcnetworks.com or dial 1-877-347-9170, using the following passcode: 91468440.
About AMC Networks Inc.
AMC Networks owns and operates several of cable television's most recognized brands delivering high quality content to audiences and a valuable platform to distributors and advertisers. The Company manages its business through two reportable operating segments: (i) National Networks, which includes AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel; and (ii) International and Other, which includes AMC/Sundance Channel Global, our international programming business; IFC Films, the Company's independent film distribution business; and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, the Company's network technical services business. For more information on AMC Networks, please visit the Company's website at http://www.amcnetworks.com.
Contacts
        
    
        
6
AMC NETWORKS INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
Three and Twelve Months Ended December 31, 2012 and 2011
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
(Unaudited)
7
AMC NETWORKS INC.
SUPPLEMENTAL FINANCIAL DATA
(Dollars in thousands)
(Unaudited)
8
AMC NETWORKS INC.
SUPPLEMENTAL FINANCIAL DATA
(In thousands)
(Unaudited)
disbursement (see the Other Matters section of this release for further details).
9


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20130315215439.txt.gz
TIME:20130315215439
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Employment Agreement with Sean S. Sullivan, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
On March 12, 2013, AMC Networks Inc. ("the Company") entered into an employment agreement (the "Employment Agreement") with Sean S. Sullivan, the Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of the Company, which will terminate on March 12, 2016 (the "Scheduled Expiration Date").
The Employment Agreement provides for a minimum annual base salary of $655,000, subject to annual review and potential increase in the discretion of the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Committee"). Mr. Sullivan is also eligible to participate in the Company's discretionary annual bonus program with an annual target bonus opportunity equal to 75% of salary. The decision of whether to pay a bonus, and the amount of that bonus, if any, is made by the Committee in its discretion. Mr. Sullivan is also eligible to participate in such equity and other long-term incentive programs that are made available to similarly situated executives at the Company. Beginning in calendar year 2013, Mr. Sullivan may expect to receive annually one or more long-term cash and/or equity awards with an aggregate target value of at least $1,200,000, as determined by the Committee in its discretion. Any such awards would be subject to actual grant to Mr. Sullivan by the Committee, would be pursuant to the applicable plan document and would be subject to terms and conditions established by the Committee in its sole discretion. Mr. Sullivan remains eligible for the Company's standard benefit programs subject to meeting the relevant eligibility requirements, payment of required premiums and the terms of the plans.
If, prior to the Scheduled Expiration Date, Mr. Sullivan's employment with the Company is terminated (i) by the Company (other than for Cause (as defined in the Employment Agreement)) or (ii) by Mr. Sullivan for Good Reason (as defined in the Employment Agreement) (other than if Cause then exists) then, subject to Mr. Sullivan's execution of a separation agreement (including, without limitation, non-compete (limited to one year), non-disparagement, non-solicitation, confidentiality, and further cooperation obligations and restrictions on Mr. Sullivan as well as a general release by Mr. Sullivan of the Company and its affiliates) the Company will provide Mr. Sullivan with the following benefits and rights:
 
 
 
 
Upon the termination of Mr. Sullivan's employment with the Company, any outstanding equity or cash incentive awards will be treated in accordance with their terms, other than as specifically provided above.
The above description is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Employment Agreement, which is attached as Exhibit 10.1 and incorporated into this Item 5.02 by reference.
Employment Agreement with James G. Gallagher, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
On March 12, 2013, the Company entered into an employment agreement ("Mr. Gallagher's Employment Agreement") with James G. Gallagher, the Executive Vice President and General Counsel of the Company, which will terminate on March 12, 2016.
Mr. Gallagher's Employment Agreement provides for a minimum annual base salary of $520,000, subject to annual review and potential increase in the discretion of the Committee. Mr. Gallagher is also eligible to participate in the Company's discretionary annual bonus program with an annual target bonus opportunity equal to 60% of salary. The decision of whether to pay a bonus, and the amount of that bonus, if any, is made by the Committee in its discretion. Mr. Gallagher is also eligible to participate in such equity and other long-term incentive programs that are made available to similarly situated executives at the Company. Beginning in calendar year 2013, Mr. Gallagher may expect to receive annually one or more long-term cash and/or equity awards with an aggregate target value of at least $700,000, as determined by the Committee in its discretion. Any such awards would be subject to actual grant to Mr. Gallagher by the Committee, would be pursuant to the applicable plan document and would be subject to terms and conditions established by the Committee in its sole discretion. Mr. Gallagher remains eligible for the Company's standard benefit programs subject to meeting the relevant eligibility requirements, payment of required premiums and the terms of the plans.
If, prior to the Scheduled Expiration Date, Mr. Gallagher's employment with the Company is terminated (i) by the Company (other than for Cause (as defined in Mr. Gallagher's Employment Agreement)) or (ii) by Mr. Gallagher for Good Reason (as defined in Mr. Gallagher's Employment Agreement) (other than if Cause then exists) then, subject to Mr. Gallagher's execution of a separation agreement (including, without limitation, non-compete (limited to one year), non-disparagement, non-solicitation, confidentiality, and further cooperation obligations and restrictions on Mr. Gallagher as well as a general release by Mr. Gallagher of the Company and its affiliates), the Company will provide Mr. Gallagher with the following benefits and rights:
 
 
 
Upon the termination of Mr. Gallagher's employment with the Company, any outstanding equity or cash incentive awards will be treated in accordance with their terms, other than as specifically provided above.
The above description is qualified in its entirety by reference to Mr. Gallagher's Employment Agreement, which is attached as Exhibit 10.2 and incorporated into this Item 5.02 by reference.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: March 15, 2013
 

Exhibit 10.1
March 12, 2013
Mr. Sean Sullivan
266 Parkwood Road
Fairfield, CT 06824
 
Dear Sean:
This letter (the "Agreement") will confirm the terms of your continued employment by AMC Networks Inc. (the "") as an at will employee with the title of Executive Vice President  Chief Financial Officer. This Agreement will supersede and replace the letter agreement between you and the Company, dated August 11, 2010, and any and all other discussions, understandings or arrangements regarding the subject matter herein. This Agreement will be effective upon execution by the Company and you.
Company
The term of this Agreement (the "") shall commence as of the date it is executed by both you and the Company and shall automatically expire on March 12, 2016 (the "").
Term
Expiration Date
You agree to devote substantially all of your business time and attention to the business and affairs of the Company and to perform your duties in a diligent, competent and skillful manner and in accordance with applicable law.
Your annual base salary will be a minimum of $655,000 (retroactive to January 1, 2013), subject to annual review and potential increase by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Compensation Committee"), in its discretion. You will be eligible to participate in our discretionary annual bonus program with an annual target bonus opportunity equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of salary. Bonus payments are based on actual salary dollars paid during the year and depend on a number of factors including Company, unit and individual performance. However, the decision of whether or not to pay a bonus, and the amount of that bonus, if any, will be made by the Compensation Committee in its discretion. Except as otherwise provided herein, in order to receive a bonus, you must be employed by the Company at the time bonuses are being paid. Your annual base salary and annual bonus target (as each may be increased from time to time in the Compensation Committee's discretion) will not be reduced during the term of this Agreement.
You will also continue to be eligible, subject to your continued employment by the Company and actual grant by the Compensation Committee in its discretion, to participate in such long-term equity and other incentive programs as are made available in the future to similarly situated executives at the Company. It is expected that such awards will consist of annual grants of cash and/or equity awards with an annual target value of not less than $1,200,000, as determined by the Compensation Committee. Any such awards would be subject to actual grant to you by the Compensation Committee in its discretion pursuant to the applicable plan documents and would be subject to terms and conditions established by the Compensation Committee in its discretion that would be detailed in separate agreements you would receive after any award is actually made.
You will also continue to be eligible for our standard benefits program at the levels that are made available to similarly situated executives at the Company. Participation in our benefits program is subject to meeting the relevant eligibility requirements, payment of the required premiums, and the terms of the plans themselves. You will be entitled to four (4) weeks vacation per year, to be accrued and used in accordance with Company policy.
Effective immediately, you and the Company agree to be bound by the additional covenants and provisions applicable to each that are set forth in the attached hereto, which shall be deemed to be a part of this Agreement.
Annex
Annex
If your employment with the Company is terminated during the Term (1) by the Company or (2) by you for "" and at the time of such termination under clauses (1) or (2) "" does not exist, then, subject to your execution and the effectiveness of a severance agreement satisfactory to the Company, which severance agreement shall include, without limitation, a full and complete general release in favor of the Company and its affiliates, and their respective directors and officers, as well as your agreement to non-competition (limited to one year), non-solicitation, non-disparagement, confidentiality and further cooperation obligations and restrictions substantially in the form set forth in the attached hereto, the Company will provide you with the following:
Good Reason,
Cause
Annex
 
 
 
 
 
In connection with any termination of your employment described above, other than as specifically provided above, all equity or cash incentive grants or awards you may then have outstanding will be treated in accordance with their terms.
This Agreement does not constitute a guarantee of employment or benefits for any definite period. Your employment may be terminated by you or the Company at any time, with or without notice, liability (subject to the terms of this Agreement) or cause. This Agreement shall automatically terminate upon your death.
If and to the extent that any payment or benefit hereunder, or any plan, award or arrangement of the Company or its affiliates, is determined by the Company to constitute "non-qualified deferred compensation" subject to Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 ("Section 409A") and is payable to you by reason of your termination of employment, then (a) such payment or benefit shall be made or provided to you only upon a "separation from service" as defined for purposes of Section 409A under applicable regulations and (b) if you are a "specified employee" (within the meaning of Section 409A and as determined by the Company), such payment or benefit shall not be made or provided before the date that is six months after the date of your separation from service (or your earlier death). Any amount not paid or benefit not provided in respect of the six month period specified in the preceding sentence will be paid to you in a lump sum or provided to you as soon as practicable after the expiration of such six month period. Any such payment or benefit shall be treated as a separate payment for purposes of Section 409A to the extent Section 409A applies to such payments.
 
To the extent you are entitled to any expense reimbursement from the Company that is subject to Section 409A, (i) the amount of any such expenses eligible for reimbursement in one calendar year shall not affect the expenses eligible for reimbursement in any other taxable year (except under any lifetime limit applicable to expenses for medical care), (ii) in no event shall any such expense be reimbursed after the last day of the calendar year following the calendar year in which you incurred such expense, and (iii) in no event shall any right to reimbursement be subject to liquidation or exchange for another benefit.
The Company may withhold from any payment due to you hereunder any taxes that are required to be withheld under any law, rule or regulation. If any payment otherwise due to you hereunder would result in the imposition of the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code, the Company will instead pay you either (i) such amount or (ii) the maximum amount that could be paid to you without the imposition of the excise tax, depending on whichever amount results in your receiving the greater amount of after-tax proceeds (as reasonably determined by the Company). In the event that any such payment or benefits payable to you hereunder would be reduced because of the imposition of such excise tax, then such reduction will be determined in a manner which has the least economic cost to you and, to the extent the economic cost is equivalent, such payments or benefits will be reduced in the inverse order of when the payments or benefits would have been made to you (i.e., later payments will be reduced first) until the reduction specified is achieved.
This Agreement is personal to you and without the prior written consent of the Company shall not be assignable by you otherwise than by will or the laws of descent and distribution. This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of, and be enforceable by, your legal representatives. This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of, and be binding upon, the Company and its successors and assigns.
To the extent permitted by law, you hereby waive any and all rights to a jury trial with respect to any claim arising out of or in any way connected with or related to this Agreement, your employment by the Company or the termination of your employment with the Company.
This Agreement will be governed by and construed in accordance with the law of the State of New York applicable to contracts made and to be performed entirely within that State.
You hereby irrevocably submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of the State of New York and the federal courts of the United States of America located in the State of New York solely in respect of the interpretation and enforcement of the provisions of this Agreement, and you hereby waive, and agree not to assert, as a defense that you are not subject thereto or that the venue thereof may not be appropriate.
You hereby agree that mailing of notice, process or other papers in connection with any such action or proceeding in any manner as may be permitted by law shall be valid and sufficient service thereof if delivered to you at your address set forth above or to such other address as you may later designate in writing for the receipt of such notices.
 
This Agreement may not be amended or modified otherwise than by a written agreement executed by the parties hereto or their respective successors and legal representatives.
The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement. If any provision of this Agreement is held by any court of competent jurisdiction to be illegal, invalid, void or unenforceable, such provision shall be deemed modified, amended and narrowed to the extent necessary to render the same legal, valid and enforceable, and the other remaining provisions of this Agreement shall not be affected but shall remain in full force and effect.
Capitalized terms used in this Agreement, including in the attached hereto, shall have the meanings set forth below:
Annex
"" means your (i) commission of an act of fraud, embezzlement, misappropriation, willful misconduct, gross negligence or breach of fiduciary duty against the Company or an affiliate thereof, or (ii) commission of any act or omission that results in a conviction, plea of no contest, plea of , or imposition of unadjudicated probation for any crime involving moral turpitude or any felony.
C
ause
nolo contendere
"" means that (1) without your consent, (A) your base salary or annual bonus target (as each may be increased from time to time in the Compensation Committee's discretion) is reduced, (B) your title is reduced, (C) your responsibilities as in effect immediately after the date hereof are thereafter materially diminished or (D) the Company requires that your principal office be located more than fifty (50) miles from Manhattan, (2) you have given the Company written notice, referring specifically to this letter and definition, that you do not consent to such action, (3) the Company has not corrected such action within 30 days of receiving such notice, (4) you voluntarily terminate your employment with the Company within 90 days following the happening of the action described in subsection (1) above.
Good Reason
and
It is the parties' intention that this Agreement not be construed more strictly with regard to you or the Company. This Agreement reflects the entire understanding and agreement of you and the Company with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior understandings and agreements.
 
 
 
This Annex constitutes part of the Agreement, dated March 12, 2013, by and between Sean Sullivan ("You") and AMC Networks Inc. (the "Company"). Terms defined in the Agreement shall have the same meanings in this Annex.
You agree to comply with the following covenants in addition to those set forth in the Agreement.
 
(a) You agree to keep the existence and terms of this Agreement confidential (unless it is made public by the Company) that (1) you are authorized to make any disclosure required of you by any federal, state or local laws or judicial proceedings, after providing the Company with prior written notice and an opportunity to respond to such disclosure (unless such notice is prohibited by law), (2) you and your representatives and agents may disclose to any and all persons, without limitation of any kind, the tax treatment and tax structure of this Agreement and all materials of any kind (including opinions or other tax analyses) that are provided to you relating to such tax treatment or structure, and (3) you may disclose this Agreement in connection with any action by you to enforce this Agreement.
Agreement.
provided
(b) You agree to retain in strict confidence and not use for any purpose whatsoever or divulge, disseminate, copy, disclose to any third party, or otherwise use any Confidential Information, other than for legitimate business purposes of the Company and its affiliates. As used herein, "" means any non-public information of a confidential, proprietary, commercially sensitive or personal nature of, or regarding, the Company or any of its affiliates or any director, officer or member of senior management of any of the foregoing (collectively ""). The term Confidential Information includes information in written, digital, oral or any other format and includes, but is not limited to (i) information designated or treated as confidential, (ii) budgets, plans, forecasts or other financial or accounting data; (iii) subscriber, customer, guest, fan vendor or shareholder lists or data; (iv) technical or strategic information regarding the Covered Parties' cable, data, telephone, programming, advertising, sports, entertainment, film production, theatrical, motion picture exhibition or other businesses, (v) advertising, business, programming, sales or marketing tactics and strategies; (vi) policies, practices, procedures or techniques, (vii) trade secrets or other intellectual property; (vii) information, theories or strategies relating to litigation, arbitration, mediation, investigations or matters relating to governmental authorities; (vii) terms of agreements with third parties and third party trade secrets, (viii) information regarding employees, players, coaches, agents, talent, consultants, advisors or representatives, including their compensation or other human resources policies and procedures and (ix) any other
Confidential and Proprietary Information.
Confidential Information
Covered Parties
 
information the disclosure of which may have an adverse effect on the Covered Parties' business reputation, operations or competitive position, reputation or standing in the community.
(c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the obligations set forth in subsection (b) above, other than with respect to subscriber or customer information, shall not apply to Confidential Information that is:
Exception for Disclosure Pursuant to Law.
 
 
 
Notwithstanding anything contained elsewhere in this Agreement, you are authorized to make any disclosure required of you by any federal, state or local laws or judicial, arbitral or governmental agency proceedings, after providing the Company with prior written notice and an opportunity to respond prior to such disclosure. In addition, this Agreement in no way restricts or prevents you from providing truthful testimony concerning the Company to judicial, administrative, regulatory or other governmental authorities.
 
You acknowledge that due to your executive position in the Company and your knowledge of Confidential Information, your employment by or affiliation with certain businesses would be detrimental to the Company or any of its direct or indirect subsidiaries. You agree that, without the prior written consent of the Company, you will not represent, become employed by, consult to, advise in any manner or have any material interest, directly or indirectly, in any Competitive Entity (as defined below). A "" shall mean any person, entity or business that (i) competes with any of the Company's or any of its affiliate's programming or other existing businesses, nationally or regionally; or (ii) directly competes with any other business of the Company or one of its subsidiaries that produced greater than 10% of the Company's revenues in the calendar year immediately preceding the year in which the determination is made. Ownership of not more than 1% of the outstanding stock of any publicly traded company shall not, by itself, be a violation of this paragraph. This agreement not to compete will expire on the first anniversary of the date on which your employment with the Company has terminated if such termination occurs prior to the Expiration Date.
Competitive Entity
 
You agree, for yourself and others acting on your behalf, that you (and they) have not disparaged and will not disparage, make negative statements about or act in any manner which is intended to or does damage to the good will of, or the business or personal reputations of the Company, any of its affiliates or any of their respective incumbent or former officers, directors, agents, consultants, employees, successors and assigns.
This agreement in no way restricts or prevents you from providing truthful testimony concerning the Company or its affiliates as required by court order or other legal process; provided that you afford the Company written notice and an opportunity to respond prior to such disclosure.
In addition, you agree that the Company is the owner of all rights, title and interest in and to all documents, tapes, videos, designs, plans, formulas, models, processes, computer programs, inventions (whether patentable or not), schematics, music, lyrics, programming ideas and other technical, business, financial, advertising, sales, marketing, customer, programming or product development plans, forecasts, strategies, information and materials (in any medium whatsoever) developed or prepared by you or with your cooperation during the course of your employment by the Company (the ""). The Company will have the sole and exclusive authority to use the Materials in any manner that it deems appropriate, in perpetuity, without additional payment to you.
Materials
 
Following the date of termination of your employment with the Company, you will no longer provide any regular services to the Company or represent yourself as a Company agent. If, however, the Company so requests, you agree to cooperate fully with the Company in connection with any matter with which you were involved prior to such employment termination, or in any litigation or administrative proceedings or appeals (including any preparation therefore) where the Company believes that your personal knowledge, attendance or participation could be beneficial to the Company or its affiliates. This cooperation includes, without limitation, participation on behalf of the Company and/or its affiliates in any litigation, administrative or similar proceeding, including providing truthful testimony.
The Company will provide you with reasonable notice in connection with any cooperation it requires in accordance with this section and will take reasonable steps to schedule your cooperation in any such matters so as not to materially interfere with your other professional and personal commitments. The Company will reimburse you for any reasonable out-of-pocket expenses you reasonably incur in connection with the cooperation you provide hereunder as soon as practicable after you present appropriate documentation evidencing such expenses. You agree to provide the Company with an estimate of any such expense before it is incurred.
 
For the term of the Agreement and until one year after the termination of your employment, you agree not to hire, seek to hire, or cause any person or entity to hire or seek to hire (without the prior written consent of the Company), directly or indirectly (whether for your own interest or any other person or entity's interest) any employee of the Company or any of its affiliates. This restriction does not apply to any employee who was discharged by the Company or any of its affiliates. In addition, this restriction will not prevent you from providing references.
 
You acknowledge that the restrictions contained in this , in light of the nature of the Company's business and your position and responsibilities, are reasonable and necessary to protect the legitimate interests of the Company. You acknowledge that the Company has no adequate remedy at law and would be irreparably harmed if you breach or threaten to breach any of the provisions of this ,and therefore agree that the Company shall be entitle injunctive relief to prevent any breach or threatened breach of any of the provisions and to specific performance of the terms of each of such provisions in addition to any other legal or equitable remedy it may have. You further agree that you will not, in any equity proceeding relating to the enforcement of the provisions of this , raise the defense that the Company has an adequate remedy at law. Nothing in this shall be construed as prohibiting the Company from pursuing any other remedies at law or in equity that it may have or any other rights that it may have under any other agreement. If it is determined that any of the provisions of this or any part thereof, is unenforceable because of the duration or scope (geographic or otherwise) of such provision, it is the intention of the parties that the duration or scope of such provision, as the case may be, shall be reduced so that such provision becomes unenforceable and, in its reduced form, such provision shall then be enforceable and shall be enforced. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, in the event you violate the covenants and agreements set forth in this , then, in addition to all other rights and remedies available to the Company, the Company shall have no further obligation to pay you any severance benefits or to provide you with any other rights or benefits to which you would have been entitled pursuant to this Agreement had you not breached the covenants and agreements set forth in this .
Annex
Annex
Annex
Annex
Annex,
Annex
Annex
 
The covenants and agreement set forth in this shall survive any termination or expiration of this Agreement and any termination of your employment with the Company, in accordance with their respective terms.
Annex
 

Exhibit 10.2
March 12, 2013
Mr. James G. Gallagher
541 Third Street
Brooklyn, NY 11215
 
Dear Jamie:
This letter (the "Agreement") will confirm the terms of your continued employment by AMC Networks Inc. (the "") as an at will employee with the title of Executive Vice President  General Counsel. This Agreement will supersede and replace the letter agreement between you and Cablevision Systems Corporation, dated February 22, 2008, and any and all other discussions, understandings or arrangements regarding the subject matter herein. This Agreement will be effective upon execution by the Company and you.
Company
The term of this Agreement (the "") shall commence as of the date it is executed by both you and the Company and shall automatically expire on March 12, 2016 (the "").
Term
Expiration Date
You agree to devote substantially all of your business time and attention to the business and affairs of the Company and to perform your duties in a diligent, competent and skillful manner and in accordance with applicable law.
Your annual base salary will be a minimum of $520,000 (retroactive to January 1, 2013), subject to annual review and potential increase by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Compensation Committee"), in its discretion. You will be eligible to participate in our discretionary annual bonus program with an annual target bonus opportunity equal to sixty percent (60%) of salary. Bonus payments are based on actual salary dollars paid during the year and depend on a number of factors including Company, unit and individual performance. However, the decision of whether or not to pay a bonus, and the amount of that bonus, if any, will be made by the Compensation Committee in its discretion. Except as otherwise provided herein, in order to receive a bonus, you must be employed by the Company at the time bonuses are being paid. Your annual base salary and annual bonus target (as each may be increased from time to time in the Compensation Committee's discretion) will not be reduced during the term of this Agreement.
You will also continue to be eligible, subject to your continued employment by the Company and actual grant by the Compensation Committee in its discretion, to participate in such long-term equity and other incentive programs as are made available in the future to similarly situated executives at the Company. It is expected that such awards will consist of annual grants of cash and/or equity awards with an annual target value of not less than $700,000, as determined by the Compensation Committee. Any such awards would be subject to actual grant to you by the Compensation Committee in its discretion pursuant to the applicable plan documents and would be subject to terms and conditions established by the Compensation Committee in its discretion that would be detailed in separate agreements you would receive after any award is actually made.
You will also continue to be eligible for our standard benefits program at the levels that are made available to similarly situated executives at the Company. Participation in our benefits program is subject to meeting the relevant eligibility requirements, payment of the required premiums, and the terms of the plans themselves. You will be entitled to four (4) weeks vacation per year, to be accrued and used in accordance with Company policy.
Effective immediately, you and the Company agree to be bound by the additional covenants and provisions applicable to each that are set forth in the attached hereto, which shall be deemed to be a part of this Agreement.
Annex
Annex
If your employment with the Company is terminated during the Term (1) by the Company or (2) by you for "" and at the time of such termination under clauses (1) or (2) "" does not exist, then, subject to your execution and the effectiveness of a severance agreement satisfactory to the Company, which severance agreement shall include, without limitation, a full and complete general release in favor of the Company and its affiliates, and their respective directors and officers, as well as your agreement to non-competition (limited to one year), non-solicitation, non-disparagement, confidentiality and further cooperation obligations and restrictions substantially in the form set forth in the attached hereto, the Company will provide you with the following:
Good Reason,
Cause
Annex
 
 
 
 
 
In connection with any termination of your employment described above, other than as specifically provided above, all equity or cash incentive grants or awards you may then have outstanding will be treated in accordance with their terms.
This Agreement does not constitute a guarantee of employment or benefits for any definite period. Your employment may be terminated by you or the Company at any time, with or without notice, liability (subject to the terms of this Agreement) or cause. This Agreement shall automatically terminate upon your death.
If and to the extent that any payment or benefit hereunder, or any plan, award or arrangement of the Company or its affiliates, is determined by the Company to constitute "non-qualified deferred compensation" subject to Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 ("Section 409A") and is payable to you by reason of your termination of employment, then (a) such payment or benefit shall be made or provided to you only upon a "separation from service" as defined for purposes of Section 409A under applicable regulations and (b) if you are a "specified employee" (within the meaning of Section 409A and as determined by the Company), such payment or benefit shall not be made or provided before the date that is six months after the date of your separation from service (or your earlier death). Any amount not paid or benefit not provided in respect of the six month period specified in the preceding sentence will be paid to you in a lump sum or provided to you as soon as practicable after the expiration of such six month period. Any such payment or benefit shall be treated as a separate payment for purposes of Section 409A to the extent Section 409A applies to such payments.
 
To the extent you are entitled to any expense reimbursement from the Company that is subject to Section 409A, (i) the amount of any such expenses eligible for reimbursement in one calendar year shall not affect the expenses eligible for reimbursement in any other taxable year (except under any lifetime limit applicable to expenses for medical care), (ii) in no event shall any such expense be reimbursed after the last day of the calendar year following the calendar year in which you incurred such expense, and (iii) in no event shall any right to reimbursement be subject to liquidation or exchange for another benefit.
The Company may withhold from any payment due to you hereunder any taxes that are required to be withheld under any law, rule or regulation. If any payment otherwise due to you hereunder would result in the imposition of the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code, the Company will instead pay you either (i) such amount or (ii) the maximum amount that could be paid to you without the imposition of the excise tax, depending on whichever amount results in your receiving the greater amount of after-tax proceeds (as reasonably determined by the Company). In the event that any such payment or benefits payable to you hereunder would be reduced because of the imposition of such excise tax, then such reduction will be determined in a manner which has the least economic cost to you and, to the extent the economic cost is equivalent, such payments or benefits will be reduced in the inverse order of when the payments or benefits would have been made to you (i.e., later payments will be reduced first) until the reduction specified is achieved.
This Agreement is personal to you and without the prior written consent of the Company shall not be assignable by you otherwise than by will or the laws of descent and distribution. This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of, and be enforceable by, your legal representatives. This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of, and be binding upon, the Company and its successors and assigns.
To the extent permitted by law, you hereby waive any and all rights to a jury trial with respect to any claim arising out of or in any way connected with or related to this Agreement, your employment by the Company or the termination of your employment with the Company.
This Agreement will be governed by and construed in accordance with the law of the State of New York applicable to contracts made and to be performed entirely within that State.
You hereby irrevocably submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of the State of New York and the federal courts of the United States of America located in the State of New York solely in respect of the interpretation and enforcement of the provisions of this Agreement, and you hereby waive, and agree not to assert, as a defense that you are not subject thereto or that the venue thereof may not be appropriate.
You hereby agree that mailing of notice, process or other papers in connection with any such action or proceeding in any manner as may be permitted by law shall be valid and sufficient service thereof if delivered to you at your address set forth above or to such other address as you may later designate in writing for the receipt of such notices.
 
This Agreement may not be amended or modified otherwise than by a written agreement executed by the parties hereto or their respective successors and legal representatives.
The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement. If any provision of this Agreement is held by any court of competent jurisdiction to be illegal, invalid, void or unenforceable, such provision shall be deemed modified, amended and narrowed to the extent necessary to render the same legal, valid and enforceable, and the other remaining provisions of this Agreement shall not be affected but shall remain in full force and effect.
Capitalized terms used in this Agreement, including in the attached hereto, shall have the meanings set forth below:
Annex
"" means your (i) commission of an act of fraud, embezzlement, misappropriation, willful misconduct, gross negligence or breach of fiduciary duty against the Company or an affiliate thereof, or (ii) commission of any act or omission that results in a conviction, plea of no contest, plea of , or imposition of unadjudicated probation for any crime involving moral turpitude or any felony.
C
ause
nolo contendere
"" means that (1) without your consent, (A) your base salary or annual bonus target (as each may be increased from time to time in the Compensation Committee's discretion) is reduced, (B) your title is reduced, (C) your responsibilities as in effect immediately after the date hereof are thereafter materially diminished or (D) the Company requires that your principal office be located more than fifty (50) miles from Manhattan, (2) you have given the Company written notice, referring specifically to this letter and definition, that you do not consent to such action, (3) the Company has not corrected such action within 30 days of receiving such notice, (4) you voluntarily terminate your employment with the Company within 90 days following the happening of the action described in subsection (1) above.
Good Reason
and
It is the parties' intention that this Agreement not be construed more strictly with regard to you or the Company. This Agreement reflects the entire understanding and agreement of you and the Company with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior understandings and agreements.
 
 
 
This Annex constitutes part of the Agreement, dated March 12, 2013, by and between James G. Gallagher ("You") and AMC Networks Inc. (the "Company"). Terms defined in the Agreement shall have the same meanings in this Annex.
You agree to comply with the following covenants in addition to those set forth in the Agreement.
 
(a) You agree to keep the existence and terms of this Agreement confidential (unless it is made public by the Company) that (1) you are authorized to make any disclosure required of you by any federal, state or local laws or judicial proceedings, after providing the Company with prior written notice and an opportunity to respond to such disclosure (unless such notice is prohibited by law), (2) you and your representatives and agents may disclose to any and all persons, without limitation of any kind, the tax treatment and tax structure of this Agreement and all materials of any kind (including opinions or other tax analyses) that are provided to you relating to such tax treatment or structure, and (3) you may disclose this Agreement in connection with any action by you to enforce this Agreement.
Agreement.
provided
(b) You agree to retain in strict confidence and not use for any purpose whatsoever or divulge, disseminate, copy, disclose to any third party, or otherwise use any Confidential Information, other than for legitimate business purposes of the Company and its affiliates. As used herein, "" means any non-public information of a confidential, proprietary, commercially sensitive or personal nature of, or regarding, the Company or any of its affiliates or any director, officer or member of senior management of any of the foregoing (collectively ""). The term Confidential Information includes information in written, digital, oral or any other format and includes, but is not limited to (i) information designated or treated as confidential, (ii) budgets, plans, forecasts or other financial or accounting data; (iii) subscriber, customer, guest, fan vendor or shareholder lists or data; (iv) technical or strategic information regarding the Covered Parties' cable, data, telephone, programming, advertising, sports, entertainment, film production, theatrical, motion picture exhibition or other businesses, (v) advertising, business, programming, sales or marketing tactics and strategies; (vi) policies, practices, procedures or techniques, (vii) trade secrets or other intellectual property; (vii) information, theories or strategies relating to litigation, arbitration, mediation, investigations or matters relating to governmental authorities; (vii) terms of agreements with third parties and third party trade secrets, (viii) information regarding employees, players, coaches, agents, talent, consultants, advisors or representatives, including their compensation or other human resources policies and procedures and (ix) any other
Confidential and Proprietary Information.
Confidential Information
Covered Parties
 
information the disclosure of which may have an adverse effect on the Covered Parties' business reputation, operations or competitive position, reputation or standing in the community.
(c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the obligations set forth in subsection (b) above, other than with respect to subscriber or customer information, shall not apply to Confidential Information that is:
Exception for Disclosure Pursuant to Law.
 
 
 
Notwithstanding anything contained elsewhere in this Agreement, you are authorized to make any disclosure required of you by any federal, state or local laws or judicial, arbitral or governmental agency proceedings, after providing the Company with prior written notice and an opportunity to respond prior to such disclosure. In addition, this Agreement in no way restricts or prevents you from providing truthful testimony concerning the Company to judicial, administrative, regulatory or other governmental authorities.
 
You acknowledge that due to your executive position in the Company and your knowledge of Confidential Information, your employment by or affiliation with certain businesses would be detrimental to the Company or any of its direct or indirect subsidiaries. You agree that, without the prior written consent of the Company and to the extent permissible under applicable rules of professional responsibility, you will not represent, become employed by, consult to, advise in any manner or have any material interest, directly or indirectly, in any Competitive Entity (as defined below). A "" shall mean any person, entity or business that (i) competes with any of the Company's or any of its affiliate's programming or other existing businesses, nationally or regionally; or (ii) directly competes with any other business of the Company or one of its subsidiaries that produced greater than 10% of the Company's revenues in the calendar year immediately preceding the year in which the determination is made. Ownership of not more than 1% of the outstanding stock of any publicly traded company shall not, by itself, be a violation of this paragraph. This agreement not to compete will expire on the first anniversary of the date on which your employment with the Company has terminated if such termination occurs prior to the Expiration Date.
Competitive Entity
 
You agree, for yourself and others acting on your behalf, that you (and they) have not disparaged and will not disparage, make negative statements about or act in any manner which is intended to or does damage to the good will of, or the business or personal reputations of the Company, any of its affiliates or any of their respective incumbent or former officers, directors, agents, consultants, employees, successors and assigns.
This agreement in no way restricts or prevents you from providing truthful testimony concerning the Company or its affiliates as required by court order or other legal process; provided that you afford the Company written notice and an opportunity to respond prior to such disclosure.
In addition, you agree that the Company is the owner of all rights, title and interest in and to all documents, tapes, videos, designs, plans, formulas, models, processes, computer programs, inventions (whether patentable or not), schematics, music, lyrics, programming ideas and other technical, business, financial, advertising, sales, marketing, customer, programming or product development plans, forecasts, strategies, information and materials (in any medium whatsoever) developed or prepared by you or with your cooperation during the course of your employment by the Company (the ""). The Company will have the sole and exclusive authority to use the Materials in any manner that it deems appropriate, in perpetuity, without additional payment to you.
Materials
 
Following the date of termination of your employment with the Company, you will no longer provide any regular services to the Company or represent yourself as a Company agent. If, however, the Company so requests, you agree to cooperate fully with the Company in connection with any matter with which you were involved prior to such employment termination, or in any litigation or administrative proceedings or appeals (including any preparation therefore) where the Company believes that your personal knowledge, attendance or participation could be beneficial to the Company or its affiliates. This cooperation includes, without limitation, participation on behalf of the Company and/or its affiliates in any litigation, administrative or similar proceeding, including providing truthful testimony.
The Company will provide you with reasonable notice in connection with any cooperation it requires in accordance with this section and will take reasonable steps to schedule your cooperation in any such matters so as not to materially interfere with your other professional and personal commitments. The Company will reimburse you for any reasonable out-of-pocket expenses you reasonably incur in connection with the cooperation you provide hereunder as soon as practicable after you present appropriate documentation evidencing such expenses. You agree to provide the Company with an estimate of any such expense before it is incurred.
 
For the term of the Agreement and until one year after the termination of your employment, you agree not to hire, seek to hire, or cause any person or entity to hire or seek to hire (without the prior written consent of the Company), directly or indirectly (whether for your own interest or any other person or entity's interest) any employee of the Company or any of its affiliates. This restriction does not apply to any employee who was discharged by the Company or any of its affiliates. In addition, this restriction will not prevent you from providing references.
 
You acknowledge that the restrictions contained in this , in light of the nature of the Company's business and your position and responsibilities, are reasonable and necessary to protect the legitimate interests of the Company. You acknowledge that the Company has no adequate remedy at law and would be irreparably harmed if you breach or threaten to breach any of the provisions of this , and therefore agree that the Company shall be entitle injunctive relief to prevent any breach or threatened breach of any of the provisions and to specific performance of the terms of each of such provisions in addition to any other legal or equitable remedy it may have. You further agree that you will not, in any equity proceeding relating to the enforcement of the provisions of this , raise the defense that the Company has an adequate remedy at law. Nothing in this shall be construed as prohibiting the Company from pursuing any other remedies at law or in equity that it may have or any other rights that it may have under any other agreement. If it is determined that any of the provisions of this or any part thereof, is unenforceable because of the duration or scope (geographic or otherwise) of such provision, it is the intention of the parties that the duration or scope of such provision, as the case may be, shall be reduced so that such provision becomes unenforceable and, in its reduced form, such provision shall then be enforceable and shall be enforced. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, in the event you violate the covenants and agreements set forth in this , then, in addition to all other rights and remedies available to the Company, the Company shall have no further obligation to pay you any severance benefits or to provide you with any other rights or benefits to which you would have been entitled pursuant to this Agreement had you not breached the covenants and agreements set forth in this .
Annex
Annex
Annex
Annex
Annex,
Annex
Annex
 
The covenants and agreement set forth in this shall survive any termination or expiration of this Agreement and any termination of your employment with the Company, in accordance with their respective terms.
Annex
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20130408162453.txt.gz
TIME:20130408162453
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): April 8, 2013 (April 8, 2013)
 
AMC Networks Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
(212) 324-8500
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
As previously disclosed, on October 21, 2012, Cablevision Systems Corporation (Cablevision) and AMC Networks Inc. (the Company or AMC) settled the lawsuit (the Settlement) entitled VOOM HD Holdings LLC against EchoStar Satellite LLC, predecessor-in-interest to DISH Network L.LC (DISH). On April 8, 2013, Cablevision and the Company entered into an agreement (the DISH Proceeds Allocation Agreement) to allocate the proceeds, including the $700,000,000 in cash (the Settlement Funds) received from DISH pursuant to the Settlement
.
As previously disclosed, the parties had previously entered into a Letter Agreement dated as of June 6, 2011 (the "VOOM Litigation Agreement"), with respect to the allocation of any proceeds received pursuant to the Settlement.
The principal terms of the DISH Proceeds Allocation Agreement are as follows:
In accordance with the Company's Related Party Transaction Approval Policy, the final allocation of the proceeds from the Settlement was approved by an independent committee of the Company's Board of Directors, as well as an independent committee of Cablevision's Board of Directors.
The DISH Proceeds Allocation Agreement is in full and final settlement of the allocation between Cablevision and the Company of cash and non-cash proceeds (including the value of the DISH affiliation agreement attributable to the Settlement) received in the Settlement in accordance with the VOOM Litigation Agreement, except for legal fees and expenses incurred in connection with the DISH litigation not yet paid or shared between the parties as required under Section 5 of the VOOM Litigation Agreement. The DISH Proceeds Allocation Agreement further provides that Cablevision and the Company have agreed to release all of their claims relating to this matter. The disclosure above updates the disclosure in the Company's report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2012, in Note 11. Commitments and Contingencies to the Company's Consolidated Financial Statements.
2
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20130424162510.txt.gz
TIME:20130424162510
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): Apri
l
24,
2013 (April
19,
2013)
 
AMC Networks Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
(212) 324-8500
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Employment Agreement with Edward A. Carroll, Chief Operating Officer
On April 19, 2013, AMC Networks Inc. (the Company) entered into an employment agreement (the Employment Agreement) with Edward A. Carroll, the Chief Operating Officer of the Company, which will terminate on December 31, 2016 (the Scheduled Expiration Date).
The Employment Agreement provides for a minimum annual base salary of $1,100,000, subject to annual review and potential increase in the discretion of the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the Committee). Mr. Carroll is also eligible to participate in the Companys discretionary annual bonus program with an annual target bonus opportunity equal to not less than 115% of his salary. The decision of whether to pay a bonus, and the amount of that bonus, if any, is made by the Committee in its discretion. Mr. Carroll is also eligible to participate in the equity and other long-term incentive programs that are made available to similarly situated executives at the Company. Beginning in calendar year 2013, Mr. Carroll may expect to receive annually one or more long-term cash and/or equity awards with an aggregate target value of at least $2,250,000, as determined by the Committee in its discretion. Any such awards would be subject to actual grant to Mr. Carroll by the Committee, would be pursuant to the applicable plan document and would be subject to terms and conditions established by the Committee in its discretion. Mr. Carroll remains eligible for the Companys standard benefit programs subject to meeting the relevant eligibility requirements, payment of required premiums and the terms of the plans.
If, prior to the Scheduled Expiration Date, Mr. Carrolls employment with the Company is terminated (i) by the Company (other than for Cause (as defined in the Employment Agreement)) or (ii) by Mr. Carroll for Good Reason (as defined in the Employment Agreement) (other than if Cause then exists) then, subject to Mr. Carrolls execution of a separation agreement (including, without limitation, non-compete (limited to one year), non-disparagement, non-solicitation, confidentiality, and further cooperation obligations and restrictions on Mr. Carroll as well as a general release by Mr. Carroll of the Company and its affiliates) the Company will provide Mr. Carroll with the following benefits and rights:
If, prior to the Scheduled Expiration Date, Mr. Carroll ceases to be an employee of the Company as a result of his death or physical or mental disability, and at the time Cause does not exist then, subject to Mr. Carrolls execution of a separation agreement (other than in the case of death), the Company will provide Mr. Carroll (or his estate or beneficiary) with the benefits and rights set forth in clauses (b), (d) and (e) above and each of his outstanding long-term cash incentive awards granted under plans of the Company will immediately vest in full, whether or not subject to performance criteria and will be payable on the 90
th
day after termination of his employment, provided that, if any such award is subject to any performance criteria, (i) if the measurement period for such performance criteria has not yet been fully completed, then the payment amount shall be at the target amount for such award and (ii) if the measurement period for such performance criteria has already been fully completed, then the payment of such award shall be at the same time and to the extent that other similarly situated executives receive payment as determined by the Committee (subject to satisfaction of the applicable performance criteria).
Notwithstanding clauses (c), (d) and (e) above, any more favorable provisions of Mr. Carrolls existing cash incentive, restricted stock, restricted stock unit, stock option or stock appreciation right award agreements will apply to the treatment of such awards following a going private transaction (as defined in the award agreements), a change of control (as defined in the award agreements) or Mr. Carrolls death.
The above description is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Employment Agreement, which is attached as Exhibit 10.1 and incorporated into this Item 5.02 by reference.
Item 9.01.    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)    Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 10.1
April 19, 2013
Mr. Edward A. Carroll
246 Bay Avenue
Huntington Bay, New York 11543
Dear Ed:
This letter (the 
Agreement
) will confirm the terms of your continued employment by AMC Networks Inc. (the 
Company
) as an at will employee with the title of Chief Operating Officer. This Agreement will supersede and replace the letter agreement between you and Rainbow Media Enterprises, Inc, dated April 16, 2010, and any and all other discussions, understandings or arrangements regarding the subject matter herein. This Agreement will be effective upon execution by the Company and you.
The term of this Agreement (the 
Term
) shall commence as of the date it is executed by both you and the Company and shall automatically expire on December 31, 2016 (the 
Expiration Date
).
You agree to devote substantially all of your business time and attention to the business and affairs of the Company and to perform your duties in a diligent, competent and skillful manner and in accordance with applicable law.
Your annual base salary will be a minimum of $1,100,000 (retroactive to January 1, 2013), subject to annual review and potential increase by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the 
Compensation Committee
), in its discretion. You will be eligible to participate in our discretionary annual bonus program with an annual target bonus opportunity equal to not less than one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of salary. Bonus payments are based on actual salary dollars paid during the year and depend on a number of factors including Company, unit and individual performance. However, the decision of whether or not to pay a bonus, and the amount of that bonus, if any, will be made by the Compensation Committee in its discretion. Except as otherwise provided herein, in order to receive a bonus, you must be employed by the Company at the time bonuses are being paid. Your annual base salary and annual bonus target (as each may be increased from time to time in the Compensation Committees discretion) will not be reduced during the term of this Agreement.
You will also continue to be eligible, subject to your continued employment by the Company and actual grant by the Compensation Committee in its discretion, to participate in such long-term equity and other incentive programs as are made available in the future to similarly situated executives at the Company. It is expected that such awards will consist of annual grants of cash and/or equity awards with an annual target value of not less than $2,250,000, as determined by the Compensation Committee. Any such awards would be subject to actual grant to you by the Compensation Committee in its discretion pursuant to the applicable plan documents and would be subject to terms and conditions established by the Compensation Committee in its discretion that would be detailed in separate agreements you would receive after any award is actually made.
You will also continue to be eligible for our standard benefits program at the levels that are made available to similarly situated executives at the Company. Participation in our benefits program is subject to meeting the relevant eligibility requirements, payment of the required premiums, and the terms of the plans themselves. You will be entitled to four (4) weeks vacation per year, to be accrued and used in accordance with Company policy.
Effective immediately, you and the Company agree to be bound by the additional covenants and provisions applicable to each that are set forth in the
Annex
attached hereto, which
Annex
shall be deemed to be a part of this Agreement.
If your employment with the Company is terminated during the Term (1) by the Company or (2) by you for 
Good Reason,
 and at the time of such termination under clauses (1) or (2) 
Cause
 does not exist, then, subject to your execution and the effectiveness of a severance agreement satisfactory to the Company, which severance agreement (the 
Severance Agreement
) shall include, without limitation, a full and complete general release in favor of the Company and its affiliates, and their respective directors and officers, as well as your agreement to non-competition (limited to one year), non-solicitation, non-disparagement, confidentiality and further cooperation obligations and restrictions substantially in the form set forth in the
Annex
attached hereto, the Company will provide you with the following:
-2-
Compensation Committee in its discretion, but without adjustment for your individual performance;
If you cease to be an employee of the Company prior to the Expiration Date as a result of your death or your physical or mental disability, and at such time Cause does not exist then, subject (other than in the case of death) to your execution and delivery, within 60 days after the date of termination of your employment, and non-revocation (within any applicable revocation period) of the Severance Agreement, you or your estate or beneficiary shall be provided with the benefits and rights set forth in sections 2, 3, 5 and 6 above, and each of your outstanding long-term cash incentive awards granted under the plans of the Company shall
-3-
immediately vest in full, whether or not subject to performance criteria and shall be payable on the 90th day after the termination of your employment;
provided
, that if any such award is subject to any performance criteria, then (i) if the measurement period for such performance criteria has not yet been fully completed, then the payment amount shall be at the target amount for such award and (ii) if the measurement period for such performance criteria has already been fully completed, then the payment of such award shall be at the same time and to the extent that other similarly situated executives receive payment as determined by the Compensation Committee (subject to satisfaction of the applicable performance criteria). Notwithstanding sections 4, 5 and 6 above or the foregoing paragraph, in the event of a Going Private Transaction or a Change of Control, as such terms are defined in your respective long-term cash incentive, restricted stock, restricted stock unit, stock option or stock appreciation right award agreements, or in the event of your death, you will be entitled to receive the more favorable vesting and payment provisions (if any) provided in such award agreements;
provided
,
however
, that to the extent any previously granted award agreement provides for deferred compensation subject to Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (
Section 409A
), then payment will not be made prior to the earliest date permitted under Section 409A.
This Agreement does not constitute a guarantee of employment or benefits for any definite period. Your employment may be terminated by you or the Company at any time, with or without notice, liability (subject to the terms of this Agreement) or cause. This Agreement shall automatically terminate upon your death.
If and to the extent that any payment or benefit hereunder, or any plan, award or arrangement of the Company or its affiliates, is determined by the Company to constitute non-qualified deferred compensation subject to Section 409A and is payable to you by reason of your termination of employment, then (a) such payment or benefit shall be made or provided to you only upon a separation from service as defined for purposes of Section 409A under applicable regulations and (b) if you are a specified employee (within the meaning of Section 409A and as determined by the Company), such payment or benefit shall not be made or provided before the date that is six months after the date of your separation from service (or your earlier death). Any amount not paid or benefit not provided in respect of the six month period specified in the preceding sentence will be paid to you in a lump sum or provided to you as soon as practicable after the expiration of such six month period. Any such payment or benefit shall be treated as a separate payment for purposes of Section 409A to the extent Section 409A applies to such payments.
To the extent you are entitled to any expense reimbursement from the Company that is subject to Section 409A, (i) the amount of any such expenses eligible for reimbursement in one calendar year shall not affect the expenses eligible for reimbursement in any other taxable year (except under any lifetime limit applicable to expenses for medical care), (ii) in no event shall any such expense be reimbursed after the last day of the calendar year following the calendar year in which you incurred such expense, and (iii) in no event shall any right to reimbursement be subject to liquidation or exchange for another benefit.
-4-
The Company may withhold from any payment due to you hereunder any taxes that are required to be withheld under any law, rule or regulation. If any payment otherwise due to you hereunder would result in the imposition of the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code, the Company will instead pay you either (i) such amount or (ii) the maximum amount that could be paid to you without the imposition of the excise tax, depending on whichever amount results in your receiving the greater amount of after-tax proceeds (as reasonably determined by the Company). In the event that any such payment or benefits payable to you hereunder would be reduced because of the imposition of such excise tax, then such reduction will be determined in a manner which has the least economic cost to you and, to the extent the economic cost is equivalent, such payments or benefits will be reduced in the inverse order of when the payments or benefits would have been made to you (i.e., later payments will be reduced first) until the reduction specified is achieved.
This Agreement is personal to you and without the prior written consent of the Company shall not be assignable by you otherwise than by will or the laws of descent and distribution. This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of, and be enforceable by, your legal representatives. This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of, and be binding upon, the Company and its successors and assigns.
To the extent permitted by law, you hereby waive any and all rights to a jury trial with respect to any claim arising out of or in any way connected with or related to this Agreement, your employment by the Company or the termination of your employment with the Company.
This Agreement will be governed by and construed in accordance with the law of the State of New York applicable to contracts made and to be performed entirely within that State.
You hereby irrevocably submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of the State of New York and the federal courts of the United States of America located in the State of New York solely in respect of the interpretation and enforcement of the provisions of this Agreement, and you hereby waive, and agree not to assert, as a defense that you are not subject thereto or that the venue thereof may not be appropriate.
You hereby agree that mailing of notice, process or other papers in connection with any such action or proceeding in any manner as may be permitted by law shall be valid and sufficient service thereof if delivered to you at your address set forth above or to such other address as you may later designate in writing for the receipt of such notices.
This Agreement may not be amended or modified otherwise than by a written agreement executed by the parties hereto or their respective successors and legal representatives.
The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement. If any provision of this Agreement is held by any court of competent jurisdiction to be illegal, invalid, void or unenforceable, such provision shall be deemed modified, amended and narrowed to the extent
-5-
necessary to render the same legal, valid and enforceable, and the other remaining provisions of this Agreement shall not be affected but shall remain in full force and effect.
Capitalized terms used in this Agreement, including in the
Annex
attached hereto, shall have the meanings set forth below:
C
ause
 means your (i) commission of an act of fraud, embezzlement, misappropriation, willful misconduct, gross negligence or breach of fiduciary duty against the Company or an affiliate thereof, or (ii) commission of any act or omission that results in a conviction, plea of no contest, plea of
nolo
contendere
, or imposition of unadjudicated probation for any crime involving moral turpitude or any felony.
Good Reason
 means that (1) without your consent, (A) your base salary or annual bonus target (as each may be increased from time to time in the Compensation Committees discretion) is reduced, (B) your title is reduced, (C) you report directly to someone other than the Executive Chairman or the President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company, (D) your responsibilities as in effect immediately after the date hereof are thereafter materially diminished or (E) the Company requires that your principal office be located more than fifty (50) miles from Manhattan, (2) you have given the Company written notice, referring specifically to this letter and definition, that you do not consent to such action, (3) the Company has not corrected such action within 30 days of receiving such notice,
and
(4) you voluntarily terminate your employment with the Company within 90 days following the happening of the action described in subsection (1) above.
It is the parties intention that this Agreement not be construed more strictly with regard to you or the Company. This Agreement reflects the entire understanding and agreement of you and the Company with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior understandings and agreements.
AMC NETWORKS INC.
By: _/s/ Joshua W. Sapan________
Name: Joshua W. Sapan     Title:     President and CEO
ACCEPTED AND AGREED:
_/s/ Edward A. Carroll________
Edward A. Carroll
Date: April 19, 2013
-6-
ANNEX
This Annex constitutes part of the Agreement, dated April 19, 2013, by and between Edward A. Carroll (
You
) and AMC Networks Inc. (the 
Company
). Terms defined in the Agreement shall have the same meanings in this Annex.
You agree to comply with the following covenants in addition to those set forth in the Agreement.
1.    Confidentiality
(a)    
Agreement.
You agree to keep the existence and terms of this Agreement confidential (unless it is made public by the Company)
provided
that (1) you are authorized to make any disclosure required of you by any federal, state or local laws or judicial proceedings, after providing the Company with prior written notice and an opportunity to respond to such disclosure (unless such notice is prohibited by law), (2) you are authorized to disclose this Agreement and its terms to your legal, financial and tax advisors or to members of your immediate family so long as such advisors and family members agree to maintain the confidentiality of the Agreement, (3) you and your representatives and agents may disclose to any and all persons, without limitation of any kind, the tax treatment and tax structure of this Agreement and all materials of any kind (including opinions or other tax analyses) that are provided to you relating to such tax treatment or structure, and (4) you may disclose this Agreement in connection with any action by you to enforce this Agreement.
(b)    
Confidential and Proprietary Information.
You agree to retain in strict confidence and not use for any purpose whatsoever or divulge, disseminate, copy, disclose to any third party, or otherwise use any Confidential Information, other than for legitimate business purposes of the Company and its affiliates. As used herein, 
Confidential Information
 means any non-public information of a confidential, proprietary, commercially sensitive or personal nature of, or regarding, the Company or any of its affiliates or any director, officer or member of senior management of any of the foregoing (collectively 
Covered Parties
). The term Confidential Information includes information in written, digital, oral or any other format and includes, but is not limited to (i) information designated or treated as confidential, (ii) budgets, plans, forecasts or other financial or accounting data; (iii) subscriber, customer, guest, fan vendor or shareholder lists or data; (iv) technical or strategic information regarding the Covered Parties cable, data, telephone, programming, advertising, sports, entertainment, film production, theatrical, motion picture exhibition or other businesses, (v) advertising, business, programming, sales or marketing tactics and strategies; (vi) policies, practices, procedures or techniques, (vii) trade secrets or other intellectual property; (vii) information, theories or strategies relating to litigation, arbitration, mediation, investigations or matters relating to governmental authorities; (vii) terms of agreements with third parties and third party trade secrets, (viii) information regarding employees, players, coaches, agents, talent, consultants, advisors or representatives, including their compensation or other human resources policies and procedures and (ix) any other information the disclosure of which may have an adverse effect on the Covered Parties business reputation, operations or competitive position, reputation or standing in the community.
(c)    
Exception for Disclosure Pursuant to Law.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the obligations set forth in subsection (b) above, other than with respect to subscriber or customer information, shall not apply to Confidential Information that is:
1)    already in the public domain;
Notwithstanding anything contained elsewhere in this Agreement, you are authorized to make any disclosure required of you by any federal, state or local laws or judicial, arbitral or governmental agency proceedings, after providing the Company with prior written notice and an opportunity to respond prior to such disclosure. In addition, this Agreement in no way restricts or prevents you from providing truthful testimony concerning the Company to judicial, administrative, regulatory or other governmental authorities.
2.    Non-Compete
You acknowledge that due to your executive position in the Company and your knowledge of Confidential Information, your employment by or affiliation with certain businesses would be detrimental to the Company or any of its direct or indirect subsidiaries. You agree that, without the prior written consent of the Company, you will not represent, become employed by, consult to, advise in any manner or have any material interest, directly or indirectly, in any Competitive Entity (as defined below). A 
Competitive Entity
 shall mean (1) any person, entity or business that (i) competes with any of the Companys or any of its affiliates programming, advertising, entertainment, theatrical, film production, motion picture exhibition or other existing businesses, nationally or regionally; or (ii) directly competes with any other business of the Company or one of its subsidiaries that produced greater than 10% of the Companys revenues in the calendar year immediately preceding the year in which the determination is made, or (2) any trade or professional association representing any of the businesses covered by this paragraph, other than the National Cable Television Association and any state cable television association. Ownership of not more than 1% of the outstanding stock of any publicly traded company shall not, by itself, be a violation of this paragraph. This agreement not to compete will expire on the first anniversary of the date on which your employment with the Company has terminated if such termination occurs prior to the Expiration Date.
3.    Additional Understandings
You agree, for yourself and others acting on your behalf, that you (and they) have not disparaged and will not disparage, make negative statements about or act in any manner which is intended to or does damage to the good will of, or the business or personal reputations of the Company, any of its affiliates or any of their respective incumbent or former officers, directors, agents, consultants, employees, successors and assigns.
This agreement in no way restricts or prevents you from providing truthful testimony concerning the Company or its affiliates as required by court order or other legal process; provided that you afford the Company written notice and an opportunity to respond prior to such disclosure.
In addition, you agree that the Company is the owner of all rights, title and interest in and to all documents, tapes, videos, designs, plans, formulas, models, processes, computer programs, inventions (whether patentable or not), schematics, music, lyrics, programming ideas and other technical, business, financial, advertising, sales, marketing, customer, programming or product development plans, forecasts, strategies, information and materials (in any medium whatsoever) developed or prepared by you or with your cooperation during the course of your employment by the Company (the 
Materials
). The Company will have the sole and exclusive authority to use the Materials in any manner that it deems appropriate, in perpetuity, without additional payment to you.
4.    Further Cooperation
Following the date of termination of your employment with the Company, you will no longer provide any regular services to the Company or represent yourself as a Company agent. If, however, the Company so requests, you agree to cooperate fully with the Company in connection with any matter with which you were involved prior to such employment termination, or in any litigation or administrative proceedings or appeals (including any preparation therefore) where the Company believes that your personal knowledge, attendance or participation could be beneficial to the Company or its affiliates. This cooperation includes, without limitation, participation on behalf of the Company and/or its affiliates in any litigation, administrative or similar proceeding, including providing truthful testimony.
The Company will provide you with reasonable notice in connection with any cooperation it requires in accordance with this section and will take reasonable steps to schedule your cooperation in any such matters so as not to materially interfere with your other professional and personal commitments. The Company will reimburse you for any reasonable out-of-pocket expenses you reasonably incur in connection with the cooperation you provide hereunder as soon as practicable after you present appropriate documentation evidencing such expenses. You agree to provide the Company with an estimate of any such expense before it is incurred.
5.     No Hire or Solicit
For the term of the Agreement and until one year after the termination of your employment, you agree not to hire, seek to hire, or cause any person or entity to hire or seek to hire (without the prior written consent of the Company), directly or indirectly (whether for your own interest or any other person or entitys interest) any employee of the Company or any of its affiliates. This restriction does not apply to any employee who was discharged by the Company or any of its affiliates. In addition, this restriction will not prevent you from providing references.
6.    Acknowledgments
You acknowledge that the restrictions contained in this
Annex
, in light of the nature of the Companys business and your position and responsibilities, are reasonable and necessary to protect the legitimate interests of the Company. You acknowledge that the Company has no adequate remedy at law and would be irreparably harmed if you breach or threaten to breach any of the provisions of this
Annex
, and therefore agree that the Company shall be entitle injunctive relief to prevent any breach or threatened breach of any of the provisions and to specific performance of the terms of each of such provisions in addition to any other legal or equitable remedy it may have. You further agree that you will not, in any equity proceeding relating to the enforcement of the provisions of this
Annex
, raise the defense that the Company has an adequate remedy at law. Nothing in this
Annex
shall be construed as prohibiting the Company from pursuing any other remedies at law or in equity that it may have or any other rights that it may have under any other agreement. If it is determined that any of the provisions of this
Annex,
or any part thereof, is unenforceable because of the duration or scope (geographic or otherwise) of such provision, it is the intention of the parties that the duration or scope of such provision, as the case may be, shall be reduced so that such provision becomes enforceable and, in its reduced form, such provision shall then be enforceable and shall be enforced. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, in the event you violate the covenants and agreements set forth in this
Annex
, then, in addition to all other rights and remedies available to the Company, the Company shall have no further obligation to pay you any severance benefits or to provide you with any other rights or benefits to which you would have been entitled pursuant to this Agreement had you not breached the covenants and agreements set forth in this
Annex
.
7.    Survival
The covenants and agreement set forth in this
Annex
shall survive any termination or expiration of this Agreement and any termination of your employment with the Company, in accordance with their respective terms.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20130509095146.txt.gz
TIME:20130509095146
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
May 9, 2013
 
AMC Networks Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
(212) 324-8500
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Item 2.02    Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On
May 9, 2013
, AMC Networks Inc. (the Registrant) issued a press release announcing its financial results for the quarter ended
March 31, 2013
. A copy of the Registrants press release is being furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety.
The information furnished pursuant to this Item 2.02, including Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities under that Section and shall not be deemed to be incorporated by reference into any filing of the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act.
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits. The following Exhibit is furnished as part of this Report on Form 8-K:
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
AMC NETWORKS INC. REPORTS
FIRST QUARTER 2013 RESULTS
First Quarter 2013 Highlights
:
New York, NY - May 9, 2013
: AMC Networks Inc. (AMC Networks or the Company) (NASDAQ: AMCX) today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2013.
President and Chief Executive Officer Josh Sapan said: "AMC Networks is off to a strong start in
 
2013, with double digit increases in net revenues, AOCF and operating income driven by our popular original programming that is resonating with an increasing number of viewers and advertisers. Sundance Channel's two new original scripted shows,
Rectify
and
Top of the Lake
, have been met with wide critical and popular acclaim, and
Portlandia
, which has become IFC's signature show and one of the most unique comedies on television, completed its third season and continues to perform well. WE tv's successful series
Braxton Family Values
and
Mary Mary
out-delivered prior year averages, making WE tv a top three women's network on Thursday nights, and at AMC,
The Walking Dead
became the number one show for the broadcast season for adults 18-49 for all of television, a first for any cable series, up 55% from the prior season."
First quarter net revenues increased $56 million, or 17.1%, to $382 million over the first quarter of 2012, led by 18.2% growth at National Networks. Adjusted Operating Cash Flow (AOCF)
1
totaled $150 million, an increase of 19.5% or $24 million versus the prior year period. The AOCF increase resulted from 19.3% growth at National Networks partially offset by a $2 million decline in AOCF at International and Other. Operating income was $127 million, an increase of 31.4% or $30 million versus the prior year period. The operating income increase resulted from 29.5% growth at National Networks partially offset by a $2 million increase in the operating loss at International and Other.
First quarter net income from continuing operations was $62 million ($0.85 per diluted share), compared with $43 million ($0.60 per diluted share) in the first quarter of 2012. The increase resulted primarily from the growth in operating income.
For the three months ended March 31, 2013, net cash used in operating activities was $38 million and Free Cash Flow
1
was negative $46 million. These amounts represent a decrease of $115 million and $120 million, respectively, compared to the prior year period. The decrease was primarily the result of $83 million in cash income tax payments in the current period, compared to $2 million in the prior year period. The increase in cash income tax payments reflects $81 million in payments related to preliminary allocation of the VOOM HD settlement proceeds. See the Other Matters section of this release for a further discussion of this matter. Excluding the impact of cash income tax payments, the decrease in Free Cash Flow was primarily the result of an increase in working capital and capital expenditures partially offset by improved operating performance.
1. See definition of Adjusted Operating Cash Flow (AOCF) and Free Cash Flow included in the discussion of non-GAAP financial measures on page 3 of this earnings release.
1
Segment Results
National Networks
National Networks principally consists of the Company's four nationally distributed programming networks, AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel.
National Networks revenues for the first quarter 2013 increased 18.2% to $359 million, AOCF rose 19.3% to $159 million, and operating income grew 29.5% to $141 million, all compared to the prior year period.
Growth in revenues was primarily led by a 26.9% increase in advertising revenues to $164 million. The increase in advertising revenues was due to strong demand for our original programming, primarily at AMC. Distribution revenues increased 11.7% to $196 million. The growth in distribution revenues was primarily attributable to increases in digital distribution and affiliate fee revenues.
First quarter AOCF increased 19.3% to $159 million reflecting the increase in revenues partially offset by an increase in operating expenses. The increase in operating expenses was primarily attributable to higher programming expenses partially offset by a decrease in marketing expenses compared to the prior year period. The operating income increase reflected the growth in AOCF and a reduction in amortization expense.
International and Other
International and Other principally consists of AMC/Sundance Channel Global, the Company's international programming business; IFC Films, the Company's independent film distribution business; AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, the Company's network technical services business; various developing online content distribution initiatives; and VOOM HD.
International and Other revenues for the first quarter of 2013 were essentially flat at $26 million, AOCF declined $2 million to a deficit of $10 million, and operating loss increased $2 million to $15 million, all compared to the prior year period.
First quarter revenues reflected an increase in affiliate fee revenues related to the Company's international operations offset by a decline in revenues at IFC Films.
First quarter AOCF principally reflected an increase in professional fees related to the allocation of the VOOM HD settlement proceeds. Operating loss results reflected the AOCF performance.
2
Other Matters
DISH Network
As previously noted, on October 21, 2012, DISH Network L.L.C. (DISH Network) and the Company entered into a settlement agreement resolving the litigation between VOOM HD and DISH Network. In connection with the VOOM HD settlement agreement, DISH Network entered into a long-term affiliation agreement with the Company that provided for the carriage of AMC, IFC, Sundance Channel and WE tv. In addition, DISH Network paid $700 million to an account for the benefit of Cablevision Systems Corporation (Cablevision) and the Company. As of December 31, 2012, $350 million of the settlement proceeds were preliminarily distributed to each of Cablevision and the Company.
On April 8, 2013, Cablevision and the Company entered into an agreement to finalize the allocation of the $700 million in settlement proceeds. As a result of the April 8
th
agreement, the Company retained $175 million and paid the remaining $175 million of the $350 million that was previously distributed to it to Cablevision. Additionally, during the second quarter, the Company expects to record to operating income a litigation settlement gain of approximately $133 million.
Please see the Company's Form 10-Q for the period ended March 31, 2013 for further details.
Description of Non-GAAP Measures
The Company defines Adjusted Operating Cash Flow (AOCF), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as operating income (loss) before depreciation and amortization, share-based compensation expense or benefit and restructuring expenses or credits. Because it is based upon operating income (loss), AOCF also excludes interest expense (including cash interest expense) and other non-operating income and expense items. The Company believes that the exclusion of share-based compensation expense or benefit allows investors to better track the performance of the various operating units of the business without regard to the effect of the settlement of an obligation that is not expected to be made in cash.
The Company believes that AOCF is an appropriate measure for evaluating the operating performance of the business segments and the Company on a consolidated basis. AOCF and similar measures with similar titles are common performance measures used by investors, analysts and peers to compare performance in the industry.
Internally, the Company uses net revenues and AOCF measures as the most important indicators of its business performance, and evaluates management's effectiveness with specific reference to these indicators. AOCF should be viewed as a supplement to and not a substitute for operating income (loss), net income (loss), and other measures of performance presented in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP"). Since AOCF is not a measure of performance calculated in accordance with GAAP, this measure may not be comparable to similar measures with similar titles used by other companies. For a reconciliation of AOCF to operating income (loss), please see page 6 of this release.
The Company defines Free Cash Flow from Continuing Operations, (Free Cash Flow), which is a non-GAAP financial measure, as net cash provided by operating activities (continuing operations) less capital expenditures (continuing operations), both of which are reported in our Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. Net cash provided by operating activities excludes net cash provided by operating activities of discontinued operations. The Company believes the most comparable GAAP financial measure of its liquidity is net cash provided by operating activities. The Company believes that Free Cash Flow is useful as an indicator of its overall liquidity, as the amount of Free Cash Flow generated in any period is representative of cash that is available for debt repayment, investment, and other discretionary and non-discretionary cash uses. The Company also believes that Free Cash Flow is one of several benchmarks used by analysts and investors who follow the industry for comparison of its liquidity with other companies in the industry, although the Company's measure of Free Cash Flow may not be directly comparable to similar measures reported by other companies. For a reconciliation of Free Cash Flow to net cash provided by operating activities, please see page 7 of this release.
3
Forward-Looking Statements
This earnings release may contain statements that constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management's current expectations and are subject to uncertainty and changes in circumstances. Investors are cautioned that any such forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance or results and involve risks and uncertainties, and that actual results or developments may differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including financial community and rating agency perceptions of the Company and its business, operations, financial condition and the industries in which it operates and the factors described in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including the sections entitled "Risk Factors" and "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" contained therein. The Company disclaims any obligation to update any forward-looking statements contained herein.
Conference Call Information
AMC Networks will host a conference call today at 11:00 a.m. ET to discuss its first quarter 2013 results. To listen to the call, visit http://www.amcnetworks.com or dial 1-877-347-9170, using the following passcode: 44068483.
About AMC Networks Inc.
AMC Networks owns and operates several of cable television's most recognized brands delivering high quality content to audiences and a valuable platform to distributors and advertisers. The Company manages its business through two reportable operating segments: (i) National Networks, which includes AMC, WE tv, IFC and Sundance Channel; and (ii) International and Other, which includes AMC/Sundance Channel Global, our international programming business; IFC Films, the Company's independent film distribution business; and AMC Networks Broadcasting & Technology, the Company's network technical services business. For more information on AMC Networks, please visit the Company's website at http://www.amcnetworks.com.
Contacts
        
    
        
4
AMC NETWORKS INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
Three Months Ended March 31, 2013 and 2012
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
(Unaudited)
5
AMC NETWORKS INC.
SUPPLEMENTAL FINANCIAL DATA
(Dollars in thousands)
(Unaudited)
6
AMC NETWORKS INC.
SUPPLEMENTAL FINANCIAL DATA
(In thousands)
(Unaudited)
7


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AMCX/AMCX-8K-20130610161313.txt.gz
TIME:20130610161313
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
June 10, 2013 (June 6, 2013)
 
AMC Networks Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
(212) 324-8500
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
(a) On June 6, 2013, AMC Networks Inc. (the Company) held its 2013 annual meeting of stockholders. In accordance with the Companys Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, the Class A stockholders have one vote per share and the Class B stockholders have ten votes per share. The proposals are described in detail in the Companys proxy statement for the 2013 Annual Meeting of Stockholders filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission on April 25, 2013.
(b) Shareholders voted on the matters set forth below. The final results for the votes regarding each proposal are set forth below.
The Companys Class B stockholders elected the eight directors listed below to the Board of Directors, each for a one-year term. The votes regarding this proposal were as follows:
 
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
